BOOK THE FIRST.
THE LAST NIGHT.
I will send a Deliverer to this land of the New World, who shall save my people
from physical bondage, even as my Son saved them from the bondage of spiritual death.
CHAPTER FIRST.
THE WARNING.
Night
came slowly down upon the wintry scene, as the travellers,
turning from the road, entered the narrow lane, which led toward the
wood-hidden stream.
It was a winter evening, sad and beautiful as a pure angel, looking
from heaven upon the crimes and agonies of Man.
Do you behold the scene?
Comeby this oaken tree, which stands beside the rude fence, built of
intermingled timber and stonewe will stand and gaze upon the valley,
bathed in the tender solemnity of winter twilight.
There is snow upon these hills; a white mantle glitters like a shining
shroud over the valley. The western sky is one soft mass of purple and
gold; it glows as with the last impassioned kiss of day. And up, into
that sky, so pure, so transparent and serene, the leafless trees raise their
dark branches.
Not a cloud in the dome, nothing to mar that vast expanse of blue,
blushing into gold. The very air is full of rest, a deep repose, scarcely
broken by a slight breezeso keen, so bitter coldwhich seems to skim
over the frozen snow, and hover near it, as it scatters the shining particles
in the light of the darkening day.
The lane leads through the valley, winding along the ridge, above the
frozen streamlet in the east. And above that frozen streamlet, on the
knoll which towers in the east, the dark grey walls of a cluster of
buildings
,
grow crimson in the flush of the western sky. Look upon them
are they not beautiful? A rugged farm-house, seen through the branches
of some leafless trees; a mill, built of huge logs, with the icicles
glittering
like diamonds on its motionless wheel; a corn-crib with the golden
ears peeping from its snow-white bars.
This is the view toward the east, but in the north, the course of the
lane is lost to view, amid the dark mass of rocks and woods. Do not
turn your eye from these rocks and woods, nor pass them by as devoid
of interest, for they shelter the
Wissahikon
.
They shroud from your sight that stream, which bears the name of a
love-maddened Indian girl, who buried her love and her wrongs in its
clear waters. By those strange waters we will discover the scenesthe
men and the womenof this, our Solemn History.
For it is a solemn history, telling in every page of the strong agonies
of love, fanaticism and madness; now gliding in the solemn chambers,
where a secret brotherhood celebrate their rites, and passing again into
the cheerful glow of an olden time fire-side. Think not that it is a
history
of my own production. Think not that I have but sat me down,
on this drear winter night, to tell an idle romance, to coin a marvellous
fableno! I but write again the dark story which is already written, on
many a dusky and blotted pagedusky with age, and blotted with tears.
I am but the translator of that dread story, which has been recorded
in mystic ciphers, for seventy years. It is my task to give the ciphers,
which look so unmeaning and sometimes appear so grotesque, the tongue
and language of every-day life. And when the shadows of this history
gloom terribly before you, and its phantoms rouse wild and contending
emotions
in your hearts, and the words which fall from their weird lips, sound
in your ears like the words of the dead, do not too harshly blame, I beseech
you, the wizard craft of the author, who has only invokednot created
these Ghosts of the Past.
Along this valley, at the hour of sunset, on the last day of the year of
our Lord, 1774, two travellers took their way. As their footsteps broke
the frozen snow, their faces were bathed in the mild light of the winter
evening.
It needed no second glance to tell you the relation which these
way-farers
bore to each other. They were Master and Servant.
It is true you gained no knowledge of this fact, from survey of their
garb. They were attired alike in the costume of humble toil.
The youngest of the two, not more than twenty years in age, was at
least six feet in stature. His step was firm and graceful; his coarse garb
could not hide the muscular beauty of his chest, nor altogether veil the
round proportions of his sinewy limbs. From his cap of coarse grey fur,
waving masses of light brown hair floated in the light. His complexion
was light, sanguine, almost florid, and his features firm and regular in
their well-defined outlines. As he turned to the western sky, you might
discern the colour of his eyes by the fading light. They were clear,
large and brilliant, and in color, trembled between a deep azure and
midnight
black.
As he walked along the narrow laneclad in a coat of coarse grey
cloth reaching to the knees and buttoned to the throathis manly figure
cast its distinct shadow far over the mantle of glittering snow.
The elder wayfarer presented a strange contrast to his young and
handsome
companion, or, to speak more correctly, his Master. There was
something intensely ludicrous in his look, his gait, the outline of his form,
the very twinkle of his small black eyes.
That outline, described on the frozen snow, was in itself a grotesque
picture. Imagine a round paunch, supported by long and spider-like legs;
arms whose excessive length is only matched by their intense want of
flesh; hands huge and bony; high shoulders, surmounted by a small face,
red as a cherry, round as an apple, with a wide mouth, small nose, and
diminutive eyes, shining like flame-sparks amid laughing wrinkles.
This was the servant, clad like his master, wearing the same garb, a fur
cap precisely similar, and yet presenting in every outline a contrast so
laughable. To complete the picture, you must not permit a single lock
of hair to wander from beneath that cap. No! The grey fur is drawn
tightly over the forehead, while beneath itlike a beaconshines the
red, round face.
In the calm silence of that winter evening they journeyed on, their
faces bathed in the same mellow light, their long shadows trembling over
the snow. The red-faced servant beguiled the way, with many singular
substitutes for conversation, but dared not speak. His master had
forbidden
him to unclose his enormous mouth. Therefore, while the young
man, with a stout oaken staff in hand, strode steadily on, his eyes fixed
upon the ground, a sombre thought stealing over his facethe servant
amused himself by a sort of dumb show, that gave a deeper grotesqueness
to his round face and spider-like form. He walked like a man afflicted
with a distressing lameness; he inflated his round cheeks, until they seemed
ready to burst; he rolled his eyes in their sockets, and distorted his mouth,
until his face resembled a frog in the agonies of a galvanic spasm; and
last of all, placing one hand on his hip, and twisting one leg into a
serpentine
shape, he advanced with the graceful gait of a belated Muscovy
duck. Still the young Master did not pay the least attention to his antics,
nor suffer his eyes to wander to the ridiculous mimic who limped at his side.
Presently they stand on the verge of yonder bridge of dark stone,
which spans the narrow streamlet. Two roads meet beside the bridge;
one, the continuation of the lane, winds around yonder cluster of cottages
and skirts the mill-dam, which, framed in woods, sparkles before us. The
other road, a narrow path, rough with deep ruts, and scarcely wide enough
for the passage of two horses, when journeying abreast, leads over the
little stone bridge, and is lost to view on yonder hill-top, among the
ever-green
pines.
Which road,
John
said the servant, venturing at last to break the
silence, and laying a strange emphasis on the Italicized word.
Over the bridge, and up among the pines. It is the nearest to the
farm-house.
They crossed the bridge and rapidly approached the shadows. In a
moment they will have passed from the soft glow of the twilight into
the darkness of the hill-side, where the pines, almost touching from either
side, and depending from the high banks, enclosed the road as in two
high and almost contiguous walls.
We are near the Wissahikon, Jacob the young master began.
Jacopo
, if you please, whispered the servant, with a peculiar
contortion
;
In Italy we were called
JacopoJacopo
, you remember! Hang
Jacob
. It's low, and smells like a greasy penny. Jacopo has a silvery
sound.
We are near the Wissahikon, Jacopo. Near the farm-houseyou
understand? What course do you advise? In a few moments we will
be there
The young man hesitated, as though afraid to trust his voice with the
thought of his heart. He cast his eyes along the dark and narrow pass,
and seemed to feel the silence and shadow that brooded in those thick
pines, among those grey rocks. In that gloom, even the cherry-ripe face
of Jacob, or Jacopo, as the reader pleases, grew sad, and his beacon-like
nose lost its freshness.
What course? Can it be possible that you ask me? A beautiful
pair of ankles, a fine bust, an eye like a star after a shower, and a cheek
like a peach with the sun shining on its ripest sideBah! What have
you been doing for this month back? In Italy
Corpo di Bacco!
(Fine oath that!)we managed these things much better
Come to the point, Jacopo, and the master touched the servant
with his oaken staff.
I'm coming. Give me time. Here you have been for a whole
month, wasting your time in toying with this forest damsel, when
The pass grew darker. Some few paces ahead, a belt of light broke
through an aperture among the trees, and glowed brightly upon the summit
of a solitary rock.
When? echoed the young master, laying his hand upon his
servant's
arm.
Jacopo halted; the strange expression of his small black eye,that
leer, half-comical, half-satanicwere visible even in the gloom.
When a few grains of white powder, quietly mixed in a cup of
wine, would do the work of a whole year of boyish courtship
What mean you? The voice of John sounded deep and hollow
through the silence of the pass.
You remember Florence? She was a proud lady thatbut
Pshaw! You know how it happened, when we were in Italy. And
this is but a Peasant Girl!
These incoherent words and broken hints had a powerful effect upon
the young man. You see his nether lip move tremulously; his bright
eye grow brighter, his broad chest heave like a wave.
That was a proud lady, Jacopo, who first loved, then scorned me
he gasped. But Medeline
`But Madeline,' mimicked the servant, speaking in a dolorous nasal
toneA peasant girl. Lives on this out-of-the-way stream they call
2
Wissahikonor Wiskeysikeenor some such name. We come from
Philadelphia, disguised as a
merchant's clerk
. We visit the farm-house,
meet the little girl in the woods, and talk romance by the dozen. We
that is you, Mister
John
spend our time, in saying soft nonsense, when
we should trap the little bird, and cage it, without a moment's delay.
Bah! I'm ashamed of you, John. We managed these things much better
in Italy.
As he spoke, a strange vision broke upon the wayfarers' eyes. They
started backstood spell-bound with involuntary terror.
They had reached the rock, over whose rugged brow broke the last
glow of the winter's day. It stood alone, a bright thing among the dark
pines, its crest shining like gold.
On that crest arose a shapeless and uncouth figure. Was it a man, or
some strange beast, perched before them on the summit of the lonely
rock? It rose before them, a stunted figure, with arms folded over its
broad chest, an uncouth hump rising above its shoulders, long hair and
beard, waving black and straight in the winter wind. Two eyes, bright
as flaming coals, glared from that hideous, half-human visage, with
waving hair above, and streaming beard below.
The travellers saw those thin lips move, they felt the vivid light of
those eyes, and between them and the light, right across their path, a
long arm, with bony fingers, was extended.
Go back! a voice was heard speaking through the intense silence
which had fallen upon the passGo back! Heir of a noble house
last man of an illustrious raceI stand in your path, and warn ye back
from this soil. Back, I say, and never let your footsteps press this sod
again. There is danger for you here. That word Wissahikon means
death and judgment to your race. Even now, in England your father
prays for the safe return of his sonand here you come to plot the ruin
of an innocent woman, and grasp your death over her dishonored corse!
The echo of that hollow voice died away; the travellers looked up;
the rock was there, glowing in the light, but the uncouth shape had
vanished
like a dream.
It is plainly to be seen, even through the gathering gloom of the
hill-side
pass, that these words of omen, uttered by the apparition, which
appeared
for a moment only, on the crest of the rock, had their own effect
strange and deadeningupon the minds of the wayfarers.
Jacopo sank on his knees, and began to pray in four or five languages.
Having exhausted the calendar of Catholic saints, implored the assistance
of Martin Luther, and other reformers, he concluded with the emphatic
ejaculation
Devil help me! We didn't see any thing like this in Italy!
John tottered forward, and leaned against the rock, while the cold dew
stood on his forehead.
Here it stoodthat horrible phantom he madly pressed the cold
rock with his handsHereand warned me back
The words died on his lips. Something there was in the gathering
night of that forest to impress his heart with awe; but even yet, he saw
it, distinctly pictured in the twilight air, that phantom of a deformed man,
with the face of a human being, the cold lustrous eyes of a fiend.
Come, Jacopo, he faltered, we will go back! This is an unholy
adventure. Up, man! Do you not see, that the very Devil warns us to
retrace our steps!
Jacopo, still on his knees, glanced about him, with a nervous fear.
Let us forward to the farm-house. The night is cold as Iceland, and
we'll freeze to death. Come, my lord
Fool! Dare you breathe that title in these woods? Have I not
commanded you? Remember, knave he finished the sentence by a
hearty admonition, administered on the cheek, with the palm of his hand.
Then, as if ashamed of his recent emotion, he led the way through the
darkness
Come! I am going to the farm-house. Madeline awaits me!
Followed by his trembling servant, the young man urged his way
over the snow, and among the withered leaves, while above, the thickly
clustering pines extended their canopy, blacker than the midnight
without
a star.
Soon emerging from the shadows, they stood upon the verge of a hill,
with the sublime panorama of the twilight hour spread before them.
Above, that cloudless dome, deepening every moment into a more intense
azure. Beneath, a wide waste of woods, stretched grey and dark under
the twilight sky. And over that vague mass, just where it touched the
horizon, far in the west, hung a solitary star, glittering in lonely glory,
through the silent universe.
A low, musical murmur sounded through the night. It came through
the woods, echoing from the shadows which no eye might penetrate. It
was the voice of an impetuous rivulet, forcing its way among the rocks
of ice and rocks of granite. It was the Wissahikon.
Through the leafless trees, came one long and trembling ray of light,
shining like a golden arrow over the frozen snow.
It is the farm-house! cried Jacopo, twirling his arms in grotesque
delightThat's something like! Ah! I smell the good things already
I see the firethat hearty, good-humored fireI inhale the incense of
the sausages! Come, John, let us forward!
Winding along a foot-path, that led through the valley, over a frozen
brooklet, and up the opposite hill, they soon came in sight of the farm-house.
It was a massive edifice, built of alternate logs and stone, two stories in
height, with a steep roof and some five chimneys, of which the largest,
sent into the sky a rolling mass of smoke. It was a quaint structure
altogether
,
the windows narrow and low, the porch before the door, fashioned
of rough cedar, the steep roof cumbered with many rude ornaments along
the projecting eaves.
It stoodsingular as it may seemin the lowest part of a circular
hollow, which seemed to have been scooped out from the surrounding
woods.
On one side the portly barn, looking, for all the world, like a rich and
self-complacent citizen retired from the business of active life, and given
up at once to meditation and corpulence. On the other side arose a giant
horse-chesnut tree, with ponderous trunk and many and far-reaching
branches. Near the barn, on one side of the enclosures of the cattle-yard,
the corn-crib was seen, packed to bursting with the ears of golden maize.
Along the lane, which led to the farm-house door, a line of vehicles
was discernible, with the horses attached to them, carefully tied to the
rail fence. Vehicles of every shape and pattern, from the massive
farmer's
wagon, whose sides had often groaned under the heavy load of corn
and hay, to the quaint gigsulky or calashwhich shall we call it?
that wonderful affair, with a top like a Monk's cowl, and a seat perched
high on springs, in which the village Doctor made his circuit among the
sick and suffering of the country-side.
From afar, the light of the fireside flashed through the farm-house
windows
,
out upon the starlight night. An air of Sabbath repose imbued the
scene,yet hold! strains of music break on the silence, music from an
old fiddle, in the hands of the blind Negro in the chimney corner. There
is a festival in the farm-house to-night. From far and near the country
people have come, to sing and dance and drink together, and send the old
year to his grave, with a chorus of boisterous joy.
In the summer-time, this farm-house is a pleasant sight to look upon.
Say, in the month of June, when the air seems like a breeze from
Paradise
,
and the Wissahikon goes singing on, among the trees that dip into
it, among the oaks that shadow it, among the flowers that tremble above
it, ready to fall and bless its waters with their white bosomssay, in the
month of June, have you ever seen the farm-house, framed in the drapery
of leaves and blossoms?
The horse-chesnut stretches forth its arms, clothed with broad leaves
deep and rich in their virgin greenand shelters the steep roof,
scattering
,
all the while, its snowy blossoms around the porch below.
There is a wild honeysuckle trailing over the dark timbers of the porch,
and the very lane, leading from the woods to the door, is enclosed in its
green hedges, two winding walls of leaves and buds and flowers. Then
the roof of the barn stands boldly out from the background of the forest,
and the fields around, tufted with grass, spread their carpet in the smile
of the summer skythat sky, which only wears a deeper blue, when
the clouds sweep over it, unfolding their bosoms to the sun.
Thus, in summer-time, smiles the quaint farm-house, a dark image
framed in freshness and verdure.
But now that dark image only looks more dark and dreary, as the gloom
of its walls is contrasted with the roof, covered with snow. The fields
around are whitelook! how the rays of the fireside go sparkling and
shining over the white mantle which veils the sod, and shields beneath it
the hidden seeds of spring.
The horse-chesnut springs with leafless branches into the blue heaven,
marking each rugged limb and little branch, in black distinctness, on the
clear azure. Winter is on the scene, and the woods which encircle the
farm-house and its white fields are black and desolate.
At the end of the lane, our travellers stood, gazing in silence upon the
prospect.
The young man, with his hands clasped on his staff, his head slightly
bowed, fixed his dilating eyes upon the lighted windows of the forest
home. He was silent; but even in the dim starlight, you might have
seen his broad chest swell, his brilliant eye grow wild with a more
intense
brightness.
Only a month since first I saw this home in the wilderness? he
murmured, and was silent again.
Only a month! And yet a great many thoughts may start into deeds
in a month. Only a month! It is but a little while, the humble twelfth
of the long year, and yet, in a month,
only a month
, battles may be lost
and won, nations hurled from masters into slaves, and bosoms that pant
beneath silk and velvet, may become cold and still under grass and sod.
Only a month! And yet, in a month, the heart of a pure virgin may be
robbed of its bloom; her form, the shrine of a love at once passionate and
pure, become the monument of her dishonor.
How the image of this wild forest girl has twined itself about the
chords of my heart! She is innocentshe trusts in meshe is pure!
To-morrow
It is a terrible word, that to-morrow. It is murmured alike by the
convict
,
taking his last sleep in the doomed cell, and by the woman, who,
surrendering her purity into the arms of shame, shrieks it fearfully amid
the frenzies of her guilty love.
To-morrow! Look upon the lip of the young traveller, curving in a
smile; read his dilating eye, warming with a wild yet voluptuous light,
and tell me what means that smile, that look? A fearful
to-morrow
for the wild forest girl!
The voice of Jacopo was heard:
I would suggest in the most delicate manner in the world, my Lor
that is,
Mister John
and without the least desire to appear obtrusive,
that there are two of us here, one of whomnot being delighted with stars
or forest girlsstands a dev'lish fine chance of being frozen to death.
Look at me, John! Did you ever see a human icicle before? Ah, it is
very well to smile, but all the blood in my thin legs has rushed into my
head, and from my head into my noseDid you ever see a nose like
that before?
He placed a long and skinny finger against that intense carbuncle which
formed the tip of his nose, and looked at his master with a sidelong leer.
Come, said John, with an involuntary smile, let us hasten to the
farm-house. Madeline awaits me.
As he hurried along the lane, Jacopo crept closer to his side, and taking
the arm of his master within his own, whispered these jocular words:
Music yonder, John,d'ye hear it? Supper tooAh! One can
smell that! Andd'ye rememberif the girl is willing, whyyou have
an elegant house in Philadelphia, which may be her home before
morning
.
If she refusesis obstinate, or stupidwhy, trust the matter to me.
`
A few grains of white powder, properly prepared
,' saith an ancient
Philosopher
,
`
conveyed into the drinking-cup of an innocent maiden, will
'
D'ye hear the fiddle, John?
CHAPTER SECOND.
YOCONOK.
Within
the farm-house the details of a strangely interesting picture,
lighted by the warmth of a capacious hearth, await us.
Yet ere we enter, we must go back to the hour of sunset, and gaze upon
a far different scene.
The rays of the setting sun, streaming through the thick pines, gave
their faint and uncertain light to a lonely nook in the forest of Wissahikon.
It was a circular space, not more than twenty yards in diameter. The
trunks of pine and fir trees, starting side by side from the sod, formed an
impenetrable wall around it; their branches, meeting overhead and woven
together, shadowed it like a roof. It is a silent place, enlivened only by
a ray of lightthat streams over the frozen snow like a golden thread,
and is gone ere you can look again.
The deep green of the branches forms a strong contrast to the slight
mantle of snow, which has drifted into this lonely nook.
Yonder, between those two huge trunks, you discern something, which
may be the resting-place of a man, and yet looks like the lair of a wild
beast.
This lair or hut, whatever you may choose to call it, is formed after the
simplest style of architecture. The trunks of those trees supply the place
of door-posts; the skins of wild beasts stretched from branch to branch,
compose the roof; some wild moss scattered on the sod beneath, at once
the bed and floor of the rude home.
Beside that hut, or lair, stands a rifle, with a stock of dark mahogany
inlaid with silver.
In the centre of the scene, seated on the trunk of that fallen tree
blasted last summer by the lightningyou behold the figure of a Man.
A Man, though his dark-red visage wears the wrinkles of an hundred
years. A single tuft of snow-white hair waves from the centre of his
skull. A blanket, much worn and tattered, falls back from his shoulders
and discloses the shrunken outlines of that once broad and sinewy chest.
His thin limbs are cased in leather leggings, and he wears moccasins on
his long, straight feet.
The downcast head, sunken on the chest in an attitude of stolid apathy,
at once arrests our attention. The high cheek-bones, the nose curved
like an eagle's beak, the bold arch of the brow, the forehead lofty in
proportion
to its width, all indicate an organization once full of physical and
mental power.
But age has fallen on that noble head and iron form. The deep
wrinkles
on either side of the compressed lips, the cavernous hollow beneath
each cheek-bone, the muscles of the neck, resembling cords of iron, all
speak of that stern life, whose sands have been falling for an hundred
years. Those sands are well-nigh run. A little while, and those dark
eyes, now glaring with vacant despair upon the sod, will be darkened
forever
by the shadow of the falling clod.
It is an Indian that we behold. One hundred years ago he was born,
in this very forest, the child of a King. Seventy years gone by, he strode
this soil, and looked, with a quivering pulse, upon the forms of his dusky
warriors. His wigwam was here; here his squaw, with the brown cheek
and sad, deep eyes, and his child, encased in its rude cradle, quivered in
its slumber upon yonder tree.
They are all gone now. His race has passed; they are forgotten by
the strange white race, who now people the woods, and rear their stone
wigwams on the plain.
Of all his race, he is the Last.
Think of the powerful People, who walked these woods an hundred
years agothe smoke of their wigwams rising from every dell, the gleam
of their many-colored wampum belts seen from every hill-topand then
behold this stern image of their Destiny
An old man, withered by the long winter of an hundred years, seated
alone in the silent forest, suffering at once from intense hunger and cold,
and dying by inches!
Go to the white man's home, and beg for bread! The old Indian is
too proud for that, even though no morsel has passed his lips for two
days. He will dieHark! you hear that low murmur from his thin,
cold lips?
It is the Death-Song of Yoconok, the last of his tribe.
He will die,alone,desolate as the winter which howls around him
but die proud and uncomplaining.
Ghosts of my fathers, hear my voice, for it is your child, it is
Yoconok
that calls!
The old man is coldno corn, no fire! But he is coming, Fathers
of the Red Menhe is coming to the happy hunting-grounds, he is
coming to the land of Manitto! He is cold now, but soon he will be
warmed by the sun that never shines upon winter or snow! He is
hungry, the old warrior, but there, the deer wander without ceasing,
through woods whose greenness never dies!
You are there, my fathers. Yoconok sees you, as you stand upon the
high mountain, which guards the happy hunting-grounds. The sunlight
is upon your faces. The smoke of the calumet encircles your heads.
Yoconok sees you allhe is coming! There, the squaw of Yoconok,
there his childhis Peopleall! Ghosts of my fathers, sing the song of
the war-path, for Yoconok is coming to the happy land, where the sun
never sets, and the leaf never dies!
Thus, in our imperfect way, have we endeavored to translate the stern
and simple death-song of the old Indian chief. When he spoke in the
tongue of the pale face, his words were few and grotesque, but in his
own tongue, the language of his fathers, Yoconok was eloquent. Look
upon him now, with that glassy eye brightening into new life, that chest
throbbing with quick pulsations, that brow raised proudly in the
wandering
gleam of the setting sun!
Fired with that last impulse of life, he started to his feet and seized the
rifle, and stood erect, with his chest thrown forward, as if in the act of
confronting a mortal foe. His eye was lighted with fire of forty years
ago, his nostrils quivered with a quick nervous motion.
Yoconok is on the war-path once more! Let the foe comethe old
warrior is young againhe knows no fear!
It was a glorious picture in the history of the Red Man; that solitary
nook, walled and roofed by trees, mantled with a slight covering of snow,
with the dying warrior erect in the centre, his chest bared, his arm raised
in the act of battle.
But it was only for a moment. The impulse died away, and the old
warrior sank helpless and exhausted upon the blasted tree. The rifle was
in his grasp, but his arm was nerveless, his sight dim and fast failing.
As he sank upon the log, the blanket falling from his shoulders, he
murmured in his Indian tongue
She was the only friend of the old warrior, but she comes to the
wigwam
no more. The White Doe dwells in the home of the pale face.
When Yoconok was sick, the White Doe camewhen he was cold, she
built his fireher hands fed him, when the old man could go forth on the
hunting-path no more. But Yoconok is dying, and the White Doe comes
not. The warrior is forgotten; the home of the pale face has fire and
water. The wigwam of Yoconok is dark!
Chilled by the intense cold, fevered by the want of food, the old
warrior
sank exhausted and insensible on the log. His eyes were glassy;
his arms hung nerveless by his side.
There was a step upon the snowy mossa light, soft-echoing step, like
the rustling of a withered leaf. From an interval between the trees,
toward
the west, the form of a woman appeared, and a woman's face looked
in upon the gloom of the lonely covert.
A wandering ray of sunlight shone over her brown hair, and gleamed
upon her humble garb, as she stood, with her hands raised in a gesture of
surprise and alarm.
She was a girl of not more than eighteen years, clad in the boddice and
coarse linsey skirt, which formed the costume of a peasant woman, in the
early days of Pennsylvania. Yet that boddice displayed the outline of a
full bosom, and from beneath that coarse skirt appeared two small feet
encased in rude moccasins.
From the folds of the brown cloak, which hung from her shoulders,
her round bare arms were visible, with a glimpse of the white neck and
fairer bosom rising slowly into view.
Yoconok! she cried, and, springing along the sod, stood over the
insensible
chief.
The sunlight, gushing suddenly through an opening in the boughs,
lighted up her face, while her form and the figure of the old man were
wrapt in soft shadow.
In that sudden light, which played over her brown cheeks, and shone
upon the unbound masses of her chesnut hair, the face of the young girl
looked like the countenance of a virgin saint, encircled in a glory.
Yoconok! she cried, in the Indian tongue, awake! the White
Doe is hereshe has not forgotten you! She brings you foodah!
she exclaimed, in English, he does not hear me, he is dead
Her voice seemed to call back to the old warrior's heart, the last
impulse
of life. His glassy eyes glowed with faint lustre; his motionless
lips were unclosed again.
Good! he muttered in English, with a deep guttural accent
Madlin'
White
DoeGood!
It would have made your heart beat quicker, to behold the angel-like
tenderness of that brown-cheeked maiden.
You are cold, Yoconok and she pressed his chilled hands to her
warm bosom, and wound the blanket around his shoulders. Then sinking
beside him, she drew some corn bread from the small basket which she
carried on her arm, but the old man could not eat.
The fire-water! he cried, clutching her cloak, as he pointed to his
throat. Yoconok is dryYoconok has not drank for two days
I have forgotten the flask! she exclaimed, as she tossed the contents
of the basket on the groundThe fire-water is not good for the Red
Man. It burns his heart, and puts the Evil Manitto in his veins! Wait,
YoconokI will bring you water from the Wissahikon
As she whispered these words in the Indian tongue, bending her lips to
his ear, a quick, pattering sound broke the deep silence of the shadowy
nook.
The young girl raised her eyes and stood spell-bound with surprise.
There, not ten paces from where she stood, a wild deer was gazing in
her face, with its large eyes dilating as in wonder and alarm. It was a
beautiful doe, with sleek brown skin and slender and tapering limbs.
The maiden stood like a statue; the gloom shadowed her from the view
of the cautious animal, while the sunlight fell like a scarf of gold over its
quivering nostrils and dilating eyes.
At once the brave girl's resolution was taken.
The old warrior has told me many a time, that the warm blood from
the neck of a dying doe, will save the life of the sick and starving.
The doe gazed for a moment around the covert, with that peculiar
glance of fear and alarmits short ears quivering all the whileand then,
stooping her head, began to browse the soft and fragrant moss, which
started from the intervals of the snow.
Even as the doe lowered her head, the young girl raised the rifle.
Her bosom heaved tremulously; it seemed a terrible sin to kill that
gentle thing, which fed so innocently before her eyes.
Again the doe raised her head, again elevated her ears and gazed
around, and all the while the rifle, lifted in the soft arms of the young
girl, was levelled at her breast.
Her aim was not the most certain in the world, yet as she raised the
rifle she murmuredIt is for Yoconok's life! and placed her finger
on the trigger.
At this moment the sunlight, shifting, played more freely over the
beautiful head and graceful limbs of the doe. She stood encircled by
light, while all around was twilight gloom.
For Yoconok's life! murmured the girl, her finger placed upon the
trigger, when a sharp, quick, almost imperceptible sound echoed from the
opposite side of the forest. As quick as thought, Madeline turned, and
her blood grew cold.
For, glaring from the shadow of a pine branch which touched the ground
two brilliant points of flame sent their rays to her very breast.
These brilliant points of flame, were the eyes of a female panther
which, crouching on the snow, was about to spring upon the
unconscious
deer.
The young girl saw that crouching form, darkly defined on the
snow-covered
sod.
I need not tell you that her heart beat quickly, that her color went
and came, while the rifle was grasped by arms, that seemed suddenly
frozen into stone.
She could not stir; terror held her paralyzed and dumb. A moment
fled! Still those fiery eyes glared from the covert; still, on the opposite
side, in the sunlight browsed the unconscious doe, raising every moment
her mild eyes into the sunglancing roundand then stooping her head
to feed again.
The doe must die, or else Yoconok's life is gone! If I kill the doe,
the panther will spring upon meif I turn the rifle upon the panther, the
doe will escape!
Thus ran her wandering thoughts; but at once she was resolved upon
her course of action. While her bosom heaved in gasps, while the hands
which grasped the rifle, seemed chilled in every vein, with the ice of death,
she still had the presence of mind to retain her statue-like position.
Again the doe raised her head. It was for the last time. For even as
her large mild eyes glittered in that passing ray of sunshine, a whizzing
sound disturbed the dead silencea dark body swept through the air,
before
the very eyes of the maidenand the doe lay mangled upon the sod,
its warm blood spouting over the panther's jaws.
The maiden beheld it all. Saw the fur of the wild beast glow sleek
and glossy in the sun, as, with a deep growl, she mangled the neck of the
quivering deer.
The rifle was raised. Hush! That sharp, quick report; how it
crashes on the silence!
Woe to the young girl now, woe to her, if her trembling aim has failed
to kill. For then, the jaws of the panther, which tore the palpitating
heart of the doe, will rend the bosom of the maiden, and grow crimson
with her blood.
She drew the trigger, and fell swooning on the ground.
But the sound of the rifle called the old warrior back to life. As we
gaze, in dumb surprise, he raises his head, starting into a sitting posture.
At a glance he beholds the dying doe, with the blood smoking as it pours
from the mangled throat. He does not heed the panther, which writhes
upon the sod, its skull cloven by the fortunate ball.
But tottering forward, he falls upon the sod, gathers the warm body of
the doe in his arms, and applies his lips to the wound in the throat.
He drinks the bloodaye, pure and fresh, as it pours from the palpitating
heart of the deerhe drinks the crimson current, with a mad delight.
Ugh! Yoconok is a warrior! Yoconok will follow his foe on the
war path and drink his blood!
It was some time before the young girl unclosed her eyes. Starting
from her swoon, Madeline saw that dark night had fallen upon the woods,
but the light of a cheerful flame shone in her face, and baptized those
giant trunks, the green canopy overhead, with a crimson glow.
She passed her hands over her eyes, and glanced hurriedly from side
to side. Before her, in the centre of the covert, a mass of ponderous
logs were blazing, their heat imparting a delicious temperature to the air
of the place, while by her side, crouched upon the sod, his face glowing
in the ruddy light, was Yoconok.
In one hand he held the calumet, from which he inhaled the
peace-inspiring
fumes of tobacco; in the other a piece of peeled hickory, which,
inserted in a slice of venison, held the savory morsel over the hot coals.
There was a calm expressiona look of deep quiet, and dreamy
composure
upon
each corded wrinkle of Yoconok's withered face.
When Madeline awoke, she discovered that her head was resting on
the Indian's knee. He had built the fire, and, like a kind nurse watching
over a sleeping babeplaced her head upon his knee, so that the full
light of the fire would shine into her face. In silence he guarded her
unconscious form.
Ugh! White Doe is good he said in English, as she unclosed
her eyesWhite Doe kill deer. Blood save Yoconok life. Manitto
told the White Doe, old man hungry, old man dying. White Doe came,
Yoconok strong!
With his fingers he tore the half-broiled venison, and devoured it with
all the eagerness of famine.
Madeline rose, and placed her hand upon the Indian's shoulder, and
stood in silence. The light of the fire streamed over her, and you might
freely read the expression of her face, and gaze upon each waving outline
of her form.
Around that face, whose rich brown hue deepened into vermilion on
the full lips and swelling cheek, swept the unbound masses of her brown
hair. Her eyes were large and shaded by long lashes. Their color was
a soft brown, darkening sometimes into black, but always brilliant and
sparkling as the stars that come forth in the purple of the twilight hour.
She was by no means tall, but that which her form lacked in height,
was supplied by its full and flowing outlines.
Her shoulders are seen above the coarse boddice, and like a wave that
swells without breaking, her young bosom comes gently into view.
The skirt of coarse texture which descended but a short distance below
the knee, gave some indications, by its folds, of the warm beauty of the
maiden's shape. Her cloak had fallen aside, and her arms glowed with
the clear hues and round outlines, in the light of the fire.
Altogether, a picture more interesting in its varied details cannot be
imagined
.
That fire, flashing over the bark of the encircling trees, and
lighting up the dark green branches above. The snow blushing into
crimson. Here the old Indian, a stern image of decay, seated on the
earth, his arms clasped on his knees, the smoke of the pipe winding
about his wrinkled features; there, a young girl clad in peasant attire,
yet with a ripening bloom glowing freshly from her brown face, and
waving in the outlines of her virgin form.
You must forgive me, Yoconokshe laid her hand upon the old
warrior's armFor two days I have not seen you. But I have not
been myself for two days. I have been wildmad! There is a dark
cloud upon the path of your White Doe.
As she spoke sadly in the dialect of the Indian, he inclined his head to
one side and listened in evident anxiety.
Does the old man hear the voice of the childor does the White
Doe speak the language of Dreams?
Madeline crouched on the earth by his side, and clasping her hands
over her form, murmured with a faltering voice
Yoconok is my only friend. For years his words have been life to
the poor orphan girl. She comes to him now. She, who never saw the
face of father or mother, who has lived all her life, by the fire of the
stranger, in dependence on others, now comes to the old man for counsel.
Tell me, father, what I must do, or I will die!
Her cheek was flushed, her bosom panting; she looked very beautiful,
with her large eyes veiled in moisture. The old chief turned; something
like affection shone in his lustreless eyeballs, as he placed her soft palm
in his bony fingers.
Shall the White Doe become the squaw of Gilbert the Hunter, the
Man who dwells in the forest, or of this Stranger, who comes from the
cities of the pale face, and has no name?
Yesthat is the question I would ask of youthree days since,
before I fell sick, I told you the whole story
The heart of the White Doe inclines to Gilbert, the Man of the
Forest, but her soul wanders against her will to the Stranger who has
no name?
Yesfaltered MadelineYesthat is it! I love Gilbert; we
were children together; I have always loved him. But this stranger,
who, a month ago, appeared for the first time in our farm-houseah!
His eye deprives me of all power; his voice fills me with a wild terror!
Wherever I move, I see himat night he is in my dreams! I fear him, and
yet an unknown power draws me toward him, and makes meNo!
No! Not love him! For I fear him too much. I cannot gaze into his
eye without a shudder!
The old warrior did not reply. His eyes were fixed on the fire, the
pipe was extended in his left hand, but he sate motionless as a stone. In
her agitation Madeline had not so much addressed the Chief, as
involuntarily
shaped her thoughts in words. Wondering at the continued silence
of Yoconok, she laid her hand lightly upon his armit was cold as ice.
With a shudder she looked into his facethe eyes were glassy.
Yoconok! Speak to your child! Do not leave me alone, in the cold,
dark world!
He spoke not, but a faint light, like the last ray of the expiring taper,
glanced from his motionless eyeballs. She flung herself upon him,
girded his gaunt form in her bared arms, and pressed her downy cheek
against his withered face. Cold the form, cold the cheek, cold as the ice
upon the Wissahikon.
He is dead! The wild shriek of Madeline rung through the woods
Mine only friend! The blood of the dying deer only called him
back to life for a momenthe is dead, gone to the land where his fathers
dwell, and without one parting word to his child!
She was an orphan, one of those wandering children of God, whom
no one calls, Child! Alone in the world! Those words are full of
meaning, but to the orphan they speak in tones of horrible emphasis. To
the orphan they mean poverty and neglect, temptation and despair.
But she was not yet altogether alone. A few muttered words quivered
from the cold lips of the dying Indian. With the last gleam of life
playing over his motionless balls, he spoke
Fear this
Stranger
! as the
Manitto of Evil
fear him! Do not
put your trust in Gilbert. He is brave, he is true,
but hands that he
cannot
see
, guide him on to a deed of falsehood and blood. Fear the stranger
do not trust Gilbertbut
dread the old man, whose roof gives you
shelter
, dread him worse than hungercoldor death!
With these words,spoken not as we have written them, but in an
Indian
dialect, which compresses a hundred separate ideas in a sentence,
the old Chief, who had once grasped the hand of William Penn, lay
on the snow, as cold as the wind which swept his tawny cheeks, as
motionless
as the great trunks which encircled the scene, rising in the
fire-light
,
like the unhewn pillars of a pagan temple.
Madeline was alone.
The same cheerful glow, which lighted up her young face, shone over
the mangled deer, and revealed the cold features of the dead Indian.
The woods were very still. Now and then, a gust of wind howled,
like a war-blast, down some midnight ravine, and again, every sound
save the crackling of the wild-wood fire died away, in an unearthly
stillness.
Her arms clasped, her beautiful profile cut distinctly on the dark
background
,
her large lustrous eye, her warm nether lip tinted by the fire, she
stood in an attitude of deep sorrow, gazing into the face of the corse.
As the old man died, he had folded his arms, and knit his brows; he
looked stern and unrelenting, even as a corse; there was a warrior's
defiance
upon his red visage.
He was my only friend! True, the old man at the Farm-House
gave me food and shelter, since the hour when I was discovered in these
woodsa poor, forsaken babe. But Yoconok was my friend; to him I
brought my sorrows, of him I asked advice. While he lived, I felt that
I was not
alone!
Now it is changed! This cold winter night is not
more desolate than the fate of the poor Orphan Girl!
Beside the fire she knelt, and raised her eyes, and spread forth her
hands, and through the canopy of overarching pines, looked up toGod.
O, how softly, over her brown face, that expression of child-like Faith
stole, like a veil of light!
A step aroused her from her prayera hand was laid upon her shoulder
with a half-uttered cry of fear, she sprang to her feet.
The Wizard! The Ghost-seer! she cried, clasping her hands to
her breast, with an accent and a gesture of shuddering fear.
Nay, maiden, do not fear me. Old Isaac harms no one. He is but
a Watcher, in this dreary world. The Lord hath told him, Watch
and I will come to thee; and lo! Isaac watches evermore, seeking
the knowledge of the Life which is Eternal! Dost fear the old man,
maiden?
In the light of the fire, stood a stunted figure, not more than five feet
in height, the chest narrow, the back bent, as if with years, the veins
swelling black and distinct on the pale face and dead-white hands.
That facesunken on the breastwas marked by deep wrinkles, which
traversed the cheeks and brow, and added to the spiritual look of those
blue eyes, which seemed not so much to shine, as to burn, beneath the
white eyebrows. From a small cap of black cloth, which covered the
head of the stranger, long locks of straight hair fell like snow-flakes, and
waved in white masses, in the light of the fire.
He was clad after the costume of the olden time. A dark coat, much
faded and worn, with buttons of polished metal; a vest with white
lappels
,
descending half-way to the knees; black stockings, which fell in
wrinkles
around the sunken limbs, and large shoes, glittering with silver
buckles.
This was the costume of the old man, whose form indicated extreme
old age, or premature decrepitude, while his blue eyes and white hair,
gave an almost hallowed look to his wrinkled face.
And yet the maiden shrunk from that withered form, with her hands
clasped on her bosom, and felt her blood grow chill, as she encountered
the glance of those mild blue eyes.
Do not fear me, maiden. I am an old mana poor withered frame
and a brain, eaten by much toil, and the labors of long and dreary
winters
.
Passing through the woods, I witnessed the scene between you
and this aged Indian: indeed I saw him gasp his last, as I was about to
come to his aid.I will secure Christian burial for his corse.
Do notdo not touch him! cried Madeline, rushing forward, as the
hands of the old man were placed upon the arms of the dead Indian
For the sake of God, do not place your hands upon him. For they
saya shudder pervaded her formthey say, that you
What do they speak ill of me? asked the old man, raising his mild
eyesOf me! A poor old withered man, who lives apart from the great
world, and cares not for its idle uproar, nor for its petty joys?
They say, that you have sold yourself to the Enemy of Mankind,
gasped Madeline, her eyes enchained, against her will, to the tranquil
glance of the stranger.
Is that all? and a smile stole over his wrinkled faceNever heed
such fire-side gossip, my good girl. Now mark meI will take the dead
body of your friendwill have it conveyed to my house on the other
side of the Wissahikon, near the Schuylkilland bury it, with all the
rites of Christian burial.Does that look like the act of one who is sold
to the Devil?
But let Yoconok rest among his woods and trees. What need of a
cold graveyard for him? Let him be buried among his pines, where the
Song of the Wissahikon will cheer his slumber, and a granite rock will
pillow his head.
The Maiden, in her earnestness, advanced and laid her hand upon the
Wizard's shoulder.
Yoconok shall go with me! he calmly said. He has no friends;
I will be his friend, after he is dead. Hah! What is this I see?
With a sudden gesture he seized the white hand, which rested on his
shoulder, andhis blue eyes dilating until they seemed fired with
madness
turned
the palm towards the fire:
No Bridal ring shall ever cross this hand! No child shall ever bless
your sight! I read it, in the lustre of your eye, which is lighted with
the fire of a changeless Destiny! Alas! Alas! I pity and I rejoice!
Dishonor
and a Sudden Death will soon be yours!
It is false! gasped Madeline, her cheek pale as marbleIn the
name of God, who loves us all, I defy your Master, who only hates and
cannot love!
She covered her face, and stood with her head bowed, near the fire.
The old man gazed upon her trembling form with a look of
overwhelming
compassion, which was soon displaced by an expression of singular
triumph. There was an unnatural joy in his parting lips, his eyes
sparkling
with light, his face flushed with crimson.
Not a word was spoken; a silence, unbroken by a whisper, deepened
the interest of the scene.
Pity me! cried Madeline, as she raised her eyesDo not doom
me to an early death, and of all deaths,ah! I dare not speak it!
Isaac did not answer; still the mingled expression of triumph and
pity agitated his aged features.
Come hither, Black David, said Isaac the Wizard, turning toward the
darker recesses of the covertTake this body and bear it to my house.
Dost hear?
From the shadows advanced a form, which Madelinealready appalled
by the words of the old manbeheld with indescribable fear.
It was a miserable wreck of humanity, not more than four feet in
height, with the crooked limbs trembling beneath the huge body, the
back rising in a shapeless hump, and the long, unnatural, we had almost
said,
horse-like
face, resting on the breast, and hidden beneath a shaggy
mass of straight black hair.
Y-e-e-s, Master! I'se here! What wouldst do with 'un?
From that mass of hair, two large eyes shot a strange unnatural gleam,
as the fire, rising in a sudden flame, tinted with strong light, the grotesque
points of this deformed figure.
He was clad in a coarse garb, a kind of mantle, wrapping the deep
chest and the protuberant hump, with the arms appearing from its folds,
covered with loose sleeves of dark cloth. His straight black hair, falling
in tangled masses, formed the only covering for his head.
Strange to say, the hands were small, white and delicate, presenting a
strong contrast to the chaotic physical vigor of the deformed man.
Take the body of Yoconokdost hear me? I would give him
Christian
burial. Bear it to my mansion. I will reward you. Go!
Madeline for a moment seemed deprived of all power of motion or
speech. All the wild legends which she had heard, concerning the old
man, Isaac the Wizard, and his Familiar Spirit, Black David, crowded on
her brain; she felt a creeping awe pervade her veins and pale her cheek.
In this pale-faced old man, she beheld a Servant of the Evil one; in
the poor wretch, whose physical deformity was at once hideous and
pitiable
,
she saw an Incarnate Demon.
Such was the Superstition of the olden time, when every old woman,
not remarkable for personal beauty, was burned as a Witch, and old men,
not regular in attendance at Meeting, and somewhat given to burning
candles
late at night, were choked to death, as Wizards.
Do not touch him! He was my friend!
Madeline started forward, and laid her hand upon the arm of the
wizard. A faint smile was visible on the old man's face; he regarded
for a moment her countenance, glowing with an intensity of fear, and
then taking her arm gently within his own, led her from the fire.
Come, he said, the wood is dark, the way lonely. I will wait
upon you to the farm-house door. Comenever fear me! They tell
3
sad stories of my life, I hearand, ha, ha! poor Black David here, is
linked with me, in an infernal compact! Comethere is more wizard craft
in those black eyes of thine, than in all my lore.Remember, David!
He led the trembling girlwho looked up into his face with
something
of reverence for his age, more of fear for his supernatural character,
manifested in her gazehe led her into the shadows of the covert, and
the light streamed over the mangled deer, the dead chieftain, and the
deformed
man.
Through the meshes of his tangled hair, he gazed after the old man
and the maiden, and then, like a beast on its haunches, crouched beside
the fire, his white hands supporting his cheeks, while his elbows rested
on his knees.
The hair was swept aside from his face, and his features appeared
distinctly, in the ruddy fire-light.
It must be confessed that the face was hideous, and its unnatural length,
the manner in which it seemed to rest directly on the chest, made the
resemblance which it bore to the head of a horse, more palpable and
repulsive.
The brow was heavy; the nose long and thin, the mouth small, the
chin round and full; the eyes deep-set and full of intense light. Such
was the general character of that face, with the hair falling in thick
straight masses on either side; but the sudden glow of the fire made the
cheek-bones seem unnaturally prominent, the hollow beneath more deep
and cavernous, and gave the brow a bolder outline, the lips a more decided
scorn, the eyes a wilder light.
He crouched by the fire, his distorted form darkly defined against the
snow-mantled earth. The pine-branches above bent slowly to the
winter blast, and the massy trees around, glowed from black into crimson.
Spreading forth his hands, which looked as white and delicate as the
marble hands of a sculptured Venus, he seemed absorbed in his own
wandering thoughts.
He spoke; the echo of his voice broke the deep silence, with a
startling
emphasis, and yet that voice was soft, thrilling and musical, as the
tones of a beautiful woman.
Three hundred yearsit is a wilderness of strange memories! thus
he murmured, without the slightest indication of ignorance or vulgarity in
his manner or his languageIn truth, it is a long while tolook back!
There was the bluff Harry, renowned for the number of his wives, and
the establishment of the
Reformation
. Pale-faced Edward, too young
to be criminal; Lady Grey, who passed from the throne to the block;
Mary called Bloody, and Elizabeth
called
Virgin; James the Pedant;
Charles the Martyr and Charles the Libertineall are gone long ago.
Dust and ashes, despite their fine linen and royal blood. Yet I see
them all again, see them as plainly as whenTut! Tut!
He glanced around the covert, with his deep-set eyes kindling in a
more vivid light:
They may hear mecall me Madmanho! ho! Then to the
prison or the scaffold with the old dotard! Three hundred years! A
great while to live, but wearisome, very, very wearisome! To see one
century whirling along, bubbling and frothing just like the others, and
only bubbling and frothing with a more pitiful uproar as it goes down in
the great abyss, called Time Past, which has swallowed up the Dead
Ages! I am weary of it all, and
The body of the Indian Chief, resting stiff and motionless in the
warmth of the fire, met his gaze.
He sleeps well! But as for me
And as he bent his face nearer to the fire, and clasped his white hands,
as in a gesture of supplication, it might be seen that there were tears in
the eyes of the Deformed Maniac.
CHAPTER THIRD.
THE FARM-HOUSE.
Come, folks, help yourselves! It's the last night of the Old Year,
and we'll send the dull old fellow to his grave, with a hearty store of
good things under his belt, and a bowl of good liquor to make him sleep
easy! Some of the turkey, Parson? Hey! How are you comin' on
down there, at 'tother end of the table? Try a slice of this ham,
neighbor
Spurtzelditscher?a-h! There's fat and lean! By Thun-der!
You see, neighbor, I swear in English! I sometimes wish I could swear
in Dutch. There's something that stirs the heart, in a solid, deep-chested
Dutch oath! Now then, who's for the cider?a-h, that's the stuff!
hisses and froths like an old maid, who has been caught lying about her
neighborsthe rale October juice of the red-streaked Spitzenberger, as
I'm an honest man!
The old man, at the head of the table, raised the hot poker with one
hand, while the other rested upon the edge of the broad bowl, which was
filled to the brim with the steaming cider. It was a curious-looking
bowl, fashioned of some strange wood, hard as iron, with an uncouth
name, and crowded all around its capacious sides with carvings of the
most grotesque character.
He was an old man, but you must not picture to yourself a spare form,
or lantern jaws, or eyes bleared and glassy.
Beneath the ample folds of his brown waistcoat, a rotundity that would
have made the fortunes of a dozen Aldermen, was hidden; his hair,
eyebrows
and long beard, were all white as snow, yet his round cheeks
glowed with tints as warm and rosy, as those which make an unbroiled
sirloin steak look lovely in the eyes of a good liver. The eyebrows
were white, as though the snow had fallen on his forehead, and hung
there for a moment, ere it melted before the summer of his cheeks. And
yet, from beneath those shaggy outlines, two eyes, very small, very black,
and piercing as daggers' points, glittered like newly lighted coals.
Altogether
it was a face that would have warmed a hungry man, with its
plump outline, and unctuous look, to say nothing of the nose, which shone
like a huge red pear, ripening in the autumnal sun.
As to the form of the old man, it would have scared a famine into
nothingness, by its very picture of eloquent fatness. His broad
shoulders
,
his sinewy arms, his chest that shook with laughter, deep and
sonorous
,
beneath the lace ruffles of his shirt, his hands round and plump,
glowing to the very finger tips with corpulence,ah, he was a hale old
fellow, who seemed to grow younger with time, and catch new bloom on
his cheeks, from the very icicles of age.
He was seated in his great arm-chair, at the head of the table, which
extended along the sanded floor, from the fire-place to the doorway. In
one hand he raised the poker, with its blazing point; in the other he
grasped the corpulent bowl, frothing to the brim with fragrant cider.
Your health, my good folks! A-a-h! with a sigh of deep
satisfaction
That's
the stuff to warm the heart and set the brain a-fire! And,
while I think o't, here's a health to his Majesty, King George!
As he set down the bowl, he slightly inclined his head to one side, and
smoothing down his white beard, with his plump fingers, he glanced with
one eye half-closed, along the well-filled board.
It was an interesting scene. In the foreground, a huge turkey, brown
and smoking; the view was lengthened out with a savory panorama of
boiled ham, chickens and venison, interspersed with white pyramids of
home-made bread, and bowls of steaming cider. This long table,
groaning
under the weight of substantial cheer, was framed by the faces of
some twenty-five or thirty guests. Here the parson, with his red face
glowing between his black cap and blacker gown: there the portly
farmer, with bony hands and iron frame; yonder a group of rosy-cheeked
country girls, and beyond them, a Philadelphia lawyer, lank as a
bean-pole
and devouring as a Famine. The clatter of knives and forks
deafened
the ears, and was only interrupted by a chorus, something like this:
A little more of the ham! cried the Parson; red lean and white
fatvery
Some of the chicken, Dolly? exclaimed a gallant country beau
legs or breast?
Cider? Your health, neighbor! Royal stuff, that! was the
remark
of a city merchant, whose broadcloth shone beside the country
home-spunDid you say, you would like a piece of this chicken?
The salt, if you please. A little ham. There. Some turkey. A
touch of that rabbit. Thank you for the corn-beef. Pass the venison.
Cideryes, sir, cider. Health, sir. Little more ham! Pass the pepper.
Some more turkeyno! Just a
hint
of that 'possum.
This was the Philadelphia lawyer, whose knife and fork seemed
impelled
by a mechanical power of unknown capacities, while his plate
went round the orbit of the table like a planet, somewhat hasty and
irregular in its motions. His lank jaws were never still. He seemed to
have been placed upon this earth, only to solve a great problem, to wit,
how much can a man devour whose body resembles a lath or a bean-pole,
and how long will it require for him to eat himself into an apoplexy?
Dat rabbit ish nish! Mein Gott! Neighbor Perkenpine! was
the remark of Neighbor Spurtzelditscher, a short, thick, brown-faced
farmer, in linsey-wolsey, who was commonly called Spurtz for the
sake of brevity and an easy life.
Two farmers sat beside each other, engaged in earnest conversation,
which it must be confessed was carried on with perseverance and
ingenuity
,
worthy of a wider field. You may see them, near the lower end of
the table, both very old men, alike thin, withered and greyhaired, and
attired in linsey-wolsey. The one this way, cannot speak a syllable of
any language but English, and his friend understands never a word, that
is not spoken in German. But still, with all these obstacles, which to
the vulgar mind might appear insurmountable, they maintain a very
intelligible
,
nay, interesting conversation.
Neighbor Wampole, the farmer who speaks English and English only,
poises the white breast of a chicken on his fork, gazes intently in his
neighbor's face, and utters distinctly his condensed opinion
Good!
he cries, and the chicken disappears.
To this emphatic remark, neighbor Schneider, who cannot speak a
word, that is not German, replies by elevating a savory slice of the
opossum, and displaying it for a moment before his neighbor's eyes;
after which he significantly remarks
Goot!
and the opossum vanishes.
The bowls are touched; one drinks to the other's health; again that
significant glance, and again that interesting interchange of thought
Good!
Goot!
Near these intelligent and communicative neighbours, and opposite the
parson, was seen a gentleman of some forty years, remarkable for his
immense wig, with flowing flaxen curls, his velvet coat, silver
shoe-buckles
,
and prominent nose, curved like a parrot's beak. This was the
Doctor of the country-side, famous for the potency of his humha!
which was supposed to comprise a whole encyclopdia of medical
knowledge
,
and for the peculiarly dexterous application of his gold-headed cane
to the side of his nose.
He never had much to say, and on the present occasion, merely
interrupted
the important duty of supper, with such remarks asSoberly
and in verity, this stewed rabbit is a tooth-some dish!
For his almost unbroken silence, he seemed to continually apologize
by drinking deep draughts of the steaming cider. Indeed, a superficial
observer of human nature would have supposed, at first sight, that the
Doctor was in liquor, or that the liquor was in the Doctor; for his head
went bobbing from side to side like a cork on a wave, and he brushed
imaginary flies from the tip of his nose, with great energy and
perseverance
.
And while the supper-party went gayly on by the light of the
home-made
candles, which were placed along the board, there was a fire of
huge logs, blazing and crackling within the broad arch of the spacious
hearth.
The light of that roaring fire fell in crimson flashes over the faces of
the guests, and lighted up with its hearty glow every nook and corner of
the farm-house hall.
Would you like to look upon that Picture of Comfort in the Olden
Time?
Then strip your imagination of all modern ideas, and prepare for a
picture of 1774, as widely contrasted with 1847, as a hale old
Revolutionary
soldier, with his rosy cheeks and snow-white hair, compares with
a Chesnut Street dandy, remarkable only for his slim waist and
sublimely
insipid face.
Do not expect to behold any thing like imported carpet on the floor.
No carpets from Brussels or from Smyrna conceal the sanded boards,
nor are the walls covered with hangings of French paper. There are
no chairs with narrow seats and dangerous backs, looking like chairs
that never were healthy, but stricken with consumption from the
moment
of their birth. Nor is there any diminutive stove glaring with the
pestilence of anthracite; nor do you behold tables with marble tops, or
mantel-pieces, unworthy of the name, adorned with showy lamps, or
windows
with Venitian blinds, and sills as narrow as a bigot's soul.
Look around this farm-house hall and see what comfort was like, in
the olden time.
The light of the great hearth-fire sparkles upon the sanded floor, and
glows along those huge rafters which support the ceiling. The walls
are white as snow, and the window-frames deep-sunken and capacious.
In one corner stands the cupboard, painted blue, and glittering with a
store of burnished pewter; opposite you discern the old clock, with its
round Dutch face, and its new moon rising over a broken cloud.
But the hearth is decidedly the centre of the picture. It looks like a
great sacrificial fire built beneath some pagan archway. Above the arch
hangs a rifle, resting on the antlers of the wild deer, and within the
recess
on either side of the fire, benches of substantial oak are placed.
A blind negro sits on the bench to the right, his fingers outspread
toward
the flame, which imparts its red glow to his ebony features, and
reveals the fiddle laid with its bow across his knees.
Opposite is seated a corpulent old dame, whose black face is
contrasted
with a flaming red handkerchief wound about the temples, while her
withered hands are crossed upon her linsey dress.
I say, Phillisey, dis am comfor'bl'!
It ar, Sam, you blind
niggar!
Near the hearth, seated on huge arm-chairs, behold three white dames,
whose rotund forms and full-moon faces, do not indicate any deprivation
of the comforts of life. Their heads bent together, their white caps
touching each other, they pass the snuff-box, and converse in earnest
whispers.
It is a strange world, Betsy!
And, Nancy, we've all got to die
sometime!
But, Sally, it was not so when I was a girl!
You will at once perceive, that their conversation is of the most
interesting
character. The snuff-box passes, and the thoughts of the old
ladies take a different turn.
Queer world! Laws-a-massy, Betz!
We must all go! `Dust to dust,' as the Parson sez!
When I was a girl
But at this moment of absorbing interest the conversation is interrupted
by the bluff, hearty tones of the host:
I say, Parson, did you ever hear the story of Old Hontz and his
New Year's supper?
By way of commanding attention, he brought the handle of his knife
upon the table, with all the force of his right arm.
Never did! responded the Parson, from the other end of the table,
as he raised a dainty piece of rabbit to his lips.
Nor you, Lawyer Simmons? Nor you, Doctor Perkenpine? Hello!
Did
none
of you ever hear the story of Old Hontz and his New Year's
supper?
For a moment the great work of eating and drinking was suspended.
At least twenty faces were turned toward the jovial host. There was a
wicked twinkle in the old fellow's half-closed eyes, and even the
inclination
of his head to one side looked suspicious.
Never heard the story, friend Peter! was the burden of twenty
voices.
The old man settled himself easily in his huge chair, smoothed his
white beard with his fat fingers, and took a hearty draught of cider.
Then, taking a pipe from a side pocket, he quietly filled the bowl with
tobacco, lighted it at the candle, and resting comfortably in his chair,
seemed at peace with all the world, as the smoke floated in wreaths
around his red face.
As you're all done supper, I'd like to tell you the story. It's a short
story, but very, very good; especially to those, who have eaten heartily
of stewed rabbit. Talkin' o' rabbit, how d'ye like it, Parson?
I have feasted plentifully upon this dish, friend Peter, replied the
Parson.
It is savoryvery toothsome, echoed the Doctor.
Could not be better! where did you get the rabbits? inquired the
lawyer.
That's
the fun of it, Lawyer Simmons. Where did I get the rabbits?
That's
the very cream of the joke. Now mark me, everybody here,
when I've told my story, they will be sorry that they did not try the
stewed rabbit. For, as you will see, this story is apt to give one a
ravenous
taste for stewed rabbit
But concerning this unknown person whom you call Old Hontz?
suggested the Parson.
I want you all to be very still, while I tell this story. G-a-ls!
(turning to the three corpulent dames,) stop babbling and listen! The
guests were all attention; you might have heard a pin drop. Once upon
a time, there lived a jolly old fellow named Hontz, who had a house in a
woods, and was well-to-do in the world; his neighbors almost died of
spite, when they looked at his barn, or saw his sleek cattle. He was
rich, was old Hontz, and fond of fun, and of a glass! But he was a
bachelor
. Therefore every gossip in the neighborhood lied about him
lied murderously, telling strange stories of Old Hontz, the rare jovial
fellow. They said he gained his moneynot from his farm, or his
horses, or his oxen, or his cowsbut in unheard-of-ways, horrible to
think of, and most dreadful to tell. Now, among those neighbors, there
were three persons, who fed at the old fellow's table, and drank of his
cider, and yet lied more horribly about him, than all the world
together
The jovial Peter paused, and smoothed his beard, emitting a volume
of smoke, as he glanced over the faces of the wondering guests. Even
the three aged dames by the fire bent forward, in attitudes of absorbing
interest, and the old Negro in the chimney corner remarked, in an
under-tone
,
to PhilliseyBerry bad neighbors, dem!
Now one of these persons was a lawyer
Su-r-e! exclaimed lawyer Simmons, dropping his cider bowl.
One a doctor
Remarkable! and the Doctor, in his surprise, permitted a savory
slice of rabbit to fall from his fingers.
And the other was a parson!
A parson? Eh! Neighbor Peter? cried the Parson, rubbing his
nose, and fixing the black cap more firmly on his head.
Yesby ! The lawyer, the doctor and the parson, who fed at
the old fellow's table, and drank of his cider, never spoke of him, save
with a shrug of the shoulders, or a wink of the eye, and it may be, some
such kind remark as this`A very clever old fellow, who lives in the
woods alone,
but
'here was the sore point`Where does he get
all
his
money?'
It was a very interesting thing, to remark the twinkle of neighbor
Peter's half-closed eye, as he paused again in his story.
A singular silence had fallen on the supper guests; they gazed in each
other's faces, and then cast their eyes down upon their folded hands.
Now, do you want to know how this jolly old fellow (with a
white
beard
and a
great round paunch
, mark ye) revenged himself? He knew
the doctor, the lawyer, the parson, to be very fond of good eating, but of
all kinds of eating,
stewed rabbit
, and of all kinds of
stewed rabbit
The story began to be very interesting. Why it was we cannot tell,
but certainly the greater portion of the guests began to cast stealthy
glances at the doctor, the lawyer and the parson, who sat among them, at
the supper-board.
Yesyou were saying hesitated the Parson. The Doctor
arranged
his flowing wig, with a somewhat nervous movement, and the lank
face of the lawyer was lengthened out, by an expression of apathetic
wonder, most ludicrous to behold.
And of all kinds of stewed rabbit, they most admired that kind of
stewed rabbit, which is smothered in onions
The jovial host took a hearty puff at his pipe, and placed the cider to
his lips, coolly remarking
There's my story. What d'ye think o't, anyhow?
It was wonderful to behold the amazement pictured on the faces of the
guests. A dead silence prevailed.
What d'ye think of it, I say? and the bluff Peter rapped the table
with the handle of his knife.
Dat is no shtory at all! faintly remarked neighbor Spurtzelditscher.
I confess, I do not see its point the lawyer exclaimed.
Nor its wit added the parson.
In soberness, and in truth, I can't see
what
you are driving at!
The doctor turned his parrot nose, and looked his host full in the face.
Why, how stupid you are! Don't you see that the jolly old fellow
with a beard like a snow-drift, and a paunch round as a punkin, made a
great supper, one New Year's Eve, and invited the doctor, the parson,
the lawyer, to come and eat stewed rabbit, smothered in onions?
The Parson blushed to the tips of his ears, while the Doctor looked
in his plate, and the lawyer described lines on the table with his fork.
Dat ish better! cried SpurtzelditscherYah! y-a-h! Dat ish
goot!
Indeed, Mr. Peter Dorfner, exclaimed the Parson with marked
politeness
I
must confess that I don't see the point of your story.
Nor I! Nor I! chorussed the Doctor and the Lawyer.
A faint smile began to steal over the faces of the other guests.
But you will presently. I know you love a good story, Parson, and
I'm sure, the lawyer and doctor don't love any thing better, except good
living or fat fees. Soh, my hearties, I will tell you the point of the
jokewhile the doctor, and the lawyer, and the parson were eatin' away
like so many buzzards, and a thinkin' that they were eatin' stewed rabbit
smothered in onions, the old fellow, that jolly dog of a bachelor, was
laughin' in his sleeve, forfor
Y-e-sgasped the Parson, bending forward.
Forthe old host, even Peter Dorfner, bent forward also, his little
black eyes twinkling with a sort of demoniac gleeFor well he knew
that these three jovial fellows were eatin'eatin'
E-a-ting echoed the Doctor, looking over his spectacles. The
old fellow sank back in his chair, and resumed his pipe, saying mildly
between the puffs of smoke
Cats
. They were eatin'
cats!
Fine old Toms, which the old
bachelor had caught in his farm-yard, killed and cookedall done by
himselfcats, smothered in onions! Fine dish, gentlemen
for them as
likes it
.
A roar like thunder shook the room. It was the sound of some
twenty boisterous laughs, joined in one. For a moment nothing was
seen but mouths wide open, and eyes rolling tears.
With one movement the Doctor, the Parson and the Lawyer started to
their feet.
Cats! shrieked the Parson, pitching forward with a sea-sick
movement
Did
you say cats?
The Doctor uttered a horrible oath.
Feed
me
a member of the FacultyME! on CATS! He shook
his clenched fist over the table. You shall pay for this! You
shall
The Lawyer looked around with a very sickly attempt at a smile.
Neighbor Wampole, will you allow me to pass you? It seems to me
that I want a little fresh air.
Why, gentle-
men!
what
is
the matter? cried the corpulent Peter
Dorfner from his good arm-chair at the head of the tableThe incident
does not allude to you. Pooh! You never abused me, you
But a fresh explosion of laughter drowned his words. It cannot be
denied that the scene was in the highest degree picturesque. There
foamed the Doctor, tearing his flaxen wig, in very despite, while on the
opposite side of the table, the Parson still continued to ask, whether Peter
Dorfner had said cats? In the background, Lawyer Simmons' lank
face was visible, pale as death, and distorted by convulsive twitchings.
And around the table were the guests, convulsed with the grotesque
picture, all echoing the laugh, until the rafters shook again. Near the
fire the three aged dames sat motionless, gasping for breath, the tears
rolling down their round fat cheeks.
Within the chimney the Phillisey with the red handkerchief round
her brow, displayed her teethor at least, all that time had spared her
while blind Sam, seated in the opposite corner, seized his fiddle, and
played several tunes, through each other, and all together, as if for life.
And in the midst of the uproar, calm and smiling sat Peter Dorfner,
in his arm-chair, at the head of the table, the pipe between his lips, and
volumes of pale blue smoke wreathing around his red cheeks, and
snow-white
hair.
Was de rabbit fery nish, Toctor?
I thought you ate
ray
-ther hearty, Parson!
O! Lord! a doctor, a parson and a lawyer sittin' down to stewed cats!
An' sich an appeytite, too!
While these, and various kindred exclamations, echoed round the
room, the Doctor quietly left his seat and approached the head of the
table. There was a wicked light in his pale blue eyes; a sort of
determined
malice in the very compression of his large sensual lips.
Peter Dorfner received him with a calm smile, smoothing down his
white beard with the palm of his hand.
This is very w-ell! he whispered, bending down, until the curls of
his wig nearly touched the cheek of Peter: A fine joke, sir, ve-r-y fine!
But shall I tell these good folks a finer one? Shall I tell them of the
twenty-third of November, in the year 1756?
Swelling with rage, he shook his cane in the old farmer's face.
If
you dare
, Peter remarked in a whisper, as a change passed over
his face, as sudden as it was startling. He grew pale; his dark eyes flashed
from beneath the sleepy lids. His right hand was clenched as if by an
involuntary spasm.
At this moment, the roar of laughter, which echoed round the place,
was succeeded by a cry of surprise.
Madeline! Gilbert! resounded from every lip.
The Doctor leaned his head over his shoulder, and saw the persons,
who that moment had entered the room.
Do you remember her Mother?
he whispered the words into the
farmer's ear.
Dare you violate the Oath?
was the response uttered by the old
man, through his clenched teeth, with that wicked light flashing in his
eyes.
And while this singular conversation was held by the Doctor and the
farmer, the guests, starting from their seats, welcomed the new-comers
with many a hearty though rude salutation.
They stood in the centre of the circle, the Hunter and the Maiden, their
faces glowing in the light of the hearthside flame.
She, clad in her peasant garb, which could not altogether conceal the
flowing outlines of her form, nor turn your gaze away, from the sad,
tender
beauty of her face. Her dark hair, swept plainly aside, relieved those
firm and winning features, and gave a deeper warmth to the glow of her
brown cheeks, the voluptuous redness of her lips.
By her side the Hunter stood, his brawny chest and gaunt, sinewy arms,
presenting a strong contrast to her maidenly form.
Almost a giant in stature, he was clad in a hunting-frock, dark blue in
color, and edged with white fur. In one hand he grasped the Maiden's
hand, in the other his well-tried rifle, with its dark tube, and mahogany
stock, relieved by ornaments of polished silver. He wore the leggings
and moccasins of an Indian; his broad chest was crossed by a buckskin
belt; on one side of his waist you beheld a hunting-knife, on the other a
powder-horn.
But it was not on his attire, but his face, that you fixed your gaze.
A broad, square forehead, a straight, firm nose, slightly inclining to the
aquiline, a mouth somewhat too wide, and a bold, rugged chin,
half-concealed
by a brown beard. Such was the Hunter's face. His complexion
had once been fair and sanguine, but now it was bronzed by exposure to
the wind and sun, the toil of the chase, andperchancethe fever of
the battle.
Around this boldly featured face, which indicated, at first sight, a bluff,
honest nature, his chesnut hair gathered in short, luxuriant curls.
Come, Parson; 'cordin' to promise I'm here. So are you. So is
Mad'lin'. We want you to say a few words from a book, so that we can
go an' live together as man an' wife.
He rested one arm upon his rifle, and with Madeline's hand clasped in
his own, confronted the New Year's guests.
YesyesI'll be there, in a moment, cried the Minister from the
opposite side of the table. Cats! he added in an undertone
A-u-g-h! So you want to be married, Gilberteh?
With the book in his hand, he stood before the Hunter and his
promised
Wife, now fixing his eye upon the almost gigantic form, now
resting
his glance upon the Maiden, whose soft brown cheek began to
glow into crimson, while her white teeth were seen, through the parting
lips.
Her eyes were downcast; the black fringes rested on her cheek.
Altogether
,
she presented an appearance, at once so virginal and so beautiful,
in her humble attire, that every eye was enchained with the sight.
Ho, ho! So you're goin' to be married, Madeline! laughed the jovial
Peter Dorfner, as, leaving his chair, he advanced with a step that showed
at once, that he had not lost any vigor of nerve, or physical power, in his
increasing corpulence. Goin' to leave the old Bachelor alone? Well
wellmy blessing go with you, at any rate!
He stood behind the Parson, a pleasant smile agitating his round cheeks,
and twinkling under his half-shut lids.
But the maiden did not raise her eyes, or answer him with a word.
She trembled; yes, they could see her bosom heave from beneath the
kerchief
which bound it, and from her downcast lids a single tear sparkled
into light.
Did she remember the warning words of old Yoconok? Yes, Uncle
Petershe called him Uncle, for he had been her only protector, from
the hour of childhoodI amI am.
Her nether lip was agitated with a tremulous motion; her bosom rose
with one tumultuous throb. She stood silent and trembling, her
downcast
eyes filled with tears.
The rude Hunter by her side, wound his iron arm about her waist:
Mad'lin', do not fear, he whispered. Don't I love you, gal? I
know I'm but a rude fellow, but Gilbert Morgan will never see harm
come to you, while God leaves him one breath in his big body! There
now, look up, and let the Parson say his words
These words look rude, but the dark hazel eye of the woodsman lighted
up with a fiery eloquence, as he spoke, and his voicebroken by a
tremor
indicated
strong emotion.
Well, girl, well, I can only say, that I approve of this marriage, and
hope you'll do well, wherever you go. Theretake an old bachelor's
blessing on your head, and let the Parson begin; that's a good girl.
As the bluff old Peter placed his fat hands upon the glossy locks of
Madelinehis face all the while overspread with smiling wrinklesthe
Doctor drew near, and bending over his shoulder, whispered these words:
How long is it since you blessed her Mother?
The jovial old fellow started, as though a snake had bitten him in the
throat; he grew pale, and then red again, and observed with one of his
pleasant smiles:
Ohho! Doctor Perkenpinealways at your fun!
But turning suddenly round, he darted a look into the Doctor's face
which had something beside good humor in its sudden fire.
You'll leave the old man, Madeline. I shall be alone with Phillisey
and Black Sam. While one scolds the 'tother will fiddlewell, well!
Get married, girlGilbert will make a good husband!
Why did the Orphan Girl shrink from the pressure of his hands, and
turn pale and gasp for breath as his kindly words fell on her ears?
The Parson arranged his cap, while the guestsstout farmers, and
buxom damselscircled about the Hunter and his betrothed. The old
dames suspended their tattle, Black Sam his fiddle; even the lawyer and
the doctor forgot their unutterable wrongs, in the deep interest of the scene.
You love Gilbert, he kindly whispered, wishing to calm the Maiden,
whose agitation was perceptible.
I do! said a soft, low voice, that was scarcely audible.
Gilbert felt a soft, warm hand, return the pressure of his rude grasp,
and saw that the face upraised to meet his gaze, shone with an
expression
of calm confidence and child-like trust.
You are mine, Mad'lin', he whispered, bending down nearer to her,
and girdling her waist with his brawny arm.
Yoursever! she whispered, and then continued, in a tone
inaudiable
to her loverYours in spite of the warning of Yoconokyours in
spite of my own heart!
Hem! Suppose we commence said the Pastor, making a great
display by turning over the leaves of his Prayer-Book.
At this moment, the farm-house doorbehind the girl and the
woods-man
was
suddenly opened.
She did not see the intruder, but she heard his footstep.
Save me, Gilbert! she cried, turning deathly paleI am falling
And like a flower, suddenly snapt on its stem, she sank, and lay
unconscious
at her lover's feet, her eyes closed, her form as motionless as
death.
Gilbert saw her sink, so pale and lifeless, at his feet, and felt the blood
whirling in a torrent through his brain. He turned his head over his
shoulder; his face was flushed with crimson; his hazel eyes discolored
by injected blood
O, sir, this is your work! he cried, and ere an instant, the
hunting-knife
flashed in his hand.
A mingled cry of surprise and horror echoed from every lip. There,
before the half-opened door, stood a young man, clad in plain grey, his
handsome face wearing a pleasant smile, as he brushed the snow from
his curling brown hair. Over his shoulder appeared a red, round face,
with a wide mouth, distorted in a grotesque grin.
What mean you, Gilbert? cried Uncle PeterIt is John and his
friend Jacob. Surely, your senses have left you. Put away your knife,
and greet our friends with a New Year's welcome!
As the corpulent host spoke, he laid one hand gently on the Hunter's
arm, and greeted the strangers, with a cordial grasp.
New Year's welcome! growled Gilbert, as his flushed face writhed
in every feature. To whom? To men who have no name? For
what? For poisoning the mind of this innocent girlBy * * *! This
is my welcome!
Leaving the swooning girl extended on the floor, he fiercely turned,
and confronted the young man, whom we have known by the simple
name of
John
.
You are a purty-built fellow, and, I guess, know how to fight;his
manner was taunting, and a mocking sneer curled his lipDo you see
this knife?
I see it, answered John, with a pleasant smile upon his handsome
face,It seems a very good blade. The hilt, I believe, is bone.
A dead silence prevailed; every eye was centred upon the young
man; the contrast between the huge hunter and the slender stranger was
palpable.
For a moment they surveyed each other, while Gilbert clenched the
hilt of his knife with an iron grasp
That moment was soon gone, but while it passed, our friend Jacopo,
with the round face and enormous mouth, stole quietly behind the hunter,
poured some white powder in a goblet filled with water, and applied
it to the lips of the fainting girl, as he raised her from the floor. The
action passed unobserved; every eye was fixed upon the hunter and his
antagonist.
A scene occurred which baffles description. Suddenly the dead
silence
was broken by the screams of women, the voices of men mingled in
confused cries.
The young stranger was on the floor, the knee of Gilbert on his breast,
the knife flashing above his face.
Do not strike him, cried Peter Dorfner,Take care, Gilbert, it
will be a Murder
Stand back! Woe to the man who meddles in this quarrel!the
hunter was hoarse with rage; his voice, yelling through the farm-house,
sounded more like the howl of a hunted buffalo, than the voice of a
human being. I tell you, he belongs to me! He has stepped between
me and Mad'lin'! Stand backNow, Mister, will you tell your name,
who you are, and whar' you b'long? Quick!
John's face was very pale. Stretched on the floor, his back against the
hard boards, the knee of the hunter pressing the life out of his chest, he
made a desperate effort to free himself, gathering all his strength in the
attempt. It was in vain. The knee pressed heavier and firmer upon his
heart; a convulsive movement agitated the muscles of his throat. As his
face grew paler, his eyes began to protrude from their sockets.
Quick! Your name, I say!and the uplifted knife flashed into
the very eyes of the helpless man.
His lips moved; he uttered a word. Gilbert bent down to hear it
Coward!
he exclaimed, and a scornful smile crossed his pale
features. There was something so resolute, in this solitary word of the
helpless man, that a murmur of admiration escaped from the spectators,
who were held terrified and motionless by the interest of the scene.
Then, take this! The knife descended, urged by the impulse of a
madman's fury, and the prostrate man closed his eyes, as he saw the steel
flash over him, ere it fell.
A sharp, piercing cry was heard; it came from Jacopo's lips, as, with
the fainting maiden in his arms, he beheld the danger of his Master.
Strike him at your peril! he screamedit is the Lord
But his voice was drowned in the shout of wonder which echoed from
every lip, and filled the wide hall with a sound like thunder.
The knife had been dashed aside. Turned from its aim by a fragile
stick, which lay, severed in twain, on one side of the prostrate man,
while the knife glittered on the other, from the sand which covered
the floor.
One cry murmured from every lip, a sound which mingled wonder
with fear, and was remarkable not so much for loudness, as for depth
of tone:
The Monk of Wissahikon! These words were distinguishable
amid its clamor.
Even the bluff host started back, as though seized with sudden fright;
the guests, the doctor, lawyer, parson, the buxom damsels, and the hearty
farmers, all moved backward, with the same impulse.
At the sound, Gilbert the Hunter rose, and stood with his head bowed
and his arms motionless by his side. He, the strong man, who, only a
moment ago, had stricken his knife at the heart of a helpless man, now
trembled in every iron nerve.
Jacopo alone, gazing around upon the circle of affrighted faces, could
not comprehend the cause of this sudden change, this universal terror.
The young man, relieved from the pressure of the giant's knee, and
with the knife no longer flashing death into his face, rose into a sitting
posture, and looked around with a blank stare, his eyes dilating in his
ashen visage.
Before him stood the cause of this strange terror; a voice marked by
its musical emphasis, melted gently on his ears:
It was wrong, Gilbert, and the good God will not love you for the
guilty thought! To raise your hand against your brother's lifea
murderer's deed!
Not an eye but was riveted to the face of the speaker; and again the
whisper was heard
The Monk of Wissahikon!
In the centre of the circle described by the spectators, stood a young
man, not more than nineteen years old; his form at once graceful and
athletic, clad in a coat or tunic of black velvet, which, leaving his throat
bare, fell in easy folds from his broad shoulders to his knees.
His hair, long and flowing, in hue as black as the robe which he wore,
was crowned by a circular cap, also made of velvet; and, framed by the
cap and the dark hair, a face appeared which at once enchained the gaze
of every eye.
It was a young face, the forehead broad and high, the eyebrows arched
like a crescent, the nose straight and regular, the lips warm and full, the
chin round and beardless.
Such was the general description of the face; but there was a look
upon its brown skin, an expression woven with its firm features, a light
shining from its eyes, so piercing and impetuous, so much like magic or
magnetism, that no words can depict the Power which it held, at once
and for ever, upon the souls of those who looked upon it.
That face, in a word, linked with a form whose boyish outlines were
just ripening into young manhood, seemed like the face of one set apart
from the herd of mankind by some supernatural power. It bore the
stamp of Destiny.
In the eastern lands it would have been said, at once, that the brown
face was gifted with the terrible fatality of the Evil Eye.
Few could gaze steadily into that eye, and mark its colour; it was
either dead, with a vacant, glassy stare, or lighted up with a flame, that
shot its power to the gazer's heart, and held him dumb and motionless.
Most strange it was to see the terror which that face excited in the
farm-house of Wissahikon.
Not a word was spoken, as those large eyes roved from side to side, nor
did a solitary voice bid the young man welcome to the New Year's festival.
He stood in the midst of the scene, his right hand looking like marble,
contrasted with his dress, resting absently upon the silver cross, which,
suspended from his neck, rose and fell with every pulsation of his chest.
Your name? cried Joh, as he slowly rose to his feet, and took
the stranger by the hand. You have done me a service which I shall
never forget. I owe my life to you
He spoke hurriedly, but his face was flushed, his voice broken by
sincere
feeling.
They call me Paul Ardenheim.
He uttered these words in a voice whose deep melody charmed every
ear; and then turning, sought the door by which he had entered. As
he walked away with an even stride, his back toward the gazers, it
might be seen that his velvet garb concealed a form of manly vigor, and
almost womanly beauty.
On the threshold he paused; once more they beheld that bronzed face
with the large eyes, shining with that intense light
4
Do not war upon each other, my friends. The cloud of war is
darkening over our land. It will be a long and bloody contest. If war
you must, if you cannot live without the sword, let your war be waged
against the invaders of our soil; let your swords be sharpened for their
throats.
The door closed; he was gone; his place was vacant, yet still they
seemed to behold him in his dark garb, standing in their midst, the sad
look upon his face, the vivid light in his large eyes.
Remain here, Jacob, cried John, as, with his face moved by strong
emotion, he rushed to the door. I will return in a moment!
The door had not closed after him, when Gilbert took his knife from
the floor.
He was moving to the door, when Uncle Peter laid his hand on his arm:
Which way, Gilbert?
What's that to you? was the hurried reply.
A great deal, my good friend: the host whispered a word in his ear,
and with a rapid motion described a sign on his forehead. Now go!
Harm the stranger at your peril! You know your duty! Go!
The countenance of the hunter fell.
You, too, Uncle Peter? You among us? Then these stories are
true
Sirrah! Don't you see these people are listening with open eyes and
ears? Go! You remember
The other answered in a whisper
The house of old Isaac, on the hill near the Schuylkill! But
Mad'lin'?
He cast his glance toward the unconscious maiden, who still reposed
in Jacob's arms, her brown hair falling neglected over her pale cheeks,
while her arms hung by her side.
Girls, you will carry Madeline to her room, said Peter, in a loud
voiceThis marriage cannot take place to-night! Go!
Your duty
is before youI command you!
The girl started from her swoon, even as her hunter lover stood with
his face turned toward the door. She dashed the flowing hair from her
face as she sprang from Jacopo's arms, and looked around with a
frightened
glance.
I saw it all! she said in a whisper, that went to every heartI
saw her led, pale and beautiful, in her white dress, which was also her
shroud, into the half-lighted room, with rude wainscot on its narrow walls,
and a couch in one corner.
Do you hear? Take her to her roomshe is out of her headthe
face of Uncle Peter grew crimson, as he waved his hand, and with that
emphatic gesture, and angry voice, bade the country damsels remove the
bewildered girl.
O, the scene was very sad, and it seemed to me, as I looked on, my
eyes were filled with bitter tears. For she was a Mother, and no friend
was near to watch over her agony; afar from her country and her home,
and not one kind hand to wipe away a tear! Yes, there was one friend
a faithful negro, who fought for his mistress. But I see it yetah God!
They blind him with their kniveshis eyes are darkdark forever! He
cannot see the Babe, which is torn from the Mother's arms, ere it has
blessed her with a smileah! Spare her, pity her, for she is a
mother
,
and no friend is near!
Must we hear these ravings all night? Peter Dorfner forced the
bewildered girl into the arms of two red-cheeked damsels, and pointed to
the door. To her chamber, and let her sleep away this crazy dream!
As she was borne through the door, which opened upon the stairway,
Gilbert, with his head bowed down, and his right hand clasped upon his
knife, while the other grasped the rifle, left the farm-house without a word.
The bluff Peter, with his red face and white beard, found himself
standing
alone among his wondering guests.
Hey, folks? Why do you stare so? Is it such a wonder to see two
boys pick a quarrel with each other, or do you get frightened at a
love-sick
girl's faintin' fit? Comedraw your
cheers
around the fire; and let
the women make mischief, while the men smoke. A pipe, doctor? Come,
don't be snappishparson, forgive that little joke about the rabbitshere,
lawyer Simmons, let's have a social chat, I say!
In a moment, a circle was formed around the fire. The centre of the
picture, sat the jovial Peter, his red face and round form glowing in the
light. On one side the Lawyer, with a most lugubrious face; on the
other the Doctor, who arranged his wig, and looked steadily into the fire.
Next to the Doctor, the Parson was seen, his limbs crossed, and his hands
folded pleasantly upon his stomach.
The four, every one with his pipe and his bowl of cider, smoked and
drank as if for their lives. A constantly accumulating cloud hung over
their heads.
Around these figures, to the right and left were displayed the three aged
dames, the young girls, the stripling farmers, and the good neighbors
Wampole and Spurtzelditscher. Far in the chimney, Phillisey was
sleeping, nodding portentously, and every moment making a strong
demonstration
of throwing herself into the fire. The blind fiddler, Black
Sam, also seemed drowsy; his sightless eyeballs glared in the light, and
his fiddle lay neglected upon his knees.
But Jacopowhere is Jacopo, with that face shining like a beacon, that
form resembling a barrel, mounted on bean-poles? Behold him yonder.
Bending over the table, cramming himself with the wreck of the supper
dainties, now paying his respects to the fragments of a sausage, now
drowning his sorrows in a brimming bowl of rare October. All the
while, a fit of laughter seems struggling into birth, through every fibre
of his grotesque face. You see it in the distortions of his enormous
mouth, in the twinkling of his small black eyes.
Poor girl! Such a vivifying powdergood for fainting spells!
Better
for unknown lovers!
Broader and brighter grew the great fire on the hearth, and thicker and
darker rolled the tobacco cloud over the room.
Why d'ye all sit here, like leaden images in a Dutch church? Not a
word has been spoken for this five minutes. Where's all your fun,
Doctor
?
Parson, you sit moping like an owl; and as for you, Lawyer,
one 'ud think that your rich gran'mother had just died, and cut you off
without
a shillin'! Here, Phillisey; go up into the garret; under the
eaves of the roof, you will find certain bottles of rare old wine, which a
Philadelphy marchant gave me some years ago. Sam, I say, S-a-m!
Wake up and giv's a tune!
Did the blind negro hear the jovial Peter? Certainly he did not raise
his head, but, with his sightless eyeballs turned to the fire, remained as
motionless as a rock of anthracite coal.
Are you sleep, nigger?come, I say! Giv's a tune!
Was it a shudder that agitated the withered form of the black man?
His face, marked by the characteristic features of his race, the flat nose,
thick lips, and receding chin, quivered in every nerve, and the wrinkles
on his low forehead were woven together, as though by a sudden and
intense pain.
Sam, I say; stir up, and play's a tunethe cheerful Peter shook
him roughly by the shoulderYou ha'nt forgot all your music, man?
The negro's fingers, cramped and bent by severe labor, moved with the
same convulsive tremor which agitated his entire frame.
Dis nigga am sick, Massa. He am gettin berry old. Dese cold nights
driv' all de tune out of um head.
A cloud was visible on Peter's rotund visage, and something very much
like an oath came through his fat lips.
But at this moment, every ear was attracted by the sound of an opening
door, and with heads turned from the fire, the New Year's guests gazed
upon the new-comer.
Hah! It's John, said Peter, with one of his deep chucklesWhy
so changed, man? Your step is heavybless my heart! You're pale
as a corpse. Hey? Johndon't you know me?
Whowhispered the young man, as he leaned for support upon
Peter's arm-chairWho is
he?
He wiped the cold perspiration from his forehead: the light, shooting
up in a hearty glow, showed the death-like pallor of his handsome
features.
He? Of whom do you speak?
This Paulhow do you name him? This Monk of Wissahikon?
At the word, a strange gloom fell upon the faces near the fire-side.
Not a word was spoken in answer to the question.
Peter, with his habitual gesture, smoothed his beard, and inhaled a
hearty draught from the tube of his pipe, glancing sidelong, from his
half-closed eyes, toward the faces around him.
Can none of you answer? You surely know himcertainly can give
a reason for the terror which overspreads your faces, when you hear his
voice, and feel his eye upon you! A knife is at my throat, and with the
knee of my enemy pressing upon my chest, I feel that the hour of my
death is come. When lo! a mere boy clad in black appears, dashes the
knife aside, his only weapon a withered stickand you all start with
fear. Even my antagonist seems stricken with palsy. Have you no
answer
?
Who is the Monk of Wissahikon?
The Doctor looked cautiously toward the door, and took his pipe from
his lips
Hethat isyou askwhy, indeedhe isthe Monk of
Wissahikon
.
The explanation is lucid, and a sneer quivered on the young man's
lipsI almost know as much as when I first asked the question.
Sit down, John. Take a pipe, and draw a
cheer
. You shall watch
with us the comin' of the New Year, while the girls wait upon poor
Madeline in her chamber above us. There now, that's a hearty boy
smoke away, and let your cares fly with every puff! The Monk of
you want to know who he is? P'r'aps these good folks can tell us.
John slid into a chair, took the proffered bowl and pipe, while Jacopo
crept to his side, his diminutive black eyes peering, with nervous
intensity
,
into every face.
Young man, there are some questions, which it is not profitable to
ask on a New Year's Eve.The Doctor's visage was elongated beneath
his wig, into a most refreshing solemnity, reminding you of some strange
creation of fabulous history, linking the prominent characteristics of the
donkey and the owl. About one-fourth of a mile from this place, on
the other side of Wissahikon, stands an old house. In that house lives
the Monk. His father lives there, too.
Per-fectly satisfactory! whispered Jacopo.
Dish houseGott forgives me! I never likes to pass him late at
night! was the profound remark of Neighbor Spurtzelditscher.
Been by there oftenchorused Neighbor Wampole, starting a sly
glance toward the door. Often. Late at night and airly in the mornin'.
Heerd strange sounds within that house. They say its ha-a-nted.
It was now the Parson's turn. Touching the young man on the arm,
he knocked the ashes from his pipe, and gave utterance to a profound
ejaculation
Let us pray that we may be saved from selling our souls to the
Enemy
of Mankind!
By way of enforcing this excellent idea, he placed the bowl to his lips,
and drank in solemn silence.
Per-fectly satisfactory! again whispered Jacopo.
The old man, the father of theMonkhas a daughter? asked
Lawyer
Simmons, whose features manifested the sleepy period of
drunkenness
.
By-the-bye, Dorfnerhe whispered these words in the ear of
his corpulent friend
Certain they were n't cats?
John sat moodily in front of the fire, his face shaded by his uplifted
hand, while his form was enveloped to the throat, in his grey coat. Yet
beneath that shadowing hand, his pale features were wet with cold
moisture
,
and the trembling of the nether lip, the wavering light of the full
eye, indicated some powerful emotion. Jacopo, as he stood at the back
of his chair, bent over him, and placed his lips to the ear of his master
The Potion!
he whispered.
All is right. While I play the
fiddle
,
do you plead weariness, and retire to your room. The sound will
attract the attention of the girls up stairs; they will flock to the dance.
Your room is next to the chamber of Madeline!
All at once, a warm flush chased the pallor from the young man's
face: his eye grew steady, intense in its glance; his full lips wreathed in
a smile.
AhJacopo! What would the Devil do, were there no such imps
as you, in this beautiful world?
The minute hand of the Old Clock in the corner, pointed to the hour
of Twelve. In a moment, 1774 would be buried with the dead years,
and 1775, a newly born baby of a year, come chirping into light.
This was the scene which the Old Clock saw, in the last moment of
the dying year.
Beside the table, huge and portly, his coat thrown aside, and his shirt
sleeves rolled up, stood the jocund Peter Dorfner, his face like the full
moon on the clock, as, with extended hands, he poured bottle after bottle
into the colossal punch-bowl, made of some unknown wood, rimmed with
silver, and carved all over with drunken satyrs and reeling fauns.
Madeira and Sherry, Brandy and Hock, he poured them all into the
great bowl, and added spices without number, until the steam of the hot
liquors filled the very air with a drunken flavor.
Well is it for the topers of 1848, that the great Secret of the Peter
Dorfner Punch is lost forever, in the abyss of Time! Oh, my amiable
friends, whose noses bloom with carbuncles, whose very cheeks bear the
red blossoms of Brandy, had you seen old Peter mix his Punch,
composed
of all the liquors in the world, and fragrant with the spices of
every clime, you would have grown merrily drunk with the very flavor,
nay, went reeling to your beds, with a single whiff from that steaming
bowl! But the secret is lost, and the topers of 1848 must be content to
drink Pure Poison, such delectable liquids as vitriol, creosote, spiced with
cocculus indicus
and freshened with putrid water, and go reeling to their
graves, without the knowledge of the great Dorfner Punch.
And while Peter mixes his great Punch, yonder, in the arm-chair,
crouches Jacopo, writhing in the agonies of the fiddle, which he clasps
with one hand, while the other plies the bow, and sends the dancers
whirling over the sanded floor.
Only steal one look at his face, the mouth distorted by a thousand
changing grimaces, the sharp black eyes, leering from the wrinkled lids,
the round cheek resting lovingly against the fiddle!
Then his spider legs are crossed, while the round paunch undulates
with laughter, and the long right arm seems impelled into activity by
some galvanic battery.
The dancersit were worth your while to look at them. Now
huddled
in a crowd, now scattered over the floor, heels and heads and
arms, moving like clock-work run madsaw you ever such dancing?
Here the Doctor without a wig, there the Parson holding up his gown,
yonder Spurtzelditscher without his coat, and Perkenpine, his sallow
face burning with an incipient apoplexy, round and round they whirled,
entangled in a maze of young damsels, with the three old ladies
skirmishing
on the frontiers of that drunken circle!
Jacopo's fiddle did it all.
How it screamed, and roared, and yelled and laughed, putting
gunpowder
in every heel, and firing it off in every vein. It was a wicked
fiddle, and Jacopo cheered it on, with curses and shouts, until the whole
mansion shook, the very windows rattling like a thunder-storm of broken
glass.
And round and round, and up the sanded floor, and down again, and
over against the clock and across upon the table, caps flying, skirts
tossing
,
and faces steaming with damp crimson, they kept it up, while jocund
Peter mixed the punch, and Jacopo lashed the fiddle. Lashed it with
the bow, as with a whip, until it seemed to beg for mercy, and roar with
agony!
And as the dance went on, in drunken frenzy, the clock struck
Twelve
.
Come, boys and gals, shouted the jovial Peter, smoothing his white
beard, and looking like a wood-cut of Christmas in some old Dutch
AlmanacWe danced the Old Year outlet's drink the New Year in!
The clock struck Twelve, and in the room aboveonly separated
from the scene of drunken mirth, by a layer of planks, and a few stout
raftersa Maiden was extended on her virgin bed, the light held in the
hand of the Libertine playing softly over that cheek, so brown and yet
so warm, along the bosom, stealing in glimpses from the robe, that
trembled with the life throbbing beneath its folds.
Poor Madeline!
Of all the hours in her young life, the hour of Twelve, when the bell
struck 1775 into being, was most dangerous to her soul.
CHAPTER FOURTH.
PAUL THE DREAMER.
There
is a grey old rock, rising above the brown dust of the road, its
granite breast turned to the west, while all around it bloom the summer
leaves, and above it, the slanted pine flings its thick shadows.
It stands alone, huge, massive and colossal, like the altar of some
forgotten
religion, rising in sullen grandeur from the roadside earth, with
many a tender flower peeping from its crevices, while its summit
spreads beneath the sky, level as a floor.
You may stand upon this rock in the summer morning, and feel your
heart praise God, as, encircled by the freshness of the woods, lulled by
the music of the waters, you turn your gaze to the sky, whose tranquil
azurejust touched by the rising suncontrasts so beautifully with the
bright green of the leaves, the soft darkness of the waves.
To the westsuddenly turning from its northern coursethe
Wissahikon
flashes on, shadowed by broken rocks, with great walls of verdure
towering on either side, into the clear morning sky.
On the south, at the distance of but one hundred yards, an ancient mill
looks forth with its black walls, from the leaves that hang around its roof,
and near the mill, a waterfall glimpses into light, for an instant, ere it
plunges into the shadows. Beside this mill three roads meet; one
comes from the south, peeping abruptly from the world of foliage; one
leads to the north, along the base of the great rock; the other to the
west, skirting the Wissahikon, on her way to the Schuylkill.
But at the spot where the roads meet, a sight of fresh rustic beauty
meets your eye. It is an oaken trough, filled with clear cold water,
fresh from the caverns of Wissahikon, with the shadow of overhanging
branches between it and the light of day.
The mill-stream, which dashes into the shadows, to the south of the
great rock, passes underneath the bridge, erected between the rock and
the oaken trough, sparkling with clear cold water.
Such are the general features of the scene. Yet there are no words
in language to paint its full beauty. Who shall tell how the leaves, rising
in trembling pyramids of foliage, almost shut out the sky above us?
How the stream, now spreading in a pool as clear a mirror, set in a
frame of granite, now breaking in foaming waves against the rugged
rocks, passes into the shadows of the trees, and is seen, far beyond,
flashing into light again, like a soul risen again from the shadows of the
grave?
Or, what pencil shall paint the slow-moving clouds that sail over the
deep blue, and hover above the Wissahikon, as if gazing upon their white
bosom, reflected in the clear waters, far below?
It is beautiful to stand upon the rock, in the summer-time, and feel
that God is there, in the white blossoms that float along in the air, as
well as in the glimpse of blue sky, seen from overhead, but there was a
Night, when the place seemed tenanted by the Good and the Evil
Angels
of the shadowy world.
The moon rose over the eastern woods. A globe of pale golden light,
she hovered on the tops of the leafless trees, and shot her sad beams
along the summit of the giant rock, and far down the glen of
Wissahikon
.
That sad light shone upon the stream, as it chafed onward,
among rocks of ice, and rocks of stone; it gave a spectral glare to the
leafless woods, and revealed a sky, which, deepening into an intense
blue, and strown with points of light, looked like a tremulous curtain,
hung between man and Eternity. A tremulous curtain, veiling the awful
secrets of the World Beyond, and quivering in soft light, ere it was rolled
aside.
On the last night of 1774, as the moon rose in the east, you might
have seen two figures crouching under the giant rock, and have heard
their subdued whispers, breaking the Sabbath stillness of the air.
At their feet dashed the mill-stream, plunging into the Wissahikon,
with no bridge shadowing its tumultuous foam. The mill rose in the
south, its dark walls encircled by leafless branches. Above them,
projecting
as it rose, the giant rock flung a deep shadow over the wide forest
path.
Seated on a log, beneath that rock, they conversed in whispers. One,
a stunted and withered formlike a strong oak, blasted by lightning
brushed the long hair from his face, as he gathered the coarse mantle
around his distorted figure. The other, a tall and robust man, in the
prime of his manhood, grasped his rifle with a firm hand, and turned
his frank, earnest face, toward the horse-like visage of his companion.
At what hour?said a bold voiceit was the voice of the Hunter,
Gilbert Morgan.
He gazed into the face of the hunchback, with a sensation of
involuntary
awe. That long visage, shadowed by the matted hair, and resting on
the muscular breast, with the shoulders rising on either side, had a wild,
unearthly look. The small white hands were pressed against the hollow
cheeks, and a lurid light played around the eyes. It was more like the
face of a demon, than the visage of a man.
Stout Gilbert, whose tall form combined, in every outline, a rude beauty
with an iron vigor, was awed, not only by the vision of this deformed
figure and unnatural face, but by the awful night which encircled him,
the deep blue sky, made spectral by the light of the rising moon, the
Wissahikon, filling the dell with a never-ceasing echo, the trees, with
leafless branches, standing like wierd sentinels by its waters.
At what hour? he whispered.
At the hour of twelve said Black David; his voice was soft and
musical. Through the grove of pines, in front of the mansion, into the
front doorby this keyand up the stairs. Then, you will turn to the
right, traverse a corridor, and discover the small door leading to the
tower. The old man
Isaac the Wizard? asked Gilbert, his voice broken by a tremor.
Isaac the Wizard! a smile displayed the white teeth of the
Deformed
Yes,
Isaac the Wizard. You will find him in the tower.
Secure his gold. And at the hour of one, present yourself at
the House
on the opposite side of the Wissahikon
you remember it?
Gilbert shuddered. Was it from fear, as a dark Memory rushed upon
his soul, or did the accent with which Black David pronounced the
italicized
words, strike him with involuntary awe?
You areyou he began, but the words died on his lips.
What am I? Tell me. I have a vast curiosity to know what the
good people of the valley and the dell say of me. A poor, deformed
wretcheh?
He pronounced these words with an inexpressible bitterness.
Now look you, my friend Gilbert spoke in rough yet manly tones
No one ever yit caught me a-makin' fun of any man's personal
appearance
.
Don't keer how sticky the burr is, only so there's a good
chesnut inside. But I was goin' to say
Well? Black David drew nearer to him. The hunter imagined
that he felt the intense light of his eyes, shining into his face. That
you're a queer fellow, whispered Gilbert, as though he had relieved
himself of an important secret.
Queer? How?
To day, you're seen in the service of Old Isaac. To-morrow, you are
found in the Black-House 'way up the Wissahikon, in the service of the
Priest and his SonthetheMonk of Wissahikon. You don't seem
to have any place to live, and nobody knows much about you, anyhow!
Would you like to see me raise the Devil? said that low musical
voice, and again the expression, which we cannot depict, passed over
Black David's face.
Gilbert started to his feet, and clutched his rifle with a firmer grasp.
Take keer, I say! None of your dark tricks here! and he brought
the rifle to his shoulder.
The deformed arose. He raised his white hands. The moon,
streaming
over the top of the rock, bathed them in soft light, while his face and
figure were wrapt in shadow.
There was something horrible to Gilbert, in that face veiled in shadow,
while the uplifted hands glowed in the pale moonlight.
Take keer! he shouted again, his form agitated by a perceptible
tremorNone of yer devil's tricks on me, I say!
Shall I invoke
his presence
from the stream, which spreads black and
vague beneath us? On this rock shall I stand and say the words, and
speak the spells which will bring to your sideto yours, strong manthe
Enemy of Mankind? Oh, you feel your blood curdle, you grow cold
with fearyouyouthe stout hunter, who never felt before what it is
to fear!
The moon shone upon Gilbert's face. Those brown features were
agitated with an intensity of fear. The eyes glassy, the lips parted, the
veins along the bared throat writhing as if in extreme physical torture
he looked like an embodied image of fear.
Take keer! he growled againOne word more, and I fire!
You have dared to prate of me? You, a miserable earth-worm,
whom I can crush with a word? By my soul, I have a strange whim, to
punish you for your impertinence. Shall I give you into the power of
the spirits who people this wintry air? Shall I speak, and lo! do you
not feel it already? That invisible hand, cold as death, pressed against
your cheek?
The stout hunter shook as with an ague-chill. And yet, in his very
trembling, he was firm and brave. Awed by Black David's words,
chilled by his voice, fascinated by the strange power of his eyes, he
raised his rifle, and took deliberate aim at the breast of the hunchback.
Now raise your Devils, if you kin. Just try it, and I'll put this
bullet through yer breast!
Black David murmured some words in an unknown tongue. A sharp
report broke the grave-like silence, and was redoubled in a thousand
echoes. Up, slowly into the moonlight floated the blue smoke of the
rifle. The aim was deadly; the muzzle almost touched the breast of
the victim.
As the smoke rolled away, Gilberthis brow damp with moisture
started forward, and looked, with dilating eyes, for the mangled form of
that victim.
Black David was there, but neither mangled nor bleeding. There,
before
the affrighted hunter, his horse-like face framed in his matted hair
and beard, his small hands uplifted in the moonlight.
The rifle fell from the Hunter's palsied hands.
He had endured much in his time; wandered far away among the gorges
of the Alleghanies for days, without food; he had tracked the panther into
his lair, deep in the shadows of some pathless cavern, and faced the Red
Savage, in his deadliest rage; he was a man of iron nerve and fearless
soul. It may be, that his hands were stained with innocent blood, for his
life had been nurtured into robust vigor, among scenes and with men of
the darkest and most lawless character.
But now he trembled like a child in the dark, frightened at its own
footstep. He did not fear the hunchback, with his distorted form, and
long unnatural face, but he was afraid of that which palsies the stoutest
arm, and chills the firmest heartthat terrible something, which we
express
in the simple words
The other world
!
Therefore, as the rifle fell from his stiffening fingers, he stood trembling
in every nerve, with arms outspread, and face bathed with cold moisture,
while the moonlight still glowed upon the white hands of the Deformed.
Yer no man, but a Devil! I aimed at yer breastand my eye's good
to snuff a candle at a hundred yards! I loaded the rifle myself; 'twas
a sure ball, and there yo' ar', 'live as ever!
In answer to his incoherent exclamations, the voice of Black David
broke softly on the stilled air.
Do you feel the hand upon your cheek? It is coldvery cold, for it is
the hand of a dead man. You may turnbut you cannot see it! Still
it is there, pressing its icy fingers on your cheek, invisible, yet palpable as
life, and cold as death!
With his small hand, he lifted the matted hair from his forehead.
Gilbert
beheld it, saw the fair white skinmuch fairer and clearer than the
lower part of the facemarked by a livid cross, like the half-healed
cicatrice
of some hideous wound.
And did you think to kill me? he cried, in that voice, which, scarcely
audible, thrilled the listener to the heart, and startled the stillness with its
unearthly accent. Me? Do you behold that sign? His eyes gleamed
a sad and tender light. Take the knife from your belt; strike at my
heartstrike!
He flung the mantle from his shoulders. The hideous deformity of his
figure was made more painfully distinct, by a close-fitting dress of dark
hues, which revealed the large body supported by crooked and slender
limbs, the wide chest, with the face resting upon it, the long arms, high
shoulders, and back rising in a shapeless hump.
Take your knife. Strike. Do not fearthe sharp blade may drive
the life from this distorted form!
Gilbert did not touch his knife. His senses were enchained by the
eyes of the Deformed; that steady gaze held him, dumb and motionless.
Letmego! he faltered in a whisper. Take yer eyes off o'
meI can't move. Mercyif yo' b'lieve in a Godmercy!
He fell on his knees, yes, sinking on the snow which covered the sod,
and, by its spiritual white, made the clear Wissahikon look black and
spectral, he folded his arms upon his brawny chest, and his head drooped
slowly, until his face was hidden from the moon.
It seemed to himthe hardy woodsmanas though all power of mind
and body had passed from his form into the breast of the hunchback.
Even the power of speech failed him. His senses were dulled by a
drowsy languor; the sound of the Wissahikon, roaring over its rocky bed,
seemed afar off, and soon died away in a hollow murmur.
Gazing upon the prostrate huntsman, Black David stood erect, with the
moonbeamsstealing over the edge of the rockslowly lighting up his
strange face, and brow seared by a livid cross. Around his lips, a smile
of inexpressible scorn played fitfully, while the light of his eyes grew
more intense and spectral.
Rise! he said, after some moments had passed.
The herculean hunter slowly rose, stretching forth his arms with a
gesture of pain, like a man who has lain for hours in a cramped and
uneasy posture.
Take up your rifle!
Gilbert obeyed.
Go on your way. Do your duty, without fear. At the hour of One
rememberthe
House of the Brothers
! Go!
Retreating toward the rock, Black David pointed to the west, with the
delicate fingers of his right hand.
Slowly, Gilbert passed him. Without looking to the right or left, he
hurried into the shadows of the narrow dell, through which the
mill-stream
poured into the Wissahikon. He crossed the brook, now leaping
from rock to rock, now passing securely over the ice. Ascending the
opposite
hill, with one foot advanced towards the west, he turned his head
over his shoulder, and, with a shudder, looked back.
Beneath the rock, Black David stood, his form lost in shadow, while
the moon played freely over his face, and revealed his white forehead,
marked by the livid cross. With his left hand, he raised the matted hair,
with the right still pointing to the west
When I call, you will come to me! Gilbert heard his voice, rising
in deep emphasisMiles may separate us, mountains may intervene,
rivers howl between us, still you will hear my voice, and you will obey!
At the same moment Gilbert saw a form advance from the pines, and
stand in the bright moonlight, on the summit of the rock. It was the
figure of a man, whose black attire was tinted by the rays, as, with hands
clasped, he stood motionless upon the level summit of the granite mass,
his shadowed face turned toward the Wissahikon.
The Monk! he cried, andutterly bewildered by the events of the
last hour,rushed on his westward way, his head bent upon his breast,
and his rifle on his shoulder.
Meanwhile, upon the summit of the rock stood the motionless form,
clad in a sombre robe reaching to his knees,the face turned from the
moonand the long, flowing black hair, surmounted by a velvet cap.
His hands were clasped, and the silver cross gleamed faintly on his
dark dress. It was a noble form, and the face, wrapt in half-shadow, was
softened by an emotion which parted the lips, and gave the large eyes a
light at once sad and tender.
Alone upon the rockthe wild woods aroundthe intense sky above
he stood, while his dark form rose boldly into light, from the snow-covered
earth.
He raised his gaze to the skyit was there, so deep, so bright, so
beautiful
,
like a great curtain, hung between his eyes and that awful World of
Eternity, crowded with spirits of Light and Darkness.
The air was breathlessly still. The long prolonged howl of the
watchdog
came from afar with an unearthly cadence; the waves of the
Wissahikon
filled the hollows in the rocks with faint murmurs.
Save these sounds, all was still.
The eyes which gleamed from that bronzed face grew brighter and
more lustrous, even as they were wet with tears.
For the soul of the young man was elevated and purified, by the
supernatural
solemnity of the winter night upon the Wissahikon. To him,
the great sky was no vague blank in the Universe. It was crowded with
the Spirit People of many tongues, tribes and forms. The Stars above
were the Homes of Souls, many good, many evil, some lost in crimes,
and some pure as the light of God.
And even through the blue sky, he could look up, and see these spirits
or to speak in language which may be more intelligiblethese Men
and Women of a purer and diviner creation, circling in myriad throngs
of light and darkness. Some with their faces glowing ineffable love, and
others wearing upon their foreheads the fiery scorn of passion, defiance
and despair.
For, from very childhood, he had been taught to believe, that even as
the chain of physical existence begins with rudest beasts and almost
imperceptible reptiles, and extends upward to Man, so from Man up to
God, the chain of Spiritual Life extended in one unbroken line, creation
crowding on creation, and tribes of spirits rising above other tribes,
until the universe beheld its supreme source and fountain in the Great
Father of Eternity.
Therefore, to him, the beautiful sky did not seem a vague blank in
creation, peopled only with stars, that were desert worlds.
Nor did the rivulet, tossing among its ice-covered rocks, nor the leafless
trees around it, rising bleakly from the snowy earth, nor the deep glens,
sunken here and there on the borders of the gorge of Wissahikon, wear
only their external forms of wildness and beauty.
They were peopled with absorbing associations; not a rock but had
its own interest, not a tree but waved in the moonlight, stirred by some
hand, to him invisible. The very air was throngeddensewith the
Spirit People.
Ere you smile at the young man, and scorn his spiritual belief, let me
impress a few facts distinctly on your minds.
He has never passed the space of an hour's journey from the gorge
of Wissahikon.
His mind has been shaped in solitude; in an ancient mansion, centered
among these woods, he has lived since that hour of childhood, which has
but a faint mist, in place of Memory.
For some reasonhereafter to be explaineda solemn charge has
been laid upon his soul, never to permit his footsteps to wander from the
valley of Wissahikon, nor to gaze long upon the faces of men, much less
to enter into the spirit and the purposes of their every-day thoughts.
Within the Block-House, with no companionship save the aged man,
his father, and the fair girl, his sister, he has grown up to young manhood.
That sister he loves, but it is with a love, calm and serene as the stars.
That Love which burns and devours and maddens, has yet to come!
And he has yet to behold that horrible libel on the Universe of God,
that ulcer on the bosom of creation, that foul Congress of demoniac
passions
,
some tinseled with gold, and others naked as unveiled Devils
he has yet, and for the first time to behold
the Great City
.
Look upon him now, as he stands upon the rock, so serene in his
young manhood, his bronzed face softened by emotions vast and ineffable
as the great Universe which shuts him in.
His voice is heard; he speaks aloud, while, crouching in the shadow
of the very rock on which he stands, Black David hears his every word,
and smiles.
Shall IIthat have been nurtured among these solitudes, and taught
to see God in every flower, to hear his Spirit in every breezeshall I
ever share the tumult and the hatred of the great world, which lies be
yond the Wissahikon!
He paused, and raised his eyes to heaven.
But, in the shadow of the rock, Black David spoke
You shall! With the hilt in your hand, and the point to the heart
of your foe, you will wield the sword, and feel how deep the joy of
shedding blood!
He did not hear that voice, which, like a mocking echo, spoke, ere his
words had died away.
And womanshall I ever look upon her, but as some Pure Angel,
enshrined in the light flowing from the fountain of her own holiness?
This madness of passionof which the Poets speakthis devouring
frenzy, which tramples alike on truth and honor, and reaps its harvest
in the desolation of some virgin soul, in the infamy of some unpolluted
bodyshall it ever burn within my veins?
Still, from the shadow of the rock, the hunchback answered, with his
smile, that was cold as the moonbeam playing on the snow:
It shall! Even at this moment, she gazes proudly in her mirror,
and surveys the passionate beauty of her heaving breast, and wonders
when he that is to love her will appear!
Still this voice, speaking its scorn and its prophecy from the shadow,
did not reach the ears of the young man who stood upon the rock.
With his face, so bold and thoughtful in every outline, hallowed by an
emotion that was very much like PrayerPrayer at once sublime and
voicelesshe uncovered his brow, and his long black hair floated freely
on the wind.
His lustrous eyes upraised, he stretched toward the sky his
sinewy arm, and again his bold deep voice startled the Sabbath
stillness
Here be my lot forever, O Father! Here, where Thy name is
written
by the stars in the bosom of the waters, and the heart dwells with
itself, and has no ambition but to tremble nearer to its God! Here, as
long as my soul wears this drapery of mortality, may I dwell, and seek
no purer joy than to lead my father softly down the last steps of life
that lie between him and the grave, and know no deeper care than to
watch the soul of my stainless sisterand love it more serenelyas it
blossoms
into its perfect bloom!
As he spoke, a voice, sudden and abrupt, sounded at his side
Lord of Ardenheim
He turned with a sudden gesture, and saw a deformed figure, bending
respectfully, nay, in an attitude of servile obedience, before him.
It it you, David? he cried, somewhat startled by the voice, and the
strange words, which had been uttered, so abruptly, in his very ear.
The poor hunchback, whose reason is lost in a hopeless chaos! he
muttered to himself.
At the same time, clasping his hands and bending his head, until the
matted hair concealed his face, David stood before the young man, like a
servant who awaits his master's commands.
What were those strange words which you uttered, but a moment
past? he said, looking in compassion upon the deformed wretch.
Nothingmy good master, nothingonlybut poor David's mind
wanders. David is coldhe cannot remember what he has heard. An
old man in danger. Yo' see the robbers are a-goin' to murder him; so
I heard them say. An old man with white hairalone in a big house
and a daughterpoor David's brain is veryvery dark
There is some dark truth in this chaos of confused memoriesthe
thought flashed over the mind of Paul ArdenheimRobbers, did you
say? An old man in danger? Where, Davidspeak to Paulhe is
your friend. Tell him of these robbers.
In his compassion for the wandering intellect, the bodily and mental
decrepitude of Black David, Paul was wont to speak to him as to a
way-ward
child.
It wasit was and the hunchback laid his hand upon his forehead,
as if in the attempt to fix some vagrant memory.
Yesthe robbersthe old man gasped Paul, with impatient
earnestness.
On the Wissahikon slowly exclaimed Black DavidThe
mansion on the hill near the Schuylkill, under the tall pines
Isaac Van Behme? asked Paul, laying his hand on the hunchback's
arm.
YesIsaac the Wizard! cried Black David, with a sudden joy
flashing from his eyesThat's the old man. I heerd 'em jist now
under the rockthey've gone to murder him. You see, poor David is
weak. Paul is strong. And
There came over the young man's face an expression of
determination
,
which compressed his lips, and gave a deeper light to his eyes.
His arching browsblack and almost crescent-shapedwere shadowed
by a slight frown. As he turned to the moonlight, the silver cross rose
and fell, on his heaving chest.
Thanks, good David, he said, kindly pressing the hunchback's
hand. By the blessing of God, I will save the old man!
He descended from the rock, and presently, his form, attired in its
sombre robes, was seen on the opposite side of the mill-stream, on the
very spot where Gilbert had stood and looked back, but a few moments
before.
And from the top of the solitary rock, Black David contemplated him,
folding his arms, and standing as motionless as the great mass beneath
his feet, as he beheld that commanding figurethe face whose features
were shadowed in the gloomthe breast glittering with the silver cross.
The eyes of Black David grew vivid in their light, as, brushing aside
the matted hair from his forehead, he disclosed the Dark Cross, traced
on its fair hues.
5
You go on a strange pathway, my Lord Paul, Count of Ardenheim
and Baron of Lyndulfe! Nero was once a dreaming boy, and Judas a
pure Disciple! Borgia, the Pope, was, in his young manhood, an
example
of generous friendship and chivalrous honor. And yet Nero
made merry music while Rome was in flamesNero looked with
licentious
curiosity upon the dead mother, whom his own hand had slain.
Judas betrayed the Lord, who had broken bread with him, and sent the
Man-God who had loved him, to an ignominious death. Borgia became
the Demon-Pope, the lover of his own child, the
He paused, and the moon, shining upon his brow, scarred by the livid
cross, revealed the strange agitation of his large eyes, his quivering lips,
and hollow cheeks, as once more he whispered in his musical voice
You go on a strange pathway, my Lord Paul, Count of Ardenheim
and Baron of Lyndulfe!
And the words had not passed his lips, when Paul disappeared among
the shadows of the leafless trees.
CHAPTER FIFTH.
THE MONASTERY.
Ere
we follow the footsteps of Paul Ardenheim, let us turn back in
our history, and behold a scene which occurred some months before, when
the blush of June was upon the Wissahikon woods.
It stood in the shadows of the Wissahikon woods, that ancient
Monastery
,
its dark walls canopied by the boughs of a gloomy pine,
interwoven
with leaves of grand old oaks.
From the waters of the wood-hidden stream, a winding road led up to
its gates; a winding road overhung with tall, rank grass, and sheltered
from the light by the thick branches above.
A Monastery? Yes, a Monastery, here amid the wilds of Wissahikon,
in the year of Grace, 1774; a Monastery built upon the soil of William
Penn!
Let me paint it for you, at the close of this calm summer day.
The beams of the sun, declining far in the west, shoot between the
thickly gathered leaves, and light up the green sward around those
massive gates, and stream with sudden glory over the dark old walls. It
is a Monastery, yet here we behold no swelling dome, no Gothic turrets,
no walls of massive stone. A huge square edifice, built one hundred
years ago of the trunks of giant oaks and pines, it rises amid the woods,
like the temple of some long-forgotten religion. The roof is broken into
many fantastic forms;here it rises in a steep gable, yonder the heavy
logs are laid prostrate; again they swell into a shapeless mass, as though
stricken by a hurricane.
Not many windows are there in the dark old walls, but to the west
four large square spaces, framed in heavy pieces of timber, break on your
eye, while on the other sides the old house presents one blank mass of
logs, rising on logs.
No: not one blank mass, for at this time of year, when the breath of
June hides the Wissahikon in a world of leaves, the old Monastery looks
like a grim soldier, who, scathed by time and battle, wears yet thick
wreaths of laurel over his armor, and about his brow.
Green vines girdle the ancient house on every side. From the squares
of the dark windows, from the intervals of the massive logs, they hang
in luxuriant festoons, while the shapeless roof is all one mass of leaves.
Nay, even the wall of logs which extends around the old house, with a
ponderous gate to the west, is green with the touch of June. Not a trunk
but blooms with some drooping vine; even the gateposts, each a solid
column of oak, seem to wave to and fro, as the summer breeze plays with
their drapery of green leaves.
It is a sad, still hour. The beams of the sun stream with fitful splendor
over the green sward. That strange old mansion seems as sad and
desolate
as the tomb. But suddenlyhark! Do you hear the clanking of
those bolts, the crashing of the unclosing gates?
The gates creak slowly aside!let us steal behind this cluster of pines,
and gaze upon the inhabitants of the Monastery, as they come forth for
their evening walk.
Three figures issue from the opened gates. An old man, whose withered
features and white hairs are thrown strongly into the fading light by his
long robe of dark velvet. On one arm leans a young girl, also dressed
in black, her golden hair fallingnot in ringletsbut in rich masses, to
her shoulders. She bends upon his arm, and with that living smile upon
her lips, and in her eyes, looks up into his face.
On the other arm, a young man, whose form, swelling with the proud
outlines of early manhood, is attired in a robe or gown, dark as his
father's, while his bronzed face, shaded by curling brown hair, seems to
reflect the silent thought written upon the old man's brow.
They pace slowly along the sod. Not a word is spoken. The old
man raises his eyes, and lifts the square cap from his browlook! how
that golden beam plays along his brow, while the evening breeze tosses
his white hairs. There is much suffering, many deep traces of the Past,
written on his wrinkled face, but the light of a wild enthusiasm beams
from his blue eyes.
The young manhis dark eyes, wildly glaring, fixed upon the sod
moves by the old man's side, but speaks no word.
The girl, that image of maidenly grace, nurtured into beauty within an
hour's journey of the city, and yet afar from the world, still bends over
that aged arm, and looks smilingly into that withered face, her glossy
hair waving in the summer wind.
Who are these, that come hither, pacing at the evening hour, along the
wild moss? The father and his children!
What means that deep, strange light, flashing not only from the blue
eyes of the father, but from the dark eyes of his son?
Does it need a second glance to tell you, that it is the light of
Fanaticism
,
that distortion of Faiththe wild glare of Superstition, that
deformity
of Religion?
The night comes slowly down. Still the Father and Son pace the
ground in silence, while the breeze freshens and makes low music among
the leaves.Still the young girl, bending over the old man's arm, smiles
tenderly in his face, as though she would drive the sadness from his brow
with one gleam of her mild blue eyes.
At lastwithin the shadows of the gate, their faces lighted by the last
gleam of the setting sunthe old man and his son stand like figures of
stone, while each grasps a hand of the young girl.
Is it not a strange yet beautiful picture? The old Monastery forms
one dense mass of shade; on either side extends the darkening forest,
yet here, within the portals of the gate, the three figures are grouped,
while a warm, soft mass of tufted moss, spreads before them. The proud
manhood of the son, contrasted with the white locks of the father, the
tender yet voluptuous beauty of the girl relieving the thought and
sadness
which glooms over each brow.
Holdthe Father presses the wrist of his Son with a convulsive grasp
hush! Do you hear that low deep whisper?
At last, it comes to my soul, the Fulfilment of Prophecy! he
whispers
and is silent again, but his lip trembles and his eye glares.
But the timeFather
the time?
the Son replies in the same deep
voice, while his eye, dilating, fires with the same feeling that swells his
Father's heart.
The last day of this yearthe third hour after midnight
the
Deliverer
will come
!
These words may seem lame and meaningless, when spoken again, but
had you seen the look that kindled over the old man's face, his white
hand raised above his head, had you heard his deep voice swelling through
the silence of the woods, each word would ring on your ear, as though it
quivered from a spirit's tongue.
Then the old man and his son knelt on the sod, while the young
girllooking in their faces with wonder and awesank silently beside
them.
The tones of Prayer broke upon the stillness of the darkening woods.
Tell us the meaning of this scene. Wherefore call this huge edifice,
whose dark logs are clothed in green leaves, by the old-world name of
Monastery? Who are thesefather, son and daughterthat dwell
within
its walls?
Seventeen years agofrom this year of Grace, 1774,there came to
the wilds of the Wissahikon, a man in the prime of mature manhood, clad
in a long, dark robe, with a cross of silver gleaming on his breast. With
one arm he gathered to his heart a smiling babe, a little girl, whose golden
hair floated over his dark dress like sunshine over a pall; by the other
hand he led a dark-haired boy.
His name, his origin, his object in the wilderness, no one knew; but
purchasing the ruined Block-House, which bore on its walls and timbers
the marks of many an Indian fight, he shut himself out from all the world.
His son, his daughter, grew up together in this wild solitude. The voice
of prayer was often heard, at dead of night, by the belated huntsman,
swelling from the silence of the lonely house.
By slow degrees, whether from the cross which the old stranger wore
upon his breast, or from the sculptured images which had been seen
within
the walls of his forest home, the place was calledthe Monastery
and its occupant the Priest.
Had he been drawn from his native home by crime? Was his name
enrolled among the titled and the great of his Father-land, Germany?
Or, perchance, he was one of those stern visionaries, the Pietists of
Germany, who, lashed alike by Catholic and Protestant persecutors,
brought to the wilds of Wissahikon their beautiful Fanaticism?
For that Fanaticism, professed by a band of brothers, who, years before,
driven from Germany, came here to Wissahikon, built their Monastery,
and worshipped God, without a written creed, was beautiful.
It was a wild belief, tinctured with the dreams of Alchemists, it may
be, yet still full of faith in God, and love to man. Persecuted by the
Protestants of Germany, as it was by the Catholics of France, it still
treasured the Bible as its law and the Cross as its symbol.
The Monastery, in which the brothers of the faith lived for long years,
was situated on the brow of a hill, not a mile from the old Block-House.
Here the Brothers had dwelt, in the deep serenity of their own hearts,
until one evening they gathered in their garden, around the form of their
dying father, who yielded his soul to God in their midst, while the setting
sun and the calm silence of universal nature gave a strange grandeur to
the scene.
But it was not with this Brotherhood that the stranger of the
Block-House
held communion.
His communion was with the dark-eyed son, who grew up, drinking
the fanaticism of his father, in many a midnight watch; with the
golden-haired
daughter, whose smile was wont to drive the gloom from his brow,
the wearing anxiety from his heart.
Who was the stranger? No one knew. The farmer of the
Wissahikon
had often seen his dark-robed form, passing like a ghost under the
solemn pines; the wandering huntsman had many a time, on his
midnight
ramble, heard the sounds of prayer breaking along the silence of the
woods from the Block-House walls: yet still the life, origin, objects of
the stranger were wrapt in impenetrable mystery.
Would you know more of his life? Would you penetrate the mystery
of this dim old Monastery, shadowed by the thickly-clustered oaks and
pines, shut out from the world by the barrier of impenetrable forests?
Would you know the meaning of those strange words, uttered by the
old man, on the calm summer evening?
Come with me, thenat midnighton the last night of 1774. We
will enter the Block-House together, and behold a scene, which, derived
from a tradition of the past, is well calculated to thrill the heart with
a deep awe.
It is midnight: there is snow on the ground: the leafless trees fling
their bared limbs against the cold blue of the starlit sky.
The old Block-House rises dark and gloomy from the snow, with the
heavy trees extending all around.
The wind sweeps through the woods, not with a boisterous roar, but
the strange sad cadence of an organ, whose notes swell away through the
arches of a dim cathedral aisle.
Who would dream that living beings tenanted this dark mansion,
arising in one black mass from the bed of snow, its huge timbers revealed
in various indistinct forms, by the cold clear light of the stars? Centred
in the midst of the desolate woods, it looks like the abode of spirits,
or like some strange sepulchre, in which the dead of long-past ages lie
entombed.
There is no foot-track on the winding roadthe snow presents one
smooth white surfaceyet the gates are thrown wide open, as if ready
for the coming of a welcome guest.
Through this low, narrow dooralso flung wide openalong this dark
corridor, we will enter the Monastery.
In the centre of this room, illumined by the light of two tall white
candles, sits the old man, his slender form clad in dark velvet, with the
silver cross gleaming on his bosom, buried in the cushions of an oaken
chair.
His slender hands are laid upon his kneeshe sways slowly to and fro
while his large blue eye, dilating with a wild stare, is fixed upon the
opposite wall.
Hush! Not a wordnot even the creaking of a footstepfor this old
man, wrapped in his thoughts, sitting alone in the centre of this strangely
furnished room, fills us with involuntary reverence.
Strangely furnished room? Yes, circular in form, with a single
door-way
;
huge panels of dark oaken wainscot rise from the bared floor to the
gloomy ceiling. Near the old man arises a white altar, on which the
candles are placed, its spotless curtain floating down to the floor.
Between
the candles, you behold a long, slender flagon of silver, a wreath
of laurel leaves, fresh gathered from the Wissahikon hills, and a Holy
Bible, bound in velvet, with antique clasps of gold.
Behind the altar, gloomy and sullen, as if struggling with the shadows
of the room, arises a cross of Iron.
On yonder small fire-place, rude logs of oak and hickory send up their
mingled smoke and flame.
The old man sits there, his eyes growing wilder in their gaze every
moment, fixed upon the solitary door. Still he sways to and fro, and
now his thin lips move, and a faint murmur fills the room.
He will come!
mutters the Priest of the Wissahikon, as common
rumor named him.
At the third hour after midnight the Deliverer will
come!
Yet while the aged man in the Block-house, after weary years of
thought, awaits the great end of his long vigil of Prayer, we will follow
the footsteps of his son, and witness scenes of novel and absorbing
interest.
It is now the hour of twelve, on the Last Night of 1774. While the
guests are feasting in the farm-house and dancing the old year to his grave,
while Gilbert goes on his way of Blood, and Paul on his errand of Peace,
the moon rises higher in the cloudless sky, and bathes the winding gorge
the snowy hillsthe wilderness of leafless trees, in light, at once sad
and sepulchral.
Yonder, on the summit of the broad hill, which rises on the south of
Wissahikon, we behold a stone mansion, centred in a grove of tall pines,
whose branches are bent with the weight of snow.
Through these thickly-woven pines, the moonlight comes in uncertain
gleams; now the level space in front of the hall door is alive with belts
of silvery light, that move hurriedly over the frozen snow, and again a
dense shadow broods around the mansion.
Its outlines are wrapped in gloom. Before the door, a fallen statue of
some heathen deity lies half-covered in snow; the shutters are closed;
the whole place wears an aspect of desolation.
Yet, from the circular tower which rises from the centre of the roof, a
vivid ray flashes far over the snow, until it is lost in the brightness,
yonder
,
beyond the grove of pines.
And while this light flashes from the tower of the mansion, on the
southern
hill of Wissahikon, on the opposite shore, not more than five
hundred
yards away, another ray gleams from the leafless trees, and trembles
on the bosom of the Wissahikon.
Deep sunken between two high hills, an old house stands there,
encircled
with dreary brushwood, with the trees gathered thickly around it,
and the shutters on its narrow windows closed like the portals of a
grave-vault
.
Through the closed shutters, that faint and wandering ray streams
out upon the night, while the subdued echoes from its secret chambers
break at sudden intervals upon the Sabbath stillness of the air.
First we will turn our gaze toward the grand old mansion, on the
southern
hills. It is the house of Isaac Van Behme, called Isaac the Wizard.
Then to the deserted house, sunken in the sombre hollow, on the
northern
shore of Wissahikon, where the closed shutters and impenetrable
walls cannot altogether drown the sounds which awake the echoes of its
gloomy chambers.
Strange sounds, gloomy echoes! The deserted house is looked upon
with superstitious fear, by the people of the hill-side and forest. It is
haunted; ghosts are seen gliding through the shadows of its encircling
thickets; the Great Fiend himself comes nightly to visit its chambers.
Years ago, when it was a comfortable home, the country residence of a
foreigner, who sojourned awhile in the city, and spent his summer hours
beside the Wissahikon, a guest was murdered by its very hearthstone,
and buried in its cellar. So run the vague superstitions of the
Wissahikon
folks, in regard to the ruined house.
It is indeed haunted, but by Ghosts or by living Men, who appear like
ghosts, and come and go, under the mantle of an impenetrable mystery?
The Great Fiend, in truth, does often visit its walls, but not the Satan
whom men fear, armed with grotesque terrors, formidable with hoof and
horns and tail.
That Fiend is the Invisible Head of a Secret Organization, which
extends
from these woods of Wissahikon, over the continent of America,
and only speaks to hear its mandates re-echoed by the thousand Lodges
of the Old World and the New.
CHAPTER SIXTH.
THE WIZARD'S DAUGHTER.
Before
the mirror stood a Maiden, gazing upon the reflected beauty of
her dark eyes, the reflected loveliness of her half-bared bosom
These words may seem very abrupt and somewhat rude, but when
you have taken in the entire details of the picture, you will agree with
me, that it was a sight altogether interestingperchance beautiful.
It was not an oval mirror, framed in a narrow rim of carved walnut,
and placed upon an antique dressing-bureau. Nor was it encircled by a
frame of showy gilt, with golden flowers and golden Cupids strown about
its brightness.
It was a square mirror, framed by the dark paneling of the maiden's
chamber, and reaching from the ceiling to the floor.
Before it, with the light shining on her forehead, and a robe of dark velvet
flowing from her left shoulder over her form, and flowing in folds by no
means constrained or formal, stood a girl of eighteen years, whose eyes,
and brows, and hair were all intensely black.
Her complexion was brown, but a clear, rich brown, more beautiful to
look upon than the fairest blonde. For in the centre of each swelling
cheek, and on her lips, through whose intervals her white teeth were seen,
that brown complexion bloomed into the rosiest red.
The eyes were dark and very bright, but the half-closed lids and the
long lashes veiled their brightness, and subdued it into a dreamy languor.
Her hair was turned aside from her forehead, and bound at the back of
her head, in a mass of glossy blackness. But part of it, not so much a
tress, as two or three tresses linked together, escaping from the cincture,
floated down her cheek, and made her bared shoulder look more white
and beautiful, as it trembled over its faultless outlines.
In her left hand she held the lamp, while, with her right arm bent,
she clasped the mantle to her bosom, that mantle, whose loose-flowing
folds marked the outlines of her shape, and left her naked feet bare to
the light.
The light streamed warmly over her face, tinted her dark hair, and
showed a gleam of the white bosom, heaving beneath the golden fringe
of the black mantle.
That face is full of character. It speaks the soul. The languid
eyelids
,
and the parted lips; the cheek glowing into crimson, and the eye
veiled in a dewy moistureall speak of a warm, nay, a passionate
organization.
But the white forehead, rendered more distinct in every outline by the
black hair, tossed aside in glossy masses, tells of an intellectual
perchance
an ambitious organization.
Nor does the form, whose outlines are betrayed by the loosely flowing
folds of velvet, lack expression, at once decided and bewitching.
The bared left arm glows softly in the light, with its clear skin and
round outlines, and tapers into the white hand, whose palm is velvety
whose fingers seem like transparent marble, warmed by a rosy radiance.
The bust is round, full, like a flower, that only demands another
moment
,
to ripen it into perfect bloom. The waist is slender, but by no
means like the waist of a fashion-plate or a wasp. The small feet,
relieved
by the dark matting on which they rest, harmonize with the hands
and indicate, by their delicacy of outline, the voluptuous fulness of the
maiden's form.
And in the mirror, framed in the dark paneling, and reaching from the
ceiling to the floor, she beholds that form, and gazes in dreamy languor
upon the warm loveliness of her face.
The room, in which she stands, may claim our passing glance. It is
square, paneled with dark wood, with a door in the south, a recess on the
north, a window looking to the east, over a waste of frozen snow, just
silvered by the rising moon.
The dark wood is carved with the faces of nymphs, fauns, satyrs,
cupids and devils, with here and there a mask, or a cluster of flowers, or
a garland of leaves.
The recess is veiled from our sight by curtains of purple tapestry, that
look black in the candle-light, and fall with their golden fringe upon the
floor.
The floor is polished, until it resembles a mirror; the dark matting
on which the maiden stands, an antique dressing-bureau, and two chairs,
cumbrous with carvings and embroidery, alone break the uniformity of its
glittering surface.
The curtains of snowy whiteness, which sometimes veil the window,
are now drawn aside, and the moonlight comes through the narrow
panes, and shines in a line of light along the floor.
Altogether, it is a beautiful picture; this room, paneled with dark
wood, with a beautiful girl standing in its centre, the light shining above her
head, revealing another maiden, as lovely as herself, smiling upon her
from the mirror, into whose brightness she is gazing.
And as she stands there, surveying with voluptuous languor the image
of her own loveliness, reflected in the mirror, the dead silence is broken
by a sudden, sharp sound.
The mirror movesit trembles like a smooth lake into which a pebble
is thrownit passes slowly aside, and disappears within the panel. A
deep recess is visible, where, but a moment since, the mirror shone.
The maiden trembles, she utters a sudden cry of terror, and sinks on
her knees, the robe still clasped to her bosom, her unbound hair
waving
over her shoulders.
Her cheek becomes as pale as death. No longer veiled in languid
moisture, no longer hidden under the downcast lid, her eye dilates
flashes with terror.
There is a form in the recessis it but an Apparition roused from the
shadows of the Other World, or the form of a human being?
The maiden raises her eyesfor a moment the deathly paleness of her
face struggles with a rosy bloomand then, blushing over her cheek, her
neck and her bosom, which pants suddenly into light, that flush fires her
face with a warm, voluptuous beauty.
With a gesture of involuntary joy, she raises her arms, and casts her
fallen tresses aside from her white shoulder
The Monk of Wissahikon!
And once more, over the cheek, and brow, and bosom, she blushes
like a new-born summer morning.
CHAPTER SEVENTH.
THE PHIAL OF ETERNAL YOUTH.
At
the same moment, in another apartment of the Wizard's mansion,
a far different scene was in progress.
Let us leave the chamber of the maiden, and pass along the corridor,
lighted by a hanging lamp, which reveals the wide stairway, descending
to the ground floor of the mansion, and also shines upon the narrow door,
whose panels break the uniformity of the oaken wainscot. That narrow
door conceals the confined staircase leading upward into the tower, on
the summit of the mansion.
The lamp, or rather lantern, hangs from the ceiling, right above the
wide stairway, and throws but a faint light over its windings while it
glows brightly on the narrow door.
A step is heard, like the subdued and stealthy tread of an armed man,
and presently we discern a figure in the darkness of the stairwayit
slowly ascendsand in a moment, the light discloses the face of Gilbert
Morgan, shadowed by a look of sullen ferocity.
He leans against the railings of the stairway, and bends his head to
one side, in the attitude of one who listens intently for the faintest sound
One foot on the stairway, and one on the corridor, his right arm rests on
the mahogany railing, while his left hand, dropped at his side, grasps the
unsheathed hunting-knife.
And as he listens, the light discloses that almost gigantic form,
enveloped
in the blue hunting-shirt, which, leaving the throat bare, falls to the
knees, edged with white fur, while the brown facethrown into bold
relief by the darkness of the stairwayworks in every nerve, as with
the impulse of plunder and carnage.
He listenslips compressed, eyes shadowed by the down-drawn brows
but all is still.
One step, stealthy as a panther's tread, toward the door of the maid
en's chamber. His bent head touches the dark panels; all silent, not
a sound meets his ear. Then, underneath the swinging lantern he
stands again, and his face is covered by a dark mask, which, tied around
the forehead, reaches to the mouth, and leaves only the lower part of the
visage exposed to the light. With the knife in his right hand, he
approaches
the narrow door, lifts the latch, and places his foot upon the
first step of the dark staircase.
The sound of voices, rendered faint by distance, breaks indistinctly on
his ears. Without a word he enters the door, and in the darkness
ascends
the stairway. The walls touch his shoulders on either side; the
ceiling is so low, that he is forced to bend his head upon his breast, as
he ascends.
Those words become more distinct, and after twenty steps are passed,
a ray of light streams through the intervals of a curtain, and glimmers
out upon the blackness of the stairway.
That curtain supplies the place of a door, and separates the haunt of
the Wizard from the staircase.
Gilbert is on the topmost step; knife in hand he approaches the
curtain
.
As the ray flashes over his masked face, he stealthily advances,
and looks within.
It is the appointed time!
The rude hunter, bent on a deed of violence, swayed by invisible
hands to an act of midnight plunder, felt a superstitious thrill pervade
his veins, at the sound of that voice.
It must be confessed, that the scene which he beheld, might have
chilled with awe a stouter heart, a bolder brain than his.
A small lamp, glittering like polished silver, hung by a chain from the
dome-like ceiling, and cast a pure and spiritual light over the place.
It was a circular room, not more than twenty feet in diameter. The
walls were hung with parchments, inscribed with Hebrew and Arabic
characters. A recess was filled with massive volumes, whose dusty
covers, and silver clasps, bore the traces of a venerable age. On one
side, hung a skeleton, the white skull and hollow orbits glaring in the
clear light. Not far removed, a shapeless mass, enveloped in a brown
cloth, tattered with age, and covered with dust, stood crect against the
wall. That shapeless mass was once a living soul; a thousand years
ago, it trod the soil of the New World, perchance a warrior armed for
battle, or it may be, a Priest of some forgotten creed, with the knife of
sacrifice in his hand. It is an Indian Mummy, exhumed from a mound
on the far western prairies.
It was in the centre of the room, whose walls were crowded with
strange and contrasted details, that a picture of some interest was
disclosed
by the rays of the hanging lamp.
An old man bent over a corse, a knife in his hand, while his blue eyes
shone from his withered face with a wild unearthly light. He was clad
in a black gown, whose loose folds concealed the outlines of his
shrunken limbs.
The corse, extended on a board which rested on tressels, was
half-concealed
by a white cloth, which swept in careless folds from the waist to
the feet. But the broad chest, the sinewy throat, the dark-red visage,
were bare; the face, wrinkled by age, wore, even in death, a look of iron
defiance.
It was the dead body of the Chief, Yoconok.
Opposite the old man, crouching on the floor, the figure of the deformed
man, known as Black David, was visible. Resting his cheek upon his
hand, he gazed upon him steadily, his eyes almost hidden by the thick
meshes of his long hair. With that pale face, encircled by the dark
beard and hair, quivering with half-suppressed laughter, Black David
looked like some Demon, summoned by the craft of the Wizard to aid in
his unholy task.
It is the appointed time. I am about to behold the great result of the
ceaseless toil of twenty-one years. For twenty-one years, by night and
day, in the cell beneath this house, I have watched for the moment
when the liquid of immortal life should greet my eyes. The liquid is in
my hand; this phial contains those priceless drops, every one of which
is worth an hundred years of life. But thou canst not comprehend me,
Davidnature, in giving thee a body hideously deformed, has not
supplied
the lack of manly beauty with the gift of an intelligent soul. Thou
canst but aid me with thy brute strength. Rise, David. Watch the
hour-glass
on yonder shelf. When its sands are run, the dead will risethis
cold image of clay become a young and vigorous man!
Black David rose, and, gliding to the recess, glanced upon the
hour-glass
.
Its sands were well night run. Then, sinking upon the floor
again, he placed his face within his hands, and observed the old man,
with an unvarying gaze.
It was wonderful to mark the energy which lighted up that withered
face, and shone without ceasing, in the clear blue eyes. It was the
energy of a mistaken but sincere enthusiasm, the resolution of a
Fanaticism
nursed into unnatural vigor by the delusions of a long life.
He shall rise! Young and beautiful, I will make of his beauty and
his youth, the unfailing instruments of my will. When I have raised the
dead, changed death into life, then will the rest of my great task become
plain and palpable. First, the dead must be raised, then baser metals may
be transmuted into gold. So read the lessons of the sages, so speak
they all, from Apollonius of Tryana down to Paracelsus and Agrippa!
Gold? Hoho! What will
you
do with gold sneered Black
David, as he looked steadily into the old man's face. Why, Master,
you've one foot in the grave already, and 'tother is slippin' arter it. Eh
o-o-h! I seeyou want it for your coffin!
Poor wretch! muttered Isaac in a tone of deep pityHe speaks
the language of the world. But I will use him as an instrument in my
great design. When I am dead, he will apply the liquid to my cold lips,
and the old man, withered by the toil of a long lifethe limbs shrunken,
the face wrinkled, the heart chilledshall start into being, with hope in
his veins, and young manhood sparkling in his eyes!
Black David drew near the corse, while Isaac was speaking; he laid
his hand upon the frowning brow of the dead man.
Dost say 'un will come to life again? he said, with an idiotic smile
and vacant stare. No! It ain't possible, Master Behme! He be stone
deadsee!
Gilbert, from his place of concealment, beheld the Deformed lift the
naked arm of the Indiansway it carelessly to and froand then dash it
with some violence upon his broad chest.
The hunter trembled from head to foot, not so much with fear of the
Wizard, as with a sensation of creeping awe, which chilled his veins,
whenever he saw the cold gleam of the hunchback's eyes.
But, trembling from head to foot, he placed the knife in his belt again,
and in the darkness, felt the lock of his pistol.
That ar' cripple's a born devil; but as for Isaac, I'll see what he's
made of! he mutteredHe must'nt cut any of his
shines
over the
Ingin's dead carcase, while I'm about!
Do not touch the dead said Isaac with an energetic gesture
Back from the corse, I say, and watch while I make the last
experiment
.
The time will come, David, when you will have to do a deed like
thismark me, therefore, so that you may call your Master back to life,
when he is dead.
He bent over the corse, holding in one hand the scalpel, or
dissecting-knife
,
while in the other he grasped a small glass phial.
Black David approached, and watched him with great earnestness, his
face lengthening with an expression of vacant wonder, most ludicrous to
behold.
Y-a-a-s, Master he drawledI sees!
The born devil! muttered Gilbert, behind the curtainI'll be
bound he plays old Isaac some cursed trick before he's many minutes
older. Jist look at his faceas simple as a school-boy arter a good
lickin'and yet the very Devil's in them eyes!
When the moment is come, David, I will describe a Crossthus
with the point of the knife, on the breast of the dead man. Pronouncing
the awful name of Godwhich the High Priest of the Jews uttered but
once a year, and that in the Holy of Holiespronouncing THE NAME
which has been lost to the mass of mankind for thousands of years, I
will pour a drop of this liquid into the wound, made by the knife. Yet,
mark ye, it must be poured into the very centre of the Cross, else is the
charm in vain, and the elixir without power.
Then, Master mumbled Black David, twisting his fingers in the
meshes of his hair.
Even as prussic acid, applied to the lips, kills at oncekills ere the
hand that applied it falls to the sideso will this liquid, poured on the
Cross, which is cut into the flesh with the knife, bring the dead to life,
ere a second is gone.In a few moments, David, you will see it done!
The old man stood contemplating the slender phial, which was filled
with a colorless and transparent liquid. A look of strange sadness came
over his face, as he muttered an incoherent soliloquy:
I was young; my step firm, my eye bright; youth in my veins, hope
in my eye. I loved; there was a wife, a child in my home. A gorgeous
home amid the hills of Yorkshire, where the proud and beautiful came
thronging, to pay their homage to theWEALTHY COMMONER. Isaac Van
Behme was then the owner of millions. Ah, I was afraid that I might
diebe gathered to a cold vault, and leave my wealth to others. Then a
yearning desire sprung up within me, and changed my nature. I was,
indeed, born again. To live forever on the earthto fear no decayto
create gold at will, from the baser metalsto be immortal at once, in the
power of youth and in gold! My wife diedI cared not. That one
desire
became the great passion of my being. I interrogated the PastI
wrung knowledge from the writings of the ancient seersI grappled with
Death itself, and besought the answer to my question, `In what part of
the human frame does the Principle of Life make its dwelling?
NayI tracked the dark avenues of the gold mine, and sought day
after day, year after year, to look upon the Great Laboratory of Nature,
and learn the process, by which she turns base lead and copper into
gold. The end of my toil is near. The old man, hidden in this lonely
valley, shall soon go forth again into the great world; he shall become
once more the comrade of Kings; his child may perchance feel the weight
of a crown upon her brows!
With his large blue eye fixed upon the slender phial, he paced along
the floor, the gown floating loosely around his shrunken limbs, while the
clear rays of the lamp shone warmly upon his venerable hair.
As he paced along, absorbed in his wild fanaticism, Black David,
crouching near the corse with his face resting between his hands, looked
up, from beneath his bushy eyebrows, laughing all over his colorless face,
as he muttered
Fool! Would he might gain his wish, and know at once, that hell
has no curse so horrible, as the blessing he desires
eternal life on earth,
gold without end
.
Gilbert felt a strange pity melt his rude heart, as he gazed upon
the old man's face. There was an overwhelming desire, written on
every withered line; as the eyes shone in deep clear light, and the lips grew
tremulous, the hunter heard him whisper without ceasing these words
YouthGold! GoldYouth! YouthGold!
And so the withered Fanatic paced the floor of the strange room,
grasping, in those two words, the great desire of the whole world of
mankind, while, crouching like an embodied scorn, near his feet, Black
David muttered his answering echo:
Death! Sleep! Sleepdeath! To die and to forget! and over
his sneering face there came an expression of unutterable anguish.
To-day
he murmured, as Isaac paced the floor, unconscious of his
presence
To-day,
in these woods, I saw a child lie dead upon its
Mother's
knee. I would give all the gold in the universe, all the life in
eternity, to be that child!
The face of the Deformed expressed the very intensity of despair.
The time draws near. In a moment it will be here. David, rise
take the dead man by the arms. It will need all your strength to
restrain
him, in the dread moment when he uncloses his eyes, and feels
that he lives again.
Black David, standing at the head of the corse, grasped its bony arms
by the wrists, and with head bent, and the tangled hair falling over his
face, seemed to await the commands of the enthusiast.
How dost know 'un will rise? he muttered suddenly.
Have I not read it in their worksthe venerable Seers of the Ages?
exclaimed Isaac, pointing with a tremulous hand toward the recess
Yeathe Dead have come to me, and spoken of the Great Secret, with
their livid lips.
He paused, and stood motionless beside the corse, while a tremor
shook his frame.
Yes
He
has appeared to me, HE, most sad and yet terrible of all
the Fallen Angels! His pale forehead, seared with the mark of eternal
anguish, his hair streaming in waves of lurid light,I see him now
again I hear his voice. `
In the first moments of the new-born year, the
dead will come to life!
'
Why did Black David's distorted frame quiver like a withered reed
in the winter wind? We cannot read the expression of his face, for
his head is drooped; the matted hair falls around it like a lion's mane.
How much money hast spent, Master? Twenty-one yearsa long
timea very, very long time. It has swallowed a world of goldeh?
Master?
Have you not watched the Sacred Fire, burning for ever, in the cell
beneath the house? You have seen me pour the gold in the alembic,
with an unsparing hand
Y-e-s! Handfuls on it at a time. It looks beautiful like, and clinks
so pleasant likethe round gold, the yellow gold, the sunshiny gold!
When I began this search I was worth millions! Now the last
wreck of my wealthyou know it well, honest Davidis concealed in
the small chest, which lies beyond yonder curtain, in the darkness, at the
head of the stairway. It is only a thousand doubloonsonly a
thousand
.
Black David raised his face, and looked toward the curtain. Gilbert
felt the glance of his eyes resting upon him, and, with a fear that he
could not master, saw the half-suppressed laughter of that mocking face.
At the head o' the stairs! It's well, master, that no bad men know
it, forthey might even
rob you of your gold
.
The old man did not seem to hear the last words, but they thrilled on
Gilbert's ear, as his extended foot rested upon the oaken chest, in which
the doubloons were concealed.
The sands are run!Isaac's voice, quivering with enthusiasm,
clear and ringing in its emphasis, broke on the ears of the listening
hunter.
Behold! Thus I describe the cross upon the dead man's heart!
With the point of the knife, he laid open the flesh on the chest of the
corse; the wound was in the form of a cross. A single drop of blood
started from the point where the transverse gashes met.
The old man raised the phial; it glittered above his head, in the clear
rays of the hanging lamp. A wild joy quivered over his face, agitating
every feature, and shining brightly in his clear blue eyes.
It is the time. The labors of a life are about to be repaid. Thus,
thus, O Masters of the Divine Art, I follow your teachingsthus, O
darkest and most powerful of all the Fallen Host, I obey your
commands
!
His right arm shook with an unceasing tremor, as he held the phial
in the light, high over his grey hairs.
The corse lay stiff and cold before him, with the figure of the
Deformed
,
bending like an Apparition over its face; the gash in the form
of a cross, glowed vividly in the light, with the solitary drop glittering
like a blood-red tear.
6
With this liquidonly a single drop, poured on the blood-drop in
the centre of the crossI call the Dead to Life!
He pronounced a Hebrew word; it was that name which we call
Jehovah
.
Bending over the dead, he raised the phial in the light, and gazed
intently
upon its transparent liquid, his narrow chest swelling with a joy
too deep for words.
Thus
A sharp report was heard. It crashed on the silence, like thunder
from a serene sky. Through the curtain folds, which guarded the
entrance
to the place, a volume of blue smoke floated, like a veil of
transparent
gauze.
The hand of the Wizard was still upraised, but his eye glared with
all the despair of a soul forever lost.
For the hand was empty. The phial was gone. Fragments of
shattered
glass strewed the floor.
The Monk of Wissahikon!
While that blushreddening over cheek and bosom and browglowed
like the first pure glimpse of a new-born summer day, the Maiden raised
her dark eyes, and gazed upon the form which occupied the recess,
where the mirror had glistened only a moment before.
The silver cross glittering on his dark dress, he stood there, like some
sad and beautiful image of Memory, the brown hair falling aside from
his olive cheek, as, with head slightly bent, he turned the light of his full
eyes upon the maiden's glowing face.
I come to save youyour father's life is in dangerthe words
rose to his lips, but he could not speak them.
He could only gaze upon that beautiful face, and feel the light of those
brilliant eyes shining into his own.
He heard the low musical voice, but could not distinguish the words
which it spoke. Only its music melted on his ear.
For the first time, the delirium of passion seized his soul; the
intoxication
of voluptuous madness burned in his veins.
He could not advance, he could not recede; absorbed in the loveliness
which blushed before him, he stood in the recess, with his gaze centred
upon the face of the young girl.
And she, with her arms half-raised, her loose robe trembling on her
form, as though about to fall, could only return his gaze, and feel the fire
of his eyes flashing into her soul.
The light which swung from the ceiling, tinting the dim old tapestry with
mild radiance, shone clearly over the dark robe of the maiden, glowed
upon the waves of her black hair, and revealed the figure of the young
man, framed in the recess, and thrown into view by the darkness beyond.
At last he advancedhis senses whirling in an indescribable
intoxication
he
stepped from the recess, and his face, glowing through its olive
hues, with the red blush of passion, appeared distinctly in the light, with
the brown hair tossed aside from the forehead.
And with that stephe pausedlooked upon herand extended his
arms like a man who shrinks back from the verge of a dizzy cliff.
With the loose robe waving around her form, she sank on her knees,
clasped her hands, and while her lustrous eyes shone their passion into
his face, she exclaimed in that voice, which melted in strange melody
upon his ears
You have come!
Paul started at the sight. He was entangled in some bewildering
dream. He could not believe that it was a realitythat beautiful girl,
kneeling at his feet, tossing her hair back from her shoulders, raising to
his gaze her voluptuous face, and whisperinglike a Bride who
welcomes
her LoverYou have come!
He tottered to a chair, and hid his burning forehead in his clasped
hands. There was fire in his veins. His brain seemed to throb with
the intensity of a new existence. His ears were filled with a lulling
murmur, as though the voices of Angels had mingled with the echo of a
distant waterfull.
Paul!
He heard the voice, but dared not raise his head. And then a hand
trembled among the locks of his hair; he felt the pressure of soft, warm
fingers upon his forehead.
He raised his eyes. She was there, kneeling by his side, her hair
floating over her robe, her face upturned, one arm resting upon his
shoulder
,
that soft, warm hand pressed against his brow.
And again, raising her lustrous eyes, she murmured his name
Paul!
There was some strange mystery in this scene. It confused, it
bewildered
him. This young girl,whose cheek flushed with passion
through the intervals of her dark hair, whose large eyes grew dim with
moisture beneath the fringed lids,kneeling by his side, looking into
his face, winding her arm about his neck, her fingers trembling among the
brown locks about his foreheadit fired his veins with new madness.
You know my name? he wildly gasped.
Yes, she murmured, the Voice whispered it to me. And with
that look of boundless passion, she panted at his side.
The Voice!
Yesthe Voice that speaks to me in my dreams. I hear it
sometimes
by day, after I have prayed to Godsometimes by night, when
all is still. It told me of your comingit spoke of your Loveit bade
me look for you To-Night!
These words, uttered with a child-like faith, and yet with the
tremulous
accent of passion, completed the bewilderment of Paul Ardenheim.
Do I dream? he exclaimedand his hand touched the forehead of
the young girlYou that are so beautifulyou, whose dark eyes fill
my soul with lightyou, that speak to me in tones that maddenyou,
whose very touch thrills me with a mad delight! You speak my name,
you tell me that you looked for my coming! Oh, it is some dangerous
dream  it is the work of an Evil Angel, who would peril my soul!
And, darting from the chair, he fled affrighted from that beautiful girl.
As he stands by the window, gazing out into the wintry nightthe
waste of snow, silvered by the rising moon, sparkles before himthe
young girl, kneeling where he left her, covers with her hands that face,
now crimsoned with blushes and wet with tears.
How shall we explain the mystery of this scene?
The young girl has been reared from childhood in this isolated
mansion
,
her friend, her instructor, her only companion, that old man,
whose mind is bewildered by the Fanaticism of a Past Age. She has
been exposed to no temptation; never mingled in the loves and hatreds
of the great world. Like a wild flower, blushing into life on the
crumbling
wall of some old ruin, she has blossomed, she has bloomed in
solitary
loveliness.
Yet wherefore this madness of passion, this child-like tenderness,
this impetuous love, with which she welcomes an unknown man, whom
she beholds for
the first time!
We may not pierce the Mystery now, nor unravel a single thread of
the strange secret, and yet, as we gaze upon the scene, its peculiar beauty
strikes our hearts.
Here we have a woman, blooming into the ripeness of her loveliness,
and a man, whose eye indicates a strong intellect, while his form mani
fests the grace and vigor of young manhood.
Reared alike in these silent woodsafar from the world  their souls
formed amid scenes of the same characterthis young man, with the
bronzed face and eyes of strange power, this young girl, so blooming with
every hue of loveliness, so flowing with every line of voluptuous beauty,
have met for the first time.
And yet their meeting has all the transport of a long-indulged love, all
the intoxication of a Passion, which is hallowed by thoughts and
memories
as dear as Heaven!
The tears rained from her eyes; while her young bosom rose with a
more tumultuous throb, and her face grew crimson with blushes, she
started from the floor, and reached his side, with a proud and passionate
step.
It was false, then? She touched his shoulder lightly with her
hand. You love me not. You never thought of me?
He heard the voice, felt the hand, and a tremor shook his frame. He
dared not turn his head, and gaze into her face.
It is madness! Only a dream, from which I will soon awake!
And I loved youGod knows how deep, how absorbing was my love!
In the daytime I thought of you, and pictured your form, and saw your
face, wherever I turned my eyes! And at night, O, at night, when all was
still, and the Voice broke through the silence, telling me of your love,
breathing your name at every wordO, my love became mad, wild,
boundless as the great sky, which gleams before us, so beautiful with its
countless stars. You love me notthe Voice has spoken falsely!
With that small hand quivering on his shoulder, its very touch
thrilling
a strange fire through his veins, he heard her voice, breaking in
impetuous
accents upon the stillness of the midnight chamber. But he
could not answer. His heart was too full, his brain too crowded with
conflicting emotions.
He dared not even turn to look upon her face again.
If I look upon her I am lost!
Lost! Lost to God and Lost to Purity, Lost to all those serene
Thoughts which dwelt on the Majesty of the star-lit heavensthe
tenderness
of a Sister's Lovethe divine beauty of sunrise and sunsetthose
Thoughts which ascended from a full heart, to the Great Father of all the
World, and even as they arose, became Prayer.
Lost to all that was spiritual and ideal, in the mad agonies of sensual
passion.
Ladyhe said, not daring to look upon her, though he felt her
panting
breath on his cheekForgive me, for I am like one bewildered in
some intoxicating dream. I am affrighted at the beauty of your face
your touch fills my veins with an agony of delight. But there is a mist
before my eyesa sound as of voices and echoes, woven together, in my
earsmy heart swells as though the hand of death was there! Forgive
me, ladyhe tottered away from her extended handforgive and pity!
For I cannot look upon you, without
adoration
. To look into your face
is to forget my God!
O, how the roses bloomed on her cheek again, and the soft languor of
passion shone in her eyes! She gazed upon his averted face, her red
lips parting like a severed rose-bud, her bosom throbbing above the
glittering
fringe of her black robe, like a snowy wave, encircled by rays of
golden light.
Then, on her white forehead, from the crescent-shaped brows to the
roots of her hair, a single vein, slender and serpentine, swelled distinctly
into light, and darkened, without distorting, the transparent skin.
That sinuous vein, so light as to be scarcely perceptible, seemed to
indicate
the resistless Will of an organization, which combined the extremes
of Pride and Passion.
You love me! she gaspedher hand still gently laid upon his
shoulderYou love me! And with her left arm she dashed her long
hair aside from the bare shoulder.
Love you? echoed PaulThere is a love which I feel when I
gaze upon my sister's face. A Love as serene as the midnight stars,
shining over you waste of coldly glittering snow. But you? O, it is not
loveit is not enchantmentit is not intoxication. No! It is as though
you had stolen from me every impulse of my own Will; had said to me,
`Thou canst not move, save where my will permitsnor breathe, save in
the light of my eyesnor live, save by my side, and in my arms!' Love
you? his voice sunk into a whisperI dare not turn and gaze into
your face, lest I should blaspheme my God!
But he did turn and gaze. As though an irresistible influence swayed
his every motion, he turned, and beheld her panting before him, her
limbs trembling beneath the robe, while her bared arms gathered it to
her passionate breast.
It seemed to him as though a golden mist floated in waves about her
form, as she stood there, with those large eyes flashing amid their tears,
while the dark hair, waving to her shoulders, gave an indescribable
grandeur
to the white forehead, seamed by that darkly swelling vein.
You love me! And she came toward him, with a gliding motion.
Not lovenono! I am mad
You love me! and her white arms were upon his shoulder.
Pity mepity mefor the sake of God, do not peril my soul.
You love me! was still her exclamation, breathed through her
passionate
lips, as he felt her arms around his neck, her form quivering upon
his breast.
And her cheek was against his own, and over his arms and shoulders
her unbound hair streamed, in waves of jetty blackness.
His brain reeledthe antique room, with its quaint wainscot, floated
round him like the phantom of some unearthly dreamfrom head to foot,
in every nerve he trembled like a dying man.
But still her arms were about his neck, still she panted on his breast,
her warm bosom rising, from its sable veil, in passionate throbs, while
her breath mingled with his own, as their lips trembled together.
There was a moment which seemed an Eternity to him; not an
Eternity
of calm rapture, but of passionate tumult, of voluptuous madness.
It was when her eyes shone their deep brightness into his own, when
lip and breath were one, when, trembling in her embrace, he felt his
consciousness
gliding from him, in a languor that stole upon his senses, like
some enchanter's spell.
Enchanter's spell! What spell like the magnetism of a first love, the
sorcery of a first kiss, from lips that cling as they touch your own, and
blossom into new life at the touch? what wizard-craft so maddening in its
power as the pressure of a bosom, that throbs beneath its veil, and throbs
closer to your own, until your heart hears it, and echoes with an
answering
throb?
You love me! The Voice was not false! and the burden of that
virgin form was in his arms, the wild beauty of that face glowed in
burning
blushes beneath his gaze.
Yeslovelove beyond the power of words! he exclaimed in broken
tones, and his eyes answered her with a gaze as passionate as her own.
But even as she clung to him, he wound his hands around her wrists,
he held her from him, andwhile a frown gathered in sudden darkness
on his browsaw at a glance her heaving breast, her naked feet, her
round, white arms. Saw the face, whose brown hues were lighted with
warm vermilion on the cheek and on the lip, while the languor of dewy
eyes came through the meshes of her streaming hair.
O, beautifulO, fairer than a dream he gasped, his voice sinking
into a whisper, his eyes moist with passion.
At that moment a crash like thunder rung through the old mansion.
It is a knell! cried PaulThe knell of my lost soul!
As he spoke he withdrew his hands from her wrists; with the gesture
of a madman, he dashed her arms from his grasp; and tottered backward,
gazing vacantly into her face.
She trembled for a momentgrew pale and fell. Her long black hair,
strown over the floor, with the golden fringe of her mantle glittering
against the transparent whiteness of her shoulders.
She lay there like a dead woman, pale and unconscious, the blood
starting from the wound upon her brow, a wound which she received, as
her sudden fall dashed her head against the floor.
And yonder, hurrying from the room, mad with passion, the blood
boiling like molten fire in every veinyonder, behold Paul Ardenheim,
his head bent on his breast, as he flies from the beautiful woman, as from
a fiend.
He does not seek the shadow of the recess. No! Without turning
his head, without one backward look, he grasps the door in the southern
wallit yields at his touchhe is in the corridor, with the light of the
lamp, which shines there, glowing over his brow.
But as his foot is on the first step, even in the moment of passionate
delirium, when the face, the form of the beautiful girl, floats before him
in a veil of misty light, he is conscious of the presence of a far different
face, a widely contrasted form.
Black David stands beside him, folding his white hands upon his
breast, while his head is bowed, and his face is hidden by the uneven
locks of his matted hair.
Black David was wrong, Master Paul, he mumbles in an idiotic
tone, with his great eyes wearing a vacant lookThere's never a robber
in the wizard's house. Black David heard the voices in a dream;
forgive
,
Master Paul, if Black David was foolish
No reply came from the lips of Paul. He looked in the face of
the deformed man, as though he saw him not; he dashed his hand aside,
and plunged down the stairs with a madman's step.
As his face glowed into the light, ere it passed into the darkness,
Black David saw it distorted by a convulsive emotion; as his step was
heard in the hall beneath, Black David also heard his incoherent cry:
Air! air! The free air, and the clear sky for mefor I am in the
Power of the Evil One, within these walls!
The echo of the voice and the footstep died away, yet Black David
stood at the head of the stairway, leaning his arms upon its railing, and
gazing silently into the darkness beneath.
His face is turned from the light; his hair, which, by its tangled locks,
makes the outlines of his large head seem yet more massive, is tinted by
the lamp, but we cannot see his features, nor mark the expression of his
lips, nor read the meaning of his eyes.
And yet his form tremblesit quivers like a falling leafwith agony?
or with laughter?
Isaac lies insensible on the floor beside the corse, and, even in his
unconsciousness, clutches at the broken glass. The old man's hopes are
blighted; his heart broken. Paul goes from the wizard's house, flushed
with agony, and shrieking for light, for air! The wizard's gold is gone,
and with it, Gilbert, the bold Huntsman. And the fair daughter,with
dark eyes and stainless bosomwho, reared by the old man from
childhood
,
in this mansion, treasures in her virgin-soul certain vague images
of the Future, certain warm imaginings of the great world beyond the
glen of Wissahikonwhat of the beautiful girl? She is indeed a fair
creature to look upon. So queenly her step, so impetuous her glance, so
warm her lip, so beautiful the gloss of her dark hair, as it floats over
shoulders white as snow! Very beautiful, and yet the light of her eyes,
their very brightness, flashing from darkness, brings to mind Catherine
De Medicis, the Queen of Past Ages, who ruled France, with the
Poison-Phial
for a sceptre!
Once more the form of the hunchback shook like a falling leaf, as he
leaned over the railing and looked into the darkness below.
A pale face was raised from the floor, and eyes glassy and vacant in
their gaze, glared in the light of the Maiden's chamber. With her
forehead
spotted with blood, she rose, and clutched the dark mantle to her
breast, as she hurried to and fro, like one bereft of reason, now clutching
her hair with an involuntary grasp, now tossing it madly aside from her
face and back from her shoulders.
There was a terrible beauty in the sight. A lovely woman, with her
white forehead stained with blood, her hair dishevelled, and her robe
disordered in every loosened fold, striding, with an impetuous step and
flashing eye, over the floor of that silent and gloomy chamber.
He does not love me. It was false, that Voice which whispered his
name to my ear, told me to wait his coming, and yield my lip to his kiss!
Not love, but scornah! She uttered a cry of terror, as the hand
which she raised to her forehead was wet with blood.
Blood, too! The mark of the hand which dashed me to the floor!
She pressed her clasped hands over that slowly bleeding wound, and
stood before the mirror, which had glided to its place again.
I am not lovelyno, no, no! Hideous to his eyes, as I will be
hideous to all other eyes! He has seen a fairer form, and loved some
beautiful girl, who has not dwelt all her life alone; from very childhood,
shut out from the world!
And, tossing to and fro, her hands on her forehead, her bosom swelling
under the white arms, she looked madly into the mirror, and saw the
reflection of her trembling form, her lips compressed, her face pale with
agony.
At this moment, while she is dumb and deathlike with the violence of
her conflicting emotions, a Voicethat seems to break from the air
startles the silence of the chamber.
You have seen him, Maiden. You have seen Paul! there was a
wild, unearthly music in that voice.
Seen him, she answered, as though speaking to some person by
her sideSeen him, and he has dashed me at his feet, in scorn!
But he loves you, maiden
Loves! Witness this bleeding mark upon my brow.
Love!
Loves you, to madness, and will come again, and kneel at your feet,
and bathe them with his tears!
She was silent. With her fingers on her tremulous lip, she listened.
Will seal his love with a vow in the sight of God, and lead you from
this lonely valley into the great world. The unknown Maiden of the
Wissahikon may become the courted and flattered Lady of some royal
court, with a queenly robe upon her form, the eyes of the great, the noble,
centred on her beautiful face.
Still silent. But in her eyes the tears were dried, and from her lip the
tremor has passed.
And he will triumph with you, and ascend with you the dizzy
heights of rank and power. Yet, even while the praises of a world ring
in his ears, and all men hasten to scatter gold and laurels in his way,
his deepest joy will be thy kiss, O Maiden, his only heaven in thy
embrace!
How the full eyes shot forth a sudden light, and the warm blood
glowed through the rich brown of that velvet cheek!
He will be mine
Thine! Thine only, and forever! said the voicewhich seemed
to speak at her side, from the airand all was still.
The light shone over the chamber, glowing upon its antique furniture,
glittering on the mirror, over the floor, and tinting the quaint carvings on
the wall, until the oaken flowers bloom like life.
But the Maiden does not meet our eyes. Her mantle of black velvet,
fringed with gold, lies neglected on the floor. Through the white
curtains
the moonlight steals, and mingles its rays with the faint light of the
lamp, and all is silent in the Wizard's mansion.
Would you behold the passionate girl, who, not long ago, stood before
the mirror, convulsed with the agony of a love, repulsed by scorn?
Yonder, through the dark hangings of the bed, turn your gaze, and
behold
a gush of light trembling over that face, sunken deep into the silken
pillow, with black hair floating all around it; a face whose lids are
closed, while the lips are parted, murmuring, even in slumber, some
treasured name
Paul!
The lantern shines over the corridor, and flings a dim ray into the
darkness of the stairway. Black David is no longer here; the place is
gloomy and desolate.
But there is a footstep on the narrow staircase, leading from the
Wizard's tower; the small door springs open; and Isaac Van Behme
appears in the light, his face deathly pale, his eyes dilating in their
sockets, with the glare of apathetic despair. His slender form is still
enveloped in the loose gown, and, with his head bent on his breast, he
totters from the door, toward the descending stairway.
In a moment he is gone into darkness; gone without a word, his hands
clenched on his breast, his white hair hanging in tangled masses over his
wrinkled brow.
With a footstep that has no echo, he descends the stairs, and presently
stands in the darkness of the spacious hall, on the ground floor.
He does not pause a moment, but, opening a door in the side of the
staircase, he descends, without a light to show the way, into the vault
beneath
his mansion.
Along a dark passage he passes with that uncertain step, and in the
impenetrable gloom, extends his hand; a door opens; the vaulted arch is
bathed in sudden light.
He enters that chamber, or vault, which has witnessed his toil for
Twenty-One Years. In that period, no footstep save Black David's and
his own has crossed its threshold.
Through the gloom of that wide vault, whose stone archway is
supported
by four massive pillars, struggles a pale and blueish flame, which
invests the whole scene with a funereal glare. That flame shines not
from a hanging lamp, but through an aperture in the surface of the white
altar, which rises in the centre of the space between the pillars.
It is an altar of marble, an oblong square, not more than three feet high,
two in width, with a small door in one side.
That white form, rising from the stone floor, with a pale blueish light
gushing from the aperture in its surface, alone breaks the stern gloom of
the vault, whose massive ceiling and heavy pillars strike the soul with a
sensation of vague awe.
This is the Wizard's most secret cell. There are no indications of
his art, no grinning skulls, nor parchments, darkened by strange
characters
,
nor alembics, crucibles, or other details of Astrology or Alchemy.
The pure flame, shining in a flood of tremulous light, from the top of
the white altar, glowing like a spiritual presence through the gloom, alone
indicates the old man's toil, his earnest search of Twenty-One Years.
He stands beside the altar, all the anguish of his blighted hope
manifested
in the contortions of his withered face. Silent, motionless, his
thin hands clenched, and his head bowed on his breast, he gazes on the
flame, and its pale light glows on his vacant eyes.
There are no words to picture the despair of that old man's heart.
The brown sailor, gazing on the wreck of that ship which has been his
home, in calm and storm, for half a century; the renowned general,
suddenly
disgraced into a prisoner, and standing amid the bodies of his
mangled comrades; the father looking into the dead eyes of a beloved
daughterthese all are subdued by agony that is too deep for utterance
or tears. But the despair of the Alchemist was deeper than all these
woes, though linked in one convulsive throb.
He beheld not the wreck of a home, or the slaughter of an army, or
the solitary death of a daughter, at once beloved and beautiful, but an
Immortal
Lifealmost achievedwas swept into nothingness, even as he
palpitated on its threshold.
The Thought of a life was dead. Shattered with the brittle phial,
which had broken in his grasp, and sprinkled the floor with the priceless
liquid of Eternal Youth.
While thus he stood, absorbed in his despair, his blue eyes glowing in
the light of the flame, there came to his soul a thought as sudden as it
was blasphemous.
He drew from the folds of his dress a pacquet, which he extended over
the flame. A stream of sand, or white dust, descended from the pacquet,
into the aperture. And as it fell, a luminous smoke began to wind in
feathery columns over the altar, and float through the gloom, in waves
of rolling mist.
It would over the old man's white hairs, encircled his form, and ere an
instant had passed, filled the dreary vault with a cloud of perfumed
vapor.
From the bosom of that cloud his voice was heard:
Even as the seers of the old wisdom, bewildered by the clouds of
their physical existence, sought to gain communion with the Spirits of
the Invisible World, though at the peril of their deathless souls, so do I, in
the name of the Seven Fallen Angels,who once stood by the Throne
of Eternity, bathing their wings in the light that never dies  invoke the
darkest and most powerful of the Seven! Behold! The Cross is
beneath my feetI pray no longer to he muttered the awful and
incommunicable
Namebut to
Ashtaroth
, the Prince of the Fallen!
With these words were murmured the mystic formula of the ancient
Cabaliststhose Prophets of the far-gone ages, who derived their
inspiration
alike from Good and Evil, from God and Satanand as the voice
of the old man echoed, clear and deep, through the vault, the
smoke-clouds
swept aside from his face, and showed the dauntless Will, written
on the brow, and burning in the eyes.
There was a pause, and, stricken with sudden terror, he fell on his
knees, as though a strong arm had dashed him to the floor.
I am here, answered a sad, low-toned voice.
Before the altar, encircled by clouds of undulating mist, appeared a
face of wild, unearthly beauty. The pale features, invested with a lurid
light, were seen amid a mass of dark hair, waving in snake-like locks,
and with a red glow glimmering through its intervals. The eyes were
large and dazzling in their unchanging brightness. The lips wore a
smile of undefinable meaning; now it was tenderness, and now scorn.
The forehead was wide and lofty, growing wider as it arose, in an
out-line
of swelling boldness; the skin was white as a corse.
That FACE, seen amid the clouds which floated to and fro, seemed like
the face of a dead man, with an unnatural life just flashing into its eyes.
There was a mark upon the forehead; a livid cross, which blackened
in hideous distinctness on the death-like brow.
Thou hast invoked the most powerful of the Seven. Ashtaroth is
here! Poor child of clay, what wouldest thou ask?
It is gonethe fruit of my life-long toil  shrieked Isaac, wringing
his hands, as he grovelled on the floor, the cold dew starting from his
browI obeyed thy commands. For twenty-one years, night and day,
without ceasing, the fire burned within this altar, and this very night, I
was about to place the Water of Lifethe result of all my toilon the
breast of the dead, when the phial crumbled in my grasp, and  my toil is
in vain! I have become old for naughtin vain this brain racked by
the agony of eternal feverin vain this withered form, in vain these
wrinkles, which have gathered while my task wore onin vain these
grey hairs, which only tell how near that Grave, without a hope!
The Water of Eternal Youth, for which thou didst seek, in the long
dream of a life-time, has been wasted by theewasted as the dead was
about to feel its influence?
Not wasted! No! By the despair which I feelno! An unseen
hand dashed the phial from my grasp
And for that priceless liquidwasted in a momentthou didst
labor twenty-one years, every year a century; the whole circle of years,
an Eternity!'
Dark Angel, it is not for you to taunt me with my ruin. Your hand
may have done this deed
It was my deed. I saw that thou wert not yet worthy of the
unutterable
boon. Another trial is demanded, ere thou wilt be worthy of
the Forbidden Fruit, which the First Man and Woman sought to grasp.
Twenty-one years! Look at these grey hairs! Ere twenty-one
hours are past, I will be dead. Dead! And the
Hereafter
Thou shalt not die. Nor is a trial of a life-time asked of thee.
No intense study, no brain-cankering toilno anxious watch by night, and
maddening thoughts by day! Before the rising of another sun thou
mayst raise the Dead, and from his lips gain the knowledge of the great
secret, which transmutes all base metals into Gold.
SpeakAshtarothand I will worship thee!
Within this altar, warmed by the fire that never dies, still is
concealed
the Sacred Urn!
It is there now as it has been for twenty-one years. Within its bosom,
I created the Water of Eternal Youth.
Pour into that Urn a single drop of blood, warm from the heart of
a tempted but still stainless maiden, and the Water of Eternal Youth
once more will greet your eyes. It must be taken from a heart that
throbs with the last pang of lifefrom a heart that quivers with the last
impulse of the soul, fluttering ere it takes its flight.
But this is too horribleit demands a Murder. A crime
Dost thou talk of crime? What crime hast thou not committed? Is
it for thee to hesitate?
Crime! Have I been unkind, even in thought, to my only child?
Has my hand ever been closed at the call of suffering, the prayer of
houseless misery? Of what crime do you accuse me
It is not for me to accuse. But woe to thee, sad and mistaken man,
woe to thee, when the Hour of Judgment comes! The crime of all
crimes will be laid to thy soul, the blasphemy of daring to be Immortal!
The Unpardonable Sin is on thy head: it will weigh thee down, in the
fathomless anguish of an Eternity of Crime!
A single drop of blood, warm from the heart of a tempted but still
stainless maiden, and lo! the Water of Life is mine. Mine the secret
of boundless gold.
Thine before the dawn of another day! Listen! Even at this
moment a pure virgin struggles in the Tempter's arms! Hasten, ere
she is a tainted and dishonored thing, hasten to her side, and from her
form, throbbing with the last pulse of life, snatch the priceless boon!
I obey! I obey!
Then, in a low whisper, that pale face, seen dimly among misty clouds,
half-luminous and transparent, murmured the syllables of an unknown
tongue. While his face was distorted and his form cramped by the
violence
of preter natural emotions, Isaac Van Behme bent hishead on his
breast, and, from the shadows of his woven brow, gazed into the lurid
visage of the Unknown.
Those words, spoken in the mysterious tongue of the Cabalists and
Magi of the ancient ages, thrilled on the listener's ear. He heard them
with a shudder, and then a dark cloud rushed upon the scene, and Isaac
fell forward on his face, unconscious and motionless as a dead man.
When he again unclosed his eyes, the pure spiritual light shone
calmly through the aperture in the summit of the altar, and glowed upon
the massive pillars, the gloomy arch, the floor of solid stone. But the
mist had rolled away, and with it, the Unknown Face had passed into
nothingness.
The maiden, he murmured, as a cold shudder shook his stiffened
limbs, The maiden whom I met to-night by the forest fire, weeping
over the dead body of Yoconok!
He hurried from the vault. The door closed behind him, with a
sudden
jar. Along the dark passage, with unsteady steps he hastened, and,
ascending the stairway, soon reached the hall on the ground floor, with
the light shining feebly from the second story, over its gloom.
As he hurried to the door, he missed his footing, and stumbled over a
dark form, which lay crouching near the stairway.
It is but the poor brainless hunchback! he exclaimedSleeping
beside the door, too! A faithful knave!
And, stepping gently over Black David's form, he opened the door, and
passed forth into the clear, cold moonlight.
No sooner had his footsteps died on the air, than the Deformed started
to his feet, and hurried up the stairs.
Softly, on tiptoe, and with a gliding footstep, he approached the door
of the Maiden's chamber, and bent his head close to the dark panels.
There was no sound; she slept on her virgin bed, with her face sunken
in the silken pillows. Black David opened the door without a word,
and passed the threshold of that sacred retreat.
The lamp, swinging from the ceiling, invested the place with a soft,
luxurious, dreamy light.
With the same noiseless step, the hunchback approached the bed, and
winding the tapestry about his uncouth form, looked within, his face
glowing on one cheek with the dim light.
It was a strong contrast. That pale face, with the tangled hair
floating
from its huge forehead in uneven locks, down to the matted beard;
and the glowing countenance of the slumbering girl, who rested her
cheek upon her bent arm, while the dark fringes of her closed lids, and
the warm beauty of her parting lips, gave a new loveliness to her olive
complexion, as her black hair wandered in unbound tresses over the
silken pillow.
And, like some Demon, watching, with flaming eyes and livid lip,
curving
in scorn, the slumber of an Angel, Black David stood in the folds of
the faded hangings, and looked upon the sleeping girl.
She is very beautiful, and in her dreamy sleep, she murmurs the
name of her lover. Who could not predict her future? All that is
tender, all that is loving, all that is virgin in voluptuous beauty, centres
in her face, and marks each outline of her form. Yet holdupon her
brow, from the eyes to the roots of her hair, a slender veinalmost
imperceptible
swells
from the clear skin, and quivers like a serpent there!
So,it was many hundred years agoupon the brow of woman, as
fair and beautiful, a similar dark vein swelled through the stainless skin.
What was HER fate?It seems but yesterday; the ages roll back like a
curtain, and lay bare that terrible
Memory
. What shall be the Fate of
this sleeping girl? Through the clouds of the Future I behold it, and
see the serpent, which now darkens on her forehead, glide into her heart,
and drop its venom from her rosy lips!
It is enough to force a smile, the folly of these cowled Mummers,
who picture the Enemy of Mankind in a grotesque shapeha! ha!
with hoof and horns, and all the details of a puerile fancy.
No one could be deceived by a Devil so pitiable as thatnot even
the Priests who paint him thus!
But a Devil that comes panting on your senses from a white bosom;
that kisses you with warm, voluptuous lips; that fires you with the
brightness of eyes languid with passion; a beautiful Devil altogether,
who wears, on her fair brow, a single black and serpent like vein
Fear Satan at all times, brave Paul of Ardenheim, but kneel to God,
and pray for mercy, when he comes to you in a shape like this!
While the crazed hunchback uttered these incoherent words, in his
low, melodious voice, the young girl, in her slumber, clasped her white
arms over her bosom, and murmured, in a voice languid with passionate
desire
Mine, and mine only!
CHAPTER EIGHTH.
B. H. A. C.
On
a rock, beside the Wissahikon shore, where, in the summer-time,
it glides on without a ripple, wider and deeper in its tranquil flow, as it
nears the Schuylkill, stood Gilbert, the Hunter, bending upon his rifle,
with his eyes cast upon the waves, which looked black and dreary, as
they swept onward, amid white masses of ice, glittering in the rising
moon.
It was sailing there, in the pure winter sky, its cold light shining over
a broad hill, which sank to the shore, mantled with frozen snow, and
sparkling like a sheet of undulating silver, as the dark forests girdled it
on every side.
This hill rose before him to the south, ascending from the ice-cumbered
Wissahikon to the dreary woods, over whose leafless branches shone the
transparent sky.
Behind him was a wall of brushwood, and a precipitous mass of forest
trees, which towered suddenly into the heavens, with the forms of
gigantic
rocks thrust here and there from the dark branches.
And from the gloom in the east, the Wissahikon comes glittering as
she flows by the snow-mantled hills; and into the gloom in the west she
passes as suddenly, her echo breaking in a low, monotonous murmur,
far along the woodsredoubled by the craggy rocks  and rising, in
softened
music, into the sky.
There is a ray gleaming from the pine trees on the southern hill; it is
the light from the Wizard's tower.
From the gloom at the hunter's backhe stands facing the south,an
answering ray trembles forth, and dies upon the waters. It is the light
stealing from the closed shutters of the deserted house.
O, it is beautiful to stand thus alone, at dead of night, on the
Wissahikon
shore; beneath your feet a rock which, thousands of years ago,
was lightly pressed by the footsteps of some dark-cheeked Indian maid,
or swept by the white robes of the Sacrificial Priest, who raised his
hands to yonder sky, to yonder moon, and, in the deep silence of a
mid-night
universe, uttered a Prayer to God, in a tongue, now lost in the
chaos of the centuries.
It is beautiful, in the summer-time, when the broad hill wears a
garmenture
of tufted grass, and the world of foliage bends its leaves and
blossoms into the calm waters, while the distant cry of a night-bird
mingles
with the unceasing chirp of the katy-did, and the soft voice of
Wissahikon
.
But now, in Winter, and at midnight too, when the breathless stillness
deepened rather than broken by the monotonous murmur of the waves
dashing against the iceawes every throb of your heart into a solemnity
which is Religion, while the eye beholds only that great vault of
transparent
azure, arching over the leafless woods, with the moon gliding away
in cloudless light, and flinging a blessing on your forehead as she glides
it is in winter, at midnight, that the glen of Wissahikon is a holy
place, to which the Angels might come as to a temple, and breathe their
pity for the Crimes of Man, and raise their hymns of thankfulness to God.
Are you sick of the World? Do the crimes of the Great City wear
like an iron fang into your soul? Does the great panorama of wealth,
that is drunken with its boundless sensuality, and Poverty, that is
ferocious
with its sullen endurance, seem to your heart but a curse to Man,
a blasphemy to God?
Then, from the crowded streets of the Great City, come forth. Come,
from that clouded atmosphere, in whose foul bosom, the Plagues of
Moral
Death swelter into hideous birth,come, and forget the world; forget
the anguish, the blood and tears of Man the Slave, and be full of Peace,
though but for an hour, by the Wissahikon Waters.
For, by the Wissahikon, at dead of Night, when there is snow upon
the ground, and ice upon the waves, and a clear moon in a cloudless sky,
you grow nearer to your God, and feel your heart reach out its arms to
grasp Eternity.
Then, filled with Peace that is unutterable, you even forget that there
is, in all the world, such a libel on the Universe as a Man, ground into
dust by the footstep of a Brother
But hold; they tell me that I talk too much of suffering man, and
crowd my pages too full of his dumb anguish. Talk all night, if it please
you, of still waters and serene skies,they say itbut never tell us that
there are Banks and Churches for the Rich, and only Graves and Gibbets
for the Poor.
Pardon me, my friends. Be merciful to me, O silken People. For
what I speak, I have learned in a bitter school. The world has not been
a very soft road, sprinkled with roses, to my feet. Will you forgive me,
if, now and then, I dare to fling back into my Teacher's face, the iron
lesson which it taught to me? And when the flint of the rough road cuts
my feet, will you sneer very bitterly, if I but dare to moan?
For myself, I will be silent. Not a word of orphanage, and wrongs
inflicted by godly hands; not a whisper.
But the wrongs of those who have suffered like me, and endured a
thousand
pangs, where I felt one,the anguish of those who suffer now, and
go, dragging their weary feet, to miserable gravesshall they be
voiceless
too?
No. Not while the good God gives to me the strength to grasp this
7
friend of minethis well-worn pen, which has cut a way even through
the granite wall of poverty and orphanageno! Not while the Father
of the Fatherless, the Redeemer of the Poor, permits one throb to pulsate
at my heart, one word to quiver from my tongue.
For I am ambitious. Ambitious with a wild, insane ambition. When
I am dead, I want one flower to bloom upon my grave; that flower
planted by the hand of some Poor Man, who can bless my ashes with a
word like this
Here moulders the hand that dared to write one brave word in the
name of Man.
In my crude way of thinking, there is something more beautiful in
that solitary flower, planted by a Poor Man's hand, than in a marble
monument, built by a King, in Westminster Abbey, over some dead
Conqueror
,
whose hallowed epitaph bears words like these
He slew, in a hundred battles, at least one hundred thousand of his
Brothers
.
But this midnight scene of Wissahikon, hallowed by this stainless
snow and moonlit sky, has won me from the thread of my history.
Leaning on his rifle, Gilbert, the Hunter, gazed sadly into the dark
waters. The moonlight, glowing on his face, revealed the look of tender
sadness which, for a moment, softened its hardy features. He stood on
the rock, which jutted from the bank; one foot resting on its hard surface,
the other on a square box, secured by a brass padlock, and bound with
intricate cords. Beneath the lid of that box, the wealth, or rather a
wreck of the Wizard's wealth, was hidden.
There's a turnin' pint in every man's life, muttered Gilbert, with
his eyes fixed on the wavesAnd jist as that ar' twig quivers in the
eddy, near that chunk of ice, as if unsartin which way to go, so my
life quivered this night.
Associating his own destiny with the fate of the withered twig, which
trembled in the eddy created by the waves dashing against a block of ice, in
the middle of the stream, Gilbert watched its course with involuntary
interest
.
It trimbles tow'rd the channel on the left, where the eddy grows into
a little whirlpoolso! By ! It turns to the right; it swims along
the quiet channel, itcurses on it! It goes to the left, after allit
tosses in the whirlpoolthere, it is safe!
The hunter's face glowed with unfeigned pleasure, his breast heaved
with a deep respiration.
That 'ill be the way with my life. Quiverin' for a moment, unsartin
which channel to take, and tossin' on the waves, only to go safely onward,
after all. But no! By ! the twig snaps in pieces, and scatters on
the waters, in broken fragments!
Do not smile, when you see the cold dew standing in beaded drops
from his forehead. For by a superstition, common to the humblest and
most exalted natures, he had associated the Future of his own life, with
the course of some trifling thing, and taken the fate of the twig as a
Prophecy
of his destiny.
So it 'ill be with me! Tossed on the waves only to be brunk to
pieces! Wellwell! If I had married Mad'lin' all would have been
right, but now
An expression darkened over his brown face, which distorted every
bold line, tightened the lips, and drew the brows over the flashing eyes.
Now!
He raised his rifle to his shoulder, and took deliberate aim, as though
a mortal enemy was standing on the opposite shore.
That's what my life 'ill be the rifle dropped by his side again
A bullet for every man who has gold, which I would like to have; a
bullet or a knife, a shot or a stab! And Mad'lin' might ha' turned the
wild life of one like me, into somethin' quiet and full of Peace. But it
is past, and I must go where I am led.
Turning from the rock, with the box under one arm, and his good rifle
on his shoulder, Gilbert entered the shadows of the brushwood, and
pursued
the windings of a foot-path, which led far into the gloom of the
dense forest, now passing through some open space, silvered by
moon-light
,
and again lost in the maze of giant trees.
At last, emerging from a thicket of briars and brushwood, interwoven
in one almost impassable wall, Gilbert beheld the old house, deep sunken
in the glen between two high hills.
It was a two-storied structure, built of dark grey stone, with four
windows
on its front, whose shutters were closed. Before the door, on
whose dingy panels the moon shone brightly, a huge stone, worn smooth
by the pressure of many feet, supplied the place of a step. Around
it the prospect was wild and desolate. The stony ground was covered
with withered brushwood, even to the walls, and the front of the edifice
alone was visible, in that wilderness of giant trees.
The evergreen pine stretched its branches over the roof, mingled with
the leafless limbs of the chesnut and the oak. The scyamore, with its
white trunk, glared out in the light of the moon from the darkness of the
woods. Behind the deserted mansion, the hill rose suddenly, its summit
seen through the trees above the chimney, which sent a volume of smoke
into the sky.
Altogether, that house, rude and monotonous in its architecture,
presented
a sight of some interest, from its very desolation, and its peculiar
position, in the hollow of the glen, encircled on every side by the great
trees of the forest, with brushwood spreading darkly between their
trunks.
Gilbert advanced through the space in front of the edifice, where the
moonlight shone in clear radiance. On the stone before the door, he
paused for a moment, inclining his head toward the panels. All was
still, yet a confused sound, like the songs and shouts of a revel, drowned
by thick walls, came ever and again at sudden intervals to his ear.
The folks of Wisseyhik'n little dream what kind o' ghosts haunt
this here old house! he said, with a smile upon his sunburnt face.
Then, with his hand clenched, he knocked thrice upon the door,
and heard the echoes dying away within, as through the arches of a
corridor.
The door was opened, and Gilbert passed the threshold, and heard the
hinges grate, as the door was suddenly closed behind him. He stood in
utter darkness; not a ray of light shone into the intense night of the
place.
The word? said a rough voice.
Death!
answered Gilbert, in his accustomed tone.
What would you here?
I would enter the Lodge of the B. H. A. C., replied the Hunter.
If you are a true B. H. A. C., you will know the way. Advance and
give the explanation to the Word!
Through the midnight gloom, Gilbert advanced, counting his measured
footsteps. When he had measured ten paces from the door, he extended
his hand, and felt the panels of another door. He knocked four times,
each knock rising above the other, and a circle of light shone through
the darkness. It was a warm light, shining through a circular
aperture
in the door, and flinging a faint glow over the place in which he
stood.
By that uncertain light, it might be ascertained that he had entered a
small apartment, the monotony of whose bare walls, and uncovered floor,
was only broken by a dimly-defined figure near Gilbert's side.
The Hunter applied his lips to the circular aperture in the door, and
whispered these words:
to the Rich!
As he spoke, the door opened, and in a moment, Gilbert stood in a
cell-like
room, lighted by a lamp which hung from the ceiling, and revealed
the dark hangings, the floor strown with sand. A single chair stood near
the door, and leaning on its high back, a veiled figure appeared, shrouded
from head to foot in a dark robe, with a cowl drooping over the face.
On that part of the cowl which concealed the face, two letters were
inscribed
in golden embroideryB. H. A. C.
Your name? a deep voice exclaimed, speaking from the folds of the
monkish cowl.
Gilbert Morgan, a Brother of the Rifle Lodge, Number 256, of the
B. H. A. C.
Give the Word and its explanation, so that I may know you for a
Brother.
Deathto the Rich!
It is well. Clothe yourself with appropriate Regalia, and work your
way into the Lodge. The door is before you.
Placing his rifle on the floor, and with it the box, containing the
Wizard's
gold, Gilbert lifted the dark curtain which concealed the walls, and
took from a recess, or closet, a collar of scarlet velvet, edged with gold
lace, and with a dagger emblazoned on one side, a skull and cross-bones
on the other.
He placed it around his neck, and then took from the closet an apron
of the same material, also edged with gold, but with the letters, B. H. A.
C., embroidered in the centre. He secured it round his waist by a cord,
ending in a tassel of gold, and thus arrayed in the Regalia of the Order,
advanced toward a door, whose narrow panels appeared among the
sombre
hangings of the room. The box was under his left arm, the rifle on
his shoulder, as he knocked five times, with a pause between each sound.
Who comes there? a voice was heard speaking through a square
aperture in the centre of the door.
`A Brother of the Knightly Degree,' answered Gilbert, in the tone
of one who repeats some carefully remembered formula.
The word of the Knightly Degree?
`
Life
' answered Gilbert.
To whom?
`
To the Poor!
'
Enter, Brother Knight of the B. H. A. C., exclaimed the voice,
which was heard through the circular aperture in the door.
And ere a moment had passed, Gilbert, passing the door, which closed
after him, found himself encircled by the details of a scene of peculiar
interest.
It was a large room, with a lofty ceiling, and a dim light quivering in
mid air. The high walls were hung with dark cloth, on which was
emblazoned
various letters and symbols, some of the most grotesque, others
of the most impressive character.
At the eastern end of the room, rose a platform, attainable by three
wide steps, covered with dark cloth. On this platform was placed a
chair or throne, in which was seated a man of muscular form, attired in
almost regal splendor. There was a glittering crown upon his forehead
a scarlet robe upon his form, drooping from his shoulders to his feet,
in luxurious foldsand on his breast a collar of dark purple velvet,
emblazoned
on one side with the dagger, on the other with the skull and
cross-bones. The black veil which concealed his face bore the golden
letters, B. H. A. C.
This was the Worthy Master of the Rifle Lodge, No. 256, of the B.
H. A. C. His purple collar indicated the Right Venerable or Priestly
degree.
Opposite this platform, in the western extremity of the Lodge, was a
smaller platform, rising two steps above the floor, with an oaken chair
upon its summit. Here was seated a figure, veiled in a light-blue robe,
with a scarlet collar, gleaming with emblems, on his breast, and a coronal
of silver leaves entwined about his brow. His face, covered by a veil
of black cloth, with spaces for the eyes, also bore the letters, B. H. A. C.
This was the Honorable Warden of the Lodge, clad in the regalia of
the Venerable or Knightly Degree.
And between the Warden and the Master, were seated some hundred
men, every face covered with a veil, every form bearing the regalia of
the order, either the white scarf of an Initiate, or the scarlet collar of a
Knight, or the purple insignia of a Priest. In the dim light, the effect of
this scene was at once solemn and dazzling.
The floor was of dark wood, polished like a mirror. In its centre,
appeared a large star, inserted in the polished wood, and glittering like
burnished gold.
To this star Gilbert advanced, and placed the box and the rifle at his
feet. Then, raising his clasped hands above his head, he bowed before
the Worthy Master, who slowly imitated the gesture, after which Gilbert
spread forth his arms, with the fingers of each hand extended and
separate
from each other.
Right, Brother! a voice sounded from beneath the Master's veil.
The Hunter, turning on his heel, faced the Worthy Warden, and
saluted
him with the same sign.
Then, lifting the box and the rifle from the floor, he took his seat
among the veiled brethren, covering his face with a veil similar to the
others, which was extended to him by a figure clad in a shapeless black
robe, with a dark plume waving from his shrouded forehead. This was
the Worthy Herald of the Lodge.
Let the rite of Initiation begin! said the Worthy Master, in a
hollow
voice, which, evidently assumed, echoed through the spacious room,
with a strange and unnatural emphasis.
And from the dark hangings near the Warden's Platform, the Herald,
clad in black, with the plume waving over his veiled face, led forth a
half-naked
man, whose eyes were covered by a white scarf, bound tightly
around the brows. His form, bare to the waist, was marked by a broad
chest, and arms of iron muscle. And yet, as, with his eyes blindfolded,
he followed the Herald, he trembled like a man seized with an ague-chill.
It could not have been with cold, for, either from the heat of a fire which
was invisible, or from the numbers gathered in the darkened room, the
air was hot and stifling.
Not a word was spoken for the space of ten minutes, but in that space,
the senses of the Candidate were completely bewildered. He was led
to and fro, now crossing the room, now traversing its entire length, now
suddenly turned in his course, and forced on his knees, by the hands of
the Herald.
It was plainly to be seen, that the dead silence of the place awed the
senses of this strong man, while the manner in which the Herald led
him, gave him the idea of traversing winding corridors, long passages,
and a wide range of rooms. For as, in his blindfolded career, he
approached
the eastern or western extremities of the Lodge, the doors
appearing
amid the hangings were opened and closed, with a harsh, grating
sound. And every time he passed the golden star, glittering from the
centre of the floor, a figure robed in white advanced from the crowd of
brethren, and waved a burning flambeau in his face.
This impressed him with the idea of a fire, blazing in his path, and
about to envelop him with its flames.
Indeed, the silent ceremonial, altogether, was calculated to chill with
awe the firmest nerves; to weaken, with the rapid alternations of
suspense
and fear, the stoutest heart. The ten minuteswhich seemed an
eternity to the blindfolded manwere over at last. A deep bell, striking
one, and echoing like a knell, broke on his ear.
Thou art here, in the hallowed circle of the Free Lodge of the B. H.
A. C., said the Herald, in a guttural tone.
Then chains were dashed upon the floor, and clanked at his back.
The harsh sound, breaking, in sudden violence, from the dead stillness,
seemed to complete the terror of the Initiate. His bared arms trembled;
his knees quivered, and shook against each other.
Do notdo not he gaspedI will obey
Still, no voice was heard in answer; an unbroken silence prevailed.
While the Herald bound the chains about his bared chest, and twined
their cold links around his naked arms, four figures clad in white, with
torches in their hands, bore from the shadows a bier, on which was
placed a motionless figure, in a sitting posture, with two hands extended
from the black pall which covered its outlines.
It is the body of the Dead! whispered the HeraldIt is beside
thee, on its bier. Its face is covered by a pall, but the cold, stiff hands
are extended, to clasp thee in the embrace of Death. Art thou ready
for the trial?
And as he spoke, a chorus of hollow whispers echoed in the ear of
the CandidateIt is the corse of one who betrayed his trustHe
died in the act of crimeThe vengeance of the Lodge overtook
him at the altar, even as he heard the voice of his Bride
The trial? faltered the Candidate.
Yes, the solemn ordeal of the dead hand! spoke the Herald in his
hollow
voice. Give me thy hand. Press the hand of the deadthus
The Initiate shook like a reed, as he felt those cold fingers in his
grasp.
Clasp it firmly, and repeat with me the obligation of a Free Brother
of the B. H. A. C. `
If in my heart there is hidden one thought of
treachery to the Order, in whose Lodge I stand, may my hand become
like the hand which I grasp; and in witness of this my vow, I raise to
my lips the cold hand of the Dead
.'
The Candidate faltered the words, with a pause between each syllable,
as though his fears had choked his utterance.
Raise the hand to your lipsspoke the deep voice in his ear.
With his strong arm trembling in every nerve, he slowly lifted the
dead hand, and felt its fingers grow colder in his grasp. He pressed it
to his lips, and as the moist, clammy skin filled him with a sensation of
intolerable loathing, he let it fall, as though it was a hand of red-hot iron.
Examine the hand, Honorable Heraldspoke the Worthy Master
from his throneIf there is a drop of blood upon the palm, this
Candidate
will prove a Traitor!
A dead silence ensued. The Initiate, shuddering with suspense,
awaited the result of this strange ordeal.
There is! shouted the Herald in tones of thunderThere is a
drop of blood upon this dead hand.
Then, exclaimed the Master, starting erect on his platform, with
his regalia glittering in the dim lightThen have we a Traitor in our
midst. Brothers, arisearise with daggers drawn, and hurl the wretch
to his doom!
A confused sound, as of trampling feet, and rustling robes, and sharp
steel, clanking from the sheath, crashed on the Initiate's ear.
His knees sank beneath him; prostrate on the floor, with the bandage
still over his eyes, he faltered the incoherent prayer
Mercy! No Traitor, but a true mando not
He felt the points of the drawn daggers touch his face, his breast, his
arms. He was encircled by a wall of deadly steel.
Death to the Traitordeath! arose from an hundred voices. He
will betray ushe must not leave the Lodge alivethe drop of blood on
the hand of the dead, bears witness against him!
Then a voice, deeper and bolder than all the others, was heard through
the uproar:
Prepare, Brothers, prepare your daggers! When I raise my hand,
plunge them, one and all, and at the same moment, into the body of the
Traitor!
There was a pause. A breathless silence reigned. The Initiate moved
his lips, but he could not speak. His head sunk upon his breast, and
his arms fell motionless in their chains.
At this moment, a whisper disturbed the breathless stillness
Shall we spare him? He may repent! Even yet, Brothers, he may
be true!
And in answer other whispers arose
No! we cannot spare him. He is doomed. Look! The Worthy
Master is about to lift his hand!
A picture of terror more abject cannot be imagined, than was presented
in the prostrate figure of that strong man, bound in chains, and surrounded
by the crowd of veiled forms, flashing with regalia, a dagger glittering in
each uplifted hand.
The light suspended from the ceiling grew fainter, and a gloom more
impressive than intense darkness, sank on the scene, confounding the
forms of the brethren, in one vague mass of half-shadow, from which
like flame-sparks from a cloudtheir regalia glittered in tremulous points
of radiance.
What wouldst thou do, to obtain light and liberty? said a voiceit
was the disguised voice of the Herald.
The Initiate could not answer.
Let the bandage be removed from his eyes. He shall behold the
doom that awaits him.
There was a mingled sound as of whispering voices and steps hurrying
to and fro, with the sharp clang of steel encountering steel, heard through
the confusion.
The Initiate felt the bandage drop from his eyes. It was a moment
before he could recover the use of his sight, but when he gazed around,
he discovered that he was kneeling in the centre of a room not more than
ten feet square, with a lofty ceiling, and hangings of midnight darkness.
Before him stood a man, enveloped in a shapeless garment of coarse
cloth, grey in color, and with a veil of black crape over his face. In one
hand he held a glittering axe, in the other a flaming torch, whose red
light imparted a lurid glare to the terror-stricken face of the Initiate.
Beside this figure was an elevation, covered with black velvet. It was the
block of the scaffold.
I am thy executioner! said the figureAdvance and lay thy head
upon the block!
The face of the Initiate, changed from its ruddy hues, to a corse-like
pallor, was agitated in every nerve. He raised his chained hands, and
gasped
I am no Traitor!
Come! The moment of your death is here. Hark! That bell;
you hear it? It is your funeral knell.
He tottered to his feet, entirely awed by the terrors which he had
endured
.
With one step he reached the block, and knelt and laid his
head upon it. He saw the axe flash in the air, in the red light of the
torch
He closed his eyes.
There was a pause. The axe did not fall. Tremblingly the Initiate
unclosed his eyes, and felt them blinded by a dazzling light.
The four curtains, which, descending from the ceiling of the Lodge,
had formed the cell-like apartment, were rolled aside, and the sight
which met the eyes of the affrighted man, was brilliant beyond the power
of language.
An hundred torches, each grasped in the arm of a Brother of the Order,
lighted up the spacious Lodge room, and shone on the stars and jewels,
the symbols and robesin one vivid flood of brightness.
High on his platform, his breast heaving under its purple collar,
appeared
the Worthy Master, with lines of veiled forms, extending from his
side, down the steps of the platform, to the floor; and in every hand a
torch blazed brightly, and on every neck the gorgeous regalia glittered
with blinding radiance.
Arise! Advance! We hail you as a Brother! exclaimed the
Worthy Master, in a loud and ringing voice.
Trembling still, the Initiate rose; the chains fell from his breast and
arms; guided by the Herald's hand, he approached the Master's
platform.
And from his pale face the sweat started even yet in beaded drops.
He glanced from side to side, on the array of veiled figures, clad in
robes of linen and purple, and decked with symbols that shone like stars,
and then his eye was centred on the Master's form, who stood motionless
upon his platform, with a golden torch held in his extended arm.
Thou hast passed the first ordeal. Another yet remains. Yet, ere
we try thy courage, and test thy faith, with the Ordeal of Blood, I have a
charge to impress upon thy soul.
The Initiate beheld a Brother clad in white advance, holding in one
hand, a coarse garment, flaming red in hue, and in the other, a knife,
rusty and dim, as with the stain of blood.
Endue the Candidate with the Blood-red robe. Place in his hand
the rusted knife.
It was done. With the coarse garment on his broad chest, and the
knife in his hand, the Initiate awaited the commands of the Worthy
Master.
Canst thou tell, O Candidate, whose blood it is, that dyes the
sack-cloth
which now covers your form?
The Initiate's grey eyes expanded in wonder.
I cannot tell! he faltered.
It is the Blood of the Poor, exclaimed the Master.
From a hundred voices broke the chorus:
The sackcloth bears witness of the Wrongs of the Poor, slain for
ages by the axe, by the cord, by the iron hand of the Tyrant!
The dagger in thy hand is dimmed by a dusky stain. Whose blood is
it, that gathers in blackness on its sharp point?
I cannot tell
It is the blood of the Oppressor, said the Master; and again the
voice of the Brothers joined in chorus:
The Blood of the Tyrant! Sacred, in the sight of God, be the steel
which is crimsoned by that blood!
This sackcloth, stained with the blood of the Poor, this dagger, rusted
by the blood of the Tyrant's heart, have for thee a solemn lesson. That
lesson marks thy first step into the mysteries of our Order. Listen! So
long as the blood of the Poor dyes the sackcloth, so long will the blood
of the Tyrant stain the dagger. The day comes, when the sackcloth
shall be changed into a garment spotless as the snow, when the dagger
shall be transformed into a Cross of dazzling light. Then shall the blood
of the Poor no longer flow, then shall the earth be no longer polluted by
the Tyrant's step. But until that day comes, we have joined in solemn
covenant; wilt thou take the Oath of that covenant, and bind its motto to
thy heart?
I will!
Warden, administer the Oath.
The Candidate, attired in the bloody sackcloth, with the rusted knife in
his hand, was led along the floor, through the dazzling array of the
crowded Lodge. In a few moments he stood at the western extremity of
the room, at the foot of the Warden's platform.
The Warden, gorgeous in his light-blue robe, varied by the scarlet
collar, and with a group of white plumes tossing about his veiled brow,
descended the steps, holding in his hand a goblet, filled to the brim with
a red liquid.
Kneel, and repeat the oath! I do swear, in the name of * * *, to
obey forever the mandate of my superiors; to keep locked in my bosom
the secrets of this order; to yield them up, neither to the fear of man, the
love of woman, nor yet the terrors of the grave. I also swear * * * * *
* * * * * * * * * * * *. Furthermore, in case I prove recreant to my
oath, and refuse to obey the commands of my superiors, or reveal the
secrets of the B. H. A. C., or meet with any Lodge, not chartered by the
Grand Lodge of this order, may the dagger of the first brother whom I
encounter be planted in my heart; may the sun refuse me warmth,
water fail to quench my thirst, and earth deny me the shelter of a grave.
So mote it be! Amen and Amen!
And in witness of this oath, and of this invocation, I place to my lips
this goblet, filled with the blood of a Brother who betrayed his trust. So
may my blood be drunken, in case I imitate the perjury of the Traitor!
He did not refuse the goblet nor fail to utter the words. With a
frenzied
gesture, he raised it, and moistened his lips with the loathsome liquid.
Once more, terror-stricken by this horrible formula of blasphemy,
which his lips had repeated, the candidate was led to the east, where the
Master's platform rose.
Wouldst thou know the great watchword of our order? Then listen
and repeat with me
`
Death to the RichLife to the Poor
!'
The Initiate's eyes flashed, as he uttered the words in a tone of violent
emphasis.
And through the Lodge, spoken slowly and in distinct utterance, it
floatedthat fearful watchword,
Death to the RichLife to the Poor
!
Prepare for the last trial. Now comes the ordeal of Blood. Fail
in this, and thou canst never leave these walls a living man.
At this crisis, a door near the warden's platform was suddenly opened.
On the threshold appeared a figure, clad in an array whose splendor
shamed even the dazzling regalia of the Lodge.
Clad from head to foot in white velvet, sprinkled with innumerable
silver stars, with a dove and olive branch, of gold, emblazoned on his
breast, this figure bore in his hand a black wand, with a skull and cross
bones affixed to its upper extremity.
As the Worthy Master beheld this figure, he knocked four times in
succession
,
with the gavel or hammer, which lay on the pedestal arising in
front of his chair.
Arise, my brethren, and greet the Grand Herald of the Grand Lodge
of the B. H. A. C.!
With one movement they rose, and bending their heads, held their
torches high in the air with the left hand, while the right was clasped
upon the breast.
Hail to the Grand Lodge of the B. H. A. C., and hail to its
Messenger
,
who deigns to walk in our midst.
Descending from the platform, the Worthy Master knelt at its foot,
while the Grand Herald took the vacant chair, and, through the apertures
of his white veil, surveyed the dazzling array of the Lodge.
Thy bidding, Most Honorable Herald? Does the Grand Lodge
communicate with its subordinate Lodge?
I come from the Grand Lodge, Worthy Master, and come to claim a
Brother who has betrayed our order, and broken his vows!
Thus speaking, the Grand Herald advanced to the edge of the platform,
with his snow-white robe glittering in every star.
It was evident that his words produced a marked sensation. The
kneeling Master started, with the same feeling of surprise which thrilled
through an hundred breasts. Gilbert the hunter, with his face veiled
the rifle and the casket resting at his feetstarted forward, and listened with
great eagerness, his curiosity excited by the message of the Grand Herald
A Traitor in our Lodge, Right Honorable Herald?
In your Lodge, Worthy Master. Let him step forth, ere his name is
known. With his face covered by the veil, let him follow me to the
Hall of the Grand Lodge, and hear his doom pronounced without a
murmur.
That voice, soronous and bold, pierced every ear.
There was a confused movement among the ranks of the Brethren; the
murmur of mingled voices; and all was still again.
His Degree, Right Honorable Herald?
He wears the collar of Knighthood. At this moment I behold him.
Once more I extend to him the mercy of secresy. He shall be
condemned
and suffer, without his name being revealed, in case he follows
me in silence to the Hall of the Grand Lodge.
Still no answer was made; the Grand Herald might be seen, with his
veiled face turned toward a particular point of the room. Gilbert
Morgan, gazing through his veil, beheld him looking intently upon the
brethren among whom he stood, and awaited with a vague curiosity,
tinged with some awe, the utterance of the Traitor's name.
A Knight, he muttered, and a traitor too! Hard to believe; for a
man who's taken the Oath of the Degree, knows too well the fate of a
Traitor, to think o' betrayin' his trust!
And the stout huntsman smiled and shuddered at once, as he called to
mind the words of that fearful Oath. Smiled as if in scorn, at the
elabo-rate
blasphemy of those words; shuddered as he remembered the doom
which had overtaken a recreant Brother.
The revery of the hunter was broken by the voice of the Grand
Herald.
Once more I speak to
him. His foot is on the box, and by his side
the rifle
Gilbert's torch shook with the same tremor which heaved his broad
chest, and quivered in every nerve of his iron arm.
What! I can't a-heerd my ears! `
His foot on the box!
'
It seemed to him as if every veiled face was turned toward him, as by
an electric impulse; he saw the glittering forms and long lines of torches
go swimming round him, as if in a spectral dance.
Stand forth, Traitor the Grand Herald pointed with his wand as
he spokeStand forth, perjured Knight, and let the B. H. A. C. know
the Traitor who has betrayed the secrets of his Order. Gilbert Morgan,
Brother of the Knightly Degree, descend from your seat, and take your
place upon the star in the centre of the floor!
Gilbert heard that voice, and seemed to behold the floor open in a
chasm at his feet. He obeyed without a word. Descending from his
seatit was on the second range from the level of the floorhe slowly
strode toward the golden star.
He saw the fingers pointing at him; he heard the whispers, some of
pity, others of scorn.
The Traitor!
He
false to our order! Let him be dealt with as
the law enjoins!
And yet, tearing the veil from his face, he dashed it on the floor, and
with it his collar and his robe of Knighthood. Then folding his arms
over his blue hunting-shirt, he gazed towards the Master's platform with
an unfaltering eye, though his brown cheek was very pale, his nether lip
shaken by an involuntary motion.
If I am a Traitor, let me have a dog's death! he cried
That's all!
Worthy Master, in the name of the Grand Lodge, I demand from you
the body of Gilbert Morgan; and at the same time direct you to cover
his collar and his robe with the colors of mourning, and hang them on
the walls of the Lodge, so that all the brethren may know that he no
longer lives, but has gone to his reward!
I obey. It shall be done!
And as the Grand Herald descended from the platform, the Worthy
Master led Gilbert toward the door, and paused on the threshold. At a
sign from the Messenger of the Grand Lodge, a brother bore the box and
the rifle over the floor, and placed them in the hands of the Hunter.
Into your hands I deliver the Traitor. Work your will upon him,
and let the doom which he merits fall upon him alone; let his blood be
upon his own head!
There was something very impressive in the scene. Thrice the
brothers waved their torches to and fro, thrice they bent their heads, and
thrice repeated the stern decree
Let his blood be upon his own head!
And with his face reddened by the torch glare, Gilbert stood on the
threshold, and looked for the last time over the familiar array of his
Lodgesaw the Brothers of his own degree waving their torches with
the restheard their voices mingle in his death-chant.
ComeI'm ready he choked down the agitation which was
mounting from his heart to his throat, and turned to the Grand Herald,
who stood beside him, pointing the way beyond the threshold with his
extended wand. Into the darkness they went forth together; the door
closed behind them, and the Worthy Master, with the torch flashing over
his robes, lifted the collar and the robe of the Doomed Man from the floor.
Brother Scribe, you will strike from our roll the name of the Dead.
Honorable Herald, you will cover these with crape, and suspend them
behind my chair, as a token of the fate of the lost brother.
It was done. The Scribewho sat in one corner, before a desk, a
dark robe flowing round his form, with a dagger and pen emblazoned in
silver on the sleeve, erased the name from the book, which lay open in
the glaring light. Ere a moment had passed, the craped collar and robe
fluttered from the hangings behind the Eastern Chair, and it was known
to all the brothers, that Gilbert Morgan was dead, from that hour.
Now let the Candidate prepare for the last ordeal!
This strange incident had not failed to make a strong impression on the
sense of the Candidate. While it passed, he had remained standing at
the foot of the platform gazing in mute wonder upon every point,
listening
to every word of the sceneand now, with his face manifesting in
every line a pitiable terror, he trembled as the voice of the Worthy
Master announced the Ordeal of Blood.
We may, in future pages of this history, describe at length the
appearance
and character of this Candidate, and reveal him in scenes of
another
and far different nature.
I am fainthe gasped, as the knife fell from his unclosing fingers:
Do notdo noturge me farther. This scene bewildersit is too
much
Covered as he was with the blood-red sackcloth, he fell insensible to the
floor.
How long he remained unconscious, he knew not, but when he
recovered
the use of his faculties, the dazzling light of the hundred torches
no longer illumined the hall. He rose to his feet, and by the dim lamp,
which swung from the high ceiling, beheld the floor crowded by
kneeling
men, who bent their faces on their clasped hands. An unbroken
silence
reigned. On his platform the Master knelt, his attitude as humble
as the humblest of the brethren. The other officers of the Lodge were
also on their knees; throughout that dimly lighted hall, nothing was seen
but prostrate forms, heads bowed, and hands clasped as if in silent Prayer.
And through the gloom, the symbols of the order gleamed, with a faint
and tremulous light.
Suddenlywhile the Candidate, awed to the soul, was watching
intently
for the slightest gesture, or the faintest sounda flood of ruddy light
poured through an open doorway. It grew more vivid, it bathed the
room in sudden splendor.
And on the threshold appeared two figures, in robes which resembled
shrouds, slowly advancing with a measured step. They held lighted
torches over their heads.
As they passed the threshold and took their way through the kneeling
brethren, two forms appeared behind them, at the distance of some three
or four paces. Clad in the same shroud-like robes, they also bore
torches above their heads.
Slowly the four advanced, moving with the same measured step,
and it was seen that they bore a funeral bier, on which was placed a
coffin of unpainted pine wood. The torch-light glowing over their
shroud-like
robes, shone in painful distinctness upon the closed lid of the coffin.
They came slowly on. Still the brethren knelt. They reached the
star in the centre of the floor. Still no head was lifted; not a hand was
unclasped. They placed the bier upon the star, and stood around it,
waving their torches over the rude coffin.
The scene was wild and spectral. These four figures clad in white,
that coffin of rough pine wood, were seen in the centre of the dazzling
array of robes and symbols.
The figure who stood at the head of the coffin, on the right, suddenly
lowered his torch, and dashed it against the closed lid. The others, one
by one, imitated his action, and the extinguished torches rested upon the
lid of the coffin.
Through the gloom, the voice of the first figure echoed, like a knell
Worthy Master of the Rifle Lodge, No. 256, of the B. H. A. C., into
your hands I deliver the dead body of Gilbert Morgan.
CHAPTER NINTH.
THE FATE OF GILBERT MORGAN.
It
may not be altogether without interest, for us to follow the stout
hunter on his way, and behold the manner of his Doom.
Come! Follow me! said the voice of the Grand Herald, speaking
through the darkness of the passageWe ascend these stairs, and pass
into the ante-room of the Grand Lodge.
In silence, with his heart chilled, his senses bewildered by this
mysterious incident, Gilbert followed the unknown messenger. They
ascended the stairs, and through a doorway, where a curtain supplied the
place of oaken panels, passed into the ante-room.
It was a small apartment, illumined by a lamp, which stood on a table
covered with dark cloth, with a skull and an unsheathed sword by its
side. The place was hung with dark tapestry, on which the various
symbols of the order were emblazoned, with the B. H. A. C.
glittering
brightly in their midst.
A man dressed in a loose garment of white linen, with a dark mantle
floating from the shoulders, confronted the Grand Herald, with the veil
on his face glowing with the mystic letters, and the point of his sword
turned to the uncovered floor.
Pass on, Grand Herald, he said, the Grand Sentinel gives thee
free passage into the Hall of the Grand Lodge.
Through the doorwayopposite that by which they had entered, and,
like it, with a curtain in the place of a doorGilbert and the Grand
Herald
silently passed.
In a circular room, hung with purple tapestry, and lighted by candles,
which were placed on four separate pedestals, covered with white cloth
and rising at intervals from the polished mahogany floor, the Grand Lodge
of the Order were assembled.
Gilbert, led by the Grand Herald, looked from side to side, and beheld
some twenty men, veiled in robes of dark purple, seated in a circle,
around the white pedestals. Their faces were concealed by a sort of cowl,
made of scarlet velvet, and glittering with golden letters and symbols.
Altogether, the effect of the scene was very impressive.
Before the Hunter arose a platform, with its three steps covered with
dark cloth. In a chair, adorned with cumbrous carvings, with wide arms,
and a high back, surmounted by a golden crown, sat a veiled form, clad
in a flowing robe of purple, glittering, from the shoulders to the feet, with
vine leaves, stars, a dagger and a skull, and other symbols of the Order.
This figure wore over his face a veil of white lace, which permitted his
bronzed features to be dimly seen: around his brow, a coronet of golden
leaves was twined, and from its centre waved a single long and slender
plume of raven darkness.
You stand before the `Most Venerable, the Grand Master of the
Grand Lodge of the B. H. A. C.'
The Grand Herald, as he uttered these words, laid his hand on the
hunter's shoulder, and whisperedKneel! You are now in the
presence
of your Judge!
In the centre of the space, bounded by the four pedestals, the
Huntsman
knelt, his plain hunting-shirt strongly contrasted with the purple
robes of the encircling figures, his rude sunburnt features with the
half-veiled
face of the Grand Master, to whom his gaze was turned. By his
side, in the white robe sprinkled with stars, the Herald stood, the wand
grasped in his extended hand.
The Hunter looked wonderingly around, while the sensation of
mystery
,
and the terror that comes from mystery, began to crowd his brain
with images of gloom and death.
Not a word was spoken. Like lifeless effigies, those figures were
grouped around; like a corse placed erect, with a veil over its frozen
face, the Grand Master sat on his throne, the lights playing warmly over
his flowing robe, and shining on each brilliant symbol.
Have you no word, in answer to our charge?
It was the voice of the Grand Master, and broke with a sudden
emphasis
upon the Hunter's ear. He could not answer; the mysterious
8
nature of the summons which had called him hither; the fear which had
fallen upon the faces of his brethren, as they heard him charged with the
unpardonable treason; the anticipation of an approaching Doom, which
would be as terrible as it was secretall rushed upon the stout Woodsman
at once, and held him dumb.
Of what am I accused? he faltered at lastWhat's the man that
dar' say it?
Even as he knelt, raising his clenched hand, while the arm shook with
a ceaseless motion, he uttered the words in a husky voice, and with his
head bent forward, awaited an answer.
Deathsman of the B. H. A. C.advance! Prepare the cord!
Gilbert did not see the form, which, advancing from the circle, stood at
his back, but he heard the footstep, and felt that his Executioner was
at hand.
It was indeed a hideous figure, with a death's-head mask upon his face,
the fleshless bones of a skeleton traced upon his breast and limbs, and in
his hand, covered with a black glove, painted in resemblance of a
skeleton
hand, he bore a cord, which, wound once around the fingers, dangled
to the floor.
Accuser of the Guiltyadvance! again the Grand Master's voice
was heard.
And in front of Gilbert, on the right, appeared a man veiled in a
shapeless
robe, black as midnight, and with no ornament to relieve its
drooping
cowl, or gloomy folds.
Speak, Accuser, what is the Crime of the Accused?
Without lifting the cowl, the Accuser spoke; Gilbert listening all the
while with trembling earnestness.
I accuse Gilbert Morgan of the violation of his Oath as a Brother of
our Order. I accuse him of betraying his sacred trust, as a Knight of the
Scarlet Degree!
Accuse me? It's a liea lie, by ! shouted Gilbert, with an
involuntary
impulse of anger and profanity.
Half-starting from the floor, he flung his clenched hand toward the
Grand Master, while the pallor of his face vanished before a flush of
ungovernable
rage.
Accuse me o' violatin' my oath as a Brother, my trust as a Knight?
I don't keer who ses itI fling the lie in his teeth! And I'll prove it to
his face, with my foot upon this box, this rifle in my hands!
He towered in the midst of the secret band, his foot upon the box, his
own true rifle in his grasp. There was a look of defiance on his brow, a
fearless scorn upon his lip.
Yet at the same moment, a cord was thrown over his head; it tightened
round his neck; he felt himself dragged rudely backward, and sinking on
one knee, gasped for breath.
Ah! By ! This is a coward's trickto murder a man like a
dog!
Struggling fiercely while that cord tightened about his neck, Gilbert
rolled his head from side to side, and saw the point of an unsheathed
sword glimmering from the folds of every robe. The Accuser held a
pistol to his throat, a grim weapon, huge in the barrel, with a stock of
heavy mahogany inlaid with silver. At the same instant, the Grand
Herald drew a dagger from beneath his white garment, and stood ready
to strike its keen point into the victim's heart.
Let me know my crime muttered Gilbert, every word rendered
thick and gurgling by the tightening cordIf I have violated the oath of
a Free Brother, or betrayed the trust of a true Knight, let me know it!
You have violated your oath as a Brother, exclaimed the Grand
Master, starting from his chairAt your initiation, you took a solemn
obligation, never to desert the Order; never to undertake any enterprise,
much less enter into bonds of marriage, without the Decree of the Grand
Lodge, affirming your purpose. To-night, without consulting your own
Lodge, or the Grand Lodge, you resolved to enter into marriage bonds
with Madeline, the orphan, who dwells in the home of Peter Dorfner.
You resolved to desert our Order, break your vows, and renounce all
allegiance to your superiorsI hold the Accusation in my hand. It is
signed by a Brother of the Knightly Degree.
Utterly confounded by this charge, Gilbert felt the rope about his neck,
saw the dagger and the pistol levelled at his heart, and could not speak a
word in answer.
More than this continued the Grand Master, as he stood erect on
his platform, with the parchment of the Accusation in his hand; you
have perjured yourself in another point. By your vow, you are bound
to bring at once, without a moment's delay, all sums of money in your
possession, either to the chest of your own Lodgeor, in case the sum
is beyond an hundred doubloonsto the Treasury of the Grand Lodge.
Have you done this? The box at your feet contains one thousand pieces
of gold. You knownay, you dare not denythat it was your intention
to appropriate this sum to your own purpose. Appointed, at the last
meeting of your Lodge, to
secure
this money,appointed by your
Lodge, at the Decree of the Grand Lodgeyou have violated your trust.
And in proof of this also, I hold the accusation in my hand, made and
signed by a Brother!
I was in the Lodge, with the box in my hand, about to deliver it,
when
The words were interrupted by the gradual tightening of the cord.
Thrown on his back, Gilbert lay without speech or motion, his face
darkening
into livid purple, his eyes protruding and blood-shotten.
Brothers of the Grand Lodgeyou have heard the Accusation, made
not only by the Venerable Accuser, but affirmed by your Grand Master?
What is your Decree?
Guilty! was echoed by every voice.
Your judgment?
And, in chorus, they uttered the formula of the B. H. A. C.
Let him be stripped of all Regalia, for he has dishonored that
Regalia
.
Let the name of Brother be torn from his heart, for he has
covered that name with infamy. Let him be put under the Ban of the
Order, and then surrendered to the vengeance of the first Brother who
may encounter him; for he has broken his vows, and severed every tie
that bound him to our protection and our love.
The Grand Lodge will now prepare for the solemn ceremony of the Ban
of Excommunication, said the Grand Master, descending from his platform.
The stout hunter uttered an involuntary groan. The cord grew
tighter; he struggled fiercely, in the effort to free himself from its stifling
coil, but the hue of his sunburnt face was changed to livid purple, his lips
became the color of bluish clay, and every vein, every muscle of his
visage was distorted by the impulse of harrowing physical torture.
`It isfalse he groaned, and then all became a blankhis senses
failed himthere seemed a blood-red light flashing upon his starting
eye-balls
and
all was darkness.
When he recovered his senses, he found himself standing in front of
the Grand Master's platform, supported on one side by the Deathsman,
on the other by the Accuser.
A pale bluish flame shone over the encircling forms, and gave their
robes a spectral and unnatural appearance. That flame was only the
combined light of the torches, which they held in their uplifted arms.
Before the hunter was a large vessel, made of dark wood, and encircled
with iron hoops. It was filled with a red liquid.
And as the Grand Master waved his hand, the Brethren advanced
between the hunter and the Grand Master, and plunged their lighted
torches into the vessel, filled with the red liquid. Thus they cried,
as torch after torch was extinguishedThus perish the soul of the
False Brother!
The twenty torches were plunged into the wooden vessel, their flames
extinguished, their handles projecting from the red liquid. A candle,
held by the Grand Master, shed its faint light over the scene, and dimly
disclosed the circle of shrouded forms, with the half-naked figure of the
Hunter in the centre.
His arms were pinioned; the cord was about his neck; but
half-aroused
from a deathlike swoon, his senses were deadened by a leaden
apathy. As torch after torch hissed into the vessel, and flashed with a
more vivid brightness, as it sunk in darkness, Gilbert thought he was
entangled in the horrors of some unutterable dream.
The False Brother is degraded, said the voice of the AccuserHis
name has been inscribed on the Book of Judgment; he has been laid
under the irrevocable Ban of the Covenant!
Accursedaccursed, forever! the words broke in faint whispers
through the gloom.
Then do I give him over to the Deathsman of our Order. Let his
death be secret; let it be speedy, so that his form may no longer pollute
the earth, and shame the broad canopy of heaven with the sight of a
Living Traitor!
Gilbert felt the gripe of the Deathsman on his arm. Without a word,
he suffered himself to be led along the floor, and saw, with an apathetic
gaze, the shrouded figures kneeling on either side.
He reached the curtained wall, andwhile the Deathsman, in his
hideous mask, with the form of a skeleton traced upon his limbslifted
the candle, and extended his hand, as if to point the way, he heard the
voices of the Brethren, speaking in a murmur
Farewell, they whisperedFarewell to the forsworn and fallen!
The hangings were lifted by the Deathsman, and a narrow doorway
appeared in the light.
His arms pinioned, his neck encircled by the cord, Gilbert passed
under the raised hangings, and in an instant was enveloped in thick
darkness
.
A cloth had been placed on his forehead; it hung over his eyes,
and shrouded their sight.
Not a word was spoken, but he felt himself dragged onward, along a
narrow passage; dragged by the cord, which encircled his neck.
The bandage was removed from his eyes. It was some time before
the hunter could see clearly; but when he recovered the use of his
vision, he found himself in a small room, with wainscotted walls, and a
cheerful fire, smoking and crackling, on an open hearth.
A table of unpainted oak stood in the centre, before the fire, with an
arm-chair at either end. On this table were placed a bottle, a goblet of
silver, and a clay pipe.
Gilbert could scarce believe his sight. He turned from the ruddy
blaze, and beheld the Deathsman standing by his side.
What does all this mean? he askeda comfortable fire, a bottle o'
wine, a cup, and a pipe o' tobacco!
It means, that a half-hour of life is still permitted to you said the
voice, echoing from within the death's-head mask. In that half-hour,
you are allowed the warmth of the fire, the cheerful influence of tobacco
and wine. Yet, when you have exhausted the pipe and the bottle, the
hour of your death will be at hand.Until that moment comes, I
leave you.
There was but one door to the room. It was opposite the fire.
Gilbert beheld it close, as the Deathsman passed the threshold, and heard
the key turn in the lock. He stood for a moment, gazing about him, with
a bewildered glance.
Is there no way of escape? he muttered, pacing rapidly around the
room, and feeling every panel of the wainscot. No secret passage out
o' this cursed den? Little did I think, some years ago, when first I was
'nitiated into the order, and took the oath to rob and murder, for the
benefit of my Lodge, that I'd ever be caught in a trap like this!
There was no way of escape; the panels were perfectly smooth, and
firmly jointed into each other. The hunter turned to the fire, and started
with a new surprise. A coat of dark-green velvet, faced with gold, was
hung over the arm-chair, and beneath it appeared a shirt of fine linen,
with ruffled collar and bosom, and a waistcoat of buff-colored cloth,
glittering with small buttons of gold.
I'm cold, he laughedand shuddered at the same momentfor,
even in his merriment, the incalculable Power of the Secret Order awed
his iron heartAn' this fine gear will do for me, jist as well as my
hunting-shirt, leather belt, and powder-horn!
It was not long ere he stood in front of the hearth, clad in the green
coat, with the lace ruffles protruding from the buff vest. This costume
displayed the outlines of his massive figure in strong relief, and its bright
colors threw his sunburnt features boldly into the light.
He flung himself in the chair, filled the goblet, and lighted the clay
pipe, whose long stem reached from his lips to his waist.
Anybody, to see me, now, 'ud think I was a gentleman o' fortin'
takin' my ease, and carin' a cuss for nobody!
He drained the goblet, and the smoke of the pipe floated in bluish
wreaths above his head.
That 'ere wine goes through the veins like melted fire! Sich tobacco
as this, a feller don't often see in these parts. Cuba, rale Cuba, from the
West Ingies, as I'm a poor miserable Devil, doomed to be choked out o'
life, in this cut-throat den!
And as he drank and smokedthe warmth of the fire imparting its
influence
to his chilled limbshe became, by degrees, cheerful and excited,
and then a leaden drowsiness sank on his senses, and dulled his eyes
and ears.
The bowl fell from his hand, and lay upturned on the table; the pipe
was shivered into fragments at his feet. After all that he had endured,
with the certainty of death before him, the hunter sunk into a dead
slumber. His hands were crossed upon his buff waistcoat, and, with his
head resting against the back of the chair, his mouth wide open, he slept
the dreamless sleep of weariness and exhaustion.
As the pipe fell from his hand, the door opened behind him, and the
Deathsman, hideous in his mask and skeleton disguise, once more appeared.
CHAPTER TENTH
THE GOLDEN SIGNET AND ITS COUNTERPART.
The
drug has done its work he exclaimed, in a voice whose
joyous
intonation could not be drowned, even by his maskThe fellow has
done his work. We have used himhe shall trouble us no more!
Scarce had he spoken, when an incident occurred, which exercised an
important influence on the fate of the doomed hunter.
At the back of the Deathsman, treading at his very heels, appeared a
man, whose sharp features were shadowed by a three-cornered hat, while
his slender limbs were clad in dark attire, made after the fashion of the
oklen time, the coat with its skirts drooping to his knees, the vest
reaching
far below the waist, and the ends of a white neckcloth dangling on
the breast.
The face of this manclad, not in the robes and symbols of the secret
order, but in the attire of a plain citizenwas marked by a long hooked
nose, pinched lips, sharp eyes, and high cheek-bones. It was
dark-brown
in complexion, and the hair which straggled from beneath his
three-cornered hat, was of jetty blackness, with here and there a lock of
silvery whiteness.
While he is in this stupor, we will have him conveyed on to the
City, placed on shipboard, and then!ho, for the Coast of Africa, and
the Slave Trade. Gilbert Morgan will never trouble the Wissahikon
woods again.
A smile was perceptible on the sharp features of the stranger, dressed
in black, as he stole softly on tip-toe behind the Deathsman, and touched
his shoulder with the forefinger of his right hand.
Tell your Grand Master that I wish to see him, and have a few
moments' conversation with him, said the unknown, while the smile
deepened over his face.
Hey? who spoke? The Deathsman wheeled suddenly, and saw
the slender form of the strangerWho are
you
?
Will you convey my message to your Grand Master? And taking
a handsome snuff-box from his waistcoat pocket, he tapped the lid, and
conveyed same portion of its contents to his nose.
The hideous mask covered the face of the Deathsman; the surprise,
the overwhelming wonder stamped on his features, was not visible, but as
he spoke again, the intonation of his voiceno longer deep and measured
but harsh and hurried, told the story of his amazement. And who
are you? You dare intrude upon the council of our Orderyou!
Know you not
Pooh, pooh! That is sufficient, said the gentleman, smiling all
over his sharp featuresConvey my message, and let the Grand
Master
attend me.
The unknown crossed his hands behind his back, and advanced to the
hearth.
For a moment the Deathsman seemed to hesitate, and again he asked
Who are you? Your name, your business here? If you belong to
the Grand Lodge, give me the Word and the sign
I shall do no such thing, for I do not belong to the Grand Lodge. I
merely wish to see the Grand Master. Is that not plain enough? Can
you understand me now?
This is against our laws. Youa person altogether unknown
have penetrated into this house, and dared to spy out those mysteries in
which you have neither part nor lot. Without regaliawithout one sign
to indicate Brotherhood or authority, you desire to see the Grand Master.
It cannot be
The Deathsman stood, resting his hand on the chair of the unconscious
hunter, with the light playing freely over his grotesque disguise, and
showing, in bold relief, the contrast between it and the plain, dark apparel
of the unknown.
It can be the slender gentleman wheeled suddenly, and tapped the
lid of his snuff-boxIt must!
Then, passing before the slumbering Gilbert, he seated himself in the
unoccupied chair, and stretched his spare limbs, with silver buckles on
the knees and shoes, in the cheerful glow of the fire.
The Deathsman retired in silence; again the key grated in the lock.
A huge fellowbrawny forma vast fund of nerve. Something
might be made of him. That forehead tells the story of a man who won't
stand upon trifles, oronce arousedbe held back by scruples of
any sort.
Glancing upon the brown visage of the sleeper, the unknown very
coolly applied himself to his favorite stimulantthe dark tobacco dust
crossed his limbs in a posture of great complacency, and, placing his
thumbs together, seemed to be altogether at home in this mysterious
chamber.
The key grated in the lock, and as the door flew open, the Grand
Master entered, his tall and somewhat commanding form clad in the
purple
robe, dazzling with embroidery, the white veil shadowing his bronzed
features, and the solitary plume waving from the coronal of gold leaves
on his forehead.
Advancing one step from the threshold, he paused, and exclaimed, in
that deep tone, evidently assumed
Who is it that demands audience with the Grand Master of the B.
H. A. C.?
A-hyou have come,the unknown carelessly turned his head
over his shoulderI have waited for you. I have
waited
. Be pleased
to close the door, turn the key, and come hither.
The Grand Master started; his eyes flashed, even through the lace
which veiled his features. For an instant he stood as if completely
confounded
by the words of this slender gentleman, whose neat black attire,
and featuressharpened as by the systematic attrition of trafficindicated
the plain citizen, the restless merchant of the large city.
However, as though mastering his indignation for the moment, he
quietly closed the door, turned the key in the lock, and approached the
unknown.
Now, sir, I will hear you. After I have heard his voice, growing
bold and harsh with anger, was interrupted by the sharp tones of the
gentleman in dark attire.
After you have heard, you will
obey
. That is plain, sir. Will you
permit me to ask you a question?
Speak on.
To whom does the Initiate into a subordinate Lodge of the B. H. A.
C. swear allegiance?
To the Honorable Master of the Lodge, of course. Did you know
any thing of our Order
Bah! Enough of that kind of talk. Let me ask you another
question. To whom does the Honorable Master of a subordinate Lodge
of the B. H. A. C., swear allegiance.
To the Most Venerable Grand Master of the B. H. A. C. for the
Continent of Americato
me!
And the dazzling robe fluttered with the impulse of the broad chest
which swelled beneath it. The entire appearance of this personage, clad
in kingly robes, and standing erect, was in vivid contrast with the plain
attire and careless attitude of the slender gentleman.
And, my dear friend the snuff-box was again called into play
if I may be so impertinent as to press the subjectTo whom does the
Right Venerable, the Grand Master of the Order for the Continent of
America, swear allegiance?
The
Most
Venerable, you mean
No, sir. The
Right
Venerable. `Most' does not belong to you
nor to your office.
The Grand Master was silent.
You seem to hesitate. Is not the question easy? You remember
the last act of your installation into the Grand Master's chair, when the
box or casket containing the Will of your predecessor was placed in
your hands, sealed with the Great Seal of the Order, which no one save
the Elect Grand Master dare touch?
Truethere was an obligationa chargebut there is no such body
in existence as the Supreme Lodge of the Order, controlling its
operations
throughout the World.
There was a strange hesitation in the manner, a perceptible tremor in
the voice of the Grand Master.
Ahha! You have discovered at last, that there is such a body as
the `
Supreme Lodge
' the sharp-featured smiled in his parched lips
and small black eyesAnd the obligation that you took, invoking upon
your head the vengeance of God, the tortures of Eternal Death, in case
you broke your vowdo you remember its last and most important
word?
Who are you? fiercely exclaimed the Grand Master, unconsciously
echoing the question which the Deathsman had askedYou have
dared to question me, and I have tamely answered. Now, it is my turn
to question; yours to answer. Unfold at once your name, your
mission within these walls, or, at a sign from me, the members of the
Order will throng this room, and mete out to you the doom of the
spy.
He raised his right arm, and his eyes flashed through the veil with
the glare of ungovernable rage.
`And in case I refuse at any time to obey the mandate of the Supreme
Lodge, when conveyed to me in ancient form, the Brothers of the Order
shall be absolved from all allegiance to me; the Lodges on this Continent
are from that moment empowered by the sacred customs of the B. H. A.
C., to disown my sway, dishonor my name, and hunt me to the death,
under the irrevocable BAN.'
As he repeated these words, in a slow and measured tone, the
gentleman
dressed in black arose, and passing before the sleeping hunter,
confronted
the Grand Master.
This is the
last word
of the Obligation which you took over the
dead body of your Predecessor. Do you remember it now?
It was a singular thing to see the change which came over the
gorgeously
arrayed Grand Master, as this plainly attired man uttered these
words. He was silent; he tottered, and only saved himself from falling
by placing his hand upon the back of Gilbert's chair.
`And I will recognise the Messenger of the Supreme Lodge,
whenever
he appears holding in his hand the counterpart of the golden signet,
which I wear on my heart as the emblem of my authority, and also as
the Great Seal of the Grand Lodge'
Extending his hand, the unknown grasped the golden medal, or, to
describe it more properly, the Great Seal, which, supported by a heavy chain
also of goldshone on the Grand Master's breast.
You behold the figures on this medal, whichwhen it is impressed
upon the melted waxappear in the distinct shape of King Solomon on
his throne, with the Temple in the distance, and Hebrew and Arabic
characters, traced on the Mosaic floor at his feet? Now look upon the
counterpart of this signet.
He placed in the hands of the Grand Master a small casket of dark
wood, the lid of which flew open at his touch.
Hah! ejaculated the Grand Master, as he beheld the medal which
the casket containedIt is indeed very like the signet
Like? It is the same, only on your medal the figures are sunken;
here they are raised. Do you want further proof?
He took the medal of the Grand Master, and placed his own upon it.
The raised figures on the one, fitted into the sunken spaces on the other,
with so much exactness, that the two seemed but one piece of solid gold.
What do you demand?the voice of the Grand Master was changed
from its late fiery and indignant tones. I must confess that it appears
to me, that this may be only an impositionI never heard of the
Supreme
Lodge as a body in actual existence
You thought, my good sir, that it was only a
masonic
expression
for the Power of the Almighty, and, governed by this thought, have
assumed
titles and privileges which do not belong to youhave in fact
invaded
the Prerogative of the Supreme Lodge, and usurped its functions!
The gentleman in dark attire placed the casket within his waistcoat,
and again supplied his nostrils with tobacco dust, as he remarked
Right Venerable Grand Master, you will take one arm of this
insensible
man, and assist me to convey him into the presence of the Supreme
Lodge
But the Grand Lodge await my return. The Brothers will think
strangely of my absence
They will have to continue
thinking strangely
, for a great while,
said the dark gentleman, with an ominous smile. Was it not enough,
sir, that you held in your grasp the revenues and power of the Order?
At your word, a thousand menall bold and unscrupulous, and fitted by
desperation for any deedstarted into action, on every part of the
Continent
of America. At your mandate, the ocean was whitened by the
sails of at least five hundred ships, whose dark flags bore the same skull
and crossbones with the dagger and the motto of the order. You had
only to speak, and lo! in any of the cities of the North or South, your
bidding was doneproperty and life became, through the ten thousand
hands of the Order, your easy prey. But this it seems was not enough.
Not enough to hold a power, which, striking from the darkdeemed
fabulous by the great massrivalled, in its certainty of action, the sway
of an absolute Monarch, and, at the same time, was secured from all
danger, all responsibility, by the cloud of an impenetrable mystery. Not
enough to dwell in a splendid mansion, in the great city, and be caressed
by the rich and aristocratic, while every Minion of the Crown thought it
but a proper reverence for `high birth and great property' to do you
especial
honor. This did not satisfy your ambition. You aimed at the
supreme poweray, sir, only this night, laid your plans to convey into
your own hands
the thousand doubloons, which were ordered to be
secured for the use of the Supreme Lodge
.
Even beneath his royal robe, the Grand Master trembled like a reed in
the blast.
You know my name he faltered.
The slender man tapped the lid of his snuff-box, and, with a deep bow,
offered its contents to the Grand Master
Will you take the arm of this insensible man?
It was done. They raised the sleeping man from the chair, and,
supporting
his unconscious form between them, departed from the room. As
they passed the threshold, the gentleman in black whispered pleasantly
to the Grand Master
You do not know
all
the secrets of this old house. You doubtless
thought that all its rooms were occupied by your subordinates, and quite
forgot the fact, that the second story of the back part of this mansion
communicates with the steep hill on the north, by a door and a passage
not ten feet from where we stand. Do you believe in the Supreme
Lodge now?
They passed the threshold, and, instead of descending the stairs into the
room of the Grand Lodge, traversed the corridor in an opposite direction.
Presently, as he grasped the body of the unconscious hunter with his
muscular right arm, the Grand Master heard a key turn in a lock.
At the same moment, the whisper of the unknown thrilled on his ear,
even through the darkness:
Let us enter. This passage leads us into the bosom of the hill, at
the back of the mansion.
Scarcely had the Grand Master and the unknown, bearing the form of
Gilbert, left the small apartment, warmed by the cheerful wood fire, and
lighted by the candle on the table, when a figure crossed its threshold,
and the Deathsman appeared once more.
Strange! The Grand Master not here, and the Traitor also gone!
he ejaculated, as he surveyed the vacant apartment. Who can it be,
that so boldly desired an audience with him?
He left the room with a hurried step, and in a few moments
reappeared
,
with the Grand Herald by his side.
This is indeed singular, said that personage, as his white robe,
dazzling
with stars, glittered in the lightGone, did you say? The Grand
Master, the doomed and the unknown? Have you no traces? By what
means could they have obtained egress from the house?
To this hurried question, which he propounded without raising the veil
from his face, there was no answer. These two ministers of the Grand
Organization of the B. H. A. C. left the apartment, and descended into
the Hall of the Grand Lodge together.
Day was breaking without the desolate mansion; and in the hall, the
candles standing on the pedestals, were burning fast toward their
sockets.
Still seated in a circle, their purple robes glowing in the wavering light,
the Brothers of the Grand Lodge awaited the return of their Chief. His
platform was vacant; the Grand Herald, leaning on his wand, stood near
its foot, and by his side, the Deathsman. Through the masks which
covered their faces, they gazed over the forms of the brethren, who
conversed
in whispers; their all-absorbing topic, the unaccountable
disappearance
of the Great Head of the Lodge.
It cannot be done whispered the DeathsmanIt is against all
custom, for even a Right Venerable Warden to adjourn the Grand Lodge.
It cannot be done without the presence of our Chief.
Yet, what else can we do? interposed the Grand HeraldOur
chief, who opened this session, is absent. It is near daybreak, and we
do not wish to be seen leaving this house in the broad light of morning.
Brethren, he cried aloud, in the absence of the Grand Master, I
would suggest that the Grand Warden be empowered to close this
session
The sentence was never completed. For, as the lights were burning in
the sockets, the hangings opposite the platform were raised, and a
murmur of surprise broke the stillness
The Grand Master! At last he has come
The Grand Master, clad in the robes of his office, strode slowly, and
with a measured step, through the ranks of his brethren. As he ascended
the platform, it might be seen that the golden signet was still suspended
from his neck, while his bronzed features were covered by the veil.
Brothers of the Grand Lodge he began, but pausedas four veiled
figures, bearing a coffin, crossed the threshold and advanced toward the
platform. Every member could not fail to observe that the voice of the
Grand Master was strangely changed, as he continued:
Behold the crose of Gilbert Morgan, who was executed in my
presence
by the Ministers of the Supreme Lodge!
The effect of his words upon the members of the Order, was not
discernible
,
for as he spoke, the lights, flickering for the last time, went out in
darkness, and, amid the whispers which echoed from every side, only
three words were audibleThe Supreme Lodge!
The Grand Master had been gone for the space of threeperchance
four hours.
Shall we lift the curtain from the councils of the Supreme Lodge, and
reveal the history of those hours?
CHAPTER ELEVENTH.
THE SUPREME LODGE.
We
now return to the moment when the Grand Master heard the
Unknown
whisper
This passage leads us into the bosom of the hill.
He also heard the door close behind him, and felt the form of Gilbert
press heavily upon him. All was dark, but he was conscious that the
passage which they traversed was narrow, the atmosphere dense, the
ceiling but an inch or two higher than the top of his plume.
Urged repeatedly by the unknown, to be careful of the form of Gilbert,
to grasp him firmly, and by no means loosen his hold, even for an
instant
,
the Grand Master counted twenty paces, when his course was
suddenly ended.
You will enter the room on the right, and await my coming.
The Grand Master extended his hand, and felt the panels of a door. It
opened, and, as he crossed the threshold, closed again.
It was a cell-like apartment, with ceiling, wall and floor of roughly
plastered stone. In the centre, on an old chest, a small lamp was placed.
It was evident, at first sight, that this room, resembling a grave-vault, was
sunken in the bosom of the hill, which ascended precipitously in the
rear of the old house.
Seating himself on a chest, the Grand Master gathered his robes about
himfor the air was chill and dampand, with an ejaculation of wonder,
surveyed the cell.
He had heard of the wealth of the Order, had, indeed, been intrusted
with the control of a great portion of that wealth, but this room displayed
a sight, which exceeded the bounds of all reasonable credibility.
The floor was covered with chests of every shape and form. Some
were open, others closed; here they were thrown together in a confused
pile, and againmassy and iron-boundthey stood apart. The unclosed
chests were stored with gold and silver coins of every mould and form,
from the uncouth Chinese money, to the round and substantial Spanish
doubloon.
On the closed lids were scattered stores of gold and silver plate; and
from the aperture of the half-opened chests, projected cloths, velvets and
laces, of the richest texture and most costly dyes. It seemed as though
every part of the world had sent its tribute to swell the countless wealth
of this narrow cell. Wherever the Grand Master turned, he saw nothing
but gold and silver coin, cloths of every pattern and hue, plate of the
most precious metals, worthy to grace the board of a crowned Despot.
The treasury of the Supreme Lodge! he exclaimed, and, raising a
heavy gobletwith the veil still drooping over his facehe examined
the delicate sculpturing which adorned the narrow stem and capacious
bowl.
Will no one wake me up from this dev'lish dream?
Gilbert unclosed his eyes, and found himself encircled by a scene,
whose unearthly solemnity resembled the vague spirit-pictures of a
dream.
A lamp hung from the dome-like ceiling of a narrow cell, and shed its
faint light before his eyes. The corners of the cell were dark; the light
only served to reveal the brown visage of the Hunter, who, clad in the
coat of green velvet, faced with gold, looked about him, in blank wonder.
Before him was a circular table, on which a book, huge in size, bound
in white parchment, was placed. Its golden clasps glimmered in the light.
Around this table, three figures attired in gowns, with cowls,
resembling
the monkish robes of the Old World, were seated in arm-chairs of
unpainted oak. The figure, seated, directly opposite where the Hunter
stood, rested a small white hand upon this large volume.
It was a long while before the hunter could recover his wandering
senses; he remained standing before the table for the space of a quarter
of an hour, and in this time, not a word was spoken; the three figures
were motionless as stone.
Gilbert advanced a step, determined to touch the extended hand, and
assure himself that it was but a hand of wax or marble, not the hand of a
living man. Yet, as he advanced, the hand was slowly lifted; he fell
back into his original position, crossing his arms, while his features
assumed
an expression of sullen determination.
Gilbert Morgan said a voice, somewhat remarkable for the
softness
and music of its intonationCondemned to death by a power that
you cannot see, about to be stricken by the hand which strikes from the
darkness, a chance of life is offered unto you. Will you accept it?
It was the central figure that spoke, with his white hand resting on the
cover of the book all the while.
The reply of the Hunter was characteristic:
I'll accept most anythin'do most everythin'only get me out of
this wolf-trap.
Not only life, but wealth and power are offered to you. The wealth,
the power of the B. H. A. C. are within your grasp. We have selected
you as the Candidate for Initiation into the Degree of Grand Master of
the Order!
Initiation! echoed Gilbert. Ain't the Grand Master elected by
the Grand Lodge? Who are you, that trap a man in this 'ere waydrag
him from scene to scenepen him up with three unknown men, dressed
in black, in a grave-vault, like this?
Without seeming to take notice of his words, or of the flushed cheek
and indignant glance which accompanied their utterance, the central
figure continued:
There is no such thing as an election, or the power to elect in our
Order. The Honorable Master is designated by the Grand Master; in
his turn the Grand Master is designated by a higher authority, whose
existence
is unknown to the rest of the brethren. That higher authority, is
the Supreme Lodge. Its chief is known, not as Supreme Master, but as
THE
Invisible Head
of the Order. You stand in his presence now.
Grand Master! muttered GilbertThat were a prize indeed, for
one like me! Why, I kin hardly sign my name
You will never need to sign your name. The signet will bear
witness
of your authority. The man who becomes Grand Master, must be
known to the world, only as the dead are known. From this hour, the
name of Gilbert Morgan will only be pronounced as the name of a dead
man. Again I ask you, are you willing to pass from the edge of the
grave which yawns beneath you to the Grand Master's chair?
Like a flood of light, pouring suddenly over a mass of dark clouds, a
multitude of thoughts and memories rushed through the hunter's brain.
He was a rude manrude in speech, bold in deedbut his forehead
indicated
a mind of great and peculiar natural power. Utterly uneducated,
there lurked in the recesses of his naturelike sparks among the ashes
the elements of a wide and grasping ambition. His eye grew brighter
as he heard the words of the figure, who called himself the Invisible; his
clenched hand was pressed upon his forehead.
Grand Master! You don't mean to say, that I, a rough
backwoods-man
o' the Wissahikon, can become that ar'! IIsit on the throne,
and, with a word, manage the Lodges of Canada, the New England
Provinces
,
New York, Pennsilvany, and all the South? Gentlemen, it's not
kind of you, to make fun of a dyin' man
I have said it, and it can be done! I swear it, by the Seven
Watchers
of the Holy Temple!
Show me the way, cried GilbertName the manner o' th'
Initiation
.
Listen, and in silence. I will read to you the preparatory Lesson of
the Grand Master's degree.The Invisible unclosed the Book: with his
white hand laid on the parchment page, inscribed with the characters of
an unknown tongue, he continued: This is the great Book of the
Covenant, written in a tongue, known only to the Elect of the Supreme
Lodge, and intelligible to them, whatsoever their country or language.
This Book was written thousands of years ago, and bears witness of the
Covenant made by the
Great Being
in the Temple of Jerusalem with
the millions of mankind, in the day of Solomon. That Covenantas you
are well aware, having been initiated in the Knightly degreewas in these
words:
As long as the sun shineth by day, and the stars give light by
night, so long will I
, THE
Jehovah
,
listen to the cry of my people the
Poor, redress their wrongs, and scatter the bolts of my vengeance upon the
forehead of the oppressor
.Solomon betrayed the Covenant, and died
under the Ban of the Order, the Curse of his God. Even his countless
wealth, his superhuman intellect, could not save him from the Traitor's
doom!
Yet I must impart to you the preparatory lesson, or the Degree of
High Priest, otherwise termed the Grand Master's degree
`The Brother that would take upon himself the great work of a High
Priest, must cut loose from his heart every tie of friendship or love. He
must have no friend; he must love only the Brotherhood over which he
desires to rule. And in order that an unworthy person may not obtain this
great office, it is decreed that the Candidate for Initiation shall pass
through a certain ordeal, the manner and form of which is left to the will
of the Invisible Head, while its
certain tendency must always be, to sever
the heart, by an irrevocable blow, from all ties of friendship or love, and
devote it forever to the Brotherhood
.
Are you ready for an Ordeal of this kind, however terrible?
I am!
Are you willing that your name shall never be heard on earth again
as the name of a living man?
Yeswilling even for that!
Will you consent to enter at once upon the Ordeal, or trial, which
shall qualify you for the duties of your great office?
I consent! You can't name the thing that I'm afeerd to do!
The Invisible Head closed the volume, and rested his hand again upon
its clasped lid.
He seemed gazing, from the shadow of his cowl, upon the face of the
hunter, while a dead silence fell upon the gloomy chamber. Gilbert, in
9
his green and gold attire, stood before the table, his arms still crossed, his
brown features still compressed by an expression of unshaken resolution.
Madeline!
the word came from the lips of the Invisible.
The Hunter started, but did not utter a word, though the name thrilled
like electric fire through his veins.
At this moment, while you stand before me, she struggles in the
embrace
of herSeducer! You, the Plighted Husband, stand before the
Supreme Lodge of the B. H. A. C., and not one mile from the spot,
Madeline, your Sworn Wife, yields to her Unknown Lover.
Gilbert did not speak, butshaken by an agony that he fiercely
endeavored to masterraised his clenched hands to his forehead.
Can you hear this without a murmur? Can you think of your wife
returning the kisses of a man unknown to her, and on your wedding
night, and not groan? Then have you the heart to become our Minister;
then have you the iron nerve, requisite for a Grand Master!
Go on said Gilbert, as his brown face was deformed by swollen
veinsYou see I don't flinch. I can bear even that! Mad'lin' in the
arms of
her lover
. Yes, even that. If this is your trial, I'm through
it already. Go onthe end of all this?
Let it be spoken in few words. If you are the man we seek, if you
are willing to test your truth, your nerve, by a trial that will bind you to the
Order, and bind the Order to you, at once and forever, then take this knife
WellI see the knifego on!
Take the knife, seek the chamber of your plighted wife, even as she
clings to her loverand
Strike it to his heart? shrieked Gilbert, with a wild burst of
laughterThat is not hard to do.
True; that would, indeed, be an action without difficulty or danger.
Such a deed, the Invisible does not demand from you. You plunge your
steel into the Seducer's heart, and are avenged. What self-denial, what
high purpose is exhibited in this? None! A mere brutal revenge, a
cowardly murder; nothing more. But to punish, not the seducer, but the
partner in his act of shame; to strike, not the man whom you hate, but
the woman whom you love, but who has so terribly wronged you
this demands a soul above all common thoughts, an iron nerve, a heart
unyielding as the grave
Mad'lin'! shrieked Gilbert, as the blood congealed in his veins
Strike Mad'lin'! Strike the girlwho onlyto night
The words fell in broken accents; he could not go on. As though
some spell had suddenly darkened his reason, he stood before the
Invisible
Head, pressing his hands to his forehead, and muttering in gasps
Mad'lin'! Mad'lin'!
And in answer, was heard the musical voice of the Invisible
Even now this girl, whom you so madly love, returns his kisses.
Yes, she suffers him to wind his arms about her neck, and twine his
fingers in her flowing hair. At this moment, her eyes hazy, her bosom
full with passion, she trembles at his touch, and whispers, `Gilbert I could
not love, but thou hast won me to be thinethine forever!'
Mad'lin'! Strike herthe girl who never harmed a livin' thing, and
wished good to all the world. Stab her for the villany of this Devil in
human shape
Go, miserable man, go to her chamber, in the Farm-House, not one
mile from this hall. Look through the window; you can climb the
chesnut tree, and see all that passes in her room. Gosee her pant and
swell as her moist eyes are fixed upon her lover's face; hear her words
of passion, broken by the heavings of her naked bosom, and then refuse
the knife, then say that you will not ascend the Grand Master's throne!
Gilbert's hands fell from his brow, and he tottered toward the table.
The knife, a long and serpentine blade, shapen like the dagger of the
Malay, flashed brightly on the surface of the sombre mahogany.
Which way he said in a whisper, that was scarcely audible
Which waydo I passfrom this place?
He seized the knife, his hand trembling in every nerve.
First, you must swear an Oath, that you will appear in this hall
again before the rising of the sun
Quick! Your Oath
That you will permit no one to see your face, that you will speak to
no one, while absent on this errand
Your Oath! the knife, agitated by the tremor of his hand, clattered
against the table.
Kneel!
With the knife in his hand, he knelt, heard the Oath, and repeated
every syllable of its crowded imprecations. The lamp gave its faint
beams to the scene. On one side of the table, the Invisible, shrouded in
his shapeless dark robe, with a silent and motionless figure on either
hand; before the table, kneeling on the stone floor, the huge form of the
Woodsman, his head bowed, his hand, which grasped the knife, agitated
by an unceasing motion, while his eyes shone with a mad glare, and his
lips, compressed over his set teeth, indicated at once the firmness and the
horror of his resolve.
Brethren, blindfold the Candidate, and lead him forth from this cell to
the house of Peter Dorfner! said the Invisible.
With one movement the silent figures rose, and approached the
kneeling
Hunter, who still clasped the knife, and gazed upon the floor,
muttering
the name of the Orphan Girl.
It might be seen, even by the dim light, that one of these cowled forms
was that of a stout, perchance Herculean man, while the other was spare
and slender.
The stoutest of the twain bound a dark handkerchief tightly around the
Hunter's eyes, and, at the same moment, lifted the cowl which veiled his
features. A red round face, with hair and beard as white as snow, and
bright eyes, almost buried among laughing wrinkles, glowed in the light
with the cowl encircling it, like a dark frame around a warmly colored
picture.
It was the face of Peter Dorfner.
And, at the same instant that his laughing face, with a deadly malice
sneering from its very laughter, was revealed, the other figure raised his
cowl, and disclosed the sharp features of the Unknown, who had led
Gilbert
to this cell.
We will conduct him to the sceneMost Venerableand after he
has passed the ordeal, bring him once more to the hall of the Supreme
Lodge! said Peter Dorfner, in a tone of lugubrious depth, while his eyes
twinkled, and his lips grimaced in sneering laughter.
Even so! Thou hast said it, and it shall be done! added the
slender gentleman, in a tone as guttural, and with the same grimace and
sneer of his partner.
Let it be done! Away! Three hours from this moment, I will
await you! And the Invisible waved his white hand.
The Hunter disappeared in the shadows of the cell, in the charge of
the two disguised men; the sound of a door, quietly closed, was heard,
followed by the echo of foot-tramps, and all was still.
CHAPTER TWELFTH.
THE INVISIBLE HEAD OF THE ORDER.
The
Invisible was alone.
Alone, in the centre of the gloomy place, with the hanging lamp
shining
down over his cowled head and white hand, resting on the massive
volume. Around him, all was gloom; the walls of the place were lost
in the darkness.
The light only served to illumine that solitary figure, seated beside the
table, with the cowl over his face, and the marble-like hand extended
from the black robe. We may not see his face, but a deep sigh breaks
on the silence, and the white hand trembles in every slender finger.
And while the hour passed, this unknown being, shrouded not only in
his cowl and robe, but in the shadow and secresy of the cell, which was
sunken in the bosom of the hill, remained seated by the table, under the
light of the hanging lamp, with his pale hand placed upon the Book.
And all the while, he talked aloud, as though conversing with his own
soul, in the words of audible language.
Fools! They pretend to sneer while they bind the Initiate's eyes,
and laugh in scorn as they lead him to his work. They affect to despise
this Organization, which they think is known to them in all its
complications
of Mystery and Power! And all the while, the humblest Initiate
of the humblest Lodge, is not more the dupe of the Master of that Lodge,
than Peter Dorfner and his friend are mine. Yet, they sneer and
grimace, ha, ha! They fancy that they share my power, and partake
with me, in a perfect knowledge of the incredible Machinery of the
Order. They, indeed! it is a pitiable delusion. Both stained with
cowardly crimes, both urging the Woodsman to this deed, because the
life
of Madeline may be their
death
, while I, in the rough granite of that
rude Hunter's soul, already can trace the outlines of a Man of Genius.
In my hands, he will control the Order on this Continent; in my
hands he will go forth to his great work, prepared for every extremity, by
this night's trial
, which will cut him off forever from all sympathy or
fellowship with Man.
And yet they dreamthose creatures of an hour, who have no
thought beyond the gratification of an appetite, or the gorging of an
insatiate
avaricethat
the Order
is but a cunning trick, invented
yesterday
,
to cheat and bewilder baser men than themselves!
That Order has flourished for thousands of years, its very name
unknown
to history, while its symbolsthe Altar, the Ark, the Urnhave
been stolen by all forms of religion, and adapted to the childish
mummeries
of all shapes of Secret Organization.
Farfar back into the Night of Ages, we can trace the Order. It
arose in the dawn of the World, when Man, putting on the name of Priest
or King, first began to crush his Brother. Back, farther than the era of
Babel's Tower, back even farther than the Deluge, even into those dim
ages, whose memory is now called a fable, we may surely trace the
Great Secret Order.
At first, it was, in a word, the expression of Natural Religionwhich
had been lost among Altars and Thronesby the multitude of Mankind,
in the forms and with the solemnities of symbolic worship. A symbol
was the earliest form of an Idea, and therefore, the symbols of
the Order
are few, distinct and natural. They address themselves alike to the
civilized man and the savage who is only one grade above the brute.
They have been received alike by the Egyptian among his pyramids, by
the polished Grecian under the clear skies and by the waveless seas of his
beloved clime, by the warlike and practical Roman, the half-naked Briton
in his Druid rites, and the Hindoo, entangled among the mazes of
castes
,
and ridden to the dust by a ferocious Religion.
All ages, all nations have known this
Order
. Moulded anew by the
intellect of Moses, it appeared in the elaborate ceremonial of the Jewish
Religion; to his People of a later day, in the apparently unintelligible
dreams of the Cabalists. The Greek beheld it in the mysteries called
Eleusinian; its rites were observed in the camp of the Romans; it
became manifested to Europe in the Middle Ages, under the form of
Chivalry, and now, in Europe, in the year 1774, it is called
Masonry
; a
ridiculous Fable of Solomon and Hiram takes the place of the Great
Truths of the Order; and its simplicity of form and serene grandeur of
ceremonial, are lost in a maze of childish observances.
Shall I not revive the Order, and bid it live again in a stronger and
bolder life than ever? For Good or for Evil?
Behold the Eternal Wisdom manifested in its laws and ritual! This
Grand Master, who now awaits his doom in the next chamber, did not
dream, one hour ago, that there was such a Power in the world as the
Supreme Lodge. Yet, at his Initiation, he had sworn fealty to that
Lodge; he had bound himself to recognise it, when it appeared in a
certain form, and by a minutely described symbol, and to-night he
beholds
the form and the symbol for the first time. At first, he hesitates;
but, bewildered by
the conception of a secret and
incomprehensible
Power
,
beyond and above him
, he yields like a slave to the master's rod.
And this band of Pirates and Robbersnot only the Pirates of the sea,
but of the counting-house; not merely the Robbers of the highway, but of
the desk and counterbecome subject to my control. I hold their
immense
organization in the palm of my hand.
The Invisible stretched forth his white hand, and the light revealed his
eyes, dilating with inexplicable emotion.
Shall it be for Good? his voice broke in musical cadence upon the
breathless stillness of the cellor for Evil?
His head drooped; once more his cheeks, unnaturally pale, rested
within
his hands, while his eyes, almost shadowed by his hair, which fell over
his projecting forehead, shone with a fixed and dazzling light.
In this posture, without a word or gesture, to indicate that there was
life or thought in him, he remained for the space of an hour.
No human hand may dare to picture the dark wilderness of his thoughts.
CHAPTER THIRTEENTH.
THE ANCIENT COIN.
Madeline
!
The moon gleams through the narrow window, whose white curtains
are turned aside from the small panes, framed in lead, and shining over
the dark coverlet of the bed, discloses the snowy form reposing in
its centre.
It is by no means a spacious room, nor are the walls concealed by rich
purple tapestry, nor do the creations of the painter's soul glow in the
moonlight, from frames profuse in gilding and decked with elaborate
carvings
.
The floor is bare; the walls covered with panels of dark oak; two
windows give light to the narrow apartment, one looking to the west and
the other to the south. Between these windows, in the corner, stands a
small bed; two or three quaint chairs, and a walnut dressing-bureau,
surmounted
by an oval mirror, complete the scanty furniture of the room.
And it is a very pleasant thing to see the moonlight gushing over the
dark coverlet from the southern window. While all is dreary winter,
white snow-drifts, and leafless woods, and cloudless sky without; while,
from the room below, echo the sounds of the midnight carouse, here,
in the Maiden's bed-chamber, all is silent, and the only light that comes
to bless her slumbering form, is the clear moonshine, gushing through the
narrow window-pane.
She rests upon the bed, her form enveloped in the folds of a white
garment
,
which, covering her arms with its loose sleeves, and her head with
something like a hood or cowl, suffers her clasped hands, and face with
the brown hair twining round its warm cheeks, to be visible. But the
moonlight comes lovingly to bless her slumbering form, and in its pale
glow, she seems not a living woman, but resembles the form of a dead
Nun, laid upon her sinless couch, with every limb and feature composed
in the sleep of death.
The shadows and the moonbeams struggle for the mastery, in the dim
and narrow room; now the light glares on the mirror and widens upon the
bed. The tread of the dancers, the mad music of the revel, echo from
the room beneath, but still she slumbers, her virgin face looking very
pure and altogether loveable, as the white hood and brown tresses contrast
with her dark brows, delicately defined eyelashes, warm lips and
rosy cheeks.
And the clasped hands gently rise and as gently fall, moved by the
regular pulsations of her virgin breast.
As she slumbers, her lips move, and the silence is broken by an
incoherent
ejaculation.
It is so beautiful! * * * And thou art indeed the Lord of these
valleys* * * this gloomy hall where we stand, looking forth upon the
field and forest, the lake and river, smiling in the summer sun, is thine!
Strange dream, that speaks altogether of lordly halls, and magnificent
hills and valleys, with no shadow to dim the sunshine, no cloud to darken
the brightness of the Future
Madeline!
The rays of a lamp fell softly over the face of the sleeping girl, and a
countenance, almost deformed by the struggle of contending passions,
looked in upon her slumber.
It was the young stranger, attired in the gray surtout, with curls of
brown hair clustering around his white forehead. Lamp in hand, he had
crossed the threshold with the stealthy footstep of a man conscious of a
Guilty Thought; he had closed and bolted the door, drawn the curtains
over the southern window, and now stood by the couch,alone with his
sleeping victim.
Madeline!
It was spoken in a whisper deepened by passion, but the orphan girl,
wrapped in her dreams, did not hear the voice that uttered her name.
Turning in her slumber, she rested her cheek upon her right arm, and
her face was beneath the gaze of the intruder. Like a slumbering nun in
her white garment and hood, she lay before him, a soft flush stealing over
her clear brown cheek, her eyelids moving gently as their fringes shone
with moisture, her lips parting until the ivory teeth shone through their
glowing red.
He laid his hand upon her arm, and there was a sad look of determined
passion on his handsome face, as he heard the sleeper murmur his name
in her dreams.
With his hand grasping her arm, the enticing loveliness of her face
glowing in the light, he turned his gaze away, and his eye wandered to
the bolted door. It was yet time to relent; he might cross that threshold
in a moment, and the sleeping girl would be saved.
Ah, that some good Angel, whose solemn care it is to watch over the
sleep of child-like maidenhood, had warned him back; and in that moment
when he paused in trembling suspense, even beside the bed, had guided
his footsteps from the room, and from the home of the Orphan Girl!
But no! The world would laugh when it heard the storyeven
Jacopo would jeer! She loves me, and is already mine; for even in her
dreams she speaks my name!
In silence he surveyed the sleeping girl, as the light fell in mild
radiance
over her face.
An hour! only an hour! And yet a great many things may be done
in an hour!
His hand pressed her bared arm; his fingers encountered a stray tress
of her brown hair.
Hah! She wakesshe will utter a shriek as she beholds meall is
lost!
While John stood spell-bound, unable to utter a word, the young girl
started up into a sitting posture, her feet hanging over the side of the bed,
her hands slightly clasped, and resting upon the white folds of her dress.
Her eyes unclosed. John uttered an involuntary cry of terror; for
their light was unnatural and glassy; they did not look into his handsome
face with the impetuous glance of voluptuous impulse, or the moist
tenderness
of powerless passion but glared upon him with the cold stare
of death.
The potion has killed herI am guilty faltered the young man,
unable to turn his glance away from those glaring eyes.
It was with a feeling of unutterable surprise, mingled with a terror that
chilled every vein, and made his heart beat with a sluggish and painful
pulsation, that the Unknown heard the first words which came from the
lips of the Orphan Madeline.
Reginald Lyndulfe! she uttered, in a voice of unnatural intonation.
The face of John expressed the very extremity of apathetic wonder.
My name!
The Maiden, sitting on the edge of the bed, her gently clasped hands
resting on her dress, the light shining full upon her eyes, whispered,
still in that voice, unnatural as her glassy stare
Reginald Lyndulfe! A great lord, the son of a lord, he comes to
this forest home, eager to win a noble victory. With soft words and
gentle smiles, eyes whose glances thrill, and tones whose music maddens,
he comes to the home of the poor Orphan Girl, and comes to win her
from purity and innocence, into pollution and shame. It is a noble deed
for one so noble and fair to look upon! And the poor girl, sitting upon
her virgin couch, her senses wrapped in the delirium of an unknown
poison, speaks these words in the ears of Reginald, Lord of Lyndulfe, and
feels that in a moment she will wake from her dreamonly awake to
forget the teachings of that dreamonly awake to be more completely in
her Seducer's power!
The young man stood beside the bed, the light in his hand, but without
speech or motion. The ruddy hue of health had passed from his face;
his dark blue eyes grew large and wild; an idiotic smile agitated his
nether lip.
He could not speak; he could not find in his heart the word which
was to answer these incredible words of the Somnambulist, nor had he
the physical power to frame an audible sound.
Yes, Reginald she said, her large eyes yet veiled by that deathly
glassinessit is true. In this strange sleep I know you, know your
real name, and know your secret purposes. It is also true, that in a
moment I will awake from this dreamwonder to find you here, in my
chamber,listen to your words, and yield to their deceit.
Not one line of her features moved; not a tremor of the expanded lid,
nor a smile of the set lips, gave to the Somnambulist the appearance of
life. She looked like a beautiful image of Death, freshly gathered from
the coffin; and yet her beauty was more terrible to behold than the most
loathsome skull or skeleton of the charnel-house.
Spell-bound, unable to advance or recede, John stood by the bed, the
arm which extended the lamp, stiff and rigid as an arm of iron. He felt
the cold damps upon his forehead; he could not look to the right or the
left; the glassy eyes of Madeline enchained him, and held him
motionless
and dumb.
The wind howled dismally without; he heard it, and fancied it was
some strange funeral knell, tolling from an unearthly bell, rung by demon
hands.
Even as the grotesque conceit flashed over his bewildered brain, there
came, crowding together, a mass of incoherent thoughts:
The drug has the influence of some devil's spell * * * It has destroyed
her reason * * * It is not her voice which I hear, but the voice of a spirit
* * * So pale, so beautiful, so like a dead Maiden half-restored to life!
Thoughts like these crowded over his brain, but he could not speak a
word.
She rose from her bed. With a footstep that seemed not to touch the
floor, but to glide over it, like the footstep of a spiritual thing, she passed
the form of the young man, her hands extended, and her glassy eyes fixed
on the vacant air.
Hereon this very spot where now I standmy Mother stood!
He heard the voice, but could not turn and look upon her. It seemed
as though the same spell which wrapped her senses in this delirium,
filled his veins with ice.
Here she stood, and begged for mercy! `Spare me!if not for the
sake of God, if not for the sake of mercy, for the sake of my unborn
child!' And yet they killed her
Her voice, hollow and unnatural as it was, thrilled with a more
ghost-like
accent, as she said these words:
And yet they killed her! Upon this floor, ere the first cry of her
babe had melted on her ears, ere she had seen the face of that new-born
child, they murdered her, in her very anguish and travail!Mother, your
robes are very white, but there is blood upon their whiteness. Mother,
your face is very fair, but there is the stain of blood upon it, too;blood
on the brow and lip, blood everywhere!
Still, with the light shining over the untenanted bed, the young man
stood there, conscious that the Orphan Girl was near him, but unable to
turn and gaze upon her deathly eyes, although her voice penetrated his
very blood.
In a moment, Mother he heard her voice, as, in that slow,
measured
tone, she spokeyour daughter will kneel upon this very spot,
and plead, not for her life, but for her honor. Plead, not with her
Murderer
,
but with her Seducer. And, like you, Mother, she will pray to an
ear that is brass, a heart that is stone!
The light, shining over the young man's shoulder, lighting up his
graceful form and livid face, also shone upon the white image at his back,
and imparted a faint glow to the pale face and motionless eyeballs.
How shall we explain this scene? This Orphan Girl, with her blood
wrapped in a spectral somnambulism,chilled at its fountains,her
bosom pulseless, her eye glassywhile her soul seems to burst into a
new life,a life at once conscious of the unknown Past and the unknown
Future? Shall we say that all this was the work of the drug
administered
not an hour ago, or the result of witchcraft? Or shall we boldly
imagine that it is not the soul of the Orphan Girl which speaks from her
lips, but that some spiritual Presence from the Other World now fills her
bosom?
Let us look round the walks of our everyday life, and explain the
thousand incidents, which to us appear so dark and inexplicable. Let us
summon to our aid all the old-time wisdom which was called Magic, or
the modern Philosophy, which bears the name of Magnetism. Where
will our explanations end? Where they began. We can only record
the factsor what to us appear like facts;the explanation is reserved
for another and more intelligent age of the world, perchance for another
and brighter state of being.
So, in relation to this incredible scene, now before us, we can only
picture, not explain. Perchance, in future pages of this history, we may
learn the mystery of poor Madeline's life.
Suddenly a sound, as of a corse hurled fiercely from its coffindashed
rudely on the hard floorbroke the stupor which paralyzed the senses
of the stranger. Distinctly he heard that soundlistened with hushed
breath for the voice of Madelineall was still.
The blood flowed freely again; the strange terror which had held him
speechless was gone; he could speak, but could not muster courage to
turn himself, and look upon the maiden.
Ahthis is some devil's wizard-craft! Jacopo! Jacopo! You
shall pay dearly for this!
He turned
At his feet, no longer pale and spectral, but throbbing and panting, as
with the first pulses of a new life, was stretched the Maiden Madeline,
her cheeks glowing redly against the brown curls and the white hood;
her eyelids, half-unclosed, gleaming with the moist radiance which they
could not altogether veil.
She awakes from this wizard spell faltered John, or Reginald, as
you may choose to designate him.
Bending over her, light in hand, he soon forgot all his terrorssoon
forgot the pale, glassy-eyed maiden, in that half-slumbering image of
voluptuous
loveliness.
Madeline! he softly said, while his cheek was flushed, his deep blue
eye, warm and passionate in its lightAwake! It is Iit is your
Lover? He could not speak the word; and as for Husband, it only
rose before him coupled with the sneer of theWorld.
Marry her! Even as she bloomed beneath his gaze, trembling softly
into a warm and passionate life, a sneer curled his lipReginald of
Lyndulfe, and the Peasant Girl of Wissahikon! The world will forgive
thethe outrage, but a marriagenever!
Merrily from the room below came the sounds of the midnight revel;
sad and knell-like the wind howled through the glen of Wissahikon; but
the young man, bending over the half-conscious girl, did not heed the echo
of the dancers' tread, nor mark the roaring of the blast.
His gaze was centred upon her eyes, shining dimly through their half
closed lids; he seemed to gloat upon the freshness of her parted lips, the
glowing warmth of her cheeks.
The bosom which, only a moment past, had rested beneath the white
robe, like a dead bosom in its shroud, now began to rise and swell. She
suddenly stretched forth her armswith eyes wide open, glared wildly
about herstarted to her feet, and shrunk away from the Stranger, as
though his very gaze filled her with indefinable anguish.
You herein my chamberat this lone hour!
She faltered the words, and, joining her hands, stood in her white robe
before this unknown man, her hair coursing freely over her neck and
shoulders.
Madeline, you do not love me, he slowly uttered, his voice low and
distinct, his gaze centred upon her face.
Ahit is some dream. It cannot be. Youyou would notcould
not be so base! To pass the threshold of my chamber at the dead hour
of nightto whisper words of love to a poor forest girl, whose faith is
plighted to another. Ahit is not your voice that I hear.
Without removing his gaze, the young man raised his clasped hands,
and, in a voice that was almost hallowed by the deep reverence which
was mingled with its passion, he continued:
Madeline, will you listen to me? Hear me, before you reject my
suit with scorn. Do not condemn me unheard. Oh, when I stand thus
before you, and feel that we are indeed alone with each other, shut out
from all the world, and think how often I have longed, prayed for this
moment, I could kneel at your feet and thank
He covered his face with his hands. Did he fear to complete the
sentence
?was
he afraid to take the name of God upon his lips?
Madeline, will you listen to me? he cried, starting forward, his
hands outstretched, his voice broken by emotion. She could see his chest
heave and swell beneath the coarse garb that covered it; and his manly
face, flushed by passion, and lighted by earnest eyes, seemed to impress
her with an emotion as wild and singular as his own.
John she muttered, sinking into a chair beside the bed, as though
her strength had failed herYou know that I am the plighted Wife of
Gilbert Morgan. When last we met, I told you the story of my life.
Departleave meleave meI cannot
Her words were incoherent, her accents tremulous and broken. As the
blushes warmed over her brown cheek, she absently tossed the tresses of
her hair aside from her face, and cast her eyesshining with moisture
to the floor.
You cannot love him! cried the young manThat is it, Madeline.
Nay, do not attempt a denial. Your own heart confirms my words.
Madeline raised her eyesher face was very pale, her voice earnest
though tremulous as she spoke:
Only a month ago, beneath the withered chesnut tree that stands near
the water-side, I first beheld you, first listened to your voice. That hour
brought woe and madness to me! Before I saw you, my life was calm
thoughtlessbut it was happy. An humble peasant girl, I had been
reared in these solitudes; cherished beneath the roof which now shelters
us; my only adviser, a rude Indian man, who, but an hour ago, warned
me to fear you, John; aye, to dread you as the Manitto of Evil. There
was another frienda man, now aged, who dwells in the Monastery up
the stream, and who, from the hour of earliest childhood, unclosed to my
eyes the pages of the Bible, the knowledge of the world's past history.
It was Father Luke, of the Wissahikon Monastery, who taught the
friendless
Orphan Girl the speech of the great world, and the lessons of that
holy Religion which says to all of us, even to the poorest and the
humblest
`There
is a God, and he is our Father. There is another World,
a better and a brighter world, and it shall be our Home, when our bones
are dust.'
She paused, her pale cheek glowing into sudden life, her eyes
gleaming
,
and a look of almost hallowed purity trembling over the lineaments
of her face.
And Father Luke has warned me, John, she said, warned me to
fear you as I would fear the Enemy of Mankind!
Madeline, it is true that I have only known your name for a brief
month. It is true that your love dawned suddenly upon my soul. But
since the hour when I first saw you, I have not been the master of my
own fate. For love of you, Madeline, I would sacrifice all that is dear
to me in the world; in your presence alone I exist; away from your side,
my life is darkOh, darka dreary waste, without a flower; a gloomy
night withont a star! Listen to me, Madelineinstead of being as I am,
but the poor clerk of a wealthy Merchant, were I the titled heir of some
princely estate, I would fling title and lands at your feet, and be proud to
call the humble girl of Wissahikon my bride.
Seated on the chair beside the bed, her flushed cheek relieved by the
brown hair, which swept freely from the folds of the white hood, over
her shoulders, Madeline looked up into the face of her lover, with a
sensation
of peculiar character. It was not love, it was not fear. He stood
some paces from her side, in the centre of the floor, the light which he
held disclosing his manly face encircled by curls of waving brown hair,
his muscular and agile form enveloped in the suit of coarse cloth, which,
buttoned to the throat, relieved his countenance, and displayed the bold
outline of his chest, the sinewy proportions of his arms.
It may not be, she said, in a voice almost inaudibleOur paths in
this world lie apart. I am the plighted Wife of another. Youyou
are unknown to me. Your very name
She cast her eyes on the floor; brighter and deeper the blushes glowed
over her cheek.
John placed the lamp upon a small table of unpainted pine, which stood
near the bed. Then, seating himself upon the edge of that couch, he took
the hand which she had not the power to withdraw. Her eyes were
downcast, but he could feel the hand which he clasped grow cold as ice,
and the tremulous motion of her white robe marked the throbbing of her
bosom.
Madeline he said, in a voice which, low and faltering in its
accents
,
at once enchained the heart of the poor girlI have a few words
to say to you. You will listen to melisten in silence and in patience;
for when those words are said, I will leave you for ever.
She did not answer; with her eyes downcast, and her bosom swelling
with an emotion that was denied the blessing of speech, she felt the hand
of this unknown man pressing her own, and could not withdraw her hand
from his grasp.
You have read of other lands, Madeline. Have you not, in some old
book of romance, read a story something like this?Once, in a wild
forest, dwelt a beautiful girl, who did not know that she was beautiful,
though the stream told it to her, as her face was reflected in its clear
waves; and the wild rose which bloomed in her path, seemed pale and
withered, when compared with the warm hue of her cheek, the moist
ripeness of her lips. It was in England, Madeline, in some shadowy
valley of a Yorkshire forest, that this orphan girl dwelt; and many
hundred
years have passed since the dust was laid upon her bosom
As if absorbed in the memories of his narrative, Reginald pressed the
hand which trembled in his grasp, and toyed absently with her
flowing
hair.
One day, as, bending over the waves, she saw her face smiling upon
her, in all its youth, hallowed by the innocence of a stainless heart, there
came suddenly to her side, an unknown man, dressed in the garb of a
peasant. At once the forest girl loved him, aye, as though some spell
had won her heart, she could not look into his face without emotion, nor
hear his voice without trembling. She loved him, from the very moment
when, gazing in the stream, she saw his face reflected beside her own.
Loved him with a love that was not without a strange and indefinable fear.
Madeline shuddered. Something there was in the story of Reginald
that penetrated her heart with an indefinable agitation.
And yet he was unknown to her. She was even ignorant of his
name.
The young girl raised her eyes, and for an instant glanced upon her
lover's handsome face. Again an involuntary shudder shook her form.
For him, Madeline, this unknown man, she forsook her wild-wood
valley; she followed his fate into the great world. She forsook, for him,
those dear old woods, in whose tranquil solitudes her form had ripened
into beauty; forsook the calm waters which had reflected her virgin
face; forsook all the peace and quiet of her lonely life, and went forth,
with the unknown stranger, into the unknown world.
Madeline's head drooped slowly on her bosom; Reginald could not
read the expression of her face, nor mark her tears, but he heard her
gasping breath, he felt that gently tremulous hand.
They wandered forth together whispered Madeline.
Yes, unblessed by priestly rites; they went on their way, hand
linked in hand, and hearts hallowed in the bond of a stainless love. One
day, Madeline, just as the sun was setting, they stood together on the
summit of a hill, the dusk woods stretching toward the west, while in the
east, centred on the wide sweep of a grassy lawn, arose an ancient castle,
with the banners of a lordly race floating from its loftiest tower, and
strains of music, rich, deep, festival music, gushing from its vine-clad
casements. Around that noble hall, Madeline, invested as it was with all
the outward indications of rank and wealth, bands of marriage guests were
scattered, their gay costumes glittering from the verdure of the lawn.
They awaited the return of the lord of this fair domain. In some far
land, he had taken to himself a bride. Whether rich or poor, young or
old, they knew not; but word had been received that he would return to
his castle, at the hour of sunset, with this unknown wife on his arm.
The story seemed to absorb the very soul of the Orphan Girl. Her
bosom fluttering, her face averted, she surrendered her hand, her arm, to
the grasp of Reginald, and awaited in undisguised suspense the conclusion
of the old-time Legend.
The peasant girl, standing on the hill-topher rudely clad lover by
her side, beheld this scene, as the soft warmth of the summer evening
invested her face with new loveliness.
`It is indeed beautiful!' she said, her eyes enchained by the scene
which stretched beneath her feet`Hark! how the music, softened by
distance, comes gently over the lawn!'
Her lover did not answer her. His face, not altogether hideous or
wrinkled, you may be sure, although his rough garb indicated a life of
poverty and want,his face, I say, was shadowed by an emotion which
the peasant girl could not comprehend. There was a sad look upon his
brow, but around his lips, a smile hung trembling;it was as though joy
and sorrow contended for the mastery on the lines of his countenance.
He did not speak to her
He did not speak to her echoed Madeline, without seeming
conscious
of the words.
No, Madeline; but led her gently down the hill-side. Through the
lofty gates which stood by the roadside, they went together, she
trembling
nearer to him, afraid, in her peasant garb, of all this music and
splendor. He took her silently by the hand, and as she clung closer to
his side, they passed over the lawn, and through the marriage guests, in
their glittering costumes, and up the great steps of the ancient castle,
where a Priest, in the robes of his solemn office, awaited the coming of
the young Lord and his Bride.
`Let us depart,' she faltered`This is no place for us. We are but
poor and humble; these great people, so richly arrayed, look with scorn
upon our mean attire.'
And she buried her head upon his breast, clinging to his arms for
support, as her long hair waved over his shoulders.
`Look up,' cried her lover, speaking the name of his Peasant Bride,
`and behold our home!'
Need I pursue the story, Madeline? Need I tell to you the wonder
and the joy which covered the face of the Peasant Girl with new beauty,
as she heard her unknown Lover addressed by his Lordly title, and felt
her footstep press the threshold of her princely home?
His voice deepened by emotion, his hand entwined about her neck, her
cheek drooping nearer to his own, his eyes devoured the warm loveliness
of her face, which seemed to ripen into a more luxuriant beauty beneath
his gaze. She trembled at his touch; her downcast eyes were filled with
tears.
It is a beautiful dream she faltered.
No dream, Madeline, no dream! It is truth, all truth.
Truth! She lifted her gaze, and beheld his earnest faceWhat
mean you?
Pardon the deception, Madeline. I said that this maiden lived in a
valley of England, in the ages long since past. She does dwell in a
beautiful valley; her own form the incarnation of all that is beautiful in
cloudless skies, or unruffled waves, or the deep silent night, when the blue
heaven is set with countless stars. It is the valley of the Wissahikon;
and here, at her feet, behold her lover in his rough peasant garb!
He sunk beside her, clasping her hands within his own.
No peasant, but the heir of a lordly line. Yes, Madeline, Reginald,
Lord of Lyndulfe, asks your love, and beseeches the Orphan Girl of
Wissahikon to become his bride.
Reginald of Lyndulfe! murmured Madeline, and her eyes, even amid
their tears, assumed the glassy appearance which had veiled their
brightness
but a few moments before. I have heard that name
With her hands upon her forehead, she seemed absorbed in some
painful
memory. Meanwhile, Reginald, clutching her robe with a tremulous
grasppassion in his flashing eyes, his breast heaving violently, his
parted lips and brow deformed by swollen veinslooked up into her
half-veiled face, as he whispered once more the frenzied request.
Be mine, Madeline! Be minerankpower his voice
was broken, his words incoherent.
No answer came from the lips of the forest girl. While her hands
veiled her eyes, her cheek became death-like and crimson by turns, and
the folds of her robe, or garment, call it as you will, were violently
agitated
by the impetuous swelling of her bosom.
It was the decisive moment of her fate. She could not speak a word
in answer; but, as if enveloped by the frenzies of a dream, she felt his
arms encircle her waist, and could not resist their pressure. She felt his
burning kiss upon her lip, and could not turn her face away. His hand
toyed with the loose tresses of her hairhis gloating eye surveyed the
half-revealed whiteness of her bosom; she trembled in his embrace, and,
unable to move, sank on his encircling arm, her eyes swimming in the
light of powerless passion.
Reginald she faltered, as though some memory had flashed upon
her, like a lightning spark from a midnight cloudOn this very spot
eighteen years agoMy Motherpleaded for her lifedo notdo not
destroy the honor of her child!
The kiss of the lover drowned the maiden's earnest words.
The sound of the dance, the echo of song had died away. All was
silent in the room belowa deathly stillness reigned throughout the
farm-house
.
There was no sudden blast of wind, howling through the gorge
of Wissahikon, to break the midnight quiet of the scene. No voice was
10
heard to warn the Seducer back in his career of treachery; in his arms,
blushing and powerless, the maiden hung, her lips pressed again and
again by his guilty kiss.
But, from the withered chesnut tree, whose leafless branches touched
the panes of the western window, a face distorted by agony more terrible
than death, was gazing on the Maiden's peril with glaring eyes.
Mad'lin'! exclaimed a rough voice,but it did not reach the ears
of the girl, nor excite for an instant the attention of Reginald
Lyndulfe
And on the outer side of the bolted door, a crouching figure bent in the
darkness, his ear laid against the panels, as the words of the Tempter
broke the deathly stillness.
She yields! muttered the tremulous voice of an aged manIn a
moment, all is lostAh! The fiend has mocked me!
And while the figure of Gilbert, revealed by the cold moonlight, was
seen upon the limbs of the chesnut tree, his face against the window
frame, the knife shining in his handwhile the old man, enshrouded in
the darkness of the passage, listened for the fatal word which was to seal
the maiden's shame, Reginald of Lyndulfe, pressing his lips to the
burning
cheek of Madeline, gathered her closer to his breast.
Come! Fly with me to nightthis hourthis moment
Frenzied by his guilty passion, he said these words, and did not feel
that the Lie of his heart was written upon his forehead, darkened by the
swollen veins.
Mercy! I am but a poor weak girlalone in the world
With a last effort, she endeavored to free her lip from his kiss, her
waist from his tightening arm. The effort was vain. Her loosened hair
floated over his shoulders, as his kisses burned her lips.
Gilbert, clinging to the withered limb, beheld the flushed face of
Reginald
,
and laid one hand upon the sash of the narrow window. His face,
pressed against the glass, was hideous with hatred and despair. One blow
of his sturdy arm, and the sash would fall before him; with his right
hand he clutched the knife.
Warm kisses Gilbert muttered through his set teethHah!
There is a gay dress beneath your coarse gray coata spangled dress of
silk and di'monds. By * * *! I'll make it gayer and brighter with
your
The Huntsman, laying one hand upon the sash, grasping the knife with
the other, his eye dilating as it was rivetted by the scene within the
chamber
,
felt the withered limb bend beneath him. With an oath, he
endeavored
to grasp a higher branch of the tree, but the knife fell from his
hand, as the withered limb, with a sudden crash, snapped under his
weight.
He fell; the knife clattered upon a heavy mass of granite at the foot of
the tree. For an instant the Huntsman saw nothing but a vague blank,
heard nothing but the echo of the snapping branch. When he recovered
his consciousness, he found himself hanging by the arms to the lowest
limb of the huge chesnut, his feet dangling near the earth. Above him
shone the window of Madeline's room.
Curses on it! I'm crazy, I believe! To lose my hold at sich a
moment
!
They
are watchin' me, toowatchin' from yonder thicket. But
it does not need their watchin' to make me go forrad
now
.
Releasing his hold, he fell on his feet, picked the knife from the stone,
and, placing it between his teeth, began to ascend the tree. Once, as he
clomb from limb to limb, he turned his head over his shoulder. Through
the clear heavens the moon was shining brightly. The farm-house, the
thicket near, and the distant woods, were darkly contrasted with the
glittering
waste of pure white snow.
They watch me from the thicket! muttered Gilbert, as he sprang
upon a limb, which commanded a view of the interior of Madeline's
chamber. As the stout Huntsman, whose brain was somewhat bewildered
by the events of this crowded night, looked through the window panes,
an oath escaped from his lips.
He saw that chamber by the rays of the lamp, the bed yet bearing the
impress of the maiden's form, the quaint, old-fashioned furniture, the
dressing-bureau, and the door which led into the corridor of the
farm-house
.
But neither Madelinenor her seducer were visible.
From the limbon which Gilbert poised his weight, grasping a branch
above himto the window, was a dangerous leap, but he did not pause to
think. With a desperate bound he reached the window, dashed the sash
before himit hung on hinges and opened like a doorand in an instant
stood in the centre of the chamber, beside the maiden's bed.
All was silent there.
They've gone togethershe has fled with him the features of the
Hunter, distorted by rage, became softened suddenly by a look of rude
but unutterable anguish. Mad'lin'! This is a little too hard to bear. So
good and pure as you was, that an angel couldn't scarcely be a better
thingNowin a few hoursall your goodness gone
He clenched the knife, and gazed wildly round the chamber.
Yer Bible's thar, galand you could do it! Leave the man that 'ud
'a torn his heart into splinters for youBut it's his work, his devil's
tongue
He turned, and, with a cry of surprise mingled with hatred, beheld that
the door leading into the corridor was open.
I'll follow you, my fine feller, and paint yer spangled feathers with
yer blood!
As he rushed to the door, his purposeit was Murderwritten on his
face, a sound that was scarcely audible, so low, and like the echo of a
rustling leaf, arrested his footsteps.
Again he turned, and, near the foot of the bed, beheld the unconscious
form of Madeline. She was stretched upon the floor; her eyes were
closed; her arms lay stiffened by her side. The dress had been torn
from her bosom by a rude grasp; upon those globes, whose veins, like
threads of azure, were traced beneath the transparent skin, the livid print
of a brutal hand was visible.
Gilbert knelt beside her. His face was from the light, which streamed
over the back of his head, glowing upon his chesnut curls. The agony
that convulsed his features was lost in the shadow.
No groan came from his compressed lips; perchance the light of
contending
love and hatred grew deeper and wilder in his eyes, but not a
sound betrayed his agony.
Beautiful gal, with yer brown hair about yer pale face, an' that bosom,
which, as much as I loved you, and as often as you had said you'd
be my wife, I never yit dared to touch, or look uponan' that bosom
bare, with the print of his hand upon it. Beautiful! An Angel fresh
from 'tother world couldn't be purtier; but
The knife which he grasped, rested its shining point upon the floor.
At once the memory of his strange mission came over the hunterhe
trembled like a man who beholds some horrible Apparition rising by his
bed at dead of night.
She don't breathe. It's likely that she's dead already. As it is,
she'll only wake up to misery and shameBy * * *, I think it 'ud
be a blessed thing to kill her!'
The bosom movedvery slightlywith a pulsation as gentle as the
motion of a feather, agitated by a sleeper's breath. And as it fluttered
with that soft motion, Gilbert beheld a faded ribbon, wound about the
neck of the insensible girl. To this ribbon was attached a small coin,
which lay upon her breast, and rose with the almost imperceptible
pulsation
.
The huntsman lifted her head, and took the ribbon from her neck.
In the action his hand encountered her luxuriant tresses, and the strong
man felt the tears start into his eyes. Not for the world, or the wealth of
a thousand worlds, would he have touched that bosom.
It was stainless oncepure as the drifted snownow
Holding the small coin, or medal, toward the light, he endeavored in
vain to decipher the strange figures which were inscribed upon its surface.
The metal was gold; it was very bright, and worn smooth as glass, as by
the pressure of countless hands.
I can't read it, gal, but I'll take it as a memory of you
In silence he wound the ribbon round his neck, and then, with a
quivering
hand, placed the point of the knife upon her bosom.
In the name of the Covenant he gasped, and at the same moment
the girl unclosed her eyes. She beheld that face, convulsed with agony,
wet with tears; she felt the sharp point of the knife.
Behind the hunter, with a stealthy footstep, which he did not hear,
came the bent figure of an old man, whose blue eyes shone with a cold,
icy light, as he beheld the knife resting upon the beautiful bosom of
Madeline.
Gilbert! even in that moment of half-consciousness she knew him.
Nearer stole the old man, his pale face writhing in every nerve.
It ain't no use now, Mad'lin said the Hunter, his face glooming
with a profound despairIt's too late!
His hand was upon the hiltand the blood started, as the point entered
the white breast of Madeline.
A sound of half-suppressed laughter disturbed the silence, and in the
door-way appeared the rotund form and white-bearded face of the jovial
Peter Dorfner.
CHAPTER FOURTEENTH
THE INSCRIPTION ON THE ANCIENT COIN.
For Good or for Evil? muttered the Unknown, whom we can only
call by his own titleThe Invisible Head of the Brotherhood.
His hour of silent thought was over; a slight flush warmed his
features
,
as he glanced around the silent cell. The hanging lamp still cast
its faint rays over the gloom, and lighted up that solitary figure seated by
table, his cheeks buried in his hands.
A footstepone onlyis it the footstep of Gilbert Morgan? Does
he return alone? Has he braved the peril of the Ordeal?
While these thoughts, only half-spoken, occupied the mind of the
Invisible
,
the footstep grew more distincta figure approached from the
darkness
of the cella clanging sound disturbed the stillness of the place.
A knife lay on the table, before the gaze of the Invisible.
At first, he did not notice the wretched man who stood before him, his
muscular form agitated by an involuntary tremor, his gay apparel of green
and gold torn and disordered. Nor did he remark the cadaverous face,
whose livid cheeks only made the wild eyes and restless lips more
painfully
distinct.
His eyes rested upon the knife, as, grasping the hilt, he raised it in the
light.
It is well!
The blade was red; it shone no longer; but, as the Invisible held it in
his grasp, a blood-drop, oozing from the point, fell on the table.
Is it done? he surveyed the horror-stricken features of the
Hunter.
The wretched man made an effort to speak, but without success. The
muscles of his throat writhed convulsively, his lips moved as if agitated
by a spasm, but he could not utter a syllable.
He pointed to the knife, and laid his hand upon his heart. There was
something impressive in his silence; something of fearful eloquence in
his agitated face, and sunburnt hand, pressed forcibly upon his chest.
I need not ask you; the Ordeal was fearful, but you have passed it
like a Man. Yes, like a Brother of the Covenant.
He has, said a voice, speaking from the dark recesses of the cell
I saw him strike the blow.
And I also beheld the knife as it pierced her bosomanother voice
was heard.
Shading his eyes with his hand, the Invisible gazed in the direction
from whence these sounds proceeded, and beheld the rotund form of Peter
Dorfner, with his slender companion by his side.
Retire! he saidand at the proper signal, conduct the late Grand
Master to this cell.
The echo of their footsteps presently died away.
It was with an expression of pity, imbittered by scorn, that the
Invisible
looked into the face of Gilbert Morgan.
And so you buried your knife in her bosom? You loved her, too;
loved her in a rude way, but with all your soul. Did your hand tremble,
as your victim crouched at your feet, and saw the steel flash over her ere
it fell?
Gilbert did not speak. Trembling, pale, his hands hanging motionless
by his side, he looked vacantly into the face of the Invisible.
It seems to me that I can imagine the scene. You found her, with
the kiss of her lover yet warm upon her lip. In her own chamber, with
her attire disordered, and her cheek flushed with passion. There were
bitter words between youfierce reproaches on your part, sullen replies
from her lips. Yet no impulse of love, no touch of compassion, held
you back in your work of murder. She knelt to youa very beautiful
thing it must have beena kneeling girl, with her brown hair floating
over her bare bosom. `Gilbert!' she cried, speaking in the same voice
which not long ago thrilled your heart-strings. But there was no mercy
in your eyeresolved to do the deed, you raised your arm, and mangled
the bosom that heaved before you.
The hunter tottered backward, and, sinking on one knee, suffered his
face to droop toward the floor.
The Invisible raised his hand to his forehead, and was silent for a
moment.
Yet let me ask another question. Was the girl who received her
death at your hands a pure or a dishonored thing?
Bending over the table, he saw the kneeling form rock to and fro, but
received no answer to his question.
AhI perceive the truth of this matter. She was dishonoredyou
could not have plunged your knife into a virgin heart.
Gilbert's face was lifted toward the light, every feature agitated by a
speechless despair. Again his lips moved, but he could not frame a
sound.
Where did you leave the body?
Tottering to his feet, the Hunter advanced one step forward, and flung
his clenched hand upon the table.
Look ye he cried, his voice husky and indistinctIsn't it
enough that I've done your devil's work? Even if you are a born devil,
you might have a little pity for me. You told me to kill herI've done
it. Thar is the knife, and here I am. If you've anythin' more for me
to do, jest say it. Arter this night's work, I don't know the thing that
I'm afeerd to do. Speak outspeak out
Where did you leave the body? repeated the Invisible, waving his
hand with a peculiar motion, as he fixed his eyes upon the huntsman's
face.
As though that waving hand, those eyes, fired with peculiar light, had
been the outward indications of a supernatural power, the Hunter's
features
became suddenly rigid, his eyes fixed and glassy, his form stiff and
motionless.
Like a dead man placed in an erect posture, he stood beside the table,
while the Invisible surveyed his stiffened form and rigid face, with a calm
delight, or rather a look of smiling complacency.
Where did you leave the body?
The lips of the Hunter moved languidly, while every other feature was
rigid as the features of the dead.
In her own room said Gilbert, speaking no longer in his blunt
woodsman's accent, but in a voice that seemed to indicate a man of
education
and refined manners. In her own room, with her bosom covered
with her blood, and her glassy eyes fixed upon the ceiling.
Are you willing to obey me nowobey me in every command,
without
a look or gesture of disobedience?
I am!
The Invisible knocked thrice upon the table with the hilt of the knife,
and ere the sound had died away, the form of the Grand Master, clad in
the glittering robes of his office, advanced from the shadows. His
bronzed features were dimly discernible through the lace veil which
fluttered
from his forehead. As he came near, the Invisible drew the cowl
over his face.
Take the coronet from your brow.
The Grand Master lifted the coronet of golden leaves from his
forehead
,
and with it the slender plume and white veil. His face was
revealed
.
The features were not altogether unhandsome; their regular
outlines, relieved by dark hairpowdered and curled after the fashion of
the timeindicated a proud and sensual nature. But at this moment, the
eyes shone wildly with terror, and the forehead was damp with moisture.
What would you? he exclaimed, in tones by no means calm or firm.
Place the coronet upon the brow of the Grand Master Elect the
white hand of the Invisible pointed toward Gilbert's rigid face.
It was with a look of terror that the deposed Grand Master obeyed.
His terror was not without sufficient cause, for the glassy eyeballs and
fixed features of Gilbert resembled the face of a corse. His hand
trembled
as he wound the golden leaves about the brown hair of the hunter,
and arranged the plume over his forehead, and saw his ghostly face, but
half-concealed by the veil.
The deposed Grand Master turned once more to the cowled figure.
The Robe and again the white hand was stretched toward
Gilbert's
form.
There was a glance of sullen regret, a momentary flashing of the eye
and curling of the lip, as the gorgeously arrayed personage heard this
decided
command.
The Robe the voice of the Invisible was stern and penetrating.
The Grand Master seemed to hesitate, but in an instant stripping the
purple garment, glittering with the dagger, the skull, the vine leaves, and
other emblems, from his shoulders, his form was disclosed, attired in the
costume of a man of the world. A wide-skirted coat, fringed with lace,
silken vest and cambric ruffleshe was altogether an elegant and finished
gentleman.
Place it upon the shoulders of the Grand Master
No slave, crouching under fear of his master's lash, could have obeyed
more readily than the deposed Grand Master, for he inserted Gilbert's
arms in the flowing sleeves, and fastened the garment over his broad chest,
without a word.
Gilbert stood arrayed in the robes of the Grand Master of the B. H. A.
C., his rigid features seenthrough the veilwith a half-distinctness, that
only made them look more unnatural and death-like.
The late Grand Master, with the moisture starting from his forehead,
every line of his face agitated by fear, awaited in sullen silence the
commands
of the Invisible.
To-morrow morning a ship sails from the City, on a voyage to
Canton
.
You will take passage on board of that ship, and he drew
a letter from his monkish gownobey the orders contained in this
paper. You can now retire. Brethren looking toward the form of
Dorfner and his companionI leave this man to your charge.
The deposed Grand Master turned, without a word, and disappeared
in the shadows.
Once more the Invisible was alone with Gilbert Morgan.
Cast your eye into the Hall of the Grand Lodge, said the cowled
FigureWhat do you see and hear?
This command seems like an idle mockery to us. For thick walls and
dreary passages separate this cell from the Hall in which the Grand
Lodge are assembled. Yet the answer of Gilbert, conveyed in the
language
of an educated man, was plain and to the point
The lights are burning fast toward their sockets. The Brothers look
toward the door, and murmur the name of the Grand Master. They
await his coming with feverish suspense. Stay! A Brother rises, and
exclaims`Shall we not close this session of the Grand Lodge, without
the presence of the Grand Master?'
It is well and a smile stole over the face of the InvisibleThe
fools of the world would call this Magic, or, perchance, doubt that it ever
occurred. So, three hundred years, or scarce three hundred years ago, it
was Sorcery on the part of Galileo to say that the earth moved round the
sun. That Sorcery is now become Science. And ere an hundred years,
this
Magic
, which enables me to substitute my will for the will of this
rude man,in a word, to
fill his brain with my soul
, will be no longer
the wisdom of the devil, but the system of an acknowledged Science. So
goes the world!
It was almost demoniac in its scornthe cold smile which agitated the
face of the Invisible.
You will go without delay to the Hall of the Grand Lodge, he said,
fixing his dazzling eyes upon the face of the Hunter, and speak the
words that I will utter to your heart.
Attired in the robes of his office, dazzling from head to foot in the
paraphernalia of the Order, Gilbert turned away, and, with measured
steps, departed into the shadows. Ere a moment was gone, the echo of
his footsteps had ceased to disturb the silence.
The Invisible laid his white hand upon the heavy volume which rested
upon the table, as he pushed the cowl back from his forehead.
They are all here he muttered, as he unclosed the volumea
brave and bloody band, whose deeds extend over the history of two
centuries
.
Some died in their peaceful beds, encircled by weeping
grandchildren
others
on the bloody deck, amid the smoke and flame of
carnage
this
rude fellow on Tyburn tree, and his comrade at the yard-arm
of one of his Majesty's ships-of-war. Here I find traced the crooked
signature of Sir Henry Morganhere, the clerkly hand of the bold
Captain Kiddand next comes the mark of Blackbearda roughly
sketched dagger, beside a skull and cross-bones. A bloody and ferocious
band
Turning over the broad pages, the Invisible continued
The time will come when their deeds will appear but as the idle
fables of tradition. Then the link which bound all these cut-throats and
heroes in one great organization, will be lostforgotten. Grave men
will write histories, and speak of the buccanierthe piratethe
free-booter
as
isolated facts in the red history of piracy and murder. And I
Imay survive to read their
grave
volumes, and smile at their brazen
falsehoods. `
Survive
'it is a fearful word
As the light reveals the face of this unknown personage, who, seated
alone in his oaken chair, thus mutters absently to himself, we may see
the pale features quiver in every line; yes, we may even behold the large
bright eyes, wet with womanish tears.
Survive! It is indeed a horrible word. To live until all that you
have loved is grave-yard dustto live while every good impulse is turned
to evilto walk around among the tombs of those whom you knew
centuries
agoto see their children, nay, the descendants of your own
children, rise every day in your path, and, at the same time, be conscious
that they can never know you, never call you by name, never, never feel
for you a sentiment that is not hatred and loathing.`Survive!' Yes,
until the words `our Lord the King' are displaced by `our Brother, the
Chief of the Republic'and until the `Republic' is crushed beneath the
iron wheels of Despotism and Superstition. There are a great many
things embodied in that word`Survive!'
The Invisible started from the chair, and paced along the floor of the
cell. For the first time it is evident to us that his pale face, whose
tangled
hair waves from beneath the cowl, is supported by a strangely distorted
form. Even through the disguise of the gown, we may discover the
out-lines
of a shapeless hump, rising at the back of his neck, and his face seems
not so much to be supported by a neck, as to rest upon the surface of his
broad chest.
Always to feel the beauty of the Good, and to love it, and yet for ever
condemned to the Necessity of Evil. What hell of priestcraft can rival
a doom like this? Even now I behold a mariner, fixed upon a shapeless
raft, without rudder, oar, or sail, his eye turned toward the light which
shines from the dark shore He may gaze upon the light, stretch forth
his arms as if to grasp it, but every moment the tide is bearing him silently
and surely awayaway, deeper and farther into the blackness and the
night. The fate of the mariner is mine. The raft is beneath my feet,
the light shines faintly from the shorebut every moment the dark wave
of Necessity bears me farther into the blackness of hopeless night. The
light is growing dim and dimmersoon it will go out in blacknessyet
still the wave will bear me on, on, into that Sea of hopeless Evil which
yawns beyond me!
The cowl was thrown aside, and with the cowl, the monkish gown.
Beneath the light stood a deformed hunchback, whose long face, framed
in raven black hair, revealed, in every quivering lineament, a despair too
deep for utterance, too hopeless for tears.
In the personage known as the Invisible, we beheld none other than
the miserable maniac, whom we have beheld before, and heard addressed
by the name of Black David.
Clasping his white hands, as that unutterable despair stamps his face,
he glares upon the darkness with fixed eyeballs, muttering again, and yet
again, the word which has roused him into this preternatural anguish
`Survive.'
In the very midst of this inexplicable despair, his eyes wandered to
the floora bright object glimmered there, near his feet. Without
appearing conscious of the action, he bent down and grasped it, and the
light disclosed a small golden coin or medal, to which a faded ribbon was
attached.
No sooner did the hunchback behold it, and at a glance read the words,
and mark the characters which were inscribed upon this medal, then he
sank on his knees, uttering a cry of joy, which pealed upon the stillness
of the cell. With the gestures of a madman, he clutched the medal
turned first one side, then the other, to the light, and examined it with an
intense scrutiny, that forced his eyeballs from their sockets.
Here, where the hunter stood, I found it. Ah  I will seek him at
once, and force him to reveal to me how it came into his possession. He
started to his feet, made one step from the table, but as suddenly came
back again.
It is the samethe same and lifting the tangled locks, as he gazed
upon the medal, he revealed the livid cross, which was stampedlike the
scar of a wound  upon the fair skin of his forehead.
He examined the bright side of the Medalit bore the figure of a Cross,
with certain numerals inscribed beneathA. D. 159. Then, turning
the medal, he beheld, on the opposite side, an inscription in old English
characters: EolaNovember 12.Lyndulfe.
It may be observed that the figure between the 5 and 6, on the first side
of the medal, was dim and almost illegible. It seemed, as the light shone
over it, to represent either the figure 3 or 8, and thus the inscription either
designated the year 1539 or 1589.
The hunchback held the faded ribbon, which was inserted in an
aperture
near the rim of the medal, and gazed upon the inscription which it
bore on either side, with a delight that might have well been termed
madness.
I will to himhe shall tell me! With these incoherent words, he
turned from the table once again, and disappeared in the shadows of the
cell, only to reappear after the lapse of a moment. When he turned from
the light, his face was flushed with rapture, but, when he again stood
beside the table, a ghastly paleness had fallen upon every feature. The
livid cross on his forehead stood out distinctly on the colorless skin.
Madelinethe hunter has torn it from her breast as a memory of his
love he uttered the words with difficulty. Then came a groan of
horror
,
mingled with anguish.
O, curses, eternal curses upon my iron fate! Madeline at this moment
lies mangled upon the floor of her chamber, orin case she survived the
hunter's blow  the scalpel of Isaac Behme pierces her bosom, and tears
the living heart from its shrine!
As though his blood was chilled, his limbs paralyzed, the deformed
maniac stood motionless, with his hands folded over his breast.
Day is breaking, and it is too late! This girl might have saved me,
not from Death, but from Life; saved me from the unseen hand which
crushes me;she might have spoken unto me the word which will
bring near the hour of my Deathand I,fool, dotard! I have
murdered
her!
Once more his gaze was rivetted to the medal
Many, many yearscenturies of torturesince first it passed from
my handah! It is in vain; I cannot pray. To whom shall I address
a Prayer? At this hour I would barter the gold of a worldI would
exchange intellect and destiny with the vilest serf, only to be able to
believe
,
only to have the power to frame one word of prayer
Strange and incomprehensible words from the lips of the Deformed
Maniac!
He was on his knees, his hands crossed, his head bowedhis lips
moved slowly, but no sound was heard.
The light, streaming above him, glowed upon the flakes of his matted
hair. His face was lost in shadow, but the heavings of his broad chest
betrayed the emotion that thrilled every avenue of his life.
To whom shall I pray? he muttered, after a pauseTo God?
To Christ? To saints or angels?his voice was marked by a horrible
sincerity as he continuedThere is no God to me. No Christ, nor
Saint nor Angel. There is no other world. There is nothing beyond
the grave but vacancy and slumber. All that I can believe, is, that I am
here upon the earth, doomed to live with impulses of good always
struggling
in my heart, and yet always forced to do Evilto crush pure hearts
into hopeless miseryto blight virtue and beautyto taint children with
the leprosy of sin, and wither gray-haired age into a polluted grave. This
is my doomwhat hath prayer to do with me?
Let us suppose for a moment that the reveries of this man are sober
truth. That he has lived for some hundreds of years, with the impulse
of Good always fresh within his heart, and yet the Necessity to do Evil
for ever hurling him into the vortex of crime. That for some incredible
crimesay, the most fearful crime that Man can commithe has been
doomed to live, and live beyond the circle of Almighty compassion.
That the death which he seeks as an unutterable boon is denied him
that the Judgment pronounced by Eternal Power upon his head is
comprised
in this stern decree
Live! There is Good all around you, but you must blight it into
Evil. Live!
Can any thing be more horrible than this?
Once more, let us take it for granted that this deformed hunchback is a
Madman. That it is only a fancya mere dream of frenzythat he has
lived for centuries, and is doomed to live until unborn ages are past.
That it is only a vagary of his distorted reason, which induces him to
believe that for him there is no God, no Christ, no Saint nor Angel.
Can any thing in the Universe be more appalling than this?
To both questions, your first answer, urged from your heart, by feeling
as natural as our love for a Mother, is, simply but earnestlyNo!
Think again. Pause for a moment. What does the Creed of a Church,
the dogma of a sect hold forth?
That the Almighty Father will inflict upon countless millions of his
creatures, the irrevocable Judgment of an Eternity of Existence, and an
Eternity of Crime
.
Which is the most repulsive, my friend? The tradition embodied in
this crude history, or the Belief solemnly taught in the dogma of a
Church?
Behold said a Reverend man, one Sabbath-day, as he surveyed
the thousand faces, mellowed by the mild beams of an afternoon sun
Behold the sands that stretch beside the waves of the Ocean. Can you
number those sands? Once every thousand years, a little bird comes to
the shore, and bears away in its beak a single grain of sand. Compute
the years which will be passed ere the bird has borne away the sands on
the shoreone grain in a thousand yearsand you will have some idea
of the duration of that Eternity of woe which awaits the Damned.
This, it will be admitted, is a somewhat fearful figurea somewhat
fearful kind of Religion. While the little bird bears the sands from the
shore,one grain, only one, in a thousand yearscountless millions of
God's creatures are growing older in deathless torture, older in infernal
knowledge, in blasphemous Crime. Can you imagine the depravity
of a Soul that has existed for only a thousand years in Misery and
Crime?
Then do not too hastily deride this Legend of olden tradition, which
asserts, that once, in the history of the world, a Man, created by the
all-paternal
God, was condemned to live for ever on this earth; to live at
least while Three Centuries went down to Night; and, feeling all the
while the beauty of the Good and the Pure, was impelled by an
involuntary
Necessity to the Evil and Corrupt.
To our Legend once more.
The Invisible, kneeling on the floor, raised his forehead, darkened by
the livid cross, to the light. His eyes, dazzling at all times, as with the
light of a wrecked mind, were raised to the dusky ceiling. Over his chest
were clasped his pale hands, and a slight air tossed his flaky locks gently
to and fro. Never for an instant did he suffer the medal to escape from
his grasp.
He was but a miserable wretch, with a body whose deformity was as
grotesque as it was hideous, and yet his face, marked with ineffaceable
lines, his eyes shining with intense light, his broad forehead, marked by
the livid Cross, indicate an intellect of remarkable power.
Around him brooded the shadows and the silence of the cell, sunken
deep within the hill-side of Wissahikon. He was shut out from the
world, alone with the incredible reality of his fate.
Could I but believe that voice, whose musical accents so
singularly
contrasted with the hideousness of his formCould I but believe
in a Father!
There were tears upon his cheeks.
For when he tried to raise his thoughts to God, all was darkness and
chaos. A leaden sky seemed to stretch its hopeless wall between him
and the Great Father of mankind.
With a curse, he started to his feet, and, wrapping the mantle about
him, prepared to hasten from the place.
To-night has been to me by no means an idle flight of hours and
minutes. Much workmuch Evil! Had I but known that Madeline
bore this, the medal glittered before his eyeThis upon her bosom,
all would have been well. A quiet gravea pleasant reposepeace,
peace, after the long night, the ceaseless storm of three centuries. But it
may not be too late, even nowfirst to the farm-house, and then to the
cell of Isaac Behme
The yearning desire that was written upon the face of the Deformed,
no pencil nor pen can depictit was as though a preternatural Soul had
suddenly filled his distorted frame, and lighted his eyes with the fire of
an immortal existence.
The crime which three centures has not effaced, may be blotted out,
before the rising of the sun!
CHAPTER FIFTEENTH.
THE COMING OF THE DELIVERER.
He will come!
muttered the Priest of Wissahikon
At the third
hour after midnight the Deliverer will come!
The old man sat in the oaken chair, his hands laid on his knees, as he
swayed to and fro with a restless motion.
It was in the circular chamber, panelled with oaken wainscot, and
rendered almost cheerful by the wood-fire which blazed upon the hearth.
In the centre stands the white altar, on which the candles are placed,
their light, struggling through the gloom, shining upon the high forehead
of the solitary watcher, as, with his hands laid on his knees, he sways
slowly to and fro, the silver cross on his heart, glittering like a star.
Thus, alone, for hours he has watched, his eyes of an azure so deep
and serene, fixed upon the cross of Iron which rises in the gloom beyond
the altar. And all the while, as the old man kept his watch, the fire
crackled merrily upon the hearth, and the same light which revealed his
pale enthusiastic face, also shone upon the flagon of silver, the wreath of
laurel, the Bible with antique clasps, resting between the candles, on the
surface of the altar.
Without, all is drear and cold. The Block-house rises darkly amid
the pines, with the moonbeams shining over the frozen snow. Its gates
are flung wide openthe old man awaits his long-expected guest.
He will come; at the third hour after midnight, the Deliverer will
come!
These words acquire a singular interest from the tone and look which
accompany their utterance.
Harkthe door opensthe young man with the bronzed face and deep
dark eyes appearsadvances to his father's side.
It is Paul, with the kiss of the Wizard's child yet warm upon his lip,
her words of delirious passion yet echoing in his ears.
Scarce an hour has passed since he left his Father's sidea momentous
hour to him  an hour that in future years shall come, clad in impressive
memories, to the Dreamer's soul.
As Paul beheld the pale face of his father, with the high forehead and
dreamy eyes, all memory of the Wizard's daughter rushed suddenly
from him.
Shall that enticing memory ever return to him again?
Father whispers the young manMay it not be a vain fancy,
after allthis Hope that the Deliverer will come ere the rising of
the sun?
You can see the old man turn suddenly roundhis eye blazes as he
grasps his son by the wrist.
Seventeen years ago, I left my father-land, and became an exile and
an outcast. Seventeen years ago, I forsook the towers of my race, that
even now darken over the bosom of the Rhine. I, whose name was
ennobled
by the ancestral glories of thirteen centuries, turned my back at
once on pomp, power,all that is worshipped by the herd of mankind.
In my native land, they have believed me dead for many yearsthe
castle, the broad domains that, by the world's law, are yours, my son,
now own another's ruleand here we are, side by side, in this rude
temple of the Wissahikon. Why is this, my son?Speak, Paul, and
answer me, why do we dwell together, the father and his children, in this
wild forest of a strange land?
The son veiled his eyes with his clasped hands: the emotion of his
father's look thrilled him to the soul.
I will tell you why! Seventeen years ago, as I bent over the body
of my dead wife, even in the death-vault of our castle, on the Rhine, the
Voice of God spake to my soulbade me resign all the world and its
toysbade me take my children, and go forth to a strange land!
And there await the Fulfilment of Prophecy! whispered Paul,
raising his head from his clasped hands.
For seventeen years I have buried my soul in the pages of that
book
I have shared your studies, father! Reared afar from the toil and the
vanity of worldly life, I have made my home with you in this hermitage.
Together we have weptprayed  watched over the pages of
Revelation
!
You have become part of my soul, said the Priest of Wissahikon,
in a softened voice, as he laid his withered hand upon the white forehead
of his son: you might have been noble in your native land; yes, your
sword might have carved for you a gory renown from the corses of dead
men, butchered in battle: or the triumphs of poetry and art might have
clothed your brow in laurel, and yet you have chosen your lot with me;
with me, devoted life and soul to the perusal of God's solemn book!
The dark eye of the son began to burn with the same wild light that
blazed over his father's face.
And our studies, our long and painful search into the awful world,
which the Bible opens to our view, has ended in a knowledge of these
great truths
The Old World is sunk in all manner of crime, as was the
Ante-Diluvian World;
the New World
is given to man as a refuge,
even as the Ark was given to Noah and his children
.
The New World is the last altar of human freedom left on the surface
of the Globe. Never shall the footsteps of Kings pollute its soil. It is the
last hope of man
. God has spoken, and it is soAmen!
The old man's voice rung, in deep, solemn tones, through the lonely
room, while his eye seemed to burn as with the fire of Prophecy.
The voice of God has spoken to me, in my thoughts by day, in my
dreams by night
I will send a
Deliverer
to this land of the New World,
who shall save my people from physical bondage, even as my Son saved
them from the bondage of spiritual death!
And to-night he will come; at the third hour after midnight, he will
come through yonder door, and take upon himself his great Mission, to
free the New World from the yoke of the Tyrant!
Yes, my son, six months ago, on that calm summer evening, as, with
Catherine leaning on one arm, you on the other, I strolled forth along the
woods, that voice whispered a message to my soul! To-night the
Deliverer will come!
All is ready for his coming! exclaimed Paul, advancing to the altar.
Behold the Crown, the Flagon of Anointing Oil, the Bible, and the
Cross!
The old man arose, lifting his withered hands above his head, while
the light streamed over his silver hairs.
Even as the Prophets of old anointed the brows of men, chosen by
God to do great deeds in His name, so will I,purified by the toil, and
prayer, and self-denial of seventeen long years,anoint the forehead of the
Deliverer!
Hark! As the voice of the aged enthusiast, tremulous with emotion,
quivers on the air, the clock in the hall without, tolls the hour of
One
.
An hour of the New Year has been gathered to the great ocean of
Eternity
.
Only an hour ago, as the tones of that bell rung through the lonely
Block-House, like a voice from the other worlddeep, sad, and echoing
the last minute of 1774 sank in the glass of Time, and 1775 was born.
As the echo died away, they knelt silently beside the altar, the old man
and his son. The white hairs of the Priest mingled with the brown locks
of Paul; their hands, clasped together, rested upon the Bible, which was
opened at the Book of Revelations
11
Their separate prayers, breathing in low whispers from each lip,
mingled
together, and went up to Heaven in ONE.
An hour passed. Hark! Do you hear the old clock again? How
those sullen sounds,
One
Twoswell through the silent halls.
Still they kneel together therestill the voice of the prayer quivers
from each tongue.
After a pause of silent prayer, the old man rises and paces the floor.
Place your hand upon my heart, my son! Can you feel its
throbbings
?
Upon my browah! it burns like living fire! The hour draws
nighhe comes! Yes, my heart throbs, my brain fires, but my faith in
God is firmthe Deliverer will come!
Vain were the attempt to picture the silent agony of that old man's face!
Call him dreamercall him fanaticwhat you will, you must still admit
that a great soul throbbed within his brainstill you must reverence the
strong heart which beats within his shrunken chest.
Still must you remember that this old man was once a renowned lord;
that he forsook all that the world holds dear, buried himself for seventeen
years in the wilds of this forest, his days and nights spent amid the dark
pages of the Revelations of Saint John.
Up and down the oaken floor, now by the altar, where the light shone
over his brow, now in the darkness, where the writhings of his
countenance
were lost in shadows, the old man hurried along, his eye blazing
with a wilder light, his withered cheek with a warmer glow.
Meanwhile the son remained kneeling in prayer. The lights burned
dimlythe room was covered with a twilight gloom. Still the Iron Cross
was seenthe white altar still broke through the darkness, with its silver
Flagon and Laurel Crown.
Hark! That soundthe clock is on the hour of three! The old man
starts, quivers, listens!
One
! rings through the desolate mansion.
I hear no sound! mutters the enthusiast. But the words had not
passed on his lips, when Twoswells on the air.
He comes not! cries Paul, darting to his feet, his features quivering
with suspense. They clasp their hands togetherthey listen with
frenzied
intensity.
Still no footstep! Not a sound! gasped Paul.
But he
will
come! and the old man, sublime in the energy of
fanaticism
,
towered erect, one hand to his heart, while the other quivered in
the air.
Three
! The last stroke of the bell swelledechoedand died
away.
He comes not! gasped the son, in agonyBut yes! Is there not
a footstep on the frozen snow? Hark! Father, father! do you hear that
footstep? It is on the threshold nowit advances
He
comes! whispered the old man, while the sweat stood out in
beads from his withered brow.
It advances, father! Yes, along the hallhark! There is a hand
on the doorhah! All is silent again? It is but a delusionno! He is
come at last!
At last he is come! gasped the old man, and with one impulse they
sank on their knees. Hark! You hear the old door creak on its hinges,
as it swings slowly opena strange voice breaks the silence.
Friends, I have lost my way in the forest, said the voice, speaking
in a calm, manly tone. Can you direct me to the right way?
The old man looked up; a cry of wonder trembled from his lips. As
for the son, he gazed in silence on the Stranger, while his features were
stamped with inexpressible surprise.
The Stranger stood on the threshold, his face to the light, his form
thrown boldly forward, by the darkness at his back.
He stood there, not as a Conqueror on the battle field, with the spoils
of many nations trampled under his feet.
Towering above the stature of common men, his form was clad in the
dress of a plain gentleman of that time, fashioned of black velvet, with
ruffles on the bosom and around the wrist, diamond buckles gleaming
from his shoes.
Broad in the shoulders, beautiful in the sinewy proportions of each
limb, he stood there, extending his hat in one hand, while the other
gathered his heavy cloak around the arm.
His white forehead overarched large eyes, which gleamed even through
the darkness of the room with a calm, clear light; his lips were firm; his
chin round and full; the general contour of his face stamped with the
settled
beauty of mature manhood, mingled with the fire of chivalry.
In one word, he was a man whom you would single out among a crowd
of ten thousand, for his grandeur of bearing, his calm, collected dignity
of expression and manner.
Friends, he again began, as he started back, surprised at the sight
of the kneeling enthusiasts, I have lost my way
Thou hast not lost thy way, spoke the voice of the old man, as he
arose and confronted the stranger; thou hast found thy way to
usefulness
and immortal renown!
The Stranger advanced a footstep, while a warm glow overspread his
commanding face. Paul stood as if spell-bound by the calm gaze of his
clear, deep eyes.
Naydo not start, nor gaze upon me in such wonder! I tell thee the
voice that speaks from my lips, is the voice of Revelation. Thou art called
to a great work; kneel before the altar and receive thy mission!
Nearer to the altar drew the Stranger.
This is but follyyou mean to mock me! he began; but the wild
gaze of the old man thrilled his heart, as with magnetic fire. He paused,
and stood silent and wondering.
Nay, doubt me not! To-night, filled with strange thoughts in regard
to your country's Future, you laid yourself down to sleep within your
habitation in yonder city. But sleep fled from your eyesa feeling of
restlessness drove you forth into the cold air of night
This is true! muttered the Stranger in a musing tone, while his face
expressed surprise.
As you dashed along, mounted on the steed which soon will bear
your form in the ranks of battle, the cold air of night fanned your hot
brow, but could not drive from your soul the Thought of your Country!
How know you this? and the Stranger started forward, grasping the
old man suddenly by the wrist.
Deeper and bolder thrilled the tones of the old Enthusiast.
The rein fell loosely on your horse's neckyou let him wander, you
cared not whither! Still the thought that oppressed your soul was the
future of your country. Still great hopesdim visions of
what is to come
floating panoramas of battle and armed legionsdarted one by one over
your soul. Even as you stood on the threshold of yonder door, asking,
in calm tones, the way through the forest, another and a deeper question
rose to your lips
I confess it! said the Stranger, his tone catching the deep emotion
of the old man's voice. As I stood upon the threshold, the question that
rose to my lips was
Is it lawful for a
SUBJECT
to draw sword against his
King
?
Man! You read the heart! and this strange man, of commanding
form and thoughtful brow, gazed fixedly in the eyes of the Enthusiast,
while his face expressed every conflicting emotion of doubt, suspicion,
surprise, and awe.
Nay, do not gaze upon me in such wonder? I tell thee a great work
has been allotted unto thee, by the
Father
of all souls! Kneel by this
altarand here, in the silence of night, amid the depths of these wild
woodswill I anoint thee Deliverer of this great land, even as the men
of Judah, in the far-gone time, anointed the brows of the chosen David!
It may have been a sudden impulse, or, perchance, some conviction of
the future flashed over the Stranger's soul, but, as the gloom of that
chamber gathered round him, as the voice of the old man thrilled in his
ear, he felt those knees, which never yielded to man, sink beneath him;
he bowed before the altar, his brow bared, and his hands laid upon the
Book of God.
The light flashed over his bold features, glowing with the beauty of
manhood in its prime, over his proud form, dilating with a feeling of
inexpressible
agitation.
On one side of the altar stood the old manthe Priest of the
Wissahikon
his
silver hair waving aside from his flushed browon the other,
his son, bronzed in face, but thoughtful in the steady gaze of his large
full eyes.
Around this strange group all was gloom: the cold wintry air poured
through the open door, but they heeded it not.
Thou art called to the great work of a Champion and Deliverer!
Soon thou wilt ride to battle at the head of legionssoon thou wilt lead a
people on to freedomsoon thy sword will gleam like a meteor over the
ranks of war!
As the voice of the old man in the dark robe, with the silver cross
flashing
on his heart, thrills through the chamberas the Stranger bows his
head, as if in reverence, while the dark-browed son looks silently on
look yonder, in the dark shadows of the doorway!
A young form, with a dark mantle floating round her white robes, stands
trembling there. As you look, her blue eye dilates with fear, her hair
streams in a golden shower, down to the uncovered shoulders. Her finger
is pressed against her lip; she stands doubting, fearing, trembling on the
threshold.
Unseen by all, she fears that her father may work harm to the kneeling
Stranger. What knows she of his wild dreams of enthusiasm? The
picture which she beholds terrifies her. This small and gloomy chamber,
lighted by the white candlesthe altar rising in the gloomthe Iron Cross
confronting the kneeling man, like a thing of evil omenher brother, mute
and wonderingher father, with white hairs floating aside from his
flushed forehead. The picture was singular and impressive: the winter
wind, moaning sullenly without, imparted a sad and organ-like music to
the scene.
Dost thou promise, that when the appointed time arrives, thou wilt be
found ready, sword in hand, to fight for thy country and thy God?
It was in tones broken by emotion, that the Stranger simply answered
I do!
Dost thou promise, in the hour of thy glorywhen a nation shall
bow before theeas in the fierce moment of adversity,when thou shalt
behold thy soldiers starving for want of breadto remember the great
truth, written in these words`
I am but the Minister of God in the great
work of a nation's freedom?
'
Then, in
His
name, who gave the New World to the millions of the
human race, as the last altar of their rights, I do consecrate thee its
Deliverer
!
With the finger of his extended hand, touched with the anointing oil,
he described the figure of a Cross on the white forehead of the Stranger,
who raised his eyes, while his lips murmured as if in prayer.
Never was nobler King anointed beneath the shadow of Cathedral arch
never did holier Priest administer the solemn vow! A poor Cathedral,
this rude Block-house of the Wissahikona plainly clad gentleman, this
kneeling Strangera wild Enthusiast, the old man! I grant it all. And
yet, had you seen the Enthusiasm of the white-haired Minister, reflected
in the Stranger's brow, and cheek, and eyes; had you marked the
contrast
between the shrunken form of the Priest, and the proud figure of
the Anointed,both quivering with the same agitation,you would
confess
with me, that this Consecration was full as holy, in the sight of
Heaven, as that of Good King George.
And all the while that young man stood gazing on the stranger in
silent awe, while a warm glow lightens up the face of the girl trembling
on the threshold, as she beholds the scene.
When the time comes, go forth to victory! On thy brow, no
conqueror's
blood-red wreath, but this crown of fadeless laurel!
He extends his hand, as if to wreathe the Stranger's brow with the
leafy crownyet look! A young form steals up to his side, seizes the
crown from his hand, and, ere you can look again, it falls upon the bared
brow of the kneeling man.
He looks up and beholds that young girl, with the dark mantle gathered
over her white robes, stand blushing and trembling before the altar, as
though frightened at the boldness of the deed.
It is well! said the aged man, regarding his daughter with a kindly
smile. From whom should the Deliverer of a Nation receive his crown
of laurel, but from the hands of a stainless woman!
Rise! The Champion and Leader of a People! spoke the deep
voice of the son, as he stood before the altar, surveying, with one glance,
the face of his father, the countenance of the blushing girl, and the bowed
head of the Stranger. Rise, sir, and take this hand, which was never
yet given to man! I know not thy name, yet, on this Book, I swear to
be faithful to thee, even to the death!
The Stranger rose; proudly he stood there, as with the consciousness
of his commanding look and form. The laurel-wreath encircled his white
forehead; the cross, formed by the anointing oil, glistened in the light.
Paul, the son, buckled a sword to his side; the old man extended his
hands as if in blessing, while the young girl looked up silently into his face.
They all beheld the form of this strange man shake with emotion;
while that face, whose calm beauty had won their hearts, now quivered
in every fibre.
The wind moaned sadly over the frozen snow, yet these words,
uttered by the stranger, were heard distinctly by all
From you, old man, I take the vow! From you, fair girl, the laurel!
From you, brave friend, the sword! On this Book I swear to be faithful
unto all!
And as the light flashed over his quivering features, he laid his hand
upon the Book and kissed the hilt of the sword.
CHAPTER SIXTEENTH.
THE OLD LONDON COFFEE HOUSE.
Solemnly
, gentlemen, and truly, I must. There's daybreak in the
chinks of the door, and you can hear the kuckerekoos all over the town.
I must indeed
The little man smoothed his white apron, with his big hands arranged
his wig, which, sooth to say, inclined too much to the left side of his
narrow forehead, and arranged his hose, which hung somewhat loosely
about his knees. In one hand he held a burnished candlestick, containing
the last remains of a flickering light, and as he spoke, in tones at once
bland and deprecating, he accompanied every other word with a
grotesque
genuflection, intended for a bow.
Around the table which stood near the broad fire-placea circular
table, strewn with pewter mugs, long-necked bottles and broken pipes
three persons were seated in capacious oaken chairs. Their faces
bloomed with the freshness of Madeira, or, to speak perchance more
correctly
,
leadened with the stupor of malt and tobacco. For every hand
grasped a mug of shining pewter, and a pipe of plain clay was inserted in
every mouth.
It was a large room, with white-washed walls and a neatly sanded
floor. In one corner, certain vessels glittering on a range of shelves, gave
some indications of the character of the place. The doors and windows
were carefully closed, as if to seclude the belated revellers from the light
of daybreak, and the remains of a glorious wood-fire smoked and
smouldered
among the ashes of the hearth.
In a word, this room, into which we have so unceremoniously entered,
was nothing less than the famed public hall or bar-room of the London
Coffee House, a quaint fabric, with deep gabled roof, which stood at the
corner of Market and Front streets, to the great delight of the
town-gossips
and coffee-drinkers of old Philadelphia.
Here the good people thronged to sip their coffee, tipple their Jamaica
rum, discuss the politics of the day, and decide upon the merits of King
George, and the Continental Congress.
The persons who occupied the oak chairs may attract our attention, as
appropriate types of certain classes of society in the year 1774.
One was a burly fellow, whose round cheeks vividly brought to mind
a lively image of the full moon on a Dutch clock, while his scarlet
uniform
might have scared whole legions of male turkeys, and frightened a
herd of bulls into hysteries. With one legencased in a huge boot of
black leather, polished to a charmlaid upon the table, this gentleman
regaled himself with alternate whiffs of his pipe and draughts of beer.
Near him, with a very long nose, and lips of no character at all, was a
goodly citizen, whose dark attire, soiled by tobacco ashes and beer
drippings
,
gave evidence of the night-long revel. And beside the citizen,
whose steel buttons and steel knee-buckles spoke of the economical
habits of a careful son of traffic, was a slender youth, dressed daintily in a
wide-skirted coat of brownish velvet, with a buff waistcoat and satin
breeches. His face, rather insipid in its character, was very pale; his
large blue eyeslooking like the eyes of a Chinese mandarin on a
porcelain
pitcherwere altogether leaden. As he smoked away, sucking at
the stem of his pipe with an energy that hollowed his haggard cheeks
into caverns, and started his leaden eyes from their sockets, he swayed to
and fro in the capacious arm-chair, with a motion that reminded you of
a crab-apple tossing about in a bowl of hot liquor.
Musteh? said the scarlet gentleman, with a hiccupWhat must
you do, Tadkins?
The landlord, as you know, is gone to bed these three hours, and is
sleepin' away now at the top of his speed, with two night-caps on his
bald head, an' I mustindeed I must
Here Tadkins, the imposing representativein the absence of the
Land-lord
of
the dignity and beer of the far-famed London Coffee House,
elaborated a strange performance in gymnastics, by suddenly dropping his
head, stretching forth his arms, and scraping his right foot over the
sanded floor. This, translated into English, was intended to say, I,
Christopher Tadkins, tapster of the Old London Coffee House, leave the
drift of my remarks to your good sense, gentlemen!
What does
he
mean? cried the gayly attired youth, from a corner of
his spacious mouth, very remote from the centreTad, it's rather odd, I
vow, 'fore George his favorite way of getting up a little genteel
profanity
Speak
out, man, and don't stand there bobbing your head until
your wig flies off
Yes remarked the elderly citizenenlighten us. Be lucid.
Translate yourself from dumb motion into English. Or, if you're drunk,
say so. We're not severe to-night. It's New Year's morning, you
know
The elderly gentleman buried the tip of his nose in the recesses of his
pewter mug.
Why, gentlemen, you must see that's its reether late Tadkins
placed his right hand in the centre of his apron,I ax you to reflec'
you, Antony Hopkins, Marchant he bowed to the elderly citizen
You, Octavius Germin, Esquire a bow to the pale-faced youth
an' you, Cap'in Grosby, of his Majesty's hundred and twelfth
regiment
Poor Tadkins came to a sudden pause. In the fervor of his speech,
he had suddenly lost the idea, on the strength of which he commenced
his profound appeal.
Well? grunted the bluff Captain GrosbyWell?
There's no denyin' it, gentlemen, it's as late as daybreak, and you
must
g-o!
shrieked Tadkins in utter despair. If I let you stay any
longer, the Lan'lord will give me such a latherin' to-morrowthat is,
to-day
as
Again Tadkins came to a sudden halt.
Germin the Captain waved his red hand, encircled by white
ruffles, toward the pale-faced youthJust oblige me by heating that
poker, and while it is doing, hand me an empty mug.
There was a vast deal of significance in his bland whisper. Tadkins
retreated a step in evident alarm, while Germin handed the pewter mug,
with the remark
That's easier to manage than a hot poker. Shy it at his wig, but
don't hurt his head.
Tadkins retreated another stepGentle-men! he gasped.
Now, Sirrah, do you see me? If you don't put a cork into that hole
in your face, and stop off your jabber, I'll just take the nicest piece of
flesh off the right corner of your cocoanut, that ever you
did
see. I will,
by !
We cannot decipher the oath, from the MSS. which relates this striking
threat, but have no hesitation in giving the assurance, that said oath was
fierce, bloody, royalaltogether worthy of a British Captain, inspired by
a sense of his dignity, and a dozen mugs of beer.
Tadkins, without a word, retreated toward the shelves, where his
candle
shone over the array of burnished pewter. Yet, even as he shambled
along, he muttered an inaudible rejoinder, and grew very bitter on the
corpulent Briton, wishing among other things that his nose would set fire
to his face, and straightway reduce him to a cinder, as a warning to all
future ages. From the secure retreat near the furnished shelves, he
watched the drinking-party, with an earnestness that lasted only for an
instant. No sooner had Tadkins placed the candle on a shelf, and
straightened his wigblacking one eye with the candle-snuff, which
adhered
to his fingers, then he fell fast asleep, and snored like a north-wind
whistling through a key-hole.
To resumewhere did I leave off? Now that we're free from the
impertinent interruptions of this fellow Grosby looked with a sleepy
stare into the faces of his companions.
At the stake in the middle of a dark woods with fire at your feet
and a troop of Indian devils dancing round you suggested the young
gentleman, speaking the sentence in one short breath.
One in particular was touchin' you up with a pine torch under your
nose remarked the plain citizen, again secluding his nose from
the light.
Yes, sirs! The obese Captain panted for breath, as he forced the
smoke of his pipe through his large nostrilsThere I was. Tied to the
stake. Injins all around. Tomahawkspine torchesugly old women,
screaming like so many walking Bedlams. I
was
there, sirs. A
tomahawk
was brandished over my head, but I looked the red scoundrel in the
eyein the eye, sirsin the eye
The Captain lifted his mug to his mouth, and, with the beer froth
clinging to his large lips, quietly remarked
I wonder why
he
does stay?
It does not appear that this abrupt remark was connected, in the most
remote degree, with the narrative which the worthy Captain had been so
impressively telling. His companions were too far gone in the abstruse
meditations engendered by the beer mug, to notice this sudden diversion
of the Captain's train of thought. Indeed, Octavius was engaged in the
hopeless attempt to entrap an imaginary black beetle, which flitted
between
his eyes and the unsnuffed candle, while friend Anthony muttered
to himself the mysterious wordsOnly ten o'clock, my lovenot so
late as you thinkNew Year's Eve, you know
He evidently imagined himself in the presence of his indignant spouse.
Why does
he
stay? repeated the Captain.
Eh? I vow I don't know cried Octavius, suddenly brightening
up;He said that he would join us at three o'clock, and now it's
day-break
.
Were there ever such lively roosters in your part of the world?
he added, as the trumpet peal of an early chicken-cock echoed through
the silence of the town.
A lorda lord muttered Anthony, with an absent eye, and finger
slowly undulating between his nose and his pewter mugA live Lord
in Philadelphia, consigned by his father to my care, and nobody knows
it. Nobodyexcept youand youandhe, heand
me
.
It was no doubt an excellent joke, for friend Anthony chuckled over it,
until his nose resembled a premium pear, at some horticultural exhibition.
What are you doing? cried the Captain, with his sleepy eyes fixed
upon the pale youthIn the name of his Blessed Majesty! Octavius,
my dear
Eightnineten muttered Octavius, surveying a little pile of gold
coin, which he had placed upon the table. If
he
succeeds, I lose. If
he don't, I win. How do you think it will turn out, Captain?
The individual addressed seemed to be wrapt in deep cogitations for a
moment, and then answered gravely
If
she
was a lady of quality, I could tell you in a minute. In that
case you would lose. Distinct-l-y, sir! But, as she is a peasant girl, I
am induced to think that our friendthat is, Johneh?
John!
Capital
joke, to call himself John, plain John,eh?
R-e-g
,
Reg
, muttered the decorous citizen, writing with the end of
his finger, moistened with beer, upon the white table,I,
Regi
,
N-A-L-D-,
nald,Reginald!
As though he had accomplished some problem of incalculable intricacy,
the good citizen looked around with a glance of triumph, and pointed to
the name, inscribed upon the smooth board in charactersnot of light
but of beer.
When did you get a letter from the
old boy?
observed Captain
Grosby.
Yesterday. Mysteriousugh! very mysterious responded
Anthony
.
Diving his hand into a side-pocket, he drew forth a letter
cumbered
by a large seal, and holding it near the light, read from its pages in
an under-tone`I charge you, have a care over mymy sonand let no
effort be spared to further the great object of his journey to Phil
Philadel
'
very mysterious!
And if he succeeds, I win the guineas, said Mr. Octavius, making an
earnest effort to draw a cloud of smoke from a cold pipe.Why does
he stay? Ha, hait must be a delicious interview. The dear little girl
listens to the insinuating stranger, and
Speakin' o' girls reminds me of politics, remarked the Merchant,
arranging himself in a position of commanding gravity, with one limb
crossed over the other, and his chin very near his knee, while his thumbs
and the ends of his fingers were placed together, with due solemnity
Do you think, Captain, that this Continental Congress will ever come to
much?
Great talk in the State-house yard, in these days, about the rights
of the Colonies, andsnuff the candle, if I may trouble you, Octavius
ministerial oppression. Many words, a great many words; and, if I may
use so bold a phrase, an unlimited Ocean ofofsmall-talk.
Sir. Si-r-r! The name of his blessed Majesty King George is
The Captain inhaled an immense volume of smoke, and paid his
devotions
to the beer mug. It was quite a pleasure to hear him conclude his
remarkable sentiment:
That is my opinion, Sir. It is.
Exactly my own way of thinking, said Anthony. I have always
held those opinions.
Octavius said nothing, but continued to count his guineas.
Ehbye the bye, when do you expect John to leave the city?the
Captain turned his leaden eyes toward the citizen.
Some months will elapse began the Merchant, performing a
solemn pantomime with his thumb and fingers, when his words were
suddenly
interrupted by an alarming clamor at the tavern door.
Do you hear, Tadkins? Hellothe fellow's asleepsuppose
you let
him
in, Octavy, my dear, said the Captain, in a mild, loving
way.
It's very easy to say, Let him in; but when a man has deposited some
two or three bottles of wine within his waistcoat, with a superstructure
of beer and tobacco smoke, it becomes a question howa mancan
walk
Octavius rose to his feet, however, and reached the door, after several
erratic movements to the right and left. No sooner had he removed the
wooden bar, than the latch was lifted, and a figure rushed over the
thresh-old
and moved with hasty strides toward the table.
Hello! Why, you're white as a sheet! Rather an unpleasant object!
cried the Captain, starting in his chair. You don't call it a decent thing,
to plunge in upon us, looking like a corpse, do you?
What's the matter? drawled Anthony, gazing vacantly into the face
of the intruder.
It was Jacopo, no longer red and blooming in the cheeks, but pale as a
dead man. His slender limbs trembled under the weight of his rotund
paunch, as he stood by the table, his small black eyes peering steadily
into the lean visage of the merchant. Even his nose, which we have
seen blooming and blushing like a fire coal about to kindle into a blaze,
was colorless now.
Jacopo! How goes it, man? Octavius staggered to his side
Where's John?I'm ready he leaned for support upon the table,
while his face was invested with the apathy of the last degree of
drunkenness
How's
your health, my boy? Favor this company with a song.
And then the bewildered Octavius favored the company with a touching
couplet from a pathetic ballad of the olden time:
My name is Robert Kidd,
And so wickedly I did
As I sail-e-d, as I sa-i-l-ed.
Octavy, my love, politely interfered Captain GrosbyHold your
jaw.
Jacopo did not speak a word in answer. Panting for breath, he looked
silently into the faces of the boon companions, while his features were
pallid with a blank terror.
Anthony dashed his mug upon the table, and staggered to his feet.
Where's your master? he cried, as he beheld the terror-stricken face
of Jacopo.
The fact is, my friends, I'm a little out o' breath Jacopo spoke
very slowly, looking over his shoulder toward the door, with the glance
of a nervous man, who fancies that he is pursued by an Apparition. But
you surely are jestingyou do not mean to say that my Lor(that is,
John
)is not here?
A dead silence ensued. The terror imprinted on the face of Jacopo
impressed the boon companions with an involuntary awe. The Captain
rose, and the three gathered around the companion of Reginald
Lyndulfe.
What's this! Where is he? Your face would frighten the devil
himself
.
Out with it at once and the burly officer shook Jacopo roughly
by the shoulder.
Out with it, or I won't answer for your health, by !
Has
he
come yet? faltered Jacopo, sinking into a chair with a
grotesque
sigh, which resembled a snore.
Corpi di bacco!
This is very
singular he grasped a wine-bottle, and inserted the neck in his
capacious
mouth. A-a-h! I am very chilly. They produce such cold
weather in this new country
Would you be so good as to speak? thundered the Captain,when
suddenly a footstep was heard, and a form, crossing the threshold, came
rapidly through the shadows toward the table.
Every eye was turned with the same movement toward the face of the
new-comer. Not a word was spoken, and the breathless silence deepened
the feeling of terror which had been communicated to the revellers by the
broken words of Jacopo.
Reginald Lyndulfe stood disclosed in the lightsilentmotionless
all color banished from his facehis gray surtout thrown back on his
shoulders, with the gay apparel which it had concealed, covered with mud,
and torn in many places. His entire appearance was wild and haggard. In
silence he surveyed every visage, his blue eye discolored by injected blood,
while his hair hung in damp flakes about his forehead, and his
compressed
lips, no longer red with youth and passion, wore the color of
bluish clay.
After this silent gaze, he flung himself into a seat, or rather sank into
the chair, with the manner of one who has been exhausted by hours of
fatigue and suffering. Still, no one broke the silence; the boon
companions
cast stealthy glances into each other's faces, and then as stealthily
surveyed the faces of Jacopo and his master.
Reginald dashed his cap upon the table, and with his colorless hand
wiped the moisture from his forehead.
Jacopo he said, in a hoarse voice, that was scarcely audible
Have you any brandy?
These words may provoke a smile, but there was nothing like
pleasantry
upon the countenance of those who surveyed the haggard face of
the young man. With a hand that trembled visibly, Jacopo reached the
bottle which was labelled Brandy, and placed a capacious glass goblet
before his master.
Reginald's hand also trembled as he grasped the bottle, and held it over
the goblet until it contained at least one half a pint of that inspiring poison,
which cankers the blood with its peculiar leprosy, and degrades the man
into a demon.
He raised the goblet, and did not set it down until every drop of the
burning liquid had passed his lips.
The surprise, the terror of the company now manifested itself in words.
Zounds! An old trooper like me couldn't stand such a dose as that,
and I've swallowed the stuff these twenty years. You, my boy, you are
remarkable for your abstinence. I never saw you so much as half-drunk
or quarter-drunk, in all the time I've known you. Zounds! Enough to
kill the devil!
A half a pint! ejaculated Anthonyand without water!
I couldn't drink it if you were to cut me up into coach-whips! was
the somewhat mysterious remark of Octavius.
Jacopo gazed in silence into the face of his Master. The eyes were
still blood-shotten, the lips livid, the cheek colorless. The brandy did
not seem to have the least effect upon him; at all events its effects were
not in the most remote degree perceptible.
A painful silence ensued.
Reginald held forth the goblet once more, with an emphatic gesture
More brandy! he whispered.
Jacopo lifted the bottle, and paused when the goblet was half-filled, the
bright red liquid shining through the clear glass.
Go on said his master, in that almost inaudible tone.
Again he raised the glass, and drained it to the last drop.
The surprise and anxiety of the company may be imagined. Every
man sank back in his seat, and the same ejaculation quivered from
every lip.
Yet still Reginald sat before them, his cadaverous face, lighted by the
candle, as pale and ghastly as ever. His hands, which were laid upon
his knees, trembled as with an ague-chill; with blood-shot eyes, and
compressed lips, and pallid cheeks, he gazed vacantly into the faces of
the spectators.
It is very strange he said, in that hoarse whisperThe brandy
has not the least effect upon me. I believe that I am about to be taken
ill with some mortal disease.
At once the tongues of the spectators were unloosed.
What
is
the matter? cried Anthony.
There's something dreadful happened to you said the Captain.
The girl
At that word, uttered by the slender Octavius, who laid his hand upon
his guineas, a shudder agitated the face of the young man.
PshawI had quite forgotten our wager. Have not seen her
to-night
she did not keep her appointment  she  she  ha, ha  has
jilted
me.
With his eye fixed sternly upon the astonished face of Jacopo, he
slowly uttered these words, with a miserable attempt to force a smile.
The guineas are yours!
Jacopo, I wish to say a word to you, whispered Reginald, and he
led the way toward the door, where the light of the breaking day fell upon
their haggard faces.
Go at once to Mr. Hopkins's house,secure the package on my desk
and saddle two of the best horses in his stables. Then you will cross
the river, and wait for me in the woods at Cooper's Point. I will join
you there, within a half-hour.
Two of the best horseshow shall I get them over the river?
there was a ludicrous astonishment in Jacopo's face.
There is a ferry from the foot of High street, or you can get the old
Fisherman at Mulberry street wharf to take them over in his flat-boat.
But they must be over the river in a half an hour, or
His face became suddenly agitated.
Jacopo he continued, abruptly changing the subjectYou left
the farm-house after I did. Was there any thing like surprise at my
sudden
departure?
Jacopo answered in a whisper, hoarse and thick with emotionI was
aroused from my sleep by a loud outcry. I hurried from my room, and
found that the noise proceeded from
her
chamber
Madeline Reginald shuddered, as he whispered the name.
There was a throng of neighbors gathered there, and as I crossed the
threshold, I saw old Peter standing in their midst, pointing to the floor.
I pressed through the crowd, looking for you, and
Go ongo on
I did not see your face, but your name was spoken every moment, by
the crowd. And
Madeline? gasped Reginald, grasping his servant by the wrists.
She was not there
Reginald tottered backward, and would have fallen, had not the arm of
Jacopo held him firmly against the posts of the door.
Go on and Reginald cast a beseeching glance in the face of Jacopo,
which reflected the ghastliness of his own featuresspeak it at once.
Madelinewas notthere
She had left the farm-house, but Old Peter, who was wonderfully
agitated
,
pointed to the floor, and called the attention of the neighbors to the
stain of blood, which was visible at his feet. Nay, my Lord, the
torch-light
disclosed not only a stain, but a pool of blood Reginald's
features
became blank with vague horror.
A pool of blood * * * and Madeline goneThere has been foul play
* * * * but go at once, Jacopo, and obey my commands. Not a word
But, my Lord, you are not well
Fool! Do you hesitate? Let the horses be ready in Cooper's woods,
and he glanced over Jacopo's shoulder, towards the tableHopkins
will not suspecta vessel sails from New York to-morrowgo, I say,
and do not fail, for there is more than life at stake
He pushed Jacopo through the door, and hurried toward the table. The
faces of the boon companions were turned toward his visage, as he sank
into a seat. Not a word was spoken, but it was evident that they waited
for an explanation of all this mystery, from the lips of Reginald.
Hopkins, I was about to remark the Merchant started up in his
chairthat is to say, Octavius the leaden-eyed reveller raised his
head from his handsin fact, Captain
Turning from one to the other of the boon companions, and exciting
the earnest attention of every one by his address, Reginald slowly
continued
Have you such a thing as a well-flavored Havanna cigar? He
accompanied
these remarkable words with a hearty burst of laughter.
There could not have been a more ludicrous surprise, had he asked the
gallant Captain to pull a church steeple from his pocket, or desired the
Merchant to take a merchant vessel of three hundred tons from the crown
of his cocked hat.
He is drunk, was the muttered ejaculation of the young gentleman.
Crazy! thought Mr. Hopkins.
Had some love-scene with the girl was the reflection of the
Captain
,
who was a man of the world, and somewhat dangerous to the sex,
withal.
However, the Merchant drew from his pocket a small parcel, carefully
wrapped in yellow tea-paper.
A sample of the best Havannareceived 'em yesterday from Cuba
and he handed Reginald a cigar, observing at the same time, in an
under-tone
White
as a sheet, by George!
Reginald lighted the cigar, and placing his feet upon the table, soon
encircled
his face with a fragrant cloud.
The fact is, gentlemen, he exclaimed, as though he had been
silently elaborating some previous subject of discussionThe Colonies
will not dare to do it. They will talk, but they dare not act
And in a moment the company were involved in the mazes of a
political
discussion, which, as the hour was daybreak, and three of their
number
stupid with the bottle and pipe, and the fourth not far from crazy,
was, in every point of view, a remarkable event.
They may dress themselves as Injins, and attack whole cargoes of
tea, but when it comes to musket and bayonetB-a-h! the Captain
was decided in his opinions. There was a profundity in his B-a-h!
The fact is, gentlemen, to look at the subject philosophically, every
thing is degenerated in this country. Instead of a Church Establishment,
they have conventicles of drab-coated Quakers. Instead of a King, a mob
and in place of law, order and Christianity, they have a Continental
Congress. The general degeneracy, gentlemen, does not end here. It
extends from the political to the alimentary and convivial world. The
roast beef is tough, and the brandy worse than medicine
I attended some of their big talks, at Carpenter's Hall, in September
last, said the acute HopkinsThere were some fiery speeches, but
`Brag is a good dog,' and so forth, as the proverb has it.
The idea that any man would be so ridiculous as to the young
man possibly may have meant to advance some profound truth, or
elaborate
some new theory in political philosophy, but he concluded with
breaking his pipe, and calling on the Captain for a song.
While the discussion continued, Reginald smoked in silence, which was
only broken by an occasional word, evidently uttered with the intention
of prolonging the argument. There was no change in the unnatural
pallor of his face; even the cigar, mild and peaceful in its effects, failed to
dispel the sullen gloom which clouded his features.
There is no doubt whatever, that when the King is fully informed of
the proceedings of the Continental Congress, gravely exclaimed the
Merchant, and put in possession of all the facts connected with this
matter, he will exclaim, with an indignation truly royalZounds!
Captain, my pipe has gone out, and I've no paper to light it again!
The sedate Hopkins surveyed his pipe with an expression of
indescribable
despair, as he placed these mysterious words in the mouth of his
dread Majesty, King George.
I must confess that your figure is by no means lucid, the Captain
remarked, with a profundity altogether significant of beer and tobacco
What in the dl has King George and the Continental Congress to
do with a pipe?
Bah! Captain, this pipe, at which I have been puffing hopelessly
for the last minute, is cold as an icicle. Have you an old newspaper
about youit's so unpleasant to light one's pipe at a reeking
tallow-candle
Not an old newspaper, but a new one. I received it from a friend
today
,
who came over by the last ship. Just tear a strip off the border;
don't spoil the reading. It must last me for the next three months.
The Captain flung the paper on the table, and Hopkins began, with
great care, to peel a narrow strip from its border, muttering meanwhile
British Gazette and Chronicle. `Novem-b-ereleventhHello!
What is this? `Last dying speech and confession of Greeley, the
notorious
Pirate hung on Tyburn,'
The Merchant dropped his pipe, and with his eye rivetted by the dingy
type of the London paper, perused the paragraph which arrested his
attention
,
with undisguised, but by no means sober interest. His lips moved
12
unceasingly in a ridiculous grimace, and his eyes grew idiotic, in a
fixed stare.
What's the matter? cried the Captain, taking his huge boot from
the table, and bending forward with sudden attentionHas his blessed
Majesty taken cold, or istheChurch threatened with an attack of
the redoubtable Captain hesitated for a word, but quietly added, after a
momentepilepsy?
Just read me a bit of fresh Court news, will you? suggested Octavius.
Hopkins, however, did not answer, but, growing suddenly pale,
continued
absorbed in the perusal of the paper.
Reginald, will you have the kindness to read
that?
With his finger
placed upon the particular paragraph, he handed the paper across the
table. The young man, absorbed in a revery, did not seem to hear him
at first, but the Merchant, starting up from his seat, held the paper before
his face.
Read
that
, if you pleasethe date of the paper is the same as your
father's letter, but it is plain that he had not seen the `Gazette and
Chronicle' when he wrote to you.
The agitation of Hopkins excited the attention of the young man, whose
features were clouded by apathetic gloom. Seizing the paper, he cast his
eyes over its columns, examined the date, surveyed the advertisements
and the intelligence from court, the debates in Parliament and the
announcements
of the theatre.
It does not interest me, he said, with a vague stareI see nothing
here
That
paragraph, cried Hopkins in his shrillest tone, while, bending
over the table, his long nose almost touched the face of Reginald.
The young man beheld the paragraph designated by the Merchant,
whose face betrayed such singular emotion.
In silence he read, while the boon companions anxiously marked the
sudden changes of his handsome countenance. The agitation of Reginald
was appalling. He surveyed the paper with the glare of a madman,
crushed it in his hands, and scattered it in fragments on the table.
Look ye he gasped, as he placed his hand on the Merchant's
shoulderYou will find the object of your search in the valley of the
Wissahikon. Her name is Madelineshe dwells in
As though maddened by some memory of this eventful night, he turned
hastily awaythe half-finished sentence on his lipsand fled with
unsteady
steps from the room. As he reached the threshold, the light of the
rising sun streamed over his haggard face, and disclosed his eyes, the
lids inflamed and the balls discolored by injected blood.
I must away, he said in a low voice, as his back was to the room
and its occupants, his face to the rising sunThe horses wait for me at
Cooper's woods, and a ship sails from New York to-morrow
He crossed the threshold, and heard his name pronounced by a voice
more hollow and despair-stricken than his own. By the light of the
fresh winter dawn, he beheld a face on which were stamped the
indications
of an ineffaceable despair.
You
here he cried, and staggered backward in affright,Whence
come you?
And a voice, faint and whispering, gave answer
From Wissahikon!
While these scenes occurred at the Old London Coffee House, in
Philadelphia, events as strange and varied in their interest took place in
the glen of Wissahikon, seven miles away. Let us retrace our steps.
CHAPTER SEVENTEENTH.
THE SEALED CHAMBER.
Paul
, the Stranger wrote his name upon a piece of parchment, which
I have enclosed and sealed within this paper, in the form of a letter. I
have not looked upon that name, nor must you know it until the time for
action arrives. It cannot be long ere blood must be shed. Perhaps, a
few months will elapse, or another year may pass before the first blood
will flow. There will be a battlemany battlesarmies will be swept
awaythis new land grow rich in graves. But when the time arrives,
you will break the seal of this letter, read the name of the Deliverer, and
obey the words which you will find written beneath that name. Promise,
my son, solemnly promise, that you will not break the seal, until a year
has gone
The light which the old man held in his thin handmarked by
prominent
veinscast its rays along the gloom of the corridor, which
traversed
the Block-house or Monastery from east to west. At one end
was the narrow staircase leading into the upper rooms or cells of the
edifice
;
at the other the door, opening upon the gate. Near the door stood
the old clock, whose monotonous ticking was heard distinctly through
the stillness. On either side appeared the doors of the rooms on the
lower floor of the mansion.
They stood before a door of dark walnut, whose panels were obscured
by spider-webs. It had not been opened for many years.
Paul surveyed the high forehead and clear blue eyes of his Father, with
a glance which mingled reverence with something of awe.
I promise, Father, he saidUntil a year has passed, I will not
break the seal.
Come hither, Paul: the old man had taken a rusted key from the
folds of his robe, and inserted it in the lock of the walnut doorEnter
this chamber, and listen while I speak.
The candle which the Father carried in an iron candlestick, revealed a
small apartment, square in form, and without windows or furniture of any
kind. It was panelled with dark walnut. In the centre of the floor arose
an altar or table covered with black cloth, moth-eaten and obscured by
spider-webs, and on this altar an urn of white alabaster was visible.
With a sensation of involuntary fear, Paul crossed the threshold, and
beheld the gloomy features of this coffin-like chamber. His father's pale
face was agitated by an emotion, which resembled the rapture or madness
of an inspired Prophet. His eyes shone with deeper light; a joy that
might well have been called holy, radiated over his high narrow forehead
and trembled on his lips.
Paulyou behold this sealed packet. I place it within the urn.
Kneel, my son, beside the altar, and promise that you will not break the
seal until a year has passed.
At his father's feet the young man knelt, while his bronzed face, lighted
by dark eyes, and shadowed by masses of rich brown hair, was strongly
contrasted with the pale face, blue eyes, and snow-white locks of the
old man.
I promise, Father!
The Father, after gazing for a moment upon the urn, which stood out
vividly from the dark background, led the way from the chamber. He
locked the door, and again addressed his son
Kneel once more. Take this key, and swear that you will not
unlock
the door of this room, until a year has passed.
I swear, Father! said Paul, as he knelt in the dust of the corridor,
the light shining warmly over his thoughtful face. He clutched the
rusted key with an involuntary earnestness.
Come hither, Paul; and the old man led his son for a few paces
along the corridor. They stood before a door of black walnut, on whose
cobweb hung panels a cross was rudely traced. At the sight of that
door, all that was calm or rapturous passed from the old man's face, and
his down-drawn brow and tightened lips indicated emotions of a far
different
nature.
Father, you are not wellthe night air chills you said Paul, with
evident anxiety.
The old man's thin lips moved, but it seemed as if he had not the
physical
power to frame an audible sound.
Paul gazed upon his father with speechless anxiety and wonder.
Let me see your hand, my son
Paul extended his hand
It is a fair hand,as white and delicate as a woman's handand
yet
The Father dropped the hand with a shudder.
Father, you are coldlet me assist you to your chamberthe night
is far spentand it is very cold in this corridor
In a moment, the peculiar emotion which stamped the old man's face
with so much of horror and fear, passed away. He was calm again; his
blue eyes shining with steady light, while his long white hair trembled
gently aside from his colorless forehead.
Kneel once more
Paul knelt at his father's feet.
The old man extended his thin white hand, and placed its slender
fingers
upon the brown locks of his son. Both father and son were
attired in robes of dark velvet, somewhat faded and worn; on the
shrunken chest of the old man, and the firm, manly bosom of his son,
shone a silver Cross.
Around them was the silence of night, only broken by the distant
echoes of the winter wind.
Repeat after me, my son, a solemn vow
Paul clasped his hands upon his breast, and cast his eyes to the floor,
trembling, he knew not why, at the touch of his father's hand, at the sound
of his voice.
And then, in accents bold and deep, he repeated the words which came
from the lips of his Father:
I, Paul, devoted to God from my birth, do vow by his holy name,
never to enter the door of this sealed chamber, before which I kneel, and
whose surface bears the sign of the cross, until
The old man paused, and veiled his eyes, while Paul looked up in
wonder.
He awaited the conclusion of the oath, but his Father did not utter the
closing words, until a pause of some moments.
Until repeated Paul, looking earnestly into his father's face.
Until my father is dead
said the old man, his voice tremulous and
his eyes shaded by his hand.
Paul hesitated for a moment, and then, his eyes swimming in moisture,
slowly repeated the wordsUntil my father is dead.
And if you fail in this, Paul, the Curse of God will descend upon you,
and blight you into a hopeless grave!
For the first time in his life, Paul beheld an expression of fierceness
angerrest upon the face of his Father.
Dost thou hear, my son? continued the old man, clasping his wrist.
I hear father, and will obey, said Paul, looking with reverence into
the venerable face, whose blue eyes gazed fixedly into his own. Have
I ever disobeyed you? Can the time ever come, when I will cease to
obey?
The old man pressed his hand kindly upon the forehead of his son.
God's peace be upon you, Paul, he said, and, light in hand, hurried
along the corridor toward his chamber. It was his nightly farewell to
his child which he had spoken. Paul arose, and, gazing upon the
receding
form of his father, entered the door opposite that of the sealed
chamber.
Ere an instant had passed, he had crossed the threshold, and by the
light of a fading lamp, beheld the familiar features of his own room.
The lamp stood on a desk, and, struggling with the gloom, revealed the
details of a small chamber, with a rude couch in one corner, a window at
its head, whose shutters were fast closed and bolted, and a range of shelves
near the desk, burdened with dusky volumes.
Paul seated himself in the oaken chair, near the desk, and, resting his
cheek upon his hand, fixed his eyes sadly upon the light, and surrendered
himself to his thoughts.
Those thoughts were at once varied and tumultuous. His breath came
in gasps, as he sat enveloped by the gloom and silence of the chamber;
his eye grew large and vacant in its glance.
What power of language may picture the nature of that hour of solitary
meditation?
Now his eye wandered to the shelves, burdened with massive volumes,
with clasps of steel and silver. There were the works of the Astrologers
and Alchemists of the past ages, mingled with the writings of the spiritual
dreamers and religious mystics of Germany, in the sixteenth century.
From boyhood, nay, from very childhood, Paul had dwelt upon their pages,
and as his mindgifted by the Almighty with a power as strange as it was
peculiargrew into form, it had been moulded and colored by these written
Thoughts of Astrology, Alchemy, and Mysticism.
And amid the large volumes were two small books, which more than
once attracted the gaze of Paul, as he sat absorbed in that silent
self-communion
.
The only books, indeed, which were not devoted to the dreams
of Astrology or Alchemy, or the bewildering frenzies of Religious
Mystiticism
.
Plainly bound, their covers indicating much service, they bore
two rudely emblazoned names; one was
Shakspeare
the other,
Milton
.
How the heart of Paul bounded within him, as he thought of the day
when, from an obscure corner of a neglected chest, he had drawn forth
these priceless volumes!
Near his elbow was another volume; it was open, and its broad pages
bore the bold, firm characters of the Hebrew tongue. It was the Bible
the Old Testament and the New in one languagewhich Paul had read
for years; the only copy of the Book which he possessed. Dearer he
prized it, than all his works of Alchemy or Astrology, dearer even than
the reveries of Religious Enthusiasm; it was, to his soul, a thousandfold
more precious than the pages of those seers of the heart, Shakspeare and
Milton.
For from that boldly printed Hebrew volume, the Lord God of Heaven
and Earth talked to him, the unknown Boy of Wissahikon, and talked in
the language of the Other World. The Hebrew did not seem to him the
language of men, but the awful and mysterious tongue of Angels. Its
syllables of music rolled, full and deep, into his soul, as though a spirit
stood by him, while he read, pronouncing the words, whose meaning
penetrated
his brain.
Does it not seem to you a thought of some interest and beauty?
Here, enshrouded in the gloom and silence of this cell of the
Wissahikon
Monastery, sits the Boy of Nineteen, shut out from all the world
its experienceits love and hatea vague blank to him.
And yet, as he glances over the Hebrew page, his soul, escaping from
the narrow room, goes out into a distant land, where the palm trees stand
in the noonday sun, by the shore of the mysterious Jordan, or where the
waves, creeping up the beach of Galilee, break in ripples at the feet of the
God enshrined in flesh.
Or, he is amid the silence and shadow of that Eden whose joy was
without a pang, whose flowers concealed no poison, whose naked Eve
came, sinlessly and without shame, to the lake, and saw the serene sky
arch above her, the clear waters smile at her feet. Then with the builders
of the Babel Towerwith the earnest Moses, leading forth from Serfdom
a nation of slaves, and leading them to Civilization and Religion  with
the warrior-poet David, whose love to Jonathan is beautiful even now,
after the lapse of the many thousand centurieswith Isaiah the Beautiful
and Job the sublimeor, last of all, and most beautiful of all, with that
toil-worn face, which one day looked forth from the hut of a carpenter,
and said to all the worldGod, enshrined in flesh and toil, has come to
walk like a Brother among ye the sons of men.
The thoughts of Paul, at this still hour, dwell not altogether upon the
pages of the Hebrew Bible, nor do they wander in the fairy world of
Shakspeare, or with the terrible Phantoms of Milton.
It is strangebut it is true! The words, the very tone of my father,
seem to call me suddenly into a new life. I stand upon the Present and
survey the Past, with fearwith trembling. A singular life has been
mine. Bred afar from the worldwithin the walls of this forest home
the only faces familiar to me, are the faces of my Father and Catherine.
Beyond those faces, beyond the forest home lies the great world, a dim
chaos, whose darkness is not enlightened by a single star. Our life has
been very rude in this forest home. Our fare simple, our attire such as
was worn by our ancestors. We have neither decked ourselves in gay
apparel, nor slain a living thing in order to pamper appetite. Water from
the springbread from the corn that grows in the fields, beyond the
woodsthe fruits of summer and the bloodless produce of the garden
such has been the fare, for years, of the old man of Wissahikon and his
children.
Had I eaten of flesh, or drunken of wine, there might mingle with my
blood an impetuous desire to see the great world, and join in its
relentless
war for fame and gold. But here, within these walls, my life shall
glide gently on, until it flows, without a murmur, into that great Ocean
which Men call Death.
But this Oaththe Sealed Chamberthe strange agitation of my
Father?
What are his plans in regard to my Future? The Deliverer for
whose coming we watched so long, came but an hour agoWherefore
does my father say to me, `
Wait one year!
' or `
Until I am dead,
Paul!
'
I have never heard myself addressed by any other name than Paul
Ardenheimmy father's name is also unknown to me. Hold! Black
David, the deformed, who sometimes comes to the Monastery, and bears
messages for my father to the city, may know our name. Shall I
ask him?
No! It is not for me to lift the curtain which enshrouds my father's
secrets, and conceals his purposes from my view. It is for me to sit at
his feet, to wait in patience. Butthe future of Catherine?Shall she
dwell for ever in this home? She is so fair, so beautiful,and yet so
heaven-like in her beauty,so like one of those women of whom the
Prophet Shakspeare speaks, that I could weep to think of her dying
within these walls, neglected and unknown!
You will remember, that Paul applied the word Prophet alike to
Shakspeare and Milton. They had received their intellect from God, and
all that was good in them was God-like; thereforeso the crude
Enthusiast
reasonedthey were his Prophets, whenever they enunciated a divine
thought or embodied a holy truth.
I cannot banish the thought. It seems to encircle me, and force me
to answer its mysterious questions. It is the thought of the mystery
which overshadows our life,all dark as I look to the past, darker yet as
I gaze into the future. Father! Father! Would that the time were here,
when, placing me on one hand, and Catherine on the other, your lips
could tell to us the history of your life, and the history of ours!
Paul felt his brow grow feverish as it rested upon his hand, while his
dilating eyes were fixed upon the half-shadowed walls of his room. It
was an impressive scene. That narrow chamber, dimly lighted, with the
form of that darkly attired Enthusiast seated in the centre of its light and
gloom, his bronzed face and earnest eyes manifesting thought at once
intense and bewildering.
Paul arose and paced the floor.
It came upon him suddenly, like a burst of voluptuous music, like a
gush of intoxicating perfume, like a dream of fragrance and moonbeams
the memory of the beautiful woman whom he had seen to-night, for the
first time.
His cell was full of gloom, but even in the gloom he could see her
flashing eyes,it was very still in the old Block-house, but through the
stillness he could hear her voice, whispering words of wild, boundless
passion.
Wherever he turned, he saw a vision of a beautiful form, whose bosom,
half-revealed, panted slowly into light, and throbbed into warm loveliness,
beneath his gaze.
It seemed as though the vision had rushed upon him like the frenzy of
a feverhis heart beat in tumultuous throbshe gasped for breath, and
wildly stretching forth his hands, tottered to the chair.
Veiling his eyes, he endeavored to banish that voluptuous image. But
she was there, before himhe felt her hand trembling softly over his
foreheadher breath upon his cheek. Again, her darkly flowing hair
swept over his face; again his blood was ice and flame by turns, as her
voice whispered gentlyI have waited for you, Paul. Have loved you
and am yours for ever!
It was in the midst of this voluptuous frenzy, that Paul cast his glance
toward the light, and for the first time beheld a letter, inscribed with
these words`To my son.'
It is from my father. He must have written it last night, before the
Deliverer came. I will banish the maddening memoryand yetshe is
veryvery beautiful!
He broke the seal, and read the letter, traced in the tremulous hand of
his father.
Sunset,
December 31, 1774.
My Son
In case the hope, in which I have lived for seventeen years, proves
false, and the Deliverer for whom we have waited in Prayer, for so many
years, does not comeeven then, Paul, it is my purpose to fulfil, with
regard to you, the command of the Lord. From your infancy you have
been devoted to God. You have been sacred from the world, set apart
from the faces of men. The relentless lust of traffic, the feverish desires
of ambition, the hollow sophistries and cold selfishness of the great world,
have not polluted your virgin intellect. You have bloomed into life in
the wildernessa life, pure and serene as the stars. Therefore, to-morrow,
at the hour of sunset, I will fulfil the purpose of my heart, and solemnly
dedicate you to God.
Behold the manner of this dedication.
The upper rooms of our mansion you have never seen. They are
sealed to all human eyes, and have been for years. But when you
traverse
the corridor which extends between those rooms, you will read on
those closed doors, the names of AnselmJosephImmanuel.
These were my brothers, not in the flesh, but in the spirit. With me
they left Germany,left house and home,and we came into the
wilderness
together. Together, in these woods, we reared the altar of our
Brotherhood. Our creed was simpleLove to Man is Love to God.
While you were but a child, and Catherine scarcely a babe of two
years, they died, these brothers of my heart, and left me alone in the old
mansion. In their death-hour, I vowed a solemn vow that you and
Catherine
should be devoted to the great work of our Religion. I vowed it,
clasping their chilled hands, with their glassy eyes fixed upon mevowed
it to each one as he sunk back in the wave of death. A month or more
intervened between their deathsin the space of half a year they all
were gathered to the grave.
To-morrow I will solemnly dedicate you to the work which those
brothers loved all their lives, and clung to with unfaltering faith in the
hour of death.
You will be called upon, first of all, to take this vowIn the presence
of God, and surrounded by the skeletons of the Brothers of the good
cause, I do vow to devote all my efforts, to bend my life, my intellect,
my wealth, to the progress of that cause.
And in order that my strength may not be weakened, my heart clogged,
or my brain clouded by any tie of earth, or taint of earthly passion, I do
further solemnly vow, in the presence of the dead, never to contract
marriage
,
nor to look upon a woman with the eye of sensual love. My only
bride shall be the good causemy only hope and aim in life, its final
success.
Are you ready for this vow, my son? Let your time be passed in
Prayer, so that the hour of sunset to-morrow does not find you
unprepared
.
Your Father
.
While the young man perused this paper, his face indicated powerful
emotion. There was no color in his rounded cheeks, when he came to
the last words. The paper fell from his hands, and, with a sudden failure
of all physical or mental strength, he sank unconscious in his chair.
The lamp, glimmering with a faint lustre over his marked features and
motionless form, seemed not to disclose a living but a dead man. The
stern mental contest which had shook his reason to its centre, and
deprived
his strong mind of its native vigor, left him stiffened and cold in
every nerve.
It was after a long pause that he awoke from his stupor, but with his
first glance of consciousness he beheld his father's letter. At once he
started from his seat, and pulling forth a drawer, which was concealed in
the side of the desk, he was about to place the letter with the manuscripts
which the drawer contained, when his attention was suddenly enchained
by a new object of wonder. A slip of paper, not more than two inches
in breadth, lay on the manuscripts, its bold characters standing blackly
out from the white surface. On this paper, Paul beheld a few words,
written in a quaint and vigorous old English character. The ink was
scarcely dried; the paper was different in quality from any he used;
indeed, as Paul, ere perusing its words, held it between his eyes and the
light, he beheld the date of its fabrication, woven in its texture,
surmounted
by a British Crown and coat of arms. That date was
1590.
The ink is scarcely driedI have no paper like this in my desk, nor
have I ever seen any thing of this kind in possession of my father. The
character is strangebut let me read it first, before wasting the time in
vague conjectures
Midnight, December 31, 1774.
To Paul, Baron of Ardenheim:
Thou seekest to know. Enter the door with the Cross upon its
panels. Search the Urn. The Past and future will be opened to thee.
There is no signature, exclaimed Paul, as he sunk back in the chair,
utterly bewilderedThe mystery of my life grows darker! Who
placed this paper in my drawer? Whose hand traced these singular
words? Can it be that my father wishes to test my faithfulness to the
vow which I took upon myself not a few moments ago? But noit is
not my father's hand. These words were written by a firm hand, whose
nerves knew not a single tremor of weariness or age. Oh, for a ray of
light to shine upon this mystery!
Again he examined the paper; the ink was very black, the writing
distinct
and bold. The water-mark, or date of the fabrication of the
paper, was seen clearly, as he held it before the light1590.
`Enter the door with the Cross upon its panels!' It would be
perjury
.
`Search the urn' there is an urn within the Sealed Chamber
but, I must not think of it. It would be treason to my fatheryes, the
shame of falsehood would blister on my forehead. It cannot for a
moment influence my thoughts, this idle message sent to me by unknown
hands
While these thoughts, half-uttered, flashed through the brain of Paul,
the words: Enter the door with the Cross upon its panels, rang
unceasingly
in his ears.
The paper fell from his hands, and rested on the desk beside his
father's letter.
The Past and the Future will be opened to thee!
Paul heard these words, as though a spirit had spoken them gently in
his ears.
I swore a solemn oath, that I would not he uttered the words,
and starting from his seat, paced up and down the floor of his narrow
room.
All was breathlessly stillhe could hear the ticking of the old clock,
which stood at the remote end of the corridor, or hallit seemed to him
that he could also hear the frenzied throbbings of his heart.
He was lost in a wilderness of conflicting thought. He was at once
possessed by a yearning desire to know the mystery of his life, and with
a terrible consciousness of the guilt which would darken his soul, in case
he violated his oath.
Paul,
Baron
of Ardenheim, he muttered
Baron
of Ardenheim!
I have heard those words before! To-nightit was when I stood on the
rock of Wissahikon.
Baron
Ardenheim! Is it my father's title, the
name by which he was known in the great world?
Paul took the lamp, and went from that cellthe dearest home of his
hours of thoughtand closing the door, stood in the gloom of the
corridor
.
An unbroken stillness prevailed. The lamp revealed the door on
which the figure of a Cross was traced  shone distinctly upon its panels,
while all around was gloom. Paul's features became violently agitated as
he glanced upon the door; he stood like a man bewildered by a
supernatural
spell, gazing upon the dim Cross with expanded eyes.
The Past and the Future shall be opened to thee! he murmured,
and advanced a single step.
Then came another pause, in which Paul stood without motion in the
centre of the corridor, his face colorless, his eyes expanded and
unnaturally
brilliant.
No! No! In the name of God, I dare not think of it!Yet the
Past is to me a dim chaosthe Future a starless midnight, peopled only
by phantoms * * * * No! I will to my father's couch, and press my
kiss upon his lips as he slumbers, and then come back to my room again
to bury these fearful thoughts in Prayer!
Passing along the corridorthe old clock throbbing all the while
through the breathless stillnesshe saw that the door of the room next
to his own was slightly opened.
It was his sister's chamber.
Inclining his head toward the dark panels, he listened
All was still, save the low, soft breathing of the sinless sleeper
God's blessing upon thee! There are no frightful phantoms to mar
thy restno infernal temptation scares thy soul from its dreams. And
yetit is a strange thoughtthy fate is like unto mine. Thou must take
the vow, and swear with me, never to look with love upon the form of a
living thing
His brow clouded by a sombre expression, Paul passed on, his face
agitated in every feature. Next came the door of the old man's chamber.
Paul bent his head toward its panelsall was silenthis father slept.
Softly unclosing the door, Paul passed the threshold, the light
glimmering
dimly over the details of a cell-like place, with a rude couch in
one corner. With a noiseless footstep Paul advanced to the couch, and
saw the form of his father, prostrate in slumber, the profile of his aged
face turned toward the light. He had flung himself upon the plain bed
without removing the dark robe from his spare limbs, and as he slept, the
silver cross shone like a point of flame upon his breast.
His eyes were closed, his face very calm, and the light imparted a
faint glow to his snow-white hair.
Beside his bed, his lips firmly set, and his eyes glaring from the fixed
brows, stood his son, whose broad chest heaved with violent agitation, as
he silently surveyed the calm image of venerable age which slumbered
before him.
Moved by the violent throbbings of his heart, the Cross which he wore
now disappeared, and as suddenly flashed into the light again.
As the eye of Paul became more accustomed to the gloom of his
father's narrow room, he beheld a singular statue which rose at the
head of his couch, starting from a recess in the panelled walls. Paul
beheld this statue with an involuntary tremor, for the words which his
father had many times spoken to him, came vividly to his memory, at
this lone hour of night and thought.
When Man is free from all manner of bondage, when the mission of
the Redeemer has done its perfect work, then shall the Lead become Gold,
and the Gloom be turned into unutterable Joy.
These words had often fallen from his father's lipsas Paul looked
upon the singular statue, half-revealed by his light, he remembered them
with painful distinctness.
It was a figure of the Saviour, moulded or carved in lead, the form
clad in the humble garments of toil, and the face stamped with a look of
unutterable sadness. The large motionless eyes, the lips agitated by a
smile that had more of sorrow than joy for its meaning, the great
forehead
,
stamped with a sublime despair  all moulded of leadimpressed
the heart of the gazer with sensations of peculiar awe.
That Image, Paul the old man was wont to sayIs the Image,
not of the Saviour triumphant over death and evil, but of Jesus imprisoned
among the creeds and sophistries of the Church. There is a singular
tradition connected with the statue, my son. It was moulded by the hand
of a Hussite heretic, who, imprisoned by the followers of Papal power,
was offered life and liberty on one condition. `You are an artist,' they
said`Your hand is cunning in the arts of painting and sculpture. Carve
for us an Image for our Altar, and you shall be free!' The heretic,
encumbered
by his chains, heard them, and lifting his sunken features from
the shadows of his cell, faltered a response to their request. `Of what
metal will you have it?' `Of gold!' `Whose image shall I carve?' `The
Blessed Saviour triumphant over death' `Give me some lead, and let
me have a furnace, so that I may prepare a model of the statue which
you desire! They consented. For weary days and nights, the Hussite
was secluded in his cell, toiling steadily at his labor. They became
impatient
,
but he replied, pointing to the statue, imprisoned in its mould,
`Soon it will be done.' One morning he unclosed the door of his cell.
While his form, wasted by persecution and toil, trembled like a leaf, and
his cheek, hollow and care-worn, looked like the cheek of a corse, he led
the throng of priestly Lords across the threshold. `You asked of me an
Image of the Saviour triumphant over death. I could not mould a Lie
into gold, for I felt that my hour was near. So I moulded Him of lead,
and moulded him, not as he appears in the Bible, but as he is in your
Church, chained by your hollow forms and blasphemous ritual. Behold
beholdthe Image of the Imprisoned Jesus!' He said this, Paul, and
while the Priests encircled him in fiery anger, he fell back cold and dead.
That Image was hurled into some forgotten corner, for the Priests felt that
its divine despair was an eternal rebuke upon their heathenish worship.
But the followers of Huss lifted it from the dark corner, they bore it to
their secret place of worship,and now it is here, in the home of
Wissahikon
,
a stern Image of the Church, which imprisons the Soul of the
Blessed Saviour in a leaden and lifeless ritual. The day comes, my
son, when the Lead will become Gold, and the unchanged gloom be turned
into changeless joy; when the Lord, no longer imprisoned by creeds, shall
walk freely once more, into the homes and hearts of Men!
Such was the singular tradition of the Imprisoned Jesus.
It may have been that the dull hue of the lead deepened the
singular
impression which the Image produced; but as Paul held the light near
and nearer to it, it seemed to him that he did not merely behold a face
and form of lifeless metal.
I cannot banish the thought that a Soul is imprisoned in that leaden
mass. A Soul enclosed in the fixed eyes and despair-stricken forehead
of the Imagea Soul that listens to me nowwatches me as I stand
beside
my father's couchreads my heartand reads the Future of my
life, which is dark and terrible to me!
Paul shrunk back from the cold leaden eyes of the Image. I will
press my lips to my father's forehead, and then retire to my bed!'
There was something altogether impressive in the sightthat young face
marked by the traces of powerful emotion, pressed against the withered
countenance of the old man.
As Paul bent down, the light which he held glowed more warmly over
the leaden Image, and by the uncertain ray, the smile which dwelt upon
the sad face of the Imprisoned Redeemer, seemed to change into a sneer.
Good nightGod's peace upon your gray hairs! murmured Paul,
but his Father did not hear him. He slept the calm slumber of a serene
Conscience.
Paul raised his head, and for the first time, as the rays of his lamp
wandered from the face to the form of the Image, he beheld the extended
hand, and felt all his serenity of soul vanish before a sudden tempest of
temptation and thought.
For on the forefinger of that leaden hand an iron key was suspended,
bearing a label on which these words were written, and written in his
father's hand
THE KEY OF THE SEALED CHAMBER.
Can it be, gasped Paul, that my father means to tempt me?
Father
he extended his hand as if to rouse the aged man, but as
suddenly
withdrew itNo! he has left the key suspended to the hand of
the Image, so that I might become accustomed to it, and forget all
temptation
in the force of mechanical habit.It is a massive key, and the
label which it bears has been written not many hours ago
He touched the key, and felt his hand drop to his side, as though
detected
in an act of guilt. The face of the Image seemed to smile upon
him, in deep compassion.
Paul extended the light, and regarded the key with a fixed glance, while
the Image looked upon him with that sad smile, and the aged man
slumbered
unconsciously beneath his gaze.
His face manifested an intensity of mental agony; there was no hue
of life upon his cheek; while his lips were firmly compressed, his large
dark eyes glared fixedly upon the leaden hand and the iron key.
It was a moment of fearful thought.
Paul started at a sudden soundbut in an instant became calm again
it was only the old clock striking the hour of four.
Father, the trial is terrible faltered Paul. This ordeal fills my
brain with madness. Ah, there is a hopeI may for ever place a barrier
between my soul and this horrible Temptation
With a sudden grasp he seized the key, and casting one glance toward the
slumbering face of his father, he strode madly to the door. On the
threshold
he paused, held the light toward the bed, and looked over his shoulder.
That light gleamed faintly over his father's face, but as its ray shone for
a moment over the image, Paul with a shudder saw the leaden features
move, and the fixed eyeballs glow with red lustre.
He dared not look again, but holding the light in his left hand, and
clutching the key in his right, he closed the door of his father's room.
He hastened with unsteady steps along the corridor in the direction of his
own chamber.
The key shall tempt me no longer he said as he hurried along
In a moment, through the window of my room I will hurl it forth into
the darkness and snow!
He stood before his chamber, but the same ray that disclosed the panels
of his door, also shone upon the Cross of the opposite doorthe door
which led into the Sealed Chamber.
Paul rushed madly toward it, as though all power of self-control had
suddenly passed from his brain. While his face was marked with the
traces of that frenzy which boiled like molten fire in every vein, he
extended
his hand, and attempted to insert the key in the lock. His hand
trembled, and the attempt was vain.
Paul sank on his knees. For a moment all was a blank; his senses
were deadened by a sudden stupor.
When reason and consciousness returned, he found himself still on his
knees, the key clutched in his cramped fingers, while the cold damps
moistened his forehead.
Ah, the fearful trial is passed. I am saved.
Slowly he rose to his feet, and was turning his face away from the
Cross on the door, when a hand was laid upon his shoulder.
It was not the firm clasp of a vigorous hand, but its pressure was soft
and gentle. And yet that scarcely perceptible pressure held Paul as
motionless
as stone. He could not turn and look upon the person whose
hand touched his shoulder, but, conscious of the terrible danger which he
had just escaped, he feared to gaze into the face of a human being. The
blush of shame glowed on his cheek.
It is my father! the thought crossed the mind of the Enthusiast
He has watched me, and seen me place the key in the lock
He was afraid of the old man's wrinkled face and deep blue eyes.
The hand was still upon his shoulder, its soft pressure imparting a
singular
warmth to his frame.
Father Paul began.
Paul! answered a voice, that broke in deep emphasis upon the
stillness
of the corridor.
And the hand which had pressed his shoulder, touched his neck with
its fingers. Paul felt the blood burn in every vein, as he turned, and,
holding
the light in his quivering hand, gazed upon the intruder.
Did the pale face and high forehead of the old man meet his gaze? Or
the soft eyes and golden hair of Catherine?
Paul, are you afraid of Fortune! Afraid to cross that threshold and
stand face to face with your future fate!
It was the beautiful face of a woman, the large dark eyes of passionate
love, that met the gaze of Paul, as he heard the voice, whose every accent
fired his blood.
Ahmadness again and Paul retreated from the vision of
impetuous
loveliness which glowed upon him from the gloom of the corridor.
The Wizard's child!'
She was there, her form enveloped in a robe of rich velvet, bordered
by glossy fur. Around her face, gathered the dark hood, whose folds
gave new beauty to her face and relieved the intense blackness of her
hair. Her eyes, lighted up with a clear unchanging radiance, flashed upon
him from the shadow of their long fringes  her velvet robe was agitated
by the motion of her proud bosom.
This vision completed the bewilderment of the Enthusiast.
Has earth and heaven combined against me? Is it not enough to be
tempted by my own heart? Not enough to feel the key of the Sealed
Chamber in my grasp, and see the door gloom before me, its Cross
burning
my very eyes with an incredible fascination? Must the air give forth
its Spirits, and the image which haunts my brain take bodily shape, and
come in incarnate loveliness to my side! AwayawayI will not peril
my soul, I dare not break my OathI cannot, cannot fling a lie into my
father's face!
Deep and echoing, his voice swelled through the corridor. The warm
lips of the woman parted in a smile.
I am no spirit, Paul, she said, and flung back her hood. Freely and
in copious waves, her raven hair descended upon her shoulders. While
her olive cheek was fired with vermilion, and her large eyes swam in
moisture, and the ripe redness of her parting lips was contrasted with
the whiteness of her teeth, she touched his arm with her soft hand, and
glided nearer to his side.
Whence come you? cried Paul.
Is it so far from your home to mine? Only a mile, by the path that
leads over the Wissahikon, and through the woods.
But the night is cold  the ground is covered with snow  the forest
dark and dreary
I know it, Paul, but the Voice bade me seek your home
The Voice? echoed the bewildered Paul.
Do you not remember?again she smiled, and dashed aside the
luxuriant
hair from her faceIt was the voice that told me long ago of you
and your love. And after you left me, not many hours ago, after you
thrust me from you and
She laid her finger upon the slight wound which marred the pale beauty
of her forehead.
After all this had occurred, and I was desolate and alone, the Voice
spoke again and told me that you loved me still, told me that you would
13
return, yes,it told me that together we should climb the height of fame
and power.
How her eyes flashed into new brightness, as, placing her hand upon
his neck, she uttered these words!
Paul was spell-bound. It was no spirit voice that spoke, no spirit hand
that trembled over his neck. It was a beautiful woman, whose proud
loveliness
glowed into voluptuous life, as her lips murmuredWe should
climb the height of fame and power!
After the voice had spoken these words of hope to me, I slept. In my
dreams I saw your face. Again I heard the Voice`Would'st thou aid
thy lover in the direst moment of his fate? Away to the home of Paul
away by the path which crosses the Wissahikon, and terminates at the
door of the Monastery. The door is openthou wilt find thy lover
trembling on the threshold of his Fortune. Bid him enter the Sealed
Chamber and fear not.' I obeyed, Pauland am here.
The Sealed Chamber! echoed Paul.
Do you fear? and the touch of her hand, trembling over his
forehead
,
filled every vein of the Enthusiast with the frenzy of passion. Do
you hesitate? I am but a weak woman how proudly her bosom
heaved as she said the words! I may not pierce the cloud of mystery
which encircles us. But to woman, in her very weakness, God hath given
a power akin to Prophecyit is the instinct of her heart, it is the
inspiration
of her love. That power, Paul, tells me that your futureour future,
Paullies within the Sealed Chamber. Do you love me? Enter, and do
not fear!
It seemed to Paul that he could listen for ever to the music of her voice;
and while her eyes flashed in all their brightness, and her form, gliding
closer to his own, heaved and swelled in every vein; the Enthusiast
could not turn his gaze away, even for a single moment, from this
picture
of voluptuous beauty.
You love me! he gaspedYou, whose glances fill my soul with
new life, whose form seems to me more beautiful than a dream of Heaven
you
Love you! exclaimed the Wizard's daughterIs it so strange,
when I have seen your form, in my dreams by night and dreams by day,
for more than a year? Do you still hesitate? The key of your Fate is
in your hand
But the Oath which I took, not one hour ago, kneeling on this very
spot, at the feet of my father
Upon the brow of the beautiful girl darkened a slender vein, swelling
with a serpentine outline from the transparent skin.
Father! she echoed, her face so near the visage of Paul, that he felt
her breath upon his cheekI remember
And she clasped her forehead with her hands.
You remember
The words of the Voice, said the Wizard's daughter: as it bade me
seek your home, it also said`Tell him, tell Paul, that the man who calls
himself his Father, has no right to that sacred name'
Paul shrunk back from her side, looking into her glowing face with a
glance of vacant terror.
Who
calls
himself my father
`Tell him also, that the mystery of his life is concealed within the
walls of the Sealed Chamber. Once beyond its threshold, he will know
his father's name'
Had these words been spoken by the withered lips of age, the glow of
anger would have crimsoned the face of Paul, the fierce denial risen to
his tongue.
But they were uttered by lips that were ripe with youth and passion;
and as they fell on the listener's ears, his eye was enchained by a face
whose eyes flashed with love, through the intervals of long flowing hair.
As he heard the strange revelation, he saw the tumultuous motion of her
velvet robe, he felt the trembling of her form, as she pressed nearer to
his heart
CHAPTER EIGHTEENTH.
PAUL ALONE WITH THE TEMPTER.
Lady
, I would speak with you he exclaimed, as he led the way
into his own room, and placed the light upon his desk. Let me have
one moment of calm thought,only a moment and his gaze was
rivetted to the key of the Sealed Chamber, which he clenched in his
right hand.
The girl, whose eyes shone with changeless brightness, sunk into a
chair, her robe quivering with the impetuous pulsations of her bosom. Not
once did she remove her gaze from the pale features of the Enthusiast.
There were some moments of unbroken stillnessPaul was alone with
the Wizard's daughter.
Not in her own chamber, as some few hours ago, but in that cell of the
Block-house which had for years been the home of his thoughts.
Resting
his brow upon his hand, he could only gaze in her face, and grow
wild and bewildered with the dazzling beauty of her eyes.
As he gazed, his mind was agitated by contending memories. All that
he had ever read of woman, came crowding on his brain, in a throng of
contrasted images. She seemed to him like some form of which he had
read; like the fascinating image of one of those women, whose surpassing
beauty gives freshness and bloom to their memories, even after their
loveliness
has crumbled into grave-yard mould, and the shadows of dead ages
brood darkly over their dust.
Was it Ruth, so pure and beautiful, who, with her brown cheek lighted
by the Judean sun, bent toiling amid the full sheaves of the rich man's
field? Bathsheba, whose dazzling loveliness made the Poet-King a
Traitor and Murderer? Or the star-eyed daughter of Egypt, whose
gorgeous
beauty inspired the Son of David with that glowing Love-drama,
called the Song of Solomon? Or the Juliet of Shakspeare, the Eve of
Milton, or some creation of his own brain? Did she resemble the
voluptuous
form, which, gliding one summer day before Herod the King, so
maddened his soul, that he gave her, as a birth-day gift, the head of the
Baptist?
The impression which the beauty of the Wizard's child made upon the
soul of Paul, mingled these images with a darker association. She seemed
to him something like the tender Esther, the daughter of Mordecai the
Jew, with a shadow of Shakspeare's Lady Macbeth, darkening over her
white brow.
Yes, even as Paul felt the inspiration of her eyes, she seemed a
beautiful
embodiment of some fearful deed, the splendid shrine of a Satanic
Thought.
You hesitate she said, raising her white hand and sweeping the
luxuriant hair from her face.
Paul was silent. He could hear the monotonous sound of the old clock
the throbbing of his heartand the death-like stillness impressed him
with an omen of approaching Evil.
Hesitate, when there is greatness to be achieved, glory won by a solitary
exertion of your will! She bent forward, until the light shone fully upon
her faceher eyes grew brighter, her lips assumed a more passionate red.
GreatnessGlory? echoed Paul, in an absent tone; and then came
a murmured thoughtWhat grandeur of earthly power is worthy for a
moment to be placed in the balance with the possession of this beautiful
form? What glory like the beauty of her eyes
Listen to me, Paul. My life has been like your own, strange and dark
with mystery. Yet I feel that our fate is linked, through good and ill,
for life or death, either for purposes of glory, or for deeds of shame.
Your heart confirms my words. Our destiny is one. It is not for me to
explain that which is so dark with mysteryI can only speak that which
I feel
Speakyou would have me break my Oath, scatter confusion and
shame upon my father's gray hairs, and taint myself with the guilt of
unpardonable crime
No, Paul. I would have you as great, as noble as your destiny. I
know not the world, have no intelligence of its people or its passing events,
but I feel that the time comes, when a strong arm, nerved by a great soul,
may grasp a crown, even from the hand of death, and carve a glorious
destiny
,
even from the elements of carnage and ruin.
It is well  a crown, a throne! But the
hereafter
Paul pronounced
the word with shuddering distinctness.
The hereafter?and her face was stamped by a vague wonder.
The Other World, that unknown sea, whose waves break in indistinct
murmurs on the shores of this life Paul wildly exclaimedThe
Hereafter! O, it is terrible to think, even for a moment, that we are but
as the beasts of the field. That to-day we live, and to-morrow we are but
loathsome decay. To dream for an instant, that there is no other world
The Other World! It is a mystery; perchance it may be happiness,
perchance misery. Or, it may be nothing but a long and dreamless sleep.
It is in this world that we live. For this world we were born. I know
that I live; the breath of the flowers, the joy of the sun, the thought of
moonlightall are dear to me. But the other world is like a vague mist,
stretched over the eastern sky at early dawn. That mist, passing away,
may reveal the rising sun, or only disclose a darker cloud!
Paul started from that lovely countenance with affright. Her words
chilled his blood. So beautiful, and with no consciousness of a Better
World!
She was an Atheist. It was true. With all her beauty, her grace of
step, and magic of look and tone, she had no definite conception of a
future state, no actual belief in God. True, she prayed, but it was rather
a form of the lips than an inspiration from the heart. Her father, led
by his stern fanaticism, had reared her thus, and the end of all his
teachings
was to impress her only with the joy of existence in this world. The
Voice, speaking from the stillness of her chamber, completed this singular
education. All that was Religious in her nature, bent from its proper
tendency, became distorted into an insane Love, a grasping and boundless
Ambition.
That insane Love, that unlimited ambition, were centred in the image
of Paul of Ardenheim. She looked upon him as the embodied form of
her Thought. He was her Future, her Happiness, herif we may speak
it thusonly Hereafter.
Paul gazed sadly and with fixed eyes upon her glowing face. She
was near him; her voice broke like music over the silence of his cell;
her bosom swelled beneath the dark robe, and her tresses, agitated by the
wind which came through the aperture of the door, waved slowly to
and fro.
Thou art so very beautiful! he said, completely intoxicated by the
strange brightness of her eyesThy face so fair to look upon, thy voice
like the delicious music of a daybreak dream, thine eyes shining ever with
a light that seems to me like the brightness of a heavenly soul, and yet
thoueven thou
Shrinking from her gaze, he covered his face with his hands. He had
not the courage to complete the sentence. Even this beautiful woman,
with the voluptuous form and starry eyes, the voice that thrilled, and the
lips that glowed with the warmth of passion, even she must die! This
was his thought, but he could not speak it.
Absorbed in his reverie, Paul murmured to himselfThe white bosom
to the charnel, the grave worm upon the radiant brow! The voice that
thrills will be silent! There will be no light in the face, for that face will
be a skull, those eyes but hollow orbits, vacantdarksealed forever.
There was a hand upon his shoulder, and Paul heard her voice again.
Heard it in every low whispering accent, but could not raise his eyes.
`And thou must die!' This is your thought her voice grew
tremulous
,
nay, Paul felt the hand tremble, as it touched his shoulderIt is
true, I must die. But and her voice grew firm and strong again,
breaking in distinct emphasis on the listener's earBut not until my
Destiny is accomplishednot until our Fate is fulfilled!
How the triumph of her voice pierced the listener's ear, and made the
blood dance in his veins!
Life is before us, Paul, a goblet filled to the brim with love, with
power. Shall we refuse to drink it, Paul, ay, to the last drop, because
the goblet is held by a skeleton hand, or dash it down, untasted, because,
as we raise it to our lips, Death stands mocking as he gives the cup?
Radiant with beauty, she glowed before him, her eyes full of light, her
olive cheek glowing with fresh bloom.
Come, Paul. Do not falter now. To your task. The oaththe
injunction of the aged manthese are but a part of the ordeal, which
decides your fate and mine. Arise and seek your Destiny!
She laid her hand upon his arm, yes, upon the key clenched in his
right hand.
I am lostI tremblethere are Phantom forms before my eyes, and
strange music, like a chorus of angel's songs and the laughter of fiends,
rings without ceasing in my ears
Do you falter? Up, and know your fate. It is the hour, Paul, when,
from the Past and the Future, the shadows will roll aside, as a mist
from the dawning day. Pass the thresholdknow the mystery of the
Sealed Chamber, andPaulcanst thou not read my thought ere it is
spoken
Speak! Starting from his seat, Paul endeavored to read her meaning
in her eyes
This room shall be our Bridal Chamber, whispered the Wizard's
daughter.
And the hour of our Bridal Paul advanced a single step.
When you have passed the Ordeal. I will await you at the
threshold
of the Sealed Chamber
Our Bridal! echoed Paul, and grasping the light, he hurried from his
room, and in an instant stood in the corridor again
CHAPTER NINETEENTH.
THE THRESHOLD OF THE SEALED CHAMBER.
It
was not the moment for calm thought, for every vein swelled with
new life, and the heart within him throbbed with such violence, that even
in the cold corridor, he panted for breath, for air.
I will dare the worst, for you his voice was indistinct, hoarse
with emotion.
With a trembling hand he placed the key in the lock. The Wizard's
daughter regarded his ghost-like face with a look of glowing triumph.
Enter, she softly whisperedEnter and learn the Past and the
Future!
Paul turned the keythe door began to recedethe heavy air which
passed through the crevice, almost extinguished the light. That air
seemed tainted with the odor of the dead; it resembled a blast from the
unclosed jaws of a charnel.
The Wizard's daughter regarded him with an expanded eye, and love
and curiosity mingled in the expression of her beautiful face.
Do you falter now? she said.
There was a soft footstep, and a gentle hand raised the hand of the
woman from the neck of Paul. Between them glided a young girl, who
gathered a dark mantle around her white dress, and with her loosened
hair resting in a golden shower upon her shoulders, and her clear blue
eyes distended by a look of vague alarm, she gazed now in the face of the
voluptuous woman, now in the ashen visage of Paul.
Catherine! and he turned away from the innocence and angel-like
purity of his sister's face.
Paul, exclaimed the pure girl, in tones whose calm serenity by no
means resembled the impetuous accents of the dark-haired womanYou
stand on the threshold of the Sealed Chamber
There was a sad reproof in her gentle eyes.
The Sealed Chamberwhat know you of its mystery?
Do you frown upon me, Paul? Are you angry with your sister? An
hour ago, aroused from my sleep by the sound of father's voice, I saw
you kneeling at his feet, I heard your vow.O, Paul, you do not dream
of breaking that vow
More darkly swelled the serpentine vein upon the forehead of the
Wizard's daughter, as she beheld the pure face of Catherine, fired with a
holy emotion, as she clung to her Brother's neck.
He is not your father, she criedHe has in reserve for you a
Future darker even than the Past
The mild face of Catherine was turned toward the beautiful woman;
her blue eyes shone with wonder and alarm. She shrunk trembling from
the light of her flashing eyes.
This scene fills me with terror, Paul whispered the sister, clasping
her brother's wristCan it be? You stand on the threshold of the
Sealed Chamber, about to violate your oath!
CatherineCatherine groaned Paul, as the hand which grasped
the key fell nerveless by his side. I am terribly temptedmy will is
not my own
He turned wildly from that face, whose blue eyes, fair skin, and golden
hair, symbolized a pure and child-like soul, to the dark cheek, flashing
eyes, and jet-black hair, which embodied the idea of a proud and
voluptuous
spirit.
It was the eventful moment of his Fate; the calm love which came like
Peace from God, as he looked upon his sister's face, contended with the
frenzy of passion which fired every vein, as his glance encountered the
gaze of the dark-haired woman.
Come, Paulto your own roomit is an Evil Angel that stands so
beautiful by your side.
Paul surrendered his hand to the grasp of his sister, and turned his face
away from the door.
The eyes of the Wizard's daughter glared with a brightness that was
almost preternatural. With one proud step she advanced, her flashing
eyes and wildly floating hair, making her look like the spirit of some
feverish dream; she grasped his wrist, and pointed to the door, while the
dark vein swelled more distinctly from her fair forehead.
You are afraid! she sneered, pressing her nether-lip beneath her
white teeth, until the blood startedThe door is open, the threshold free,
and you are afraid to stand face to face with your Destiny! O, shame
upon me, that I ever sank so low, even in my thoughts, as to bestow my
love upon a coward heart like thine!
Your hand from my neck, sister, shrieked Paul, maddened by the
look of the proud maidenThere is no time for thought. I must go on
Grasping the light, which showed his convulsed countenance in every
lineament, he dashed over the threshold of the Sealed Chamber.
The door closed behind him, and all was darkness in the corridor.
Father! shrieked Catherine, but there was a firm hand upon her
mouth, a frenzied arm around her neck.
Be still, Catherine said the fierce though tremulous voice of the
strange woman. It is the dread moment of your brother's fate; be silent
therefore, or
Catherine struggled but feebly, as that arm wound closer about her neck,
while the firm hand rested upon her lips.
Or, if you must speak, let every word take the form of a prayer.
Kneel and beseech the Angels to guide your Brother in his lone
communion
with his fate!
All was thick night in the corridor. Catherine could not see the
burning
eyes of the strange woman, but she felt her writhing heart, as the arm
gathered her in a stifling embrace, and trembled as the fevered breath
fanned her cheek.
I will be silent, faltered the SisterI will kneel here in the
darkness
and pray for my lost Brother!
The strange woman's arm no longer entwined her neck.
Catherine sank on her knees, and folding her arms, looked up to
heaven. Even through the gloom and darkness, her pure soul reached
out its arms to God.
What pen is there to picture the horror of that moment to the Wizard's
daughter.
While her bosom bounded beneath her clasped hands, she muttered in
a half-coherent tone, her doubts and hopes mingling in strange confusion:
He will come forth, with joy on his noble forehead * * * * Have I
advised him to his ruin and shame * * * * Together we will mount the
steep pathway of ambition; he will be noble, and I shall be his bride,
his * * * * A terrible doubtshould the voice deceive * * * * All is still
I hear no sound * * * a crysilencea groan * * * Paul! Paul!
* * * No answer! Ah, this will kill meI can endure it no longer.
Better die a thousand deaths than be tortured by suspense so
horrible
!
And while the voluptuous girl murmured her hopes and fears, in accents
tremulous and broken, the pure Sister kneeling at her feet, prayed to
Heaven in a calm voice.
The voice of the old clock rolled through the Block-house, and Five!
pealed from the bell.
There was no sound within the Sealed Chamber; Catherine ceased
to pray, and bent her head against its panels, but could not hear the
slightest echo.
The proud girl too, sweeping her hair aside from her face, listened in
voiceless agony, listened for the accent of her lover's voice, for the echo
of his step. All was still.
Paul! cried the gentle voice of Catherine.
Paul! spoke the trembling accent of the Wizard's daughter.
No answer! Within the Sealed Chamber silence and mysteryin the
corridor darkness and suspenseit was an hour of unutterable anguish.
At last there was a soundCatherine uttered a prayer, and the
dark-haired
woman an exclamation of joy.
It was a groan of agony, and yet they were glad to hear it. Glad to
know that he lived!
A footstephe comes cried the Wizard's daughter.
It was a footstep, but unsteady and irregular as that of a man who,
bewildered by wine, reels from the hot air of the revel, into the cool, fresh
atmosphere of dawn.
The door unclosed, and Paul Ardenheim appeared on the threshold. In
one hand the light, in the other the key.
Catherine sank on the floor with a cry of horror. Even the woman
with dark hair and proudly voluptuous bosom, staggered backward, and
leaned for support against the opposite wall of the corridor. She buried
her face in her hands, while the insensible form of Catherine lay at her
feet.
The face of Paul Ardenheim thrilled the Wizard's daughter with a
feeling
of horror, beyond all power of language to define or analyze.
She heard the key turn in the lock, but could not raise her face from
her hands. He was passing near herhis wild unsteady step awoke the
echoesyet, winding the hair about her face, she shrunk closer to the wall,
afraid of his touch.
He was goneshe heard the echo of his footstep far down the corridor
shuddering she turned her face over her shoulder. She saw him as he
hurried along; his back was toward her; the light shone over his long
dark hair, but did not reveal his face.
He was near the end of the corridorshe saw the light shining upon
the face of the old clock, when the sound of an opening door was heard,
and a white-haired man came forth and stood in the path of Paul
Ardenheim
.
Back, old man! The Wizard's daughter heard the voice, saw the
extended
arm, and all was darkness. The light had been hurled to the floor.
By its last gleam, she beheld the old man's white hairs waving round
his forehead, as he tottered backward, while his face glowed redly for a
moment, and then with a dull sound he fell.
CHAPTER TWENTIETH.
THE CORSE OF MADELINE.
Very
beautiful! said the WizardEven in the last moment, when
the soul hangs fluttering on the motionless lips!
His voice, deepened by enthusiasm, awoke the echoes of the subter
ranean vault.
The pale spiritual light, shining from the aperture in the top of the altar,
bathed his face in its rays, while all around was shadowy, and the farther
corners of the cell were wrapt in thick darkness.
In that light, his features were marked and impressive. His form bending
with age and care, made his face appear as though it rested in the centre
of his shrunken chest. Covered with wrinkles, the lines deeply traced,
and the high forehead surmounted by a black skull-cap, from which the
hair escaped in straight flakes of silvery whiteness, the face of Isaac Van
Behme bore the stamp of a fanaticism, that was to terminate only with
his existence. The eyesin color now blue, now deepening into gray
were expanded beneath the white brow, with a wild, unearthly stare.
Around his thin lips trembled a smile of inexpressible joy.
Clad in a loosely flowing gown, with his pale hands, with long attenuated
fingers, clasped upon his breast, the old man stood near the altar; and as
the light imparted a rosy flush, his face appeared ten years younger; but
when it cast a glare of faint azure, he looked like a phantom, a Demon
summoned to his task of evil,like any thing but a living man.
His eyes, dilating with rapture, were downcast
It was a brave thought, right brave, by my soul! he murmured, with
a burst of shrill laughterTo use the horse of friend Dorfner, and place
her form upon it, and thus convey her to my home! The horse I turned
down the path by the streamDorfner will wonder much when he seeks
his horse to-morrow!Wherefore did the Huntsman strike that blow and
pierce her naked breast? Jealousy, I ween'Twas a good star that led
me to her side, just as the hunter struck the blow and fled, with the bloody
knife in his handa most propitious star! But I must not delaylook!
How the soul flutters as it is about to take its flight!
Near the altar a rough pine board was placed, supported by two rudely
constructed tressels.
On this board was laid the form of a naked woman, whose outlines
were distinctly defined, amid the shadows of the vault. The light shone
mildly over the image of sinless purity, revealing the hands stretched by
the side, the limbs disposed in the serene attitude of the grave, the face
wearing a calm smile, the eyelds closed, and the colorless cheeks relieved
by soft brown hair, which descended over the neck and shoulders. A
single lock strayed over the edge of the board and dangled on the floor.
It was like a form of pure white marble, warming into heavenly life,
under the chisel of some inspired sculptorso fair, so pale, so beautiful!
The face was pale, but a single spot of intense red burned in the centre
of each cheek, like a rose-bud peeping from the snow.
Beneath the bosom was a hideous stain of crimsonit was blood
flowing
from a fatal wound, and spreading imperceptibly over the rough board
on which the unconscious form was laid.
Poor Madeline!
There may have been no mercy in the eye of your Seducer, when he
gloated upon your half-revealed breast, but the cold eye that now gazes
upon your uncovered formis there any thing of pity in that fixed and
icy glare?
Her nether-lip moves gently, almost imperceptibly, and a slight
pulsation
stirs the bleeding breast.
She lives! The great Secret is within my grasp`one drop of blood,
warm from the heart of a tempted but sinless maiden,' will reward me for
these gray hairsfor the toil of twenty-one years,and ripen the liquid,
now simmering within the altar, into the Elixir of Immortal Life. It is a
glorious thought! Blessed be the Star that shines upon me at this still
hour!
Isaac examined the wound, which covered the lower part of Madeline's
breast with blood; his face became rigid in every outline as he pursued
his painful scrutiny.
The wound is not fatal! he said, with an accent of profound regret
The knife glanced aside. The hand that struck the blow was tremulous
with a little care, the maiden might recover, and go forth in youth and
loveliness again.
Isaac was silent. His brow became corrugated, his mouth distorted
by an almost grotesque grimace. He was occupied with dark and
dangerous
thoughts. Shall I falter now? When my footstep is on the
threshold of Eden, and the fruit of Immortal Life within my grasp? And
yet * * * a Murder * * * the world would cover my gray hairs with
scorn, the law consign me to the gibbet * * * not a child but would
curse my name. Yet, with the sacrifice of this
one life
, I may give life,
knowledge to thousands, and raise mankind to godlike power. Only a
life,a single lifenow fluttering on these lipsonly this, between me
and Eternal Youth!
More dark and singular grew the expression of Isaac's face. His
down-drawn
brows almost concealed the cold, icy glare of his eyes; his mouth
worked convulsively.
He glanced over the unconscious form, and saw the bosom swelling
with the first warm throb of returning life, while the rose-bud on the cheek
began to spread into perfect bloom.
I will get my scalpel, said IsaacIt is in the Tower. There is
no time to be lost!
Not once did he pause to contemplate the actual dangers of his position.
Might not the body of Madeline be traced to his home, and the guilt of
Murder be laid upon his gray hairs? This might occur before an another
hour, but the old man did not for a moment pause to think of it.
There is no time to be lost! he said, and while the bosom throbbed
slowly, and the rose-bud bloomed into a ripe flower, he hurried along the
floor and from the cell.
Five minutes elapsed ere the sound of his returning step aroused the
echoes of the vault.
The day is breaking, the day whose setting sun shall shine upon the
brow of an immortal being! Thus muttering, the old man came from the
gloom toward the altar, whose lightsuddenly changed from soft red to
faint azureinvested his agitated face with an unearthly glare.
Too much time has been lost already  it is but the sacrifice of a
life, and
Brandishing a scalpel or dissecting-knife in his upraised hand, he stood
in the pale blue light again, beside the altar in which the fire burned; the
sacred fire, that, in the long watch of a lifetime, had never once gone
out, or even been dimmed by the loss of one pure ray.
The cry of anguish which came from Isaac lips would have pierced a
heart of stone.
There was the rough board, stained with a small pool of blood, but the
body of Madeline was gone.
The Wizard's uplifted arm fell by his side; his face betrayed the
death-like
stupor which palsied his reason, and crushed his stern fanaticism
into a dull apathy.
He pressed his hands upon the board, and stained his fingers in the
blood
It is a delusion. The body is here, but mine eyesight is dim. No
footstep but mine and that of David the Idiot has ever crossed the
threshold
of this vaultit cannot, cannot have been taken away by human
hands!
With mad shrieks, gestures as frantic, the old man ran to and fro,
now lost to sight in the dark corners of the place, now tearing his thin
locks, while the light disclosed his horror-stricken features. In vain were
all his frantic cries, in vain his earnest searchthe body of the wounded
girl was nowhere to be seen.
How had she disappeared? Whose hands had borne her form from the
vault?
Isaac hurried from the place, while the dark passages echoed his frantic
cries. It was the work of a moment to ascent the stairway and attain
the ground-floor of the mansion. The lantern shone dimly from the
corridor
at the head of the main stairway. Without an instant's delay, Isaac
hastened up the stairway, and reached the door of his daughter's room.
He listened for a moment, pushed it open, and crossed the threshold.
The hanging lamp shed a faint light over the room, glimmering on the
surface of the mirror, and imparting a grotesque outline to the curtains
of the bed.
For a moment Isaac bent his head and listened. A death-like stillness
reigned. Rushing to the bed, he dashed aside the hangings and extended
his hand through the shadows. That withered hand rested upon a warm
cheek, and the regular breathing of an untroubled sleeper came gently to
the old man's ear.
It is well! My daughter slumbersshe cannot by any chance
have
With the sentence unfinished, the old man turned away, and hurried
from the room, closing the door with a sudden crash.
Scarcely had the echo of his footsteps died away, when a face appeared
amid the cumbrous hangings, and, by the faint light, the large lustrous
eyes and fair forehead, darkened by a swollen vein, were seen.
He does not suspect my absenceAh! My heart throbs as though
it would burst. How I shuddered, as, standing in the darkness of the
hall, only a moment since, I saw him go down into the secret cells of the
mansion!
And the Wizard's daughter, attired in her velvet robe, with the hood
drawn over her hair, rose from the bed, and slowly paced the floor.
Had I been a moment later, all would have been discoveredO, it is
indeed fortunate that I returned in time to fling myself beneath the coverlet,
ere my father came to my bedside! Had I been absent, when his
extended
hand sought to press my cheek
The proud girl shuddered, for there was something in the icy manner
and lonely life of the old man, which impressed her heart more with awe
than love.
Then, as she paced the floor, she suffered her dark hair to float loosely
over her shoulders, while her thoughts, only half-uttered, still centred
upon her lover
Paul! He will comeperchance within the hourwould that I
could unravel the mystery of that fatal room! Did he strike the old man
to the floor? I cannot tell, for his face'
She shuddered at the memory.
In the darkness I left the Block-house, and hurried through the silent
woods to my home. And Paulwhere does he wander now? Would
that he were here, his hand linked in mine, his lip upon mine own! Then,
even in the midst of our dream of love, we would plan the glorious
Future
,
and read the bright landscape of the coming years, with the eye of
Prophecy.
Do not smile at the passionate extravagance of the proud girl, who,
reared from infancy in the silence of these forestsalone with her
enthusiast
fatherafar from the great worldhas been taught, by a Voice that
speaks from the air, to love the mysterious Paul of Ardenheim, to invest
his face with the mad idolatry of a boundless passion!
Wild in her passion, extravagant in her words, she is yet surpassingly
beautiful, and might walk among the coronetted dames of a royal court,
and not feel abashed amid the noblest or the fairest of them all.
One hand rested upon her bosomit was firmly clenched. Her small
foot beat the floor with a nervous motion. The serpentine vein started
in black distinctness from her forehead, and, with her hair floating along
her olive cheeks, she stood in the centre of her chamber, near the light,
like a statue of some dread though beautiful Angel.
What means this singular agitation of my father? He cannotno!
no! Yet wherefore seek my chamber at the dead of night? It was but
an impulse of fatherly love.Paul! Will he ever return?
She crossed the floor with that proud step, which added a wild charm
to the voluptuous beauty of her shape, and, standing in the casement, saw
the first blush of the coming day, glowing softly over the dark woods.
The rays of the lamp and the flush of the dawn mingled, and created a
light at once uncertain and spectral.
Hast thou beheld him? a low, musical voice, started the Wizard's
daughter from her reveries.
It is the Voice ejaculated the ambitious girlI have beheld him.'
Did he enter the Sealed Chamber? Had he the firmness to look the
Future in the face?
He entered the Sealed Chamber, exclaimed the Wizard's child.
Didst thou see him come forth again?
I did she covered her face with her hands, and trembled at the
memory of that Face.
Where is he now?
I know not! Speak to me and answer! and, with her brow darkened
by a frown, the girl advanced to the centre of the roomIt is my turn to
question, yours to reply. Hast thou not spoken falsely? Hast thou not
cheated my soul with an idle delusion? If thou art indeed a voice from
some good Angel who watches over the strange course of my life, then
tell me at once the mystery of that Sealed Chamber! Wherefore that
awful countenance? wherefore the arm extended and the blow? Where
is he now, this Paul of Ardenheim, whose life is linked with mine own?
It was a singular thing to see the proud girl, gazing upon the vacant
air, as she thus boldly questioned the Voice whose source was invisible,
whose purpose incomprehensible
There was a pause; no answer came.
The Wizard's daughter placed her hand upon her forehead, and with
her finger pressed the swollen vein.
All will be made known to thee in time! was the response of the
Voice, uttered in a tone of profound sadness.
Ahit is a delusion. I am dreaming. Yes, reared afar from the
world, I have become the victim of my own fancies. I have oftentimes
read of madnessam I not a wretched maniac, an object of pity and
loathing?
Thou art not the victim of idle frenzy, but the child of a glorious
Destiny. Be patient, and all will be well.
Hast thou ever dared to
penetrate
the recesses of thy father's most secret cell?
This last question, uttered in a tone that seemed affected by sudden
emotion, startled the beautiful girl, with involuntary surprise.
Never! she replied.
Hast thou not this very night crossed the sacred threshold of that
cell? Pause and reflect. Do not speak falsely, for more than life depends
upon your answer.
I have never crossed that threshold was the firm answer of the
wondering maiden.
The Voice was heard no more.
While the kiss of day grew rosier on the eastern sky, the girl remained
motionless and pale in the centre of her chamber, listening in speechless
intensity for the accents of that Voice, but no sound awoke the echoes. All
was still and breathless. Her face was very pale, the serpentine vein
upon her forehead very dark and distinct, as she turned toward her
couch.
Meanwhile, the Wizard, after a fruitless search through every nook and
recess of his mansion, returned again to the silence and dim radiance of
his earth-hidden cell. Advancing to the altar, he started as he beheld a
dark form crouching at his feet.
The Idiot here! Wretch! Hast thou dared to cross this threshold
unbidden?
He spurned the hunchback with his foot
Arise, and answer me! Didst thou remove the body of the dead
girl?
While his thin features glowed with rage, he gazed upon the shapeless
form of the Deformed, and once more pressed his foot upon his neck.
Black David slowly rose, and with the tangled hair drooping over his
features, confronted the old man.
Eh! Measter? he mutteredDost touch Black David with thy foot?
Art angry, Measter? Have a careBlack David's brain is thickbut his
arm is strong. Measter must not strike him in anger.
The Wizard saw the angry light of the hunchback's eye, and took him
kindly by the hand
Pardon, David, pardonI am sore distressed. The great hope of
my life is crushedbut you cannot comprehend me. Speak to me,
Davidit grieves me that I was angry with youspeak, my friend.
Didst thou remove the body of the dead woman? Tell me where thou
hast hidden it, and all shall be forgotten. Ha, ha, you merry knave! You
thought you would frighten your old masteris it so?
Dead body? growled Black DavidI know nothing of your dead
bodies. I was asleepand thou didst spurn me with 'ee foot
Sullenly the Deformed turned away, leaving the old man alone by the
altar.
He has not taken her away muttered IsaacIt is plainly to be
seen that the poor idot has had no part in this deed
And while the Wizard, standing near the altar, murmured these words,
the Deformed leaned against one of the pillars of the vault, and placed his
hands upon his face
This hope has failed me. The body of Madeline is goneI know
not whither. Isaac cannot tellhis anguish is too deep to be feigned.
His daughter, tooAh! that in planning so much of evil to others,
I only bring evil to myself!
Isaac heard the voice of the Deformed, and, turning from the altar,
exclaimed
Come hither, Black David. Art angry with me?
He took the hand of the hunchback within his own, and led him
toward the light.
Why man, dost thou cherish malice? Again I tell thee that it grieves
me that I was angered with thee. Hah! What is thisa tear!
A scalding tear fell on his hand as he spoke; and even through the
tangled
hair, he saw that the face of the hunchback was bathed in moisture.
Dost weep? Art angry with me still? again repeated the old man,
an expression of compassion softening his rigid lineaments.
But the Deformed dashed his hand aside, and glided into the shadows
of the cell.
The silence which ensued was scarcely broken by a sound, while half
an hour elapsed. The pale face of the Wizard looked haggard and
spectral
by the light of the altar-flame. He stood clasping his hands and
gazing vacantly toward the light, every lineament impressed with despair.
The Deformed was lost in the shadows; his sorrow, too deep for
tended or for tears, was buried in the profound gloom of the cell.
At last a sound disturbed the stillness. Its unearthly emphasis came
through closed doors and thick walls, and broke upon the silence of the
14
cell, like the groan of a dying man, choked by the hand of a foe; a hand
which pressed the white lips and smothered the last cry of life, ere it
was uttered. Low, indistinct muttering, that sound pierced the thick
walls; it seemed to the Wizard as though the old mansion was suddenly
endued with life; as though he heard the throbbings of its heart.
The Wizard's daughter approached the bed. Parting the curtains, she
suffered the light to penetrate the gloom which hung over her couch.
Very beautiful she looked as she laid aside her robe of velvet and fur,
and suffered the dark hair to stream freely over her bosom. With the
name of Paul upon her lips, she sank upon the pillow, drawing close the
curtains, so that no ray of light might break the gloom of the sacred
retreat.
Soon she resigned herself to slumber; but in her slumber there came
a dream of a shadowy path, leading far down into the nooks of a summer
wood. There were threads of sunshine quivering over the sod; flowers
peeped from the vines that trailed among the branches; the murmur of
trees, and birds, and streams, woven together, fell on her senses like the
blessing of good angels. But suddenly, from the flowers which,
trembling
from the vines, overarched her way with bloom and fragrance,
projected
the head and fangs of a beautiful serpent. She started away with
horror, but an inexplicable fascination drew her near and nearer to the
snake, whose skin of bright green was varied by drops of gold. A dreamy
music issued from its expanded jaws; there was a strange fascination in
its eyes. Unable to advance or recede, she stood spell-bound, when the
serpent sprang from the leaves, and buried its fangs in her bosom. She
saw the blood, she felt the coil of the snake about her neck, and
The dream was gone, but in its place, a terrible reality. Buried in the
pillow, with her couch shrouded by the hangings, she felt a hand upon
her breast, and heard the sound of deep-drawn breath. Her blood grew
cold; she could not speak or move; the overwhelming terror held her
dumb.
The hand was thereshe heard the deep-drawn breathand panted
for air, as though the chamber was filled with the atmosphere of
pestilence
.
She would have given the world for the power to move or speak; there
was something fearful in the darkness which encompassed her, in the cold
hand which pressed her bosom, in the deep-drawn breath which was
heard distinctly through the stillness. Her senses were deadened by a
sudden stupor, which, while it left her without speech or motion, also left
her painfully conscious of the cold hand laid upon her breast. * * * *
By a violent effort, she dashed aside the curtains of her bedall was
dark in her chamber. The curtains, closed over the window, shut out
the light of the dawning day; the hanging lamp was extinguished. As
she rose in the couch, the hand which had rested upon her bosom,
pressed her neckshe was nerved by despair and terrorwith one
frenzied motion, she sprang from the bed.
Standing thus in the shadows of her chamber, her form, only
half-covered
,
quivering with cold, she gazed toward the bed, whose outlines
were but faintly distinguishable, and listened for that almost inaudible
sound of deep-drawn breath. She heard it once moreit seemed like
the gasping of a death-stricken man.
Then her terror found utterance in a shriek which pierced every nook
and chamber of the old mansion.
Trembling in the centre of the room, afraid to move toward the bed or
toward the window, the light of the dawn growing stronger every
moment
,
she looked fixedly toward the bed. Was it a fancy? Did she
indeed
behold a white arm extended from the shadows of of the bed?
There came a light, a red light, somewhat obscured by heavy smoke,
it flashed from the opened door, and disclosed that half-naked form, the
face unnaturally pale and the eyes bright with preternatural fear.
The maiden turned toward the door, and by the sudden light beheld the
pale visage of her father, glowing in every line with singular triumph.
Over his shoulder appeared the face of the Deformed, the eyes shining
with supernatural lustre from the shadows of the matted hair.
And then, turning her gaze from the door, as she beheld the eyes of
her father and the Deformed enchained by some object near her, the
Maiden beheldnot the image of Paul Ardenheim, nor yet some hideous
spectre summoned by blasphemous rites from the shadows of the Other
World.
It was a naked form, with arms folded over the blood-stained breast,
with brown hair waving freely, in glossy curls, over the white shoulders;
eyes uplifted, wet with tears, gazed in the face of the Wizard's child, and
a voice broken by the very intensity of fear, thrilled on the silence
Save me! Save me! For I have no friend, no hope but in you
It was Madeline, the Orphan Girl of Wissahikon.
END OF BOOK FIRST.
EPISODE.
FROM JANUARY, 1775, TO JUNE, 1777.
Two
years pass away. The Manuscripts from which this history is
taken have not a word to say in regard to the period that elapsed from the
first of January, 1775, until some time in June, 1777. A shadow rests
upon the history of the Wissahikon during that perioda shadow
unbroken by a solitary ray.
Not a word of the fate of Paul, nor of the Wizard's child, nor of
Madeline
,
the orphan girl,there is silence and night upon the Wissahikon,
while these years pass away.
The Manuscript speaks in full and terrible details of the last night of
1774; but after that nightso crowded with incident and fateis over,
there is a blank until June, 1777. It is therefore in June, 1777, that we
are to take up again the broken thread of our narrative.
From the 1st of January, 1775, to June, 1777,who shall dare write
the history of that time, not in regard to the Wissahikon and its people,
but in relation to the American Continent?
Two years and six months!In times of peace, when traffic freezes
every noble pulsation of man into a dull torpor, or only excites the soul
into a feverish lust for gold, this space of time might pass, without one
event more glorious than a rise in the price of dry-goods, or one thought
higher than the cobwebs of the counting-house.
But this was no time for mere men of traffic, nor was it an age for puny
politicians. It was the time of men; the age of noble thoughts; the
epoch of deeds inspired by God.
When the year 1775 began, a Continent lay trembling in suspense, its
happiness or its ruin hanging upon the changes of a crowned Idiot's health.
The destiny of three millions, the fate of hundreds of millions, yet
unborn, depended upon the health of an Idiot. It looks absurd, but it
is true.
Behold him, ranging the half-lighted corridor of yonder palace, his
receding forehead impressed with the curse which hangs upon his race,
his eye glassy and vacant, his nether-lip trembling in a meaningless
smile. There are beautiful pictures on those lofty walls; the light
streams through windows which are shadowed by curtains of silk and
gold; before and behind the wandering Idiot are ranges of lofty chambers,
furnished with every thing that can please a royal eye, or wake a royal
soul from the torpor of satiety into one quick pulse of sensation.
There is Royalty in the very atmosphere; Royalty glares upon him in
the sunshine; it broods in the silence of those great and shadowy rooms;
and the Idiot wandering from room to room, from corridor to corridor, is
King of EnglandKing of the eighth part of the World; the Arbiter of
the fate of America, and its three millions of people!
Is the crowned Idiot cheerful to-day? Then a few guineas are given
to the beggars who clamor in the kennels near his palace gates, and an
army of licensed cut-throats is hurried over the waters, to crush the three
millions of America into silence and slavery.
Is he gloomy? Has the last prescription of the royal physician failed
to quicken his blood, and clear the fog of his brain? Has the curse of
his reason developed itself in grotesque forms? Does he see foul
reptiles creeping over the rich carpet at his feet, or behold himself
encircled by a throng of hideous phantoms?
Then woe to America! woe to Ireland! woe to Man! For at once, in
obedience to the commands of this poor wretch, who is more miserable
with his crown, than the vilest leper of St. Giles with his rags, armies
hurry to and fro, crushing into dust, into blood, the hopes of millions of
mankind.
The Ministers of State are listening near the door of the Idiot's
chamber; they are awaiting for his commands. Upon the words which
fall from his lips, hangs the fate of England, Ireland, Scotland, America;
the fate of one-eighth of the entire globe.
For he is King.
King
! Pursued by the curse which has descended
from age to age upon his race; frightened in his royal chambers by the
phantoms of a maniac's frenzy; afraid of the motes that float in the sun;
afraid of the shadow on the wall, he is yet a King; and the drivelling of
his Idiot's lip is law and fate to some hundred millions of souls.
Beautiful picture of the divine right of Kings!
These fits of frenzy, this torpor of idiotic vacancy, which by turns
possess the Monarch, are known only to the few who are admitted to his
privacy; known only to some nine or ten persons in a hundred millions.
Yet he is King, by Grace of God too, commissioned by Heaven to tax,
and murder, and maim the human race, to convert whole nations into
sepulchres, and drain the life-blood from a million hearts.
And yet they tell us that there is no beauty in Royalty, nothing
sublime
in the atmosphere inhaled by Kings!
In all the pages of history, there is no picture which for a moment will
compare with this solitary Fact:
In 1775, George, the grandson of George the Second, was King of
England; that is to say, King of England, Scotland, Ireland, America,
and India. He was thirty-eight years of age. He was subject to
moments of unutterable gloom; now threatened with madness, now
torpid with blank idiocy. Of this fact, his subjects knew nothing; if a
vague rumor crept abroad, it was crushed at once, as a blasphemy.
In
lucid intervals, that i to say, when idiocy quickened for an instant into
thought, or madness became for a moment calm, he governed the eighth
part of the world, and decided the fate of the millions who then existed, and
stamped his impress upon the fate of hundreds of millions yet unborn
.
Is it not a beautiful thought?
Summon all the horrors of history; crowd into one page the
accumulated
crimes of a thousand years, and still you have nothing half so
horrible
as this solitary factthat an Idiot, whose idiocy is unknown to the
world, should decide, by the drivellings of his idiocy, the fate of millions
of immortal souls; souls born of God, redeemed by Christ; every one
as precious in the sight of Heaven as the soul of any King that ever
lived.
O for a high mass, chanted by devils, amid the carnage of a battle-field,
in honor of the Divine Right of Kings!
It was this Idiot King who, in 1775, held in his handunder the
royal pen, agitated by the tremors of lunacy  the fate of America.
At his command, the leper of the jail and the cut-throat of St. Giles,
the starved wretch of the factory, and the peasant of the fieldall
assumed the scarlet uniform, took sword and bayonet, were disciplined
into all the minute details of murder, and sent over the ocean to assert the
Divine Right of the King among the valleys of the New World.
Wherefore? Because the people of the New World refused to pay a
tax, or would not do obeisance to the petty ministers who encircled the
petty King? No. This does not comprise the whole truth of the
contest
.
It was, in a word, because King George of England wished to bind
the land of the New World to his crown, as his property, his own
especial
domain, subject to every impulse of his will, and to the caprices of
all KingsIdiots or Murdererswho might come after him.
The people of America did not recognise with any favor this idea of the
King.
Therefore, roughly clad in the garb of farmer and mechanic, they met
the vassals of the King, on a pleasant day in April, 1775, and shot them
from the shelter of the hedge by the roadside, and confronted them in the
centre of the highway, opposing their rude fowling-pieces to the glittering
arms of the royal soldiers.
The day was April 19th, and the place was Lexington.
The blood, smoking on the roadside and in the fields of Lexington,
spoke to the hearts of millions, and roused a people into arms.
It was on the 10th of May, 1775, that a band of farmers and mechanics
with here and there a lawyer or a rich man, assembled in Philadelphia,
and were known as the Continental Congress. This congress, with
professions
of love for the King, coupled scorn for his Ministers, and
resistance
to his laws. They were yet in that twilight which descends upon
the souls of men, just before the daybreak of freedom. Joined to England
by ties of ancestry, by the language of Shakspeare and Milton, by English
customs and English laws, they trembled at the idea of a separate destiny.
They were afraid of independence.
And while the Congress of the New World was in session in
Philadelphia
,
there came to Boston another British Army, sent by the British
Kingin one of his lucid intervals perchanceand with this army were
gallant soldiers, Clinton, Burgoyne and Howe. This was on the 25th
of May, 1775.
But, on a clear starry night in June, there were shadows moving on the
hill and along the shore; there were boats upon the waves, and the
subdued
tread of armed men broke through the stillness. Then there was,
all at once, the peal of musquetry mingled with the hurrah of conflict;
there were smoke-clouds rolling into the sky, like shrouds for the dead;
there was fighting on the hill-top, where peasants, behind a bank of
mud, levelled whole lines of splendid soldiers into dust;there was a
brave young man, named Warren, who grappled the bayonet that stabbed
him, and poured forth his blood upon the grass as a holy oblation unto
freedom.
The British were driven back, defeated and mocked by a peasant army,
encamped near Boston, on the heights of Bunker Hill.
That word, Bunker Hill, coupled with the name of Warren, spoke like
the voice of God to the Continental Congress and to the people of the
Thirteen Provinces.
Blood had been shed; Lexington found an echo in Bunker Hill; there
was no time for hesitation; no thought of submission.
The Congress determined to raise an army. Where should a leader be
found? The British King had generals of renown, who were skilled in
shedding blood, perfect in the art of leading uniformed slaves to deeds of
Murder. But where should the Continental Congress find a leader for
their peasant army?
It was a question of awful moment. There was no time for hesitation,
however, and the eyes of the farmers and mechanics, the rich men and
the lawyers, who composed the Continental Congress, were turned
towards one of their number. He was a man of forty-three years of age.
His stature was commanding; his face full of energy and fire. He was
a man to be remarked in a crowd of ten thousand. Not often did
he speak, but his words were concise and to the pointevery word
embodied
an idea, and overwhelmed with its truth the hearts of all who
listened. This man, plainly attired in the garb of a planter, was chosen
as the Leader of the Continental armies. He sat listening to a speech,
which rung in words of fire from the lips of bold John Adams, and the
last word of the speech was his own name. Covered with blushes, the
Planter fled from the Hall of Congress; but soon the people of Thirteen
Provinces recognized their champion in the person of this Virginian
Planter, and King Georgemay be in one of his lucid intervalsheard,
for the first time, the name of George Washington.
Then began the epoch of illustrious deeds. The young Commander
Washington, secluded in his tent near Cambridge, surveyed the map of
the New World, and laid his sword upon it, the hilt resting upon
Labrador
,
while the point touched Patagonia, thus symbolizing the great purpose
of his soulthe possession of the Continent of freemen.
From this camp near Cambridge went, one autumn day, a man who
was bold enough to think of the conquest of Canada. He was followed
by eleven hundred men. He was determined to traverse three hundred
miles of untrodden wilderness with this little army, and then attack the
Gibraltar of America, the rock of Quebec. He did traverse the
wilderness
;
ice, snow, trackless ravines, impetuous torrents, days of starvation,
and nights of hopeless extremityall these he dared, he and his band of
iron men.
On the last night of 1775, he stood on the rock of Quebec, under a
leaden sky, his uniform whitened by the fast-falling snow. He took by
the hand a youthful soldier, whose handsome face was contrasted with the
bold outlines of his own visage. They plighted faith together; they swore
to meet in Quebec in victory or in death. On the rock which had borne,
not fifteen years before, the corses of Montcalm and Wolfe, the little army
of Continentals prepared to attack and possess Quebec. This was when
the daybreak was yet faint and dark, while the St. Lawrence, heaving
sullenly under rocks of ice, was whitened by the falling snow.
When the day was bright, and the sun shone vividly over the City and
rock, covered by frozen snow, there was a mangled body amid five other
corses on Cape Diamond. It was the wreck of the youthful soldier,
Richard Montgomery.
There were heaps of dead by the St. Charles; dismal stains of blood
upon the barriers; corses and wounded in the dark streets of Quebec.
There was the soldier of the wilderness, covered with wounds, and fighting
as he sank upon the frozen snow, fighting on, until his sight was dim, his
arm stiffened. His name was Benedict Arnold.
The attack was glorious, though unsuccesful; the Americans did not
possess the town, but they won another name. To Bunker Hill and
Lexington they added Quebec. These names are greater than armies in
a good cause.
And all the while, as the hand and brain of Washington gave impulse
to the Continental armies, as battle after battle added to the list of King
George's victims, and the smoke of the conflict ascended to heaven, with
the souls of the dead, the Americans were fighting, not for Independence,
but for a change in the British Ministry. They were still afraid of that
word, Independence.
While Arnold fell covered with wounds, and Montgomery lay a crushed
and bloody image upon the rock of Quebec, there was a battle fighting in
another part of the Continent. It was a fearful battle. It was not a
battle fought with musquet and cannon, or with scalping-knife and
tomahawk
;
nor were armies of men called up on gory fields, opposed to each
other's throats, and set upon each other like rabid beasts, in this contest.
No! It was a battle fought by one man, his only weapons a quill,
some sheets of paper, and a bottle of ink.
While Arnold was bleeding in Quebec, this man was sitting in a
garret in Philadelphia, surveying certain loose sheets of paper, which
were crowded with the intense workings of his brain for the last six
months. From June until December, he had been engaged in this battle;
that is to say, he had been embodying upon those loose sheets of paper,
an idea which would work more judgment, more ruin for King George,
than all the armies of the world.
While the last groan of Montgomery arose to God from the dark rock
of Quebec, this man in the Philadelphia garret gazed upon his
manuscripts
,
and, with a brightening eye, beheld the idea which was to
conquer
King George embodied in a single word.
Soon the news of Quebec came to Philadelphia, and soon the
manuscripts
of the unknown, poured into the alembic of the printing-press,
appeared
in the shape of a Book.
The name of that Book was in itself a Battle. To Bunker Hill,
Ticonderoga, Lexington, Quebec, the American people now added the
name of the book,
Common Sense
.
The Idea of that book entered Congress, and spoke to the hearts of the
great men there, and awed the little men into silence. To Jefferson, to
Adams, to Franklin, to Sherman, and to all who were like them, the idea
spoke in the still small voice of a Truth, armed with the omnipotence
of God.
At last the Idea fought its battle in the hall of Congress, and it became
embodied forever in the word,
Independence
.
On a calm summer evening, the 9th of July, 1776, the Continental
troops encamped near New York, were informed by their General, that
the American Congress had declared these Colonies to be Free and
Independent
States.
The names grew on the scroll of American glory. Another name,
enshrining a thought even as body does a soul, was added to Lexington
Bunker Hill, Quebec, Common Sense. It was a name that was the
result
of all the other names, and the embodiment of allIndependence.
The King of England, in one of his lucid intervals, heard of this word,
proclaimed from the Council Hall of the New World, and chorused by
the battle-cries of Armies. Even as Pharaoh of a more ancient kingdom,
grew more blind and drunk with fury, as the hour of God's judgments
came near and nearer, so King George vented his royal rage in new
measures
,
new armies, new assassinations.
It was toward the close of 1776, that the darkest cloud gathered over
the Idea of a Nation. Independence seemed doomed to vanish in
mists of blood. There was ice upon the Delaware, near Trenton. Did
this ice freeze into one compact mass, and spread a firm pathway from
shore to shore? Then the cause of the New World was lost. Upon so
slight a fact hung the destiny of Washington and the cause.
For, on the eastern shore of the river, was the British Army, strong in
arms, in discipline, very comfortable, with well-spread tables and fine
apparel.
On the western shore, with a mob of half-clad men, was Washington,
with scarce a place in which to lay his head, scarce a roof to shelter his
starving soldiers. To nakedness and starvation, hovering like spectres
about his camp, was added a sadder and darker phantomTreason.
Upon the freezing of the Delaware, therefore, depended the fate of
Washington and the cause. The river once frozen from shore to shore,
these Britons and Hessians, cozily encamped in Trenton, will cross on
the ice, and make an easy prey of the starving mob who skulk along the
western hills.
There was a God in Heaven, at this dark hour, and Washington did not
despair. His men suffering from hunger and cold, Treason scowling
upon his camp, Congress almost hopeless of the cause, Washington did
not despair. He even wished to add another name to Bunker Hill,
Lexington
,
Quebec, Common Sense, Independence.
Therefore, some time in the dark hours of Christmas Night, he placed
his starving men in boats. He besought them to look to the priming of
their guns, and keep their powder dry. That is, such of them as had
guns and powder. Those who were destitute of powder and guns,
almost destitute of rags, took such arms as they could findperchance a
broken sword, maybe a rusted bayonet.
While the British and the Hessians were combating legions of turkeys,
parallelograms of roast beef, and hogsheads of ale,cozily keeping their
drunken Christmas in TrentonWashington came upon them with his
starving mob.Ere the dawn was bright, another name was written
beside
Bunker Hill, Lexington, Quebec, Common Sense and Independence.
Trenton
!
And thus, enlivened now and then by a sudden glare, the dreary Night
of Revolution passed on. The day was to brighten at last, but there were
still many dark hours between Washington and the light of perfect
freedom.
It is June, 1777. How stands the cause of freedom now?
We may not enter into all the details of the history of our land; let us
compress some events of the Future into pictures. June is now in
blossom
what
says the autumn and the winter, of the cause of freedom?
Gaze along this meadow, embosomed in the foliage of a lovely valley,
gemmed with orchards, and sparkling with a stream of clear cold water.
There is sunshine upon the tops of the trees, and shadow all around.
From clusters of forest trees, gray stone walls are visible; the walls of
peaceful homes, protected by the solitude of this world-hidden valley. Is
it not one of those scenes which speak to the soul of quietpeace
unutterable
peaceand mock the petty greatness of wealth, the swelling
vanity of ambition, to scorn?
And this peaceful valley, secluded from the world, shut up in its own
loveliness, will soon be rich in graves. There will be cold faces in the
light of a setting sun; the grass will be wet with a bloody rain; the stream
crimson. And this will be, ere the blossoms on yonder trees have
ripened into fruit.
For it is the valley of the
Brandywine
.
There is a house of dark gray stone, standing in a sort of rural majesty,
at the eastern extremity of a smooth green lawn. To the north and to
the south, from this mansion, spread the tenements of a quiet town,
whose gables peep from gardens and orchard trees. Upon the roof of
the stone mansion lingers the last ray of the June sun, and not a breeze
is there to shake the white blossoms from the boughs, or stir into motion
the smooth verdure of the lawn.
Ere these trees are touched by winter, yes, as they are clad in the
rainbows of autumn, there will be some hundreds of dead bodies stretched
in horrible confusion over this lawn, in all the grotesque shapes of sudden
and violent death.
For the mansion is
Chew's House
, and the village is called
Germantown
.
Behind these pictures of the pleasant valley of Brandywine, and
the town of Germantown, I see a range of snow-clad hills, crowned with
huts, and crowded with half-naked and famine-stricken men. A name is
written thereit speaks of suffering that has no tongue, of anguish only
to be soothed by tears of bloodfor that name is
Valley Forge
.
We will follow the thread of this singular history of the olden time,
and while we learn the fate of Paulof the Wizard's childof Madeline
we may perchance behold some traces of the fight of Brandywine,
some tokens of Germantown, and come at last to the huts and snow
of Valley Forge. We may, perchance, converse with Washington, and
take by the hand the Boy-General, Gilbert La Fayette.
But neither the great facts, nor the great names of general history,
shall win us from the individual narrative of the Wissahikon people. Let
us translate the dark cyphers of the ancient recordlet us give voice and
speech to the dim Chronicle of old.
Shall we behold Paul of Ardenheim again? Even now I behold that
bronzed face, shadowed by dark hair, lighted by eyes, whose strange
lustre awes and wins the hearts of men. Even now I see the pure
spiritual manhood of that virgin soul battling with the physical realities
of life, with the base and gross temptations of the world.
Shall the spirit of the Dreamer come forth from the ordeal, without
blemish or scar?
But even as we ask the question, Paul is a perjured and dishonored
Man, for an overwhelming thought crowds upon our souls. The Sealed
Chamber, and the secret, which drove Paul out into the world, a scorner
of his father's gray hairs, with the stain of Perjury upon his soul!
A secret armed with supernatural power, darkened by mystery, as
impenetrable
as the blackness which rests upon the World beyond the
Grave!
We may enter the old Monastery once again. We may read the name
of the Deliverer concealed in the Urn. Gathering courage for our task,
we may even confront that door whose dark panels are traced with the
sign of the Cross. And then but a step between us and the Secret of the
Sealed Chamber. Shall we look upon that fatal mystery?
Shall the Deformed, now known as Black David, now as the Invisible,
ever rush before our path again, like a lurid cloud before the light of a
summer day?
Winding among those quiet shades, and by those still waters of the
Wissahikon, shall we chance upon a new-made grave, and find upon a
rustic tombstone the name of
Madeline
?
Jovial Peter Dorfner, with beard of snow and cheeks of flame, shall we
ever talk with thee again, or sit beside thy broad hearth and quaff deep
draughts to Christmas Eve?
Or the Wizard's child, so queenly in her bearing, so like a spirit in her
starry loveliness, with her dark eyes fired by ambition and love, with the
serpentine vein swelling like a prophecy upon her browshall we ever
behold the beautiful Atheist again?
The Wizard himself, a haggard old manold before his time,
and withered by fanaticism into premature decayshall we converse
with him once more, and learn the result of his life-long meditation?
Is his dream of Immortal Life upon earth only a dream? or shall he
appear before us, clad in the vigor of young manhood, irresistible with the
power of boundless wealth.
Then another face comes faintly to our view; the face of the aged
man, who, companioned only by his children, waited in the Block-house
of Wissahikon, not for the secret of immortal life on earth, or for the
power of unbounded wealth, but for the coming of the Kingdom of the
Lord. We have seen him reel beneath the blow of his son; we have seen
that son rush forth from the Monastery, with the stamp of Fate upon
his forehead. Does the old man yet survive?
Treading gently through the dim corridors of the Block-house, shall
we once more meet the vision of that gentle face, with blue eyes and long,
flowing, golden hair?
We may behold the Secret Brotherhood again, assembled in
mysterious
council, and bound to blind obedience by oaths too blasphemous for
repetition. A strange Brotherhood, with Lodge rising into Lodge,
Degree above Degree,an inexplicable complication of
castes
, controlled
by One Man. That solitary ruler, either Gilbert the huntsman, or the
Deformed, or yet, perchance, some man altogether new to our sight.
These questions start to our lips, as we stand upon the threshold of a
new Epoch in our history; these, and a thousand others, full of the same
pervading interest and mystery.
Let us translate the dusk cyphers of the ancient recordlet us give
voice and speech to the dim Chronicle of old.
BOOK THE SECOND.
THE
SECRET
OF THE
SEALED CHAMBER.
CHAPTER FIRST.
AFTER TWO YEARS.
Under
an arbor fresh with vines, and fragrant with flowers, sat Peter
Dorfner, his rotund form resting in a stout oaken chair. It was a very
pleasant thing to note the contrast between his red cheeks and white
beard, and the deep green of the leaves, the varied tints of the flowers.
Before him was placed a table of unpainted oak, on which sundry
suspicious
bottles stood like the sentinels of the scene. And half-closing his
eyes, with his limbs resting on a bench, old Peter resigned himself to the
calm delights of rum and tobacco.
It was a pleasant arbor, standing at one end of the garden, near the
farm-house, whose closed doors and windows looked black and desolate
beneath the cheerful light of the summer sun.
It must be confessed, that old Peter was surrounded by all the delights
that can render a man peaceful with himself and the world. Lulled by
the unceasing murmur of the bees, who sung their songs among the
flowers, with the fragrance of new-mown hay stealing gently over the
fields, Peter Dorfner, with his red cheeks and snowy beard, his capacious
form spreading lazily in the oaken chair, looked altogether like a picture
of some corpulent satyr of Grecian story, clad in brown cloth, with a pipe
in its mouth, and a bottle of rum near its hand. Or, in case this
comparison
should seem unjust, we might compare him to some Hermit of the
middle ages, who disgusted with the vanity of the world, had retired to
some secluded forest, and sworn a solemn oath, to devote himself forever
to fatness and sleep, those cardinal duties of the monks of old.
Beyond the garden, amid whose plants and flowers the arbor rose, a
green field smiled in the June sunbeams, and stretched to the south and
west in gentle undulations, until it was bounded by the summer woods.
Strong men, with arms bare and scythe in hand, toiled among the grass,
scattering swarths of fragrant hay as they hurried along. Tired cattle
were grouped in the shade, on the verge of the wood; aldermanic oxen
and matronly cows, snuffing the scent of the new-mown hay, from which
they were separated by that kind of rural architecture, known in grave
annals
as Worm Fence. Now and then, the sound of the whetstone
applied
to the scythe, came merrily over the field, mingled with the lowing
of cattle, and the subdued murmur of the hidden stream.
Summer was upon the scene, in all the freshness and beauty of June.
There was a serene sky, only varied by passing clouds, who turned their
white bosoms to the sun, and floated slowly over the woods. There
was a drowsy fragrance in the very air, a fulness of intoxicating odours;
and the bees among the flowers, the lowing cattle grouped in the shadows,
the clang of the scythe, and the indistinct sound of the wood-hidden
Wissahikon
,
formed the music of the scene, a very lulling music altogether,
full of summer and voluptuous as June.
But the old farm-house looked sad and deserted. There were green
vines trailing about its steep roof, and flinging their leaves, their flowers,
from the very point of the high gable; the chesnut tree was glorious with
verdure, but the doors of the farm-house, the closed shutters, gave it a
lonely and desolate appearance.
Secluded in the arbor, his only companions the pipe and the bottles,
Peter Dorfner took his ease, and winked sleepily at care, as though there
was never a thing like trouble in the world.
Two years have passed since we beheld him last, two years full of
interest
and incident, and the face of Peter discloses more wrinkles about
the eyes, more fatness in the cheeks, a sublimer rotundity about the form.
Brown waistcoat loosened, hose ungartered, and cravat thrown aside,
Peter languidly smoked his pipe, and seemed hesitating for a moment, ere
he entered the domains of that ancient empire, known to philosophers and
poets as the Land of Nod.
Rousing himself for a moment, he exclaimed, in a sleepy tone, Sam
I say! Where are you, you blind devil?
In answer to this bland inquiry, a voice was heard
I'se here, Massa. I is, and, starting from a nook of the arbor
over-shadowed
by foliage, the blind Negro appeared in the light, his sightless
eyeballs rolling in their sockets.
Fill my glass and fix my pipe, oror
The good Peter Dorfner was fast asleep. With his head resting on
one shoulder, and his gouty hands placed on his paunch, he had dropped
into the land of dreams. Corpulent dreams, no doubt, blooming in
fatness
,
with pipes between their lips, and beakers of rum-punch in their
hands.
Black Sam, dressed in a suit of coarse gray homespun, stood behind
his master's chair, listening with great earnestness, while his forehead
became corrugated with innumerable wrinkles, his thick lips were
distorted in a grin, and his eyeballs rolled unceasingly in their sockets.
Are yo' 'sleep, Massa? he whisperedthen listened for a moment
He am 'sleep, by gum, he added, in a tone that was scarcely audible.
Then, raising his black hands, seamed with scars and knotted in the
joints, above the white hairs of the sleeping old man, Black Sam stood
for a moment with his sightless eyeballs lifted toward Heaven. An
15
expression as sudden as it was frightful came over his face; that visage,
black as soot, contrasted with the hair, which, frosted by age, resembled
white wool, was in truth most horrible to behold. Clenching his knotted
fingers, the negro uttered certain words, not in broken English, but in
some unknown tongue, perchance the language of his clime and race.
The good Peter Dorfner snored in his slumber; a substantial snore,
which, had it taken a form to itself, might certainly have appeared in the
shape of a full-blown poppy, overcome with liquor and tired for want of
sleep. In his corpulent slumber, lulled by obese dreams, with pipes in
their lips and mugs of rum in their hands, the convivial Peter did not for
a moment chance to think of the black visage which scowled above him,
while lips distorted by rage muttered vengeance upon his head.
Punchdon't know how to make punch? Peter murmured in his
sleep, with a chuckle that seemed choked to death, while on its way from
his chest to his lips. Some first-rate whiskeyIrish, if you can get it
a spice of lemon peelaa
Peter ended the injunction with a snore, while the negro cautiously
placed one hand upon the breast of the sleeping man, and with the other
brandished a common table-knife, sharpened to a point.
Again those words in the unknown tongue, accompanied by the
hideous cortortion, and then the Negro muttered in broken English
For sixteenseventeen year, dis nigga watch his time. Sometime
he tink he put pisen in yo' drink. Sometime come to yo' bed an' choke
yo' in yo' dam sleep. Now he no fail!
How lightly that brawny left hand touched the breast of the slumbering
man, as if to mark the point of the intended blow, while the knife,
clenched in the uplifted right hand, shone with its sharpened point over
the old man's head!
Certainly the negro was a maniac; a poor wretch, deprived of sight
and reason. Else wherefore should he wish to stab the good old man
who had fed him at his table, and given him to drink of his cup, for so
many years? Perchance some memory of a petty slight, received long
years before, nerved the negro's arm; it may have been that the blind
man had been stolen from Africa, and cherished a mad resentment against
every member of the white race.
The knife glittered faintly in the negro's grasp, as, hidden by the
foliage of the arbor, he silently prepared himself for his work of murder.
Sam kin feel yo' heart, ole boydere's for de white woman and de
little chiledere
The knife descended, urged by an arm that was nerved by madness
perchance by revenge.
Wait a minute, my dark friend, and you may kill him at your leisure,
said a bland voice.
The negro could not see, but he felt that a third person was present at
this scene; he was seized with an ague-like tremor; the knife fell from
his hand. He sank on the gravel which formed the floor of the arbor,
and, in a whispering tone, begged for mercy.
By gum, dis nigga no 'tend to hurt Massa Dorfen one little hair!
Dat am trut, so it amMassa! Massa! Don't hurt ole Sam
Will you be still, my dear charcoal? Will you stop your cursed
hullabaloo
?
Or shall I just put a pistol to your head, and blow you into
several pieces?
The poor wretch, cowering on the gravel, heard the bland voice, felt
the cold muzzle of the pistol pressing against his temple, and then
muttered
faintlyKill de nigga, but don't wake de old boy!
The voice of the unknown was heard again, rising into a jovial shout
Dorfner, I say! Hello, man, is this the way you treat your friends
stir yourself, or I'll drink your liquor and stick the neck of an empty
bottle in your yawning jaws. Dorfner, I say!
Started by the clamor, Peter unclosed his eyes, and looked around with
the peculiarly vacant glance of a corpulent gentleman aroused from a
pleasant slumber.
Good morning, friend, he slowly saidWhy, what in the dl
have we here?
Peter removed his feet from the table, started erect in his chair, and
looked in the face of the intruder with an expression of ludicrous surprise.
It was a very grave, sober-looking gentleman who stood before him,
with his back to the afternoon sun, and his head and shoulders relieved
by a glimpse of the blue sky, smiling beyond the distant woods. A very
grave, sedate personage, indeed, dressed in black cloth from head to foot,
with cravat and ruffles of inexpressible whiteness, and silver buckles about
the knees and feet.
It is true that this sombre costume gave a somewhat singular boldness
to the marked outline of his figure, which in the body resembled a barrel,
and in the lower limbs suggested the idea of bean-poles, or something
excessively lank and thin, supporting something particularly round
and fat.
Beneath the black hat which the stranger wore, appeared or rather
shone a very sober countenance, with eyes like minute points of glass,
sparkling in a flame, cheeks red as Etna, a little nose that could hardly
be called a nose, and a mouth which threatened every move to invade the
ears and take possession of the back part of the head.
It was a marked face, no doubt, and, notwithstanding its demure
expression
,
was well calculated to excite tears oflaughter.
Peter, said the stranger, quite blandly, as, with his large right hand,
half-concealed by an enormous ruffle, he described a circle in the air
Peter, my friend, allow me to subside into a little decorous emotion on
this interesting occasion. It is a long time since I have seen you, Peter
it seems a trifling matter of some nine or ten centuries. But we grow
old, my boywe grow oldit was the remark of an ancient sage, no less
renowned for the majesty of his head, than the strength of his heart,it
was
his
remark, Peterand it shows an expansive thought, my boy,
thatthatshall I repeat the remark, my dear Peter?
The old man passed his hands over his white beard, thrust his fingers
in the corners of his eyes, twitched at his gaiters, and shook his fat frame,
like a frolicsome dog, who has been indulging in a bath.
Am I awake, or am I dreamin'? Sam! I say, Sam! come here, you
scoundrel, and let me pinch you, so that I may know whether I am asleep
or not. S-a-m!
But Sam did not appearcrouching behind the oaken chair of his
master, he wished to seclude himself from public view, with a modesty
worthy of an ancient hermit.
Shall I repeat the remark, Peter? continued the stranger, bowing
profoundly.
In the first place, grunted DorfnerYou'll be so kind as to tell
us who you are, and what you want, and then take yourself off, as quick
as your legs will carry you. You
have
legseh?
The old fellow smiled like a blustery March day, relenting all at once
into the First of April. By no means discomposed, the stranger placed his
hand upon his breast, lowered his head, and stood for a moment in an
attitude of profound meditation.
To think of an event and a day like this! he exclaimed, in a tone
whose shrillness reminded one of the voice of some demure spinster, who,
having refused fifty-one offers of marriage, has settled down at last, into
the Censor of a small neighborhoodHere I am after a long absence,
and there is Peter! I have thought of the blessed meetingdreamed of
it! I come at last; I see himnot encompassed by the cares of the world,
but sitting in an arbor, with a white beard and a bottle of rum, and five
strapping fellows mowin' hay in the distance. It is thus I see him
thusregaled by the combined fragrance of new-mown hay and black
strap, and he does not know me!
The poor fellow was lost in grief. Burying his face in his large hands,
he stood opposite the astonished Peter, a picture of despair.
Sam, S-a-m, I say! You black rascal, come here and tell me, in the
name of Satan, who is this fellow?
He don't know me yet, soliloquized the stranger, rubbing the tip of
his nose with the forefinger of his right handCast your eyes through
the dim vistas of memory, and call to mind that touching night, when we
all got drunk togetherWill you, my dear?
Why, it isJacopo! ejaculated Dorfner, with eyes like saucers.
Jacopo? That was my name, my love. Your venerable exterior serves
to remind me of itpainfully. But now, since I have taken orders, and
been commissioned by an Archbishop or two, to wear a gown, I am called
the Reverend Jacob James.
You wear a gown! you preach! Ho, ho, hoI should like to hear you.
Git up on that bench and give us a slice o' divinity, will you?
Jacopo, or the Reverend Jacob James, as he now designates himself,
took a seat on the bench near the chair of the old man, and in affecting
silence proceeded to fill a glass with a great deal of rum and a very small
portion of water. After which he drank the mixture with a sigh of calm
delight.
How is it with you, old boy? He slapped Mr. Dorfner on the
shoulder.
Purty well, I thank you,how's yourself?
Poorlypoo-r-ly, sighed Jacopo, filling a pipe, and striking a light
from a tinder-box, which stood among the bottlesMy labors for the
regeneration of my species, and so on, have struck into my pulmonaries.
Don't you see how thin I am?
The old man struggled with a fit of laughter, which seemed determined
to choke him to death. The wide mouth, little nose, diminutive eyes and
red cheeks of Jacopo, all subdued by an expression of exemplary
sobriety, contrasted somewhat ludricrously with his rotund form and
spider legs.
Droll as ever, laughed old PeterYou'll be the death o' me, you
dog. Where have you been these two years, and Peter glanced stealthily
around the arborWhere's your masterJohneh?
I have discharged him. He did not suit me, replied Jacopo,
elaborating
another glass of rum and water. By-the-bye, how do things go
with you? It's now a matter of two years and six months since we
parted. What's the matterhey? Your house shut up like a tomb?
Where's the little girlMadelineHello! the old man's choking to
death, with a gallopin' consumption
The cheerful visage of the benevolent Peter grew pale and then deep
purple; his eyes were fixed, and indeed his changed countenance
manifested
various indications of an apoplectic fit.
Jacopo revived him by a copious bath of rum and water, dashed
violently in his face. It was some moments, however, before the good
man revived.
Sich a pain as I hadsich a stitch in my sideugh! I feel quite cold.
Mix me a leetle rum and light me a pipe, will you?
Jacopo obeyed. With a tenderness that was quite filial, he prepared the
draught and the pipe. The old man's white beard was presently obscured
by a veil of tobacco smoke.
You asked after Madeline, he said, quite calmly, with his eyes
twinkling from the half-closed lidsWe never heard of her since that
night. There was blood upon the floor, but that was all.
And the hunterTom, I think they called him?
Gilbert,Gilbertnever heard o' him nayther, mumbled Peter,
without
removing the pipe from his lips.
You don't say! A girl and a boy disappear on one nightit looks as
if they went off together
Or as if he took her off and then made tracks himself suggested
Dorfner, with a singular twinkle in his half-shut eyes.
How's matters about here just now, anyhow? Eh? King or Country?
Which way do you drink?
That is a ticklish question. There's a great deal to be said on both
sides, but I s'pose you won't object to fill a glass to His Majesty, God
bless him!
The good old man lifted his hand as if to raise his hat from his head,
but finding nothing like a hat, he apologized by raising the glass to
his lips.
King, God bless him, cried Jacopo, or, Continental CongressI
don't care a tuppence which.
Hey? what kind of man are you, anyhow? A
Man just like yourself, fond of peace and plenty, quietness and
tobacco, sound principles and Jamaica rum. Tuttut, Peter. Why
should you and I quarrel about these trifling things? What difference
does it make to us, whether we have a King George or a King
Washington
?
Jacopo winked rather familiarly at the old man, and placing his
spindle-shanks
upon the table, leaned against the frame-work of the arbor, while
each corner of his extensive mouth emitted a cloud of bluish smoke.
Dorfner regarded him with half-shut eyes, and yet with a look of
searching
scrutiny. Two years had not indeed given more wrinkles to the bluff
countenance of the old man, or stolen a solitary tint from his blooming
cheeks, but his intellect seemed impaired, his memory confused and dim.
Even as he gazed sidelong into the complacent visage of Jacopo, he
murmured
Queer
fellowqueer! Where have I seen him? Odddroll
queer!
That was quite a touching incident, exclaimed Jacopo, after a long
pauseIt melted me. I was all brandy and tears.
What are you drivin' at? cried Peter, still eyeing his eccentric
companion.
It was so very affecting. It worked upon me like peppered brandy.
It seemed to touch you a littlejust a little
Jacopo uttered these words without the slightest change in the grotesque
complacency of his face; his feet were on the table, the pipe between his
lips, and the glass of rum in his hand.
Peter opened his eyes. He regarded his friend with a wild stare.
You were saying something, but whether my head is thick, or
whether you are drunk, I cannot tell. Speak out, will youand if it's all
the same to you, speak it in English
Why, Peter, said Jacopo, eyeing with calm satisfaction a puff of
smoke which floated slowly upward toward the fragrant ceiling of the
arborI was just thinking of the poor girlAmelia Caroline, I think you
call her?
Madeline, said the old man rather sharply.
Madeline: that's it. (Do you observe that cloud of smoke? how much
it looks like his blessed Majestythere's his nose)Madeline. That's
the name. What a scene when she woke from her faintin' fit on
that
night! I never could get her words out of my mindcould you, Peter?
What words?
The old man laid his pipe on the table, and rested his cheeks between
his hands, his eyes growing brighter and larger as he gazed steadily into
the face of the immovable Jacopo.
Just watch that puff, will you? Did ever you see sich a capital
Turk's headthe nose is perfect!Oh, as to the girl's words, I can't of
course remember them, but you know, that she said something about her
mother being put out of the way, some eighteen years before
The dl she did! Peter's lips parted, disclosing his white teeth
set firmly together.
Can't you call to mind? Peter, you are dull. How her mother was
brought to the farm-house of Wissahikon, and `while in the pains of a
mother's anguish' You remember, Peter?
Jacopo did not cast his gaze toward the face of the old man; indeed he
seemed to avoid his glance. But, had he looked into that face, he would
have encountered an expression of ferocity, such as is not oftentime
coupled with venerable hair and white beard.
The old man did not speak a word in reply, but sank back into his
chair and closed his eyes.
After a moment, Jacopo ventured to turn his gazeventured, we say,
for he seemed conscious that he was provoking the rage of a man who
was neither to be trusted nor despised.
There he sits, like a venerable Pope, fast asleep among seventeen
Cardinals. It is a glorious picture! O for the pencil of a Vandyke, a
Godfrey Kneller, or a Michael Angelo, to sketch that nose, and make that
beard eternal in white paint and canvass! What a dear old man he is,
after allsuch traits of virtue amid his fatness, such streaks of worth
amid his ripeness!
With ejaculations such as these, Jacopo watched the slumbering man,
murmuring now and then in an undertoneWhat a perfect old devil
shouldn't wonder if he had a hoof and two claws.
The dear old 'possum! he resumed in a loud voiceHe thinks
he'll make believe to be fast asleep, so that I can drink his liquor at my
leisure, without shocking the delicate modesty of my nature. Good man!
But nohe is asleepah, that snorea snore that seems to sit in his
nose like a monk in a cloister, and sings hoarse anthems in praise of
fatness
Peter,
I say! Wake up and drink, will you?
The corpulent Peter unclosed his eyes.
You there yet? he said, in a gruff tone.
Did you think I'd leave you? Why, I mean to stay all night with
you, and we'll have a good time together, and then to-morrow you may
over-persuade
me to stay for a few days more. I am of an obliging
disposition
.
When I was in Italy, the Pope remarked in the most delicate
manner, `My dear Jack,' says hewe were taking a few bottles
together in a private chamber in the Vatican`My dear Jack' says he
for he called me Jack for short
The remark uttered by the Pope to his friend Jack, while taking a few
bottles of wine together, was no doubt very beautiful, but it is lost in
hopeless oblivion. For as Jacepo, calmly puffing his pipe, was about to
repeat the said remark, for the gratification of his friend Peter, the good
old man, with an abrupt exclamation, bearing some resemblance to an oath,
broke his pipe, and wished Jacopo and the Pope to theend of the
world. He did not say `end of the world,' it is true, for he named a dark
personage who commits all the sin in the universe, leaving poor mortality
scathless and innocent.
I want to know what you mean by makin' fun o' me? continued
PeterTellin' me these cock-and-bull stories, and fillin' yourself with
the idea that I'm a-goin' to invite you to take up your abode in my house.
WhyMister What's-your-name,
I don't know you
.
This was to the point. Had you seen the old man's face flushing with
anger from his white beard to the roots of his hair, while his clenched
hand descended heavily upon the table, you would have realized the full
force of his words.
Jacopo smoked away, looking neither to the right nor left, nor down
his nose, but straight forward, his whole attention riveted by the fragrant
clouds which floated around the bowl of his pipe.
Do you hear? thundered the old man, I say your room is better
than your company. Tramp!
Peter, said Jacopo very mildly, without turning his headYour
insinuations are indelicate. A stranger listening to us, and ignorant of
our sworn friendship, might draw unfavorable inferences from your
sly hints.
The good Peter Dorfner could not believe his eyes or trust his ears.
To be bearded at his own table, and in his own arbor, over his own
liquor, by a man whose body resembled a barrel supported by
broom-sticks
!
There were strange rumors among the country folks in regard to Peter
He was either a basely slandered, or much mistaken man. His temper
was ferocious; the source of his wealth mysterious; few of the neighbors
came any longer to his farm-house, and even the men who worked for
him, regarded the good old man with an indefinable fear. Had he not
turned law, divinity and physic into ridicule, by beguiling Lawyer
Simmons
,
Doctor Perkenpine and a grave Parson into a supper of barbecued
cats? Every farm-house of the Wissahikon was full of the Legend,
and even the firesides of Germantown grew pale at the idea. Mingled
with this grave matter, there was a trifling suspicion of Murder hanging
around the history of the benevolent man.
Peter was somewhat proud of his reputation; even as some
distinguished
literary gentleman of the modern day, is delighted at being
compared
to a certain animal,called pork! when it is deadso the good
old man grew merry at the epithetsBeast and Bear!
You may therefore imagine the amazement, the indignation struggling
into life on Peter's face, when he beheld himself defied and insulted by
the sublime impertinence of Jacopo.
Sly hints, indeed! he exclaimed, panting for breath as his visage
grew purple with rage. Shall I kick you all over my farm?
Jacopo smoked in silence, glancing meanwhile at a piece of printed
paper which he had taken from his pocket. It looked like the fragment
of an old newspaper, and was somewhat triangular in form. A singular
grimace agitated Jacopo's face as he perused the irregular sentences and
broken words, which appeared upon this dingy relic:
was
cealed in a closet,
looks out upon a large
rfner, with the Corpse, also
rchments and papers, which
lead to some knowledge of the
the poor victim. This all occu
Twenty-third of November, 1756; and in ma
this confession, I ask forgiveness of mankind for
share in this detestable Crime, and Pray the L
Such was the fragment, on which Jacopo gazed with great satisfaction,
his eyes twinkling with an expression of quiet malice, while his
enormous
mouth displayed its full magnitude in a hideous grin.
Now that looks very much like nonsense, and it's but a dirty piece
of an old newspaper after all, Jacopo murmured, without removing the
pipe from his mouth, and yet there may exist, somewhere in the world,
another piece of paper,newspaper toowhich, attached to this, would
make it read quite sensibly. By-the-bye, friend Peter, did you ever hear
of a Philadelphia merchant named Hopkins?
The last words addressed to Dorfner only elicited an oath, coupled
with the words
The scoundrel! He was here some time, years ago, prying into my
affairs, and wanting to know what had become of Madeline. The dog!
Will you travel, sirrah?
Jacopo rose from his seat, and carefully placed his pipe upon the table.
Then looking into Peter's face, which, purpled by rage, glared in a ray of
sunshine, Jacopo placed his hand within the breast of his waistcoat.
Do you see this little bit o' convenience? A pistol, nothing but a
pistol, mounted in silver and loaded with ball. I am a great coward,
Peteryou can see me tremble, if you look sharp. So I carry this trifle,
and another trifle like it, for I am told that you are afflicted with
mad
dogs
on the Wissahikon.
Jacopo spoke the truth. He was a cowarda pitiable coward, afraid
of the report of a pistol, frightened at the smell of burnt powder. Yet,
on the present occasion, nerved by an inexplicable influence into
something
like courage, he dared to confront the irritable old man, and defy
him on his own ground.
Sam, I say,where's that nigger? Sam, go into the farm-house and
bring me my pistols.
There was a deadly light in the old man's gray eyehis lips were
violently agitated. But the blind negro did not appear, and Dorfner,
purple with rage, and unable, from a delicate twinge of gout, to move with
his accustomed vigor, was left exposed to the round face, wide mouth and
impertinent eyes of the intruder.
Your impertinence is only a cloak, by * * *! thundered the old
manYou have some deeper motive
As if conscious that he had said too much, old Peter suddenly halted,
took up his pipe and began to smoke again. The hand which held the
pipe trembled like a leaf.
Jacopo resumed his seat. Amid all his bravado, there was delicately
perceptible an inexhaustible endowment of cowardice. Once or twice
he shuddered as his eye rested upon the inflamed visage of Dorfner, but,
disguising all marked indications of emotion, he silently examined his
pistols.
Ha, ha a hearty laugh almost frightened Jacopo from his seat
Ha, ha, my boy, did you think to make the old boy mad with you?
Capitally done, by * * *! But you did not succeed, ha, ha, ha! You
shall stay all the night with me, and we'll have a good time o't together.
You and me only, my good fellow, for I don't care about the company of
the neighbors. I'll brew you a punch, an old-fashioned punch, and you
will sing and fiddle, and we'll go reeling to our bedsho, ho, my
boy! you don't know old Peter yet!
Had the table taken wings and flown through the top of the arbor,
Jacopo could not have been half so much confounded as he was now, by
the sudden hilarity, the extemporaneous good-fellowship of the old man.
We will, old boy, we will! he shrilly shouted, as soon as he could
command the power of speechA night of it togetherthat's the word!
I'll drink to your white beard, and you will drink to my legs, and he
added in a tone inaudible to PeterI'll take good care that you don't
put medicine in my liquor, or steel to my throat.
Where have you been all this time;these two years and six
months? kindly inquired Dorfner.
Engaged on business of state, responded JacopoSettling a little
difficulty between my friend the Pope and the Emperor of Germany.
But let me ask a question in returnhow have you been all this while?
Any news stirring about the region? The old Wizard alive yet?
Gone these two years. His house is shut upnobody at home.
Supposed by someha, hathat he is gone to his Masterho, ho!
It was a lame jest, and yet the fat old fellow laughed heartily, until his
broad paunch and white beard shook in sympathy.
Then there was a queer body, whom you all fearedhow's this
they called him? PaulPaulBirminghamwas that the name?
Paul Ardenheim, said the old man, with a sudden and marked change
of voiceHe has never been seen on the Wissahikon, since the last
night of Seventy-four.
Had he no family? Was not there an old house, castle or monastery,
somewhere up here, among the woods? The young man had a father;
a sister: do tell us all about him!
We never mention
those people
, said Dorfner, glancing over his
shoulder with an uneasy gestureI don't believe much in devils, but
it's not safe to trifle with such matters. Nobody about Wissahikon
speaks of
him
that is, you know,
Paul
or of his people
But the monastery, or castle, or what in the deuce do you call it?
I'll not call it any thing just now. Talk about something else.
You don't believe in devils? My dear old boy, don't you know that
it's impossible to doubt the existence of a Devil? You may not believe
in a God, but as to a Devilhuman nature could not get along without
one. I believe in Devils. Pity the poor devil who don't.
As he said this, Jacopo drew once more from his pocket the fragment
of printed paper, which we have given to the reader, and glanced over it
with a peculiar grimace, muttering with a chuckleHopkins is a
merchant
,
but he is sharp, dev'lish sharp! Twenty-third of November,
fifty-six
those
kind o' dates are like Devils. I believe in 'em.
What's that? cried DorfnerWhere did you get that slip of paper?
It is mineI'll swear it!
He started from his chair, reached over the table, and attempted to
grasp the fragment. His features were agitated by a mingled expression,
which Jacopo could not altogether comprehend. It was not fear, it was
not rage, but seemed like fear and anger, struggling with a darker
emotion.
I was going to light my pipe with it, said Jacopo, very quietlyI
picked it up near the garden-gate. Take it, my old boy. By-the-bye,
what does that Twenty-Third of November, `fifty-six,' mean? Day of
your birth, I suppose; and yet you look older than twenty-one.
Peter took the paper, and pressed it against the table with his thumb,
at the same time drawing from a pocket another fragment, which fitted it
with great nicety, thus producing the appearance of one piece of paper,
square in form, and filled with the same printed characters.
Jacopo would have given the richest tint on his infinitesmal nose for the
privilege of perusing this second fragment, which was evidently a part of
the first. He beheld Dorfner gazing upon it, with his eyes downcast,
and his head bent upon his broad chesthe saw the fingers of the old
man shake with an irrepressible tremor. Rising from his seat, he glided
with a noiseless footstep to the side of his aged companion, and looked
stealthily over his shoulder.
His small eyes dilated as he beheld the printed characters, and he
could not repress an ejaculation which his surprise forced to his lips.
CHAPTER SECOND.
THE FACE AND THE SHADOW.
Hah
! The two pieces form one paragraphit reads quite sensibly,
I vow!
But the next moment he sank back, affrighted and trembling. The old
man, startled by his ejaculations, had raised his head; his face was turned
over his shoulder, and his eyes rested upon the visage of Jacopo. The
veins stood boldly out upon that forehead; the cheeks, at other times
flushed by the tints of good liquor, were now palealmost livid. There
was mischief in the expression of the old man's lips, and a quiet ferocity
in his gaze.
Who told you to look over my shoulder?
The good Peter did not swear; his tone was very even and subdued,
and therefore Jacopo felt that there was danger in his eye. Confused,
afraid, without the power to frame an answer, he stood trembling before
the gaze of Peter Dorfner.
Jacopo was a coward, and now he knew that his life hung on a chance
as frail as the tie that binds the withered leaf to the bough. He changed
color, his knees shook together; he clasped his hands. Should he fall
on his knees and beg for mercy?
Did you
read
scoundrel? was the question asked by Dorfner, in a
voice unnaturally low and calm.
There was something pitiable in the contrasthere, Dorfner, a man of
muscular frame, with his facestamped with a sullen ferocityhis face
turned over his shoulder, thus presenting his forehead, nose and beard, in
profile to the lightthere Jacopo, with his face distorted into an
expression
of grotesque fear, while his slender limbs trembled under the weight
of his rotund body.
In his terror he had forgotten his pistols. It may have been that his
abject fear was caused as much by the words which he had hastily perused,
as by the determined ferocity of Dorfner's visage.
Did you
read
, I say?
Was it courage born of the consciousness of a fatal Truth, or
the frenzied energy of despair? Jacopo became suddenly calm; his
limbs trembled no longer; something like dignity was impressed upon
his face.
Gazing over Peter's shoulder, he beheld a face, through an interval of
the foliagea face which seemed not the visage of a living thingbut an
Apparition from the Other World. At the sight of that face, whose eyes
were fixed upon him, a strange energy filled the soul of the coward;
calmly, his voice unbroken by a tremor, he uttered these words
I did read. And more than this, I only read what I knew before.
That you, Peter Dorfner, did, on the night of November Twenty-third,
fifty-six, in the room near yonder chesnut tree, commit a barbarous and
cowardly murder!
As he uttered these words, he folded his arms, and stood prepared to
meet his death. The eyes were gazing upon him all the while. Through
the interval in the foliage he saw the face, and felt his coward soul filled
with a new life.
Peter Dorfner rose from his seat, his face livid with rage. He had no
weapon, but a desperate strength, the fury of a madman, fired his veins.
His chest swelling, the veins on his face standing black and protuberant
from the livid skin, he advanced a single step, while his glance announced
his deadly purpose.
Jacopo did not move; pale and motionless, he did not wish to avoid
the fury of the old man.
For a moment, Dorfner, roused into all the vigor of his early manhood
contemplated his victim.
I will throttle youI will crush you with one grasp said Peter, in
a tone whose measured emphasis indicated the relentless nature of his
vengeance, better than all the oaths, or boisterous language, that ever rose
to the lips of madness.
At this moment a shadow passed between Dorfner and the sun. As the
shadow passed, a footstep was heard.
He turned his face to the west, and sank back in his chair, like a man
who had received a bullet in his heart. His face expressed surprise
dismay
his
extended hand pointed toward the west.
Surprised beyond the power of language, Jacopo turned and gazed in
the direction indicated by the extended hand.
The garden walk, extending from the arbor to the western wicket,
stretched before him, a brown path leading among beds of foliage and
flowers.
There was a form in the path; the form of a young man dressed in
dark attire, with a black mantle floating from his shoulder. His face
could not be seen, but as he went down the path with measured steps, his
form thrown into distinct relief by the western sky, the sunbeams tinted
his dark attire, and fringed with a pale golden lustre the locks of his
black hair.
It was a muscular form, tempered by the grace and beauty of young
manhood; the step was firm and regular; though only the back of the
unknown was visible, it was evident that he was attired in a costume,
altogether different from the fashion of the daya dark dress, which
fitted closely to his limbs, was only relieved by the graceful drapery of
the mantle, that floated from his shoulder. His locks were surmounted
by a cap, whose solitary plume rose in the sunlight, blackly defined
against the western sky.
It was this form which, passing before the arbor, had thrown a shadow
upon Peter's face, as his arm was nerved for a deadly blow; and now, as
the unknown, without once looking back, went toward the western gate,
the old man, stricken into his chair, as by a bullet, extended his hand,
while his features were blank with amazement and terror.
Jacopo could only gaze from the face of Peter to the retreating form;
the scene deprived him of the power of speech.
It's
him
I'd swear it! gasped the old man, without moving his arm,
or changing his gaze. I can't see his face, but I know it's
him
. Not in
flesh and blooda rale livin' man, but his sperrit
Who? exclaimed Jacopo, as the memory of the unknown face, whose
eyes had nerved him for a desperate accusal, only a moment since, came
back to him with overwhelming force.
Who? Don't ask me cried the old man, his features still violently
agitated, while his forehead was bathed in perspirationYou know who
we've all seen him afore, but since that night he has not been seen
alive
on Wissahikon. It's a sperritI tell youif he'd only look backit's
him, I say; I'll swear to 't!
With these incoherent words, old Peter still pointed towards the
unknown
,
his emotion growing more like madness every moment.
It's living man, cried JacopoIt is
Don't speak that name, the old man exclaimed with a shudderI
tell you he's no livin' man. He has not been seen on the Wissahikon
since the night when Madeline disappearedThere was a mangled body
found, some days afterwardsit was him! No! no! No livin' man, by
* * *! A sperrita sperrit!
To Jacopo the violent emotion of Peter Dorfner was altogether
incomprehensible
.
Peter, who had grown gray under suspicion of various
crimes, who was said to fear neither God nor Devil; Peter Dorfner,
who, only a moment since, stood prepared for a work of murder, now a
pitiable and adject thing; stricken as by a supernatural handit was
all a mystery to the eyes of Jacopo.
True, he had himself beheld a face, brilliant with eyes of unutterable
power, looking upon him, through an interval of the foliage. A vague
memory came over him of having seen that face before, and a name rose
to his lips, and, as we have seen, was drowned by the ejaculation
of Dorfner.
Look! He passes through the gate, but don't once look back! It's a
sperrit, I say! He goes down the hill-side into the meadowhah! The
men workin' in the fields drop their scythes and look at him. Does a
livin' man start up from the ground, walk between you and the sun,
and steal away without once lookin' back? Look yonder! He is passin'
through the midst of themhe turnsno! Without lookin' back, he
hurries toward the woodsAh, it's him, not in body, but in sperritit is
Paul Ardenheim!
And this man, who believed in neither God nor Devil, was conquered
by the most improbable superstition. That superstition may have been
the last ember of a great religious principle, burning faintly amid the
ashes of a debased nature. With the word Paul Ardenheim, he fell
back insensible in the chair, his parting lips spotted with white foam.
Jacopo advanced to the table, eager to grasp the fragments of printed
paper, and read at his leisure the Revelation which was embodied in
their words. Only one fragment met his view; the other had disappeared.
I can't make head nor tail on't, he exclaimed, with an oath. And
yet Hopkins must have some hint of the matter, or he would not have
directed me to search the room near the chesnut tree. `Sleep in that
room, Jacopo, and search every closet. Whatever you discover in the
way of paper or parchment, bring to me, and your fortune is made.' But
how did old Peter obtain this paragraph of a newspaper?He must know
that he is suspected o' doin' somethin' not altogether pretty.
While the light playing among the leaves and flowers of the arbor,
shone over the pallid face and snowy beard of the insensible man, Jacopo
anxiously perused the fragment.
After the deed was done, the child taken away.
The body was con near the
window which chesnut
tree. Do concealed
certain pa I suppose
may real name
of rred on the
king
my
ord
Jacopo examined the paper with a look of ludicrous dismay.
If I had the other fragment, I might make something out o' this.
`
After the deed was done, the child was taken away
.' There was a
child
,
then? `
The body was con
'there was a `
body
' alsoZounds! Where is
that fragment? Why could not Hopkins have told me all about the matter,
instead of sending me in the dark on such a fool's errand. Here I've stood
the chance of having my throat cut twice, and even now am not certain
that my lungs will not be perforated by some dirty piece of lead or other
ah, that fragment, that oracular fragment!
As Jacopo thus gave vent to his feelings in a crude soliloquy, he did
not cease to examine alternately, and with a searching glance, the piece
of paper which he held in one hand, and the white-bearded face, which
glowed in the sunlight at his side.
The more I think of it, the more I am convinced that he knows
something
of Madeline. And Madeline is no common peasant girla stray
slice cut off from the fruit-cake of aristocracy! Why should Hopkins take
such an interest in the matter? Let me think! Two years and six
months ago, Hopkins and my
late
master were thick as thieves. There
was some talk about a mysterious affair; in fact, the merchant and the
lord were never done muttering, whispering, and counselling with each
other.Oh, my unpropitious stars, why did I thus incur your
vengeance
?
As though some terrible memory had crossed his brain, Jacopo clasped
his hands piteously, and cast his eyes toward the top of the arbor.
Why did I thus depart from the strict line of my duty, and betray a
sinful weakness? Yes, on the day when my lord left Philadelphia, he
sent me to Hopkins's house, to his own chamber, in fact, to get certain
important papers. I had them in my hand, and yet forgot to break the
seal! Pitiable frailty! Had I even moistened the seal with warm water,
there would be some excuse for me, but as it is, I did not even make an
effort. That seal once removed, the whole secret of the matter would have
been revealedbut as the case stands, I know dev'lish little about it, and
have no security for my throat or lungs!
His eye rested upon the insensible man. The right hand was clenched
upon the breast; there was a fragment of paper between the finger and
thumb. Jacopo gave utterance to a cry of joy.
Could I only get itbut he may recoverhah! He begins to breathe
again! Oh, for a stray apoplexy to touch old Peter on the neck, or even
a vagrant catalepsy to throw him into a trance!
Advancing stealthily, he touched the hand of the insensible man, but
Peter did not move.
I know youyou old dog! Makin' believe that you don't see or
hear; and in a minute you'll spring upon me like a she wild-cat!
He touched the fragment; gently, very gently, but the old man's hand
was like a vice. Trembling from head to foot, Jacopo seized the hand,
and pressed the thumb and forefinger apart. The old man stirred, but
did not unclose his eyes. The paper fluttered to the ground, near
Jacopo's feet.
In a moment he had seized it; he had placed it within the other
fragment
;
and here is the result, which he beheld:
After the deed was done, the child was taken away.
The body was concealed in a closet, near the
window which looks out upon a large chesnut
tree. Dorfner, with the Corpse, also concealed
certain parchments and papers, which I suppose
may lead to some knowledge of the real name
of the poor victim. This all occurred on the
Twenty-third of November, 1756; and in making
this confession, I ask forgiveness of mankind for my
share in this detestable crime, and Pray the Lord
Jacopo shook like a withered leaf. If there was one word which he
feared above another, it was the monosyllable `
Corpse
.'
I have no objection to `body,' used in a funeral sense, but`Corpse!'
Augh! So unpleasantly suggestive! `Dorfner'oh, ho, my dear old
boy! No wonder you start and swear, and go off in faintin' spellsno
wonder. `Poor victim'`child'my brains goes whirling like a cork in
an eddy!
A black face rose slowly over the chair of the insensible Peter. Jacopo
shuddered as he saw the sightless eyeballs glowing redly in the sockets,
while the sun streamed over the dark visage. A knife gleamed over the
grey hairs of Dorfner; it was clenched in the right arm of the negro.
16
Jacopo left the arbor on tip-toe, passed around it, and strode with a
noiseless step toward the farm-house. He passed under the shadows of
the chesnut tree, and cast an anxious glance toward the window. Up
that fatal tree, you will remember, Gilbert climbed on the last night of
1775. Jacopo stood on the threshold stonethe farm-house door
was open.
He cast a searching glance around. All was still and desolate about
the farm-house. The sun shone gayly over the roof of the barn, and
there was a solitary bird chirping among the foliage of the chesnut tree.
To the west stretched the undulating field, with the laborers grouped
among the piles of new-mown hay. But they labored no longer; their
seythes rested upon the grass; every face was turned toward the western
woods.
Even as he stood upon the threshold stone, one foot resting upon the
sill of the doorwhile his hand still grasped the torn fragments of
printed paperJacopo turned his gaze far to the west, and gazed in the
direction indicated by the extended arms of the laborers.
A dark form was seen on the verge of the distant woods,dimly seen,
for the shadows gathered thickly beneath the luxuriant foliage.
It was the form which, not long ago, had passed between the old man
and the sun, and with its shadow stricken him down in the very act of
murder.
Paul Ardenheim, cried Jacopo, as he crossed the thresholdOr
his Ghost. He closed the door and was lost to sight.
At the same moment, the dark figure disappeared among the shadows
of the distant woods, and a deep groan resounded from the arbor
CHAPTER THIRD.
THE DOVE.
The
dark form which come between the old man and the sun, and with
its shadow struck him down, even in the act of Murder; was it indeed
Paul Ardenheim, or but an apparition gliding sadly and noiselessly through
the light and shadow of the summer day?
In the woods which bloom so fragrantly around the Wissahikon, we
may find an answer to our question.
There was a narrow path leading from the field of new-mown hay,
down into the nooks of the forest, down even to the waters of the
Wissahikon
.
Where the oaks and chesnuts, the maples and the pines, were
grouped in one rich contrast of foliage: where the sunlight came
lovingly
,
scattering patches of gold upon the sod; where a tiny thread of
liquid silver trickled down a gray old rock, and made low music among
the shadowssuch was the course of the wild-wood path, which led from
the field of new-mown hay, to the verge of the Wissahikon waters.
Along this path, the dark form hastened with a measured step, never
once looking to the right or left, or casting a backward glance through the
light and shadow of the woods.
Now in the sunshine, where every outline of the shape, every lock of
the waving hair, and point of the dark attire, was fully disclosed, and now
into the shade, where the thick leaves spread a tremulous canopy, and the
low voice of the tiny rill sung through the silence.
Now turning the breast of this gray rock, crowned by a clump of
saplings
,
now along this level slope, where the moss, softer than any carpet,
glowed in a passing ray, and now along this barren strip of earth, whose
brown leaves are darkened by the twilight of the withered pines.
Thus, without once looking back, or glancing to the right or left, the
dark form wandered on.
At last there came a narrow dell, open to the sunlight, and full of fresh
wild grass, whose vivid green was sprinkled with flowers. A narrow
dell, with walls of leaves on either side,or rather with the foliage
spreading from the grass to the sky, like immense folds of tapestry,
rendered surpassingly beautiful by fairy hands. A narrow dell, through
whose wild grass the tiny thread of silver sparkled fitfully, and through
whose silence the low song was ever singing.
At the western extremity of this dell, where it widened into a slope of
carpet-like moss, sparkled a calm sheet of water, embosomed among
leaves. The shadow which rested there, making the water more calmly
beautiful, and wrapping the giant trees on the opposite shore in vague
twilight, was only broken by a flood of hazy light, which came rushing
like a golden rain through an opening in the trees.
Above the dell,above the calm sheet of water, undimpled by a ripple
shone a glimpse of Heaven, whose deep azure was blushing into gold,
at the kiss of the afternoon sun.
And the dark form which had passed between the old man and the sun,
striking him down with its shadow, hastened along the dell, without once
looking back.
As it came in sight of the calm sheet of water, a word arose upon the
silence, uttered by a voice of sad emphasis.
That word was Wissahikon!
At last the form drew near the water-side, and that calm sheet, spreading
without a ripple, in its frame of rocks and trees, reflected a face.
It was a bronzed face, shadowed by locks of dark brown hair. There
were large lustrous eyes beneath the boldly marked brows. There was
beard upon the firm lipdark beard, which clothed the round chin, and
softly relieved the dark olive complexion. There was a broad forehead,
shadowed by a gloom beyond all power of language to describe.
Altogether, a face so bold, and yet beautiful in its young manhood, so
darkened in every lineament by some memory of the past, or prophecy
of the future, the Wissahikon waters never reflected before this hour.
The dark form stood by the water-sidecentred in that scene so full
of romance and beauty. To the north and south spread the calm water,
resembling no impetuous torrent, but a slumbering lakelet embosomed
amid trees, rocks and flowers.
There were grotesque rocks on the opposite shore, mingled with the
colossal trunks of forest trees. Beyond those rocks, and through the
intervals
of those trees, the ascent of a broad hill-side was dimly seen, with
a ray of light trembling through the distant shadows.
This shore was in strong contrast with that on which the dark form
stood. Leaves, blossoms, flowers, nothing but leaves, blossoms and
flowers, from the calm water to the glimpse of sky. No grand trunks
of giant trees were visible; it was a mass of foliage bathed in sunshine,
while the opposite shore brooded among its shadows.
The opening of the della space of level mossalone broke the
uniformity
of the leafy prospect.
To the south and the north, the foliage, meeting from the opposite
shores, enclosed the waters in its embrace, and the calm waves mirrored
every tree, rock and flower, until there seemed another wood, another
world and sky beneath their surface.
Over the tree-tops of the south, a glimpse of a roof was seen, with a
line of smoke fading away from a chimney into the leaves and sky. It
was the roof of an ancient mill, standing near a waterfall, whose music
came in softened cadence over the woods.
As the dark form stood on the edge of the bank, as the bronzed face
was reflected in the waters, a sharp sound crashed on the silence of the
scene. It was the report of gun or pistol, or perchance only the echo of
a rock thundering from some distant height, but the sound passed unheeded.
That face still gazed in sadness into the clear waves.
Presently a sound as of fluttering wings was heard, and an object fell at
the feet of the motionless form.
It was a dying bird, with a drop of blood starting from the soft plumage
of its breast. There was a glassy film upon its eyeonce it moved its
wings, beating the grass with faint blowsand then it was dead.
There was something like an omen, or a warning in this sceneit lay
upon the green moss, its white plumage tinted by gold, with a single
blood-drop starting from the breast.
And the form standing near the waters bent down, and a hand raised
the birdit was a wild doveand as the warmth of life still clung about
its plumage, it was pressed against a manly breast.
A welcome home! a sad voice was heardIs it an omen, or a
warning?
At the same moment a glad laugh rang merrily in the air, as, from the
crashing bushes, sprang a manly form, while a handsome face, ruddy with
excitement, appeared amid its encircling locks of chesnut hair.
Paul Ardenheim! rang out the tones of that cheerful voiceYou
here!
Reginald! exclaimed a deep voice, in an accent of unfeigned
amazement
.
CHAPTER FOURTH.
PAULREGINALD.
With
his gun resting on his shoulder, and his small huntsman's cap
tossed aside from his forehead, the new-comer advanced, and in a moment
stood beside the sombre form.
His muscular form was attired in a blue hunting-shirt, gathered to his
waist by a belt, and reaching from the bared throat to the knees. He
wore boots of buckskin. There was a powder-horn at his side, and a
hunting-knife glimmered below his girdle.
His cheeks flushed by excitement, his dark blue eyes flashing with the
consciousness of youth and health, his proud lip darkened by a slight
mustache, he stood beside that sombre form, like an embodiment of animal
beauty, beside the incarnation of a Thought.
It was a strong contrast, between this face glowing with ruddy hues,
and relieved by luxuriant hair, and that bronzed visage, whose large
earnest
eyes and pale foreheadthrown more distinctly into view by the
sombre attireonly suggested the idea of acute mental suffering.
They clasped hands together, and stood in silence, gazing into each
other's eyes,Paul Ardenheim and Reginald of Lyndulfe.
It seems to me, as though centuries had gone since last we met! said
Paul, keeping the hand of his friend within his own, and resting upon that
glowing face his sad lustrous eyes.
Egad, Paul, it does indeed! cried Reginald, with a cheerful laugh
Deuce take the cap, I say, and he rested his rifle against a rock, and
tossed his cap on the sodThe day is somewhat warma little too
warm for violent exercisesit there, Paul, and I'll sit here, and we'll talk
over old times together.
Old times, echoed Paul, as he rested himself upon a rock, which
overhung the waterWe have known each other something more than
two years.
A sad smile passed over his face.
Two years and six months, my dear Paul Reginald threaded his
chesnut curls with a delicate hand sparkling with ringsAnd yet we
have
lived
more, Paul, in that brief period, than in all the rest of our years
together. Lived, I say,suffered, enjoyedstarted up from boys into
men. Two years and six months ago, Paul, we met for the first time,
under peculiar circumstances. It was in the old farmer's house, at the
wedding of a young girlyou remember?
Was it only the shadow of a passing cloud, or did the cool air of this
quiet dell chill his blood, fevered as it was by violent exercise?
As he uttered the words, `a young girl,' a cloud came over his face, an
icy tremor agitated his limbs.
You saved my life, Paul. That bound me to you for ever; in life or
in death. The next morning, at daybreak, Paul, as I was about to leave
Philadelphiahaving been called home to England by a letteryou
appeared suddenly before me, pronounced my name, and thus reminded
me of the pledge which I had made to you the night before. You
announced your intention of going to England. We clasped hands on it,
Paul, and went together. Do you remember our journey to Lyndulfe?
Those were delightful days we passed together, Paul, in the old castle,
among the Yorkshire hillsbut, Paul
Spare your reproaches, Reginald. I left you suddenly, and without
one farewell word. The hours that we spent together in Lyndulfe castle
are present with me nowI remember well, how well! our solemn pledge
of brotherhood. But one night I hurried from the castle; I did not clasp
your hand before I went; I did not tell you of the cause of my flight.
Flight?
Yes, it was a flight. I fled, Reginaldover England, over France,
Italyover Europe, and never once escaped from my relentless pursuer.
Relentless pursuer?
It was not a physical enemy, Reginald,it came not in bodily shape,
or I would have grappled with it, and died defying its vengeance.It was
hereit was here
Paul laid his hand upon his forehead.
Reginald arose, and bending over his friend, took his hand within his
own, and gazed earnestly into his face.
Paul, he said, in a tone of unfeigned kindness, it is one of your
Dark Hours!
My Dark Hours?
You have never told me the story of your life, Paul. For this I
do not upbraid youI do not perchance deserve, and have no desire to
intrude upon, your confidence.
That confidence would blight you into madness.
On the last night of Seventy-Four, I saw you for the first time. The
moment I looked upon your face, Paul, and met the gaze of your eye
while all around fell back from you, with an inexplicable fearI felt that
you were my friend, my brother. I knew, as certainly as though the
voice of a spirit had whispered it, that we were linked together, by a hand
stronger than the hand of manmightier even than Death. I saw you,
young, frank, thoughtful, but brave and true; and without asking one word
of your past life, I took you for what you were, and you became my
Brother. That you had lived all your life in these wilds, that your father
and your sister were livingthis much, indeed, I knew. But all beside
was mystery. I seek not now to penetrate that mystery, but I have a
few rude words to say to you, Paul, and do notdo not, I beseech, slight
my friendship, yes, my brotherhood, with the reproach due only to a
heartless curiosity.You have your dark hours, Paul, and it is this that
makes the blood chill in my veins, as, gazing upon your face, I see it
shadowed by a cloud, that looks to me like an unutterable despair.
Reginald paused a moment, as if to gather strength; then, with his face
flushed and his eye brightening, he continued:
I have seen you, Paul, gazing with rapture on the setting sun. It was
on shipboard, when the ocean, framed in the white clouds that lined the
horizon, trembled and blushed in the last flush of day. My arm was
round your neckthere was rapture in your face, a calm, deep joy, that
indicated a soul at peace with God and man. `How beautiful!' you
exclaimed
`It
speaks to me of the other world!' That instant the joy
passed from your face; a cloud was on your forehead; your eyes glared
with an expression of agony, which I can never forget: and these words
passed from your lips, `My father, my father!' The accent of
unutterable
anguish which accompanied these words, I have not for an instant
forgotten
My father! My father! groaned Paul, as he hid his face within his
hands. Perjury  Sacrilege  Blasphemy! These are no trifling
crimes
It was a Dark Hour, Paul; dark to me, because I could not comprehend,
and therefore could not relieve. Many a time, since that hour, have I seen
the smile pass from your face, and that strange gloom rush suddenly over
your brow, and words as strangeevery accent steeped in unutterable
despairfall from your lips. At Lyndulfe, one night, when all was mirth
and song, and a crowd gathered round you, listening in delight to your
eloquent wordswhen every eye was centred upon your impassioned
face, and your glance shone with an incessant brightnesseven then, Paul,
your eye grew vague and glassy, your brow was overspread by that fearful
gloom, and you rushed from the scene with a mad cry of anguish. Even
then, amid the clamor and dismay created by this sudden change in your
demeanor, these words were heard, echoing through the lighted hallMy
father! My father! Uttered again, with that accent of despair, too deep
for human comprehension, or human relief.
Paul started to his feet
Spare mespare methere are incidents in every life that cannot be
too lightly touched
As he uttered these words, in an impetuous tone, Reginald became
suddenly pale.
Does he speak of that dark night? Can he know Madeline?
The thought flashed over his mind; it was his turn to shudder and grow
pale. The name of Madeline rose to his lips, her ghost to his soul. For
a moment not a word was spoken. Paul was gazing in the waters, at the
reflection of his agitated face; Reginald sat silent and shuddering.
Paul, I do not wish to lift the veil which rests upon your heart. But
can I do any thing to relieve this misery which covers you with such gloom,
and stamps upon your brow the impress of an impenetrable despair?
Command me, PaulI do not say command my gold, for that would be
an insultbut command my heart, my arm. They are yours. Even if
you havebut no! no! it is impossible. But I will speak iteven if
you have committed a crime
Reginald never forgot the look with which Paul turned to himnever,
until the hour of his death, forgot the accent in which he spoke.
Crime, once committed, leaves its memory in the soul and on the brow.
But crime that
is to be
does it not fill the soul with its horror, and stamp
itself in characters of Prophecy on the hour?
Paul! Paul! cried Reginald, overwhelmed with agony, as the words
of Paul penetrated him with awe. I would give my life to serve you.
Paul looked upon him with a sad smile.
Your life opens before you, Reginald, a track of light leading upward,
still upwardamid those beautiful clouds, which men call wealth and
power. Yourself a lord, your father one of the noblest names on the scroll
of British nobility, you have before you an enticing prospect. You will
carve for yourself a name on the faces of the battle dead. You will be
admired in the senate, welcomed wherever you turn, by the plaudits of the
multitude. When your father dies, you will become the Lord of
Lyndulfe
,
of Marionhurst, of Dernburg, of Camelford. Your title, His Grace
the Duke of Lyndulfe and Marionhurst! Is it not a glittering prospect,
Reginald?
Then you will take to your bosom some beautiful girl, whose dower
will swell your wealth into an incredible revenue, while her beauty will
be mirrored in your children. And with all this you would give your life
to serve me! Ha, ha! The Duke of Lyndulfe give his life to serve the
fortunes of a houseless and nameless man!
It is not well, Paul. It is indeed a Dark Hour, when you mock your
friend, your brother.
Pardon, Reginald, pardon. I only meant to say, that while your future
spreads before you all that is most desired by men,a prospect of light
and glorymine has in store for me nothing but a dishonored name and
a grave unblessed by tears.
Paul, I swear itI would give my life to serve you!
Look yonder, Reginald. Beyond those woods, not one mile from this
spot, lies the home of my thought. Ere the setting of the sun, I will stand
beside the walls of that home, and see the vines waving about its roof-tree;
see the faces of fatherof sister, smiling welcome from the old hall door,
or I will stand amid a pile of ruins, and fix my eyes upon two graves.
Fatherhe lives?
Take care, Reginaldit will bring on, once again, the Dark Hour. He
did live, on the first day of 1775, when I left this valley. Since that time
I have had no word from his pen; nor have I received any intelligence
of him or my sister. He may livehe may be dead. A little while and
all is over.
Confide in me. Tell me all. We are alone, Paulthe hour is very
still and solemnI feel as though the spirit which flashes from your eyes,
had pervaded my own bosom. Awed by the stillness, the solemnity of
this hour, I swear
Hold, my friend. Let us talk no longer of my life, but of yours.
Wherefore, on this day of my return to Wissahikon, do I meet you beside
these waves? Ahyou blushthere is then some fair lady in the case?
CHAPTER FIFTH.
THE NEW LOVE OF REGINALD.
Paul
, I will tell you the history. You have guessed the truth. She
is indeed a beautiful girl
She and Paul smiled that sad smile, which always filled Reginald
with involuntary awe.
Do you remember the view from the high tower of Lyndulfe?
Standing
on its summit, you behold the hills and valleys for at least thirty miles,
with farm-houses dotting the prospect, and grim castles frowning from the
distant woods. Do you remember the ruined castle
It stood upon the west of your father's castlenot ten miles away.
A splendid pile of ruins, rising, with its tottering walls, against the dark
background, like some ghost of past ages.
It is a castle of ruins no longer. Soon after you left Lyndulfe, a
stranger came to Wyttonhurstthat is the name of the castle, you
remember
and
soon the old pile of ruins became strong and beautiful again.
There were various rumors concerning this stranger. Some said that he
had heaped incredible hoards of gold in the East Indies, others spoke of
the American Continent. But that he was rich, very rich, no one could
deny, for he rebuilt the castle, and soon it was known, that he had been
knighted by the king. He was called Sir Ralph Wyttonhurst of
Wyttonhurst
.
And this stranger
Was blessed with one of the most beautiful daughters that ever human
eye beheld. Not one of those
blonde
women, whose cheeks, like the
dawn, are swept by golden hair, and whose beauty is acknowledged as a
type of our English women, but a queenly girl, with an olive cheek, eyes
intensely black and brilliant, and a step full of majesty and pride. You
may be sure that her hair was dark, that her lip, with its warm vermilion,
contrasted vividly with the clear brown of her cheek
At his words, muttered Paul, as his eye grew vacant, that memory
comes once more upon me!And you loved her? he said aloud.
I need not tell you how we met, or describe to you the history of our
love, in all those minute details, which are interesting only to two persons,
the lover and the beloved. But we did meetwell I remember the night,
when, amid the dark woods of Wyttonhurst, we plighted our faith to each
other.
Did your father know of this?
He discovered our love, and on pain of his eternal displeasure, forbade
me ever to meet my betrothed wife. It was an improper alliance, he said,
and exclaimed in scorn`The heir of Lyndulfe unite with the child of a
nameless wanderer!'
Did you obey?
I certainly did not. My father then forced upon me a commission in
his Majesty's dragoonslook
Reginald opened the breast of his hunting-shirt, and the light shone
upon a scarlet uniform.
Take care! You may be seenyou are now on Continental ground.
Ha, ha, you need have no fear. Yesterday, I left his Majesty's army,
they are encamped somewhere in that chaos of peach trees and sand,
known as New Jersey. I disguised myself, as you see, entered
Philadelphia
Your object? Ah, ha, Reginald, have you also your
dark hour?
Madeline! muttered Reginald, with a changed voice; and then
conquering
his emotion, he continued in his usual toneIt was in regard to
some matter of deep interest to my father that I came yesterday in
disguise
to Philadelphia, when, to my surprise and joy, I heard that Sir
Ralph Wyttonhurst is now living on his country-seat, near the
Wissahikon
.
His daughter
You have seen her? interrupted Paul.
Not yet. I am on my way to meet her at this moment. They tell
me that the mansion of her father stands among the pines, on the
Wissahikon
,
a mile or two from this spot, near the Schuylkill.
Strange! murmured Paul, as he saw his own face, mirrored in the
waves, suddenly flush into something like raptureDark-eyed, hair black
as midnight, a step like a queen, eyes beaming with the tender prophecies
of youth and hope! So like that beautiful dream, which flashed over the
slumber of my life, and woke me into suffering and manhood. Even now
I see her, as she stood before the door of that fatal chamber, the light
streaming over the beautiful face, as she suffered her dark hair to wander
wildly over her shoulders
Of whom do you speak? cried Reginald, in amazementDo you
also love?
Love?again that bitter smileWhy should I devote beauty and
innocence to the terrible vengeance of my destiny? You said that the
mansion of Wyttonhurst stood in a grove of pines, near the Schuylkill?
So the country folks tell me.
It must be near her homethe Wizard's daughter! Does she yet
live? Shall I ever more hear the music of her voice, or be roused into
madness by her touch? After I
have been home
home! Home! Yes,
after I have been home, I will ascend the hill, on whose summit stands
the house of Isaac the Wizard. Passing through the grove of pines, I
will look upon the window of that chamber where we met, and behold
her facehersbathed in the glory of sunset. Or perchance there is a
grave among the pines, a grave overspread with wild flowers, and sacred
with her ashes.
But tell me, Paul, the history of your life since you left Lyndulfe
Let me compress ages of thought and suffering in a word. I left this
valley, where my life had been spent, an enthusiast, a dreamer. I knew
nothing of mankind save from my books,the hour before I hurried from
Wissahikon, and met you in the street of Philadelphia, I had known for
the first time, how dark, how fathomless were the abysses of my own soul.
Now, Reginald, I have seen the world.
I have seen the world
. Does
not that sentence speak the entire history?
You have been in Italy?
In Francein Italyin Germanyin Spainin Russia.
Everywhere
the same story is telling every hour, a story told in the groans of
those who are born to suffer and die, in the laughter of those who are born
to trample and to kill! Amid the majestic ruins of that dream-land called
Italy, amid the corn-fields of France, amid the vine-clad hills of Germany,
amid the dreary wastes of Russia, I have beheld in various forms, the
same terrible facta Peasant crushed to the earth, loaded with chains,
baptizing that earth with his blood and tears, and a Lord standing with his
foot upon the Peasant's neck, mocking his anguish with laughter, and
turning his blood, his tears, into gold. That is, after all, the picture which
the whole world offers to the eye of Goda Slave and a Lord. Both
brothers, born alike of the same dust, going alike to the same grave-worm,
redeemed alike by the anguish of Calvary, and yet, one tramples the
other, loads him with chains and scorn, and turns his blood and tears
into gold.
Yet there must be classes in the world, Paul. There must be lords
and peasants. There must be kings and subjects. There must be rich
and poor.
There was another sight which I saw, Reginalda sight that affected
me deeply. Even as the Peasant, crushed to the earth by those chains
called Custom, Power, and other fine-sounding namesfelt the foot of the
Lord upon his neck, and shed upon the earth the baptism of the Poor
blood and tears, only blood and tearseven then, Reginald, as the
laughter of the Lord mocked that chained Peasant's anguish, while the
alembics of Priestcraft and Kingcraftfine names! transmuted the blood
and tears into goldeven then I saw the Peasant's dusky face lighted by
a sudden fire. I saw him spring from the dust, and trample his chains
under his bleeding feet. Then, Reginald, I witnessed a new baptism.
There was no longer a Peasant before me, but a Demona Demon raving
on his wrongs, and bathing his scarred limbs in blood, the blood of the
rich, the noble, the blood of the gifted and the beautiful.I asked the
meaning of this sight, and a voice answered, `It is the new Baptism, which
God hath in store for the poor.'
Paul stood erect, his hands outstretched toward the western sky, his
features stamped with a sombre enthusiam.
Do you not perceive, Paul, that sentiments like these will apply very
dangerously to the present contest between the Revolted Colonies and
the King?
The King! echoed Paul, in a tone that echoed strangely through the
stillness of the forestAlways the King! Speak to the man of titles
and wealth, of the poor dying by millions, dying in famine, in battle, in
plague, and you are answered by a word, `The King!' Let the poor die
a thousand deaths in one, let them suffer such slow anguish as would
bring the blush to a devil's cheek, but, be very careful of the King. Be
very tender with the Rich. Let no rough wind blow too rudely upon the
round cheek of the Priest. Reginald, Reginald, it is enough to drive one
mad to see these Kings, hedged round by law, by custom; made holy by
Religion, defended by ranks of nobles, priests and rich men; while the
Poor are turned out by millions into the dark night of hopeless toil, and
left to blunder in wounds and in blindness to the grave. King! Did I
think that the earth, one hundred years from this hour, would be cursed
by one monster, who, calling himself King, Priest, or Rich Man, only
lives to trample his brothers into the grave, I would kneel here, and
beseech
that God, who looks not unheedingly upon the fall of a sparrow, to
arouse at once the Demon in the breast of the slave, and let the New
Baptism
at once begin.
As if in witness of the sincerity of his thought, he raised his right hand
to heaven.
There is force in your words; but have a care! Let the mob once
hear and believe sentiments like these, and there is an end of all order, all
government. In the place of Law, we will have anarchy, and for King
George at the head of the British Nation, we will only have Rebel
Washington
at the head of a mob.
Washington! echoed Paulstarting as though some memory found
a voice in the utterance of that word.
One day, resting on a rock which yawned over an abyss amid the
Alps, I heard that name. It was from the lips of a wanderer, who, cast
like myself, a pilgrim on the face of the earth, had amid his journeyings
traversed this land of the New World. His face was haggard; his attire,
covered with dust, scarce concealed the sharp outlines of his withered
frame. That haggard face was suddenly flushed, that withered frame as
suddenly dilated, as with the throbbings of a new life, while he uttered a
name which, in his wanderings, he had gathered to his heart. He spoke
of battles, of dreary marches at dead of night, of a band of ragged peasants
pursued by the armed soldiers of a King. Of farm-houses fired at dead
of night by ruffian soldiery, and of old men butchered on the threshold
stone. Of virgins torn from their slumber by the hand of brutal outrage,
and dishonoredoutragedamid the shouts of armed spectators. Of a
band of mechanics and farmers, who, aroused into energy by these
accumulated
wrongs, assembled one day, in a City of the New World, and in
the face of mankind, and by the name of God, solemnly declared against
the King and his hired murderers. Of one man, who kept a rebel band
together in the face of unimaginable perilsin face of starvation,
nakedness
and treasonwho, with a mob of half-naked and starving peasants,
confronted the splendid armies of a King, and drove them like frightened
sheep before the hounds, from a Christmas revel, at a town called
Trenton. The name of that man was Washington. The story touched
me deeply. I could not help but love that man!
PaulPaul, can I indeed believe my ears? You preach treason and
sanctify revolt with words like these? I cannot hear any more of this
I am an officer of the King!
He laid his hand upon the scarlet uniform, which was visible through
the folds of his hunting-shirt.
But you are something else, my dear Reginald. An officer of the
Kinga Lordheir to a Dukedomsomething more even than these. A
Man! You have blood in your veinsdoes it bound more freely when
you reflect that, hired by a King, to do the work of murder, it is now your
duty, your solemn duty tocut my throat?
His face was convulsed with mocking laughter.
AhPaulit is not my friend that speaks. I do not know my
brother's
voice. That tone, that smile do not belong to you
Washington! cried Paul, gazing into the waters with an absent glance.
It is a new name in the history of the world. I do not remember it in
the blood-red volume of British heraldry.
It is the name of a Rebel, exclaimed Reginald, with a frown; there
is a price upon his head
Shall he indeed prove worthy of his task, and shine forth from the
clouds of Revolution, the Father of his Country? Or, shall he sink into
the degraded herd of Kings, and gasp his last breath amid the curses of an
enslaved People, leaving only these words as a record of his life
`I founded a Dynasty and died.'
TuttutPaul; we've had enough of this nonsense. Before
December
,
the British army will occupy Philadelphia, andha, ha, it may be
the head of Mister Washington will adorn the gate of London!
And the handsome Lord graced his words with a pleasant smile.
There was a man, Reginald, who rose from the Mob, and made
England
great; for, from the brute form of vassaldom, he struck into rugged
life, the image of a People. He was named Cromwell. He died, leaving
the greatness of England, achieved by his own hand, as his only
monument
.
His body was soon after rooted from its grave, his limbs torn into
fragmentsnailed to gibbetshurled into the offal of the streets. This
was some time ago. Can you tell me, Reginald, which name looks nobler
now in history, the King Charles the Second, or the Brewer Cromwell?
He was a Traitora Regicide.
This time Reginald frowned.
Yes, it is true. He helped to kill a King, who had given, not long
before, his best friend to the scaffold.Ah, it is enough to force a smile
upon lips of stone! To talk of treason against a King. There is no such
thing. There can be no treason committed against a King, for Kings are
only Kings because they have been traitors to God and man.
Washington! Is he indeed the man for the age, or must the People
look for another? AhI rememberthe name in the Urn
Paul was silent. The Last Night rushed upon his memory again.
Paul, you surely do not imagine, that the idle Declaration, promulgated
by theha, hathe Continental Congress, will ever influence the destinies
of Europe?
A Thought never dies, Reginald. The Thought of the Gospel was
uttered by certain Galilean fisherman, in the face of all the kings in the
world. This was seventeen hundred years ago. And now that Thought
is embodied once moreit is uttered once again in this Declaration. Do
you think that Thought has lived seventeen hundred yearslived in the
face of kings and their brutal lawsto die at last without an echo? A
thought that lives, is only a deed struggling into birth. Can you, or can
any man foretel the deeds which that Thought will create, within the next
hundred years?
Even now, that Thought moves in the heart of Europe, like a living
heart in the breast of a corpse.
You talk, it seemsha, haPaul, you must pardon the smile. But
you talk of a Revolution in Europe. Forgive me if I am dull of
comprehension
.
CHAPTER SIXTH.
PAUL TELLS THE STORY OF THE LADY WHOM HE MET IN THE GARDENS
OF A ROYAL PALACE.
One
summer day, Reginald, I found myself lost amid the mazes of
one of those beautiful gardens, which wear royal homes upon their fragrant
hearts. It was in France; and I strayed along the walks of the Great
Trianon. There were deep shadows all around me, and a breathless
silence reigned on every side. Shadows that were broken by wandering
rays of light, silence that was roused into gentle music by the lull of a
distant fountain.
As I wandered absently along, I suddenly beheld, standing in my path,
the image of a beautiful girl. Her loosened robe flowed freely around the
outlines of a voluptuous shape; and her pale golden hair streamed in
unbound tresses to her shoulders. There was no coronet upon her hair,
no gem upon her plain white robe, and yet, as she raised her mild blue
eyes upon me, while her brow grew dark as with wonder at my intrusion
upon her lonely walk, I felt that I stood in the presence of a lady of rank
and power. I stood hesitatingmy eyes enchained by her beautiful face
while I was conscious that my presence was an intrusion, yes, an insult.
Retreating with an involuntary bow, I cast my eyes to the ground, when
her voice arrested my footsteps.
`Stay!' she cried, `I have waited for you!'
There was a bewitching music in her voice. At the sound I turned,
and stood wondering and confused before her. I shall never forget the
look of dignity mingled with fear, which she cast upon me, as with a proud
gesture she beckoned me to approach.
`I have waited for you,' she said once more with a haughty accent
`I have been told that you can read the future.'
Completely bewildered, I knew not what to say. It did not occur to
me that she had taken me for some other person; perchance one of those
astrologers, who, at that time, prevailed in the atmosphere of the French
Court. Indeed, it seemed to me, that this singular meeting was the
especial
act of Providenceor Destiny.
`I do not ask you to read my fate in the Heavens' she said, while a
sad smile gave a new beauty to her countenance`You need not consult
the stars, in order to tell me that which is to be. But for three nights my
slumbers have been visited by a dreama dream, whether sent from God
or from the Evil One you can best determine.'
`Dreams are but the prophecies of the soul,' I answered, as though the
words had been uttered in my ear by an invisible friend`When awake,
the soul, trammelled by the flesh, can only retain the impressions of the
Past. But it is in
sleep that the Future becomes to her a Memory
. It is
in sleep that the soul rises into her immortal power, and forgets all
consciousness
of time, and knows by name, neither Past nor Future. In
sleep the past and future are onethen the Soul, indeed starting from the
trammels of flesh, rises into the atmosphere of immortality.'
Even now, I see that young countenance, so fair, so delicate in
complexion
,
with its mild blue eyes and pale golden hair! She was like
Catharineah! That word speaks to me of Home! Only there was
never a frown on Catharine's brow, never one gleam of pride in her calm,
deep eyes.
`Listen, while I repeat my dream,' exclaimed the unknown lady; and
while I stood wondering and dumb, she spoke in a low silvery accent,
which now quivered with fear, and again grew faint, almost inaudible
with preternatural awe.
I do not repeat this dream, because it is so wild and strangeno! no!
But I cannot banish it from my eyesit is ever before meeven now it
is there, between me and the sunlight.
With an accent of terror that I can never forget, she turned away from
a flood of light, which came gushing through an interval in the foliage.
`It is theredrawn distinctly upon the shadowsthere! Do you
not see itthat hideous phantom?'
She covered her face with her hands, and I could see her cheek grow
pale as death.
`I was wandering along a lofty hall, hung with tapestry, beautiful as
the rainbow of the summer evening, and adorned with images of pure
marble, and pictures, which did not seem pictures, but living souls,
imprisoned
in canvass. I was alone, and as I went straying through that
chamberwhose magnificence even now bewilders meI heard voices
murmuring my name, with accents of idolatrous praise; and it seemed to
me that I was the Queen of a World, and that the very sunlight shone for
me. The tapestry bore my image in a thousand formsmy face was in
every statuethe very flowers seen through the casements, bloomed for
mefor me alone. Oh, it was a bewildering dream, and, grown mad with
the consciousness of beauty and power, fired by the accents of the
flattering
voices, which called me GoddessDivine Queen, I raised my
hand toward the lofty ceiling, andit makes the blood freeze in my veins
defied Godyes, I defied GodI dared Almighty power to crush my
power, or wither my beauty.'
The beautiful girl once more hid her face with her hands. It
was not until some moments had elapsed that she gathered strength
to proceed.
`Even then, as I stood in the act of blasphemy, with my hand
uplifted, and the words of defiance on my lips, my attention was attracted
by a window, which was veiled, not by rich folds of purple tapestry, but
by a black cloth, drooping without a fold from the ceiling to the floor.
An impulse that I could not comprehend, hurried me to the window, and
forced me with my own hands to draw aside the dismal curtain. I
beheld'
She shuddered.
`I beheld, not a far-extending prospect of gardens and fountains,
embosomed
in the shade of lofty trees, and adorned with palaces of marble.
No! It was a wide plain, in the heart of a great city,a wide plain,
framed by huts and palaces, and crowded with one black mass of heads,
that met my eye. Thousands and tens of thousands were gathered there;
it was an awful sea of life, undulating to and fro with a ceaseless motion.
The air was steeped in a dead stillness, only broken by a hoarse murmur.
`Gazing upon this countless multitude, I beheld, in the centre of that
sea of upturned faces, the object around which it undulated in unceasing
waves.
`That object was very far away from where I stood, and yet I saw it
distinctly, and drank in every minute detail.
17
`It was a platform, surmounted by two upright pieces of timber,
connected
at the top by a horizontal beam. At the foot of one of these
upright
pieces of timber was a block; near that block, a heap of sawdust,
and standing upon the sawdust, a half-naked figure, whose bared arm was
raised above his head, while his hand clutched a rope. That rope was
attached to an axe, which glimmered near the horizontal beam.
`Even now I see it; that black structure rising over the sea of heads
against the cold blue sky!'
The young woman pressed her hands upon her breast, as though to
still the mad pulsations of her heart, while her expanded eyes glared upon
the vacant air, and her lips murmured in a tone almost inaudible`It is
therethere! The axe glitters in that passing ray!'
After a moment, growing more composed, she continued:
`Suddenly, a lane was made through this immense multitude; a lane
which reached from its very edge to the foot of the platform. There was
an unnatural stillness upon the scene; I could hear the rolling of wheels,
and presently saw the head of a horse rising above the crowd. That
horse was attached to a rude vehicle, in which stood a solitary figure, a
half-naked woman, whose dishevelled hair flowed over her bared bosom.
Whenever I attempted to gaze upon her face, a mist came over my eyes:
but I saw her form; it was very beautifulthe sun shone over a bosom
white as snow.
`The rude vehicle, rolling slowly on with a grating sound, was bearing
this lovely woman toward the platform.
`I could not turn my gaze away from her form; my heart bled for her
she seemed so terribly alone, in the midst of that countless multitude.
And as she came on, the stillness deepenednow and then a sudden cry
was hearda short, wild ejaculationand all was still again.
`Oh, how earnestly I endeavored to chase away that mist which
came between my sight and the face of this lovely woman! It was in
vainI could not trace one line of her countenanceher hair waved over
her shoulders, and her bosom shone in the sun, but her face was
a shadow.
`The vehicle reached the foot of the platform. They had taken her
from my view, but in a moment she appeared again. They were leading
her up the stepsI saw her stand upon the platform, near the half-naked
man, her white bosom gleaming in the sun.
`The breathless stillness of the multitude grew deeper.
`I was gazing at her fair round neck, whenO God! O Godthe
hand of the half-naked man was laid upon ithe was forcing her upon
her knees. Hark! A cry of smothered agonyher neck rests upon the
block, and her long hair streams over the saw-dust.
`The stillness becomes more intense.
`There is a low brooding murmurthe axe is glimmering there over
the white neck of the lovely womanit fallsthere is a torrent of blood
pouring upon the saw-dust from a headless trunkthere is a head rolling
over the floor of the platform, the long hair cumbered with
blood-stained
dust!
`The silence of the crowd is broken at last. One horrible yell, swelled
by ten thousand voices, peals into the skyit was as though the damned,
released from their torment for a while, had come to hold their infernal
jubilee in the light of day.
`That half-naked man seized the severed head, and holding it by the
hair, exposed the face to the gaze of the crowd. The sun shone vividly
upon itwrithing with the last pang, I saw it,with the glow of life and
the blue tinge of death struggling upon its cheeksat last I saw and knew
that face.
`Behold,' cried the half-naked man, tossing it in the light`Behold
the head of the Traitressthe last of an accursed brood
Marie
Antoinette
!'
`It was my own face which I saw, held by the blood-stained hair in
the light of the sun.'
She paused for a moment, and pressed her delicate right hand to her
foreheadher cheek was livid, her lips colorless.
`Dumb with horror, I started from the window, and turned my gaze
once more upon the magnificence of the lofty hall. The statues looked
pure and beautiful, the pictures glowed with rosy warmth, the
tapestry
,
trembling gently, seemed like a thousand rainbows joined in one.
But I could not banish that terrible sceneI saw, wherever I turned, the
bleeding head, held by the dishevelled hair, with the last pang quivering
over the face.
`Then a confused cry broke on the silencea crowd of half-naked and
bloody forms came rushing into the lofty hall, staining the white statues
with their crimsoned hands, and reeling with demoniac gestures over the
marble floor.
`Shuddering and cold, I shrunk within the folds of the tapestry, and
saw one form taller than the rest, dragging a headless body over the floor.
It was the body of a naked woman, with blood upon her breast, and the
print of brutal feet upon her beautiful limbs. While it was dragged along
the floor, the broken arm grasped by the ruffian's handthere was a
head tossing to and fro, under the feet of the crowdonce I saw it, as it
whirled by me, the long hair streaming in the air. It was horribly
disfigured
,
clotted all over with drops of bloodbut it was my own face
which I saw.'
As these words fell from her colorless lips, her hands drooped by her
side, and her hair seemed to rise upon her forehead. Never have I beheld,
even in the wildest creation of the artist's pencil, a more impressive picture
of unnatural fear. For some moments she stood gazing fixedly into my
face, and the sunshine stole in a subdued glow over her pale golden hair
and colorless cheek.
`For three times have I beheld this vision,' she said in a faltering
voice`Three nights in succession it has visited my couch. * * * Thou
canst read the futureread for me this terrible dream * * * tell me'
She was silent. Amazed, confounded, I knew not how to answer her.
Was it indeed a woman of royal race that I beheld, or some frenzied
daughter of the poor?
`You desire reward,' she exclaimed, `take this ring and tell me'
Scarce knowing where I stood, I took the ring and placed it on my
finger, while my eye was riveted by the surpassing whiteness of her
neck.
Even as I gazed, that neck was encircled by a livid lineI felt the
words that I uttered before, rising again to my lips.
Dreams are but the Prophecies of the Soul. When awake, the soul,
trammelled by flesh, can only retain the impressions of the Past. It is in
sleep that the Future becomes to her a Memory.
Paul ceased, and wiped the moisture from his forehead.
Reginald, utterly absorbed by the singular narrative, sat with his elbows
placed upon his knees, his cheeks resting on his hands, and his eye fixed
upon the stream. Once or twice, as Paul went on in his history, Reginald
had looked up,and been startled by the unnatural excitement of that bronzed
visage. He shrank from the sight of those dazzling eyes.
Paul was silent, but some moments elapsed ere he could rouse himself
from the profound reverie into which he was plunged.
At last, raising his eyes, he beheld Paul standing near, his arms folded
and his eyes fixed upon the undimpled stream. The unnatural pallor
of his face only made his eyes seem more wildly lustrous. His forehead
was bareit shone in the sun, and the wind agitated the locks of his dark
brown hair.
He looks like a prophet or a madman! thought Reginald.
Why, you are pale, my brother, cried Paul, turning suddenly round.
There is no color in your face. Can it be that you give credence to an
idle legend such as I have told?
But the woman whom you saw in the gardens of the Great Trianon,
exclaimed Reginald, in a voice that was faint and tremulous. Was she
indeed the Queen? was she indeed Marie Antoinette? Do you think her
dream will ever become reality? That the people of France will lay the
head of their Queen upon the block?
A smile darted over Paul's face.
There was once a King called Charles the First, and a Brewer named
Cromwell he said.
Reginald was silent.
The incident related by Paul, whose dark eye shone as with inspiration,
sank deep in his heart. With an involuntary shudder, he gathered his
blue hunting-frock over his red uniform.
CHAPTER SEVENTH.
THE BROKEN BUT NOT DIVIDED COIN.
But come, Reginaldthe sun is declining toward the western horizon
I must go home
.
Paul uttered the italicized words with an accent of profound sadness.
My way lies in this direction: he pointed to the north-west
Beyond
those woods I shall soon learn the secret of my fate. Father
Catharine
And mine in this,Reginald pointed to the south-westwithin an
hour I hope to behold my lady-love.
The color came to his cheek, and there was a joyous smile on the
face of the handsome soldier.
Imagine the face of my dear father, when he hears that his dutiful son
and the Baronet's daughter, separated from each other in the woods of
Yorkshire, have met in the wilderness of Wissahikon. Ha! ha! his face
will present a picture in which indignation and laughter struggle for the
mastery.
He raised his rifle, and placed the cap upon his chestnut curls.
You will not marry this lady without your father's consent?
I'faith, you are altogether too sober, brother Paul! Wandering amid
these delicious solitudes together, we will leave `marriage'`settlements,'
et cetera, to the old folks. It is an awkward word, that `marriage.' I never
yet could think of it while watching my own image in the eyes of a
beautiful
girl.
But, Reginald, you would not think of committing a wrong There
was a profound sadness in the countenance of Paul.
While sitting beside a lovely woman, I would not like to think of any
thing but hereven if I could. Do not talk of `thinking' in such a case,
friend Paul. What matters all our thoughtsare we not driven onward
by a power that we cannot see, and certainly do not comprehend? Observe
that flower, floating on the bosom of the streamlook how smoothly it
glides onward. Can you foretel the fate of that flower, Paul? Whether
it will lodge on the right bank or the left, or be drowned in the waterfall
below? Or whether it will be `fished out' of the stream by some truant
school-boy, armed with a stick, with a yard of thread and a pin-hook at the
end?
The quiet dell echoed with the somewhat boisterous laughter of the
young soldier.
Paul turned upon him with a stare of wonder.
Ha! ha! laughed ReginaldYou with all your thought cannot
change the course of that flower. Nor can the flower itself alter its course
one tittle. Paul, our life is precisely like the flowerwe drop from
another
world, perchance from some branch of an immortal treethe stream
that bears us is called Fate, Destiny, Providence. If it leaves us on the
right bank, we wither; if on the left, we die; or if it carries us over the
falls, we are lost. Even should we escape the right bank and the left,
and ride safely through the whirlpool, here comes some truant Chance, and
`fishes us up' with something full as ridiculous as a stick, a yard of thread
and a pin-hook.
Paul looked upon the glowing face of Reginaldmarked his athletic
formhis lip curling in a smilehis cheek flushed with vigorous physical
beautyand uttered a sigh.
It was a moment ere he answered him.
It is one thing, Reginald, to plunge madly into wrong, and call it Fate,
and it is another thing to feel ourselves every hour whirled by an invisible
hand toward some horrible crimewhirled onward, despite all your
struggles
,
your prayers, your tears. That indeed is DestinyFate
But
she
is so very beautiful, Paullips that pout with passion; eyes
that fire your blood; wavy hair, that makes your fingers mad to clasp it; a
step that at once glides over and spurns the earth; cheeks whose clear
brown is ripened by a rose-bud flush.Ah! Paul, Youth and Love mixed
in one cup make such a bewitching draught, that one cannot help but
drink it!
Reginald, said a voice, that seemed wrung from the very heart
You could not, on any pretence, do wrong to this girl,
who has trusted
in you?
As he spoke, Paul stood with folded arms, his melancholy face invested
with a wild spiritual grandeur. Reginald, glowing before him, with flushed
cheeks, shadowed by chesnut curls, presented a striking ideal of physical
beauty.
Do wrong to herha, ha! I don't think of it! You tell me that you
have seen the world, and yet talk so gravely about an affair of this kind?
I love her, Paul, would die for her, but
The sentence was broken by an ejaculation from the lips of Paul.
Had it been completed, the entire thread of this history would have been
changed.
But
I cannot wait for marriage
, he would have said, when the
exclamation broke the sentence.
She is beautiful? cried PaulHer name?
A strange name, Paulaltogether picturesque and romantic. `
Leola
!'
`Leola!'It is like music heard at dead of night, over the waters of a
still lake.
I never called her by name
he added, with a sigh.
When will we meet again? exclaimed Reginald, as he stood with
rifle on his shoulder, ready to depart.
In the depth of the woods, near the point where the Wissahikon
empties in the Schuylkill, there stood, some time ago, a colossal tree, its
trunk like a column of some pagan temple, its wide-branching limbs leafless
and withered. It stood desolate and alone, amid the glad summer trees,
a sad image of Aged Despair, glaring in the face of Youthful Hope. It
stood near a rock, imprinted with the mark of a human foot beside a cloven
hoofand stood where the setting sun always shed its last and kindliest
glow. We will meet there at sunset, Reginald. You will tell me of
your love
And you will tell me how you went home, and was welcomed by your
father's blessing and your sister's kiss.
Paul turned his face away; Reginald saw his form agitated, but could
not look upon the expression of his countenance.
FatherSister these words were audible amid the muttered
ejaculations
which came from the lips of Paul.
At sunset, under the blasted pine, he said, raising his face, and abruptly
turned away, his mantle floating from his shoulder, and his plume rising
between the eye of Reginald and the sun.
But as suddenly turning again, he placed his hand within his breast,
and drew forth a broken coin, attached to a chain of delicately worked steel.
You remember this, Reginald?
At once, Reginald dashed his rifle to the ground, and placing his hand
within his hunting-shirt and red uniform, drew forth a similar fragment,
attached also to a chain of fine steel.
I have always worn it since that hour!
These fragments were the separate halves of a silver shilling, stamped
with the image of George the Second, and bearing date 1732. The half
which Paul held in the light, bore the figures 17; while on Reginald's
fragment the figures 32 were distinctly seen.
You remember the night, Reginald, when we broke this coin, in the
woods of Lyndulfe, and swore to be as brothers to each other, until
death?
I have never forgotten it, Paul
In case one of us should, at any time, be placed in a position of
extremity
,
he should send to the other his fragment of coin
And the one who received this coin, should hasten to his brother's aid,
in face of all dangers, regardless of all other ties or obligations. I remember
it, Paul!
Join hands with me, Reginald, and let us in the sight of God renew
our pledge of Brotherhood.
`We will be true to each other, and on no extremity nor danger desert
each other, but cherish for ever the solemn symbol of the broken, but not
divided coin,broken, but not divided, for its separate pieces are moved
by two hearts joined in one, by the holy tie of Brotherhood.'
Brother Paul!
Brother Reginald?
Their hands were clasped; their eyes, centred on each other's faces,
were moistened with tears. In this dark world there are many horrible
realities, but it seems to me, that the friendshipthe Brotherhoodof two
true-hearted men, is among those things which make the angels less
sorrowful
for the crimes of earth, and even wake the cold malice of a devil's
soul into something akin to love.
At sunset, under the blasted pine! cried Paul, as he turned away.
Reginald gazed after him, as he threaded his way among the rocks on
the western bank of the stream. He saw him winding near the waterside,
his form half-hidden by the thickly clustered bushes, while the sunlight
shone only upon his hair, surmounted by the dark cap and the slender
plume.
There goes as noble a heart as ever throbbed, and some sorrow that I
cannot comprehend, crushes him to the earth!
At this moment Paul appeared in sight again, standing upon a rock,
some distance up the stream, which received the warm sunshine on its
breast. His face, thrown in strong profile, stood out from the shadows of
the distant woods, and glowed in vivid light. His arms were outspread;
he seemed absorbed in some thought of voiceless prayer.
`He is praying that he may behold his father's white hairs, and be
welcomed by a sister's kiss, muttered ReginaldAh! He descends
from the rock,he stands upon the fallen tree, which reaches from shore
to shorewith his eyes turned unceasingly to the north-west, he crosses
the stream. * * * He is lost in the shadows of the woods, and I am alone.
The sun was sinking in the west, and the shadows came thicker over
the dell. There are nooks beside the Wissahikon, where noonday is as
twilight, and evening wears the darkness of midnight. This dell, opening
suddenly upon the stream, as from a cleft in the forest, with a wall of
leaves on either hand, was full of cheerful light at the midday hour, but
no sooner did the day begin to decline, than it was rendered sad and
gloomy by a twilight shadow. True, there was a joy in its very sadness,
a holy calm in its very gloom, but as Reginald glanced around him, he felt
the quiet, the shadow of the place, impress every sense with a feeling
of awe.
I am alone, he murmured, gazing now at a wandering burst of sun
shine, now upon the waveless stream, brooding under a veil of shadow
Alone!
That word startled the silence with a strange echo. Alone with his
own soul, alone with the memory that pointed terribly to the Past, with
the hope that trembled amid its gladness, as it looked to the future.
There was a chaos of thoughts crowding over the brain of the gallant
soldier.
As if in the attempt to banish thought, he began to hum a merry air,
which he had heard at some boisterous festival of the camp; but it came
faintly from his lips, and suddenly died away without an echo.
He beheld the dove that had been killed by his shot; it lay near his
feet, with its head resting between the folded wings, and the red stain upon
its bosom. The young man raised it, pressed its plumage gently, and
murmured a single word
Madeline!
Then the Last Night rushed upon his memory in vivid and distinct
details. He saw the white form kneeling in the lonely chamber, he heard
the voice pleading for mercy, in the name of Godhe bared the young
breast, and fell back affrighted and cold before a fatal Revelation. Thus
all the scenes of that fearful night came crowding upon him at once, until
he was affrighted and cold again.
Would to God I had never entered the confines of this valley! Well
do I remember the phantom that warned me backit is before me now
I cannot banish its words from my ears. How carelessly I came to the
farm-house on that nightthe cup was druggedthe outrage planned
but, like a madman chased by the frenzies of his own brain, I fled from the
house and from the Wissahikon in the daybreak hour. Madeline!
Madeline
!
It was
his
Dark Hour.
His changing color and wandering eye, and brow damp with moisture,
all betrayed the force of his emotion.
I have not seen the Merchant who was entrusted by my father with
this secret, since I left Philadelphia. Has he obtained any clue to the
mystery? Does Madeline live? I dare not question the people of the
valleythey might recognise me, and suspect me of the murder. Better
that suspicion, ay, much better the guilt of murder itself, than
His voice died away in a murmur; his face, so fascinating in its manly
beauty, was terribly agitated.
Leola! he exclaimed, and the cloud passed from his brow.
CHAPTER EIGHTH.
PAUL GOES TOWARD HIS HOME.
Paul
crossed the Wissahikon by means of the fallen tree, and ascending
the opposite bank, plunged into the shadow of the woods. As he threaded
his way over the earth, strewn with withered pine leaves, while the huge
trunks were dimly seen on every side, his face was still turned to the
north-west.
He strode rapidly onward, until the sombre depths and unnatural
stillness
of the pines was succeeded by a thicket full of flowers and sunshine,
with green boughs stretching across his path at every step. But the
sunlight
that danced so merrily among the leaves and blossoms, did not chase
the settled gloom from his face, nor did the luxurious atmosphere of June,
steeped in fragrance and musical with the hum of bees, call one glow of
rapture to his cheek. Ever turning his eyes to the north-west, he threaded
the windings of the faintly defined pathway, while the gloom came darker
over his face.
It was a pathway rarely trodden; it led among the wildest recesses of
the woods, and led toward the Home of Paul. In a few moments he
would be there; he would behold the old Block-house smiling under its
garmenture of vines and flowers.
Paul felt his knees bend under him, and wiped the cold moisture from his
brow. Every moment brought him nearer to that Home; soon he would
know the worst.
His thoughts became vague and dream-like. He was again a wanderer
over the face of the earth. Again he stood in the streets of Paris, an
unknown
and friendless man, alone in a desert of strange people. Again he
trod the soil of Germany, and paused for a while amid the chivalric student
people of Heidelberg, and heard their earnest songs, chorused by the
clash of swords, swelling deep and far over the bosom of the Rhine. Then
he was on the way that leads through a dark wood, to the summit of a
craggy hill, from whence you may drink in the valley of the Arno, with
Florence glittering on its breast. He was in Rome, at dead of night, in
the great Temple of St. Peter's, with only a single light burning through
its profound gloomalone at dead of night in that great temple, whose
dome is itself a sky. He was in Rome, in the Catacombsthe city of the
dead sunken under the feet of the living millionshe knelt by the graves
of martyrs, and, oppressed by the memories of the place, felt his soul glide
away into the New World, where the father and the sister were waiting
for him.
And with these thoughts of his pilgrimage over Europea pilgrimage
accomplished on foot, with but little money and no friends, save those
whom his sad visage won by the waythere came other and wilder thoughts
of adventures too strange for belief.
He thought of the night when, belated among the Hartz mountains, whose
abrupt cliffs and pines and shadows reminded him of his own Wissahikon,
a voice spoke to him, and
Paul dared not pursue the thought. He shuddered as it crossed his
mind.
And as he banished the memory of the Hartz mountains, the thought
of his Father, his Sister, his Home came back with overwhelming force.
I cannot go on! he cried, and flung himself at the foot of a wild poplar
treeHow can I look upon my father's face, when there is Perjury
written upon mine?
Again the cold moisture gathered on his browhe raised his right hand
to dash it awaywhen his eye assumed an unnatural brightness, and he
gazed upon the half-raised hand with a look of singular interest.
This handthis hand he muttered, and springing from the seat at
the foot of the wild poplar, hurried on his way.
There was a strip of wood to be passed, a lane to be crossed, a gentle
hill to be ascended, and then his feet would press the wild grass of the
winding road which led to the gate of the Monastery.
Paul hurried through the strip of wood, and descended the steep bank
into the lane, which led from the Wissahikon to the Schuylkill. He was
hurrying toward the opposite bank, when his ear caught the sound of a
footstep. A man attired in the garb of a laborer was journeying slowly
along the road with a scythe on his shoulder.
Paul waited until he approached.
Can you tell me, friend, whether the old man still lives in the
Block-house
yonder?
The laborer started at the sound of the voicelooked in Paul's face
with a vacant stare, while his rugged visage was stamped with an
expression
of intense terror.
The old mansometimes called the Priest of Wissahikondoes he
still live yonder?
Paul held his breath as he awaited an answer to this question. But the
laborer did not answer; he stood in the centre of the road like one stricken
dumb by the hand of Heaven; his eyes dilating and every line of his face
agitated by terror.
The suspense of Paul amounted to agony.
Speak! Does the old man yet live? The old man who lived in the
Block-house, not two hundred yards from where you stand. Is he yet
alive?
As he spoke, he advanced, his whole frame trembling with emotion.
The laborer uttered a faint cry, dropped his scythe in the road, and darted
up the bank and into the bushes as though he had been pursued by a wild
beast.
What can it mean? Is the curse of Cain indeed written on my
forehead
?
Paul remained standing in the centre of the road, absorbed in thought.
After a moment he raised his eyes; there was a noble poplar tree standing
on the verge of the opposite bank, its broad green leaves intermingled with
flowers that resembled cups of gold adorned with pearl. At sight of this
tree, which stood alone, reaching forth its magnificent branches on every
side, all the associations of his youth rushed upon the soul of the
Wanderer
.
Beneath that tree, on the night of his flight, he had hesitated for an
instant
uncertain
whether to go back and fling himself at his father's feet,
or to rush forward into the unknown world, an outcast, stamped with the
brand of Cain.
Two hundred yards from that tree stood the Monastery of Wissahikon.
Maddened by this monument of the Past, this green memorial of his
crime, Paul ascended the bank, and darting over the irregular fence,
hurried blindly onward. It was not long before his feet pressed the
winding road which led to the Block-house gate.
Do not picture to yourself a smooth path, paved with brown pebbles,
and bordered by regularly planted flowers, with the limbs of carefully
clipped trees arching overhead. But picture a road whose traces are
almost lost in a growth of wild grass overspread with briersa devious
road, wandering among trees of every shape and kind, with brushwood
starting in luxuriant vegetation, all about their massive trunks. A road
that now strikes to the east, now to the west, at this point comes out in
sunlight, and yonder hides itself beneath the branches that bend down
until their leaves are mingled with the rank grass.
Paul gazed upon the few paces of the road which were visible, and
felt that every thing announced decay and desolation. The deep hollows
dug by wheels in former days, were buried in the briers and grass; it was
evident that the path had not been used for many a dayperchance
years.
After standing for a moment, buried in thought, Paul commenced that
journey of two hundred yards, which to him was more terrible than a
journey around the entire globe.
As he went onward, tearing his way through the briers, his cheek
became
paler, until his eyes, increasing in brightness, resembled the eyes of a
living man set in the face of a corse. He trembled with cold, although the
day was one of the most delicious in June, and gathered his mantle closely
over his breast.
He attained the solitary chesnut tree, around which the path turned
with a sudden inclination. Shadowed by the rich foliage, Paul paused for
a moment, and remembered that from this tree to the gate of the
Block-house
,
the road was marked by five inclinations. At the first,counting
from the chesnut treestood a tulip-poplar; at the second, an oak; at
the third, a pine; at the fourth, a beech; and at the fifth, a sycamore or
buttonwood tree. Around the trunk of each of these treesdistinguished
from the other trees by their remarkable sizethe path made a sudden
turn.
From the foot of the old sycamore, it was but a few yards to the gate
of the Block-house. The dense foliage prevented the ancient edifice
from being seen, until this point was attained, when it suddenly, and in
all its interesting details, rushed upon the eye.
I cannot go onevery tree, every flower brings some memory before
meI will retrace my steps, and go forth into the world again!
These words were not spoken in a tone remarkable for depth or power.
The accents of the speaker were tremulous and broken, while his chest
rose and fell with spasmodic throbbings.
The five trees, which he would have to pass, each tree venerable
with age, and clad in the glory of summer, seemed whirling before
his eyes.
With trembling footsteps, he left the chesnut tree. Faint and
powerless
from the emotion, which only added brightness to his eyes, while
it paled his cheek, and loosened every fibre of his frame, Paul toiled
slowly onward, until he stood beneath the shade of the tulip-poplar.
Then it was, that the memory of the fatal night came upon him with
crushing force; he sank on his knees, and buried his face amid the grass.
With this hand I struck him down he moanedI dashed him
beneath my feet, and lived. Perjured! Perjured! The burden of the
Unpardonable Sin is upon me. And yet, that which
has been
, even the
guilt of perjury, the crime of an unnatural blow, is innocence compared
to that which
is to be
.
An unbroken silence prevailed through the forest, while Paul remained
prostrate, with his face buried in the grass. There was no human eye to
look upon his agony, and listen to his incoherent words. He was alone
with his Soulwith Memory. Memory of what?
A low humming sound came to his ears. He started upit was the
sound of a human voice. It came gently through the wood, now rising
on the air, and again dying away in an indistinct murmur.
It is the voice of Catharine, he cried, springing to his feet, and
turning
around the foot of the wild poplar. There are two voicesI hear
them distinctly. The voice of Catherine and
My father! he would have said, but could not speak the word.
Trampling over the briers, and through the grass, he hurried onward
toward the oak. He was strong in his very despair. He was resolved
to reach the oak without a moment's delay, and turning its rugged trunk,
prostrate himself at the feet of his Father. He drew near the old tree, whose
branches might have sheltered an hundred men. Venerable with the
growth of five centuries, its immense trunk hollowed by decay, and its
gnarled limbs woven together with fragrant vines, it broke on the eye of
Paul as he hastened forward, just as he had seen it in the summers of his
boyhood.
Beneath its shade he paused, and gazed beyondthat sound of voices
breaking more distinctly on his ear. Before him, tangled no longer with
briers, the road stretched to the west again, with sunlight playing over
its grass and flowers, while the bright foliage quivered overhead.
Paul held his breath; the sight which he beheld, enchained every
faculty of his soul.
Where the sunshine came in wandering rays, there was a little child
tossing merrily on the grass, and crushing leaves and flowers in his tiny
hands. A boy with cheeks like the rose, and lips like twin-cherries, hair
of bright gold, mingling with the grass, and eyes of laughing blue, turned
towards the sky. His face and naked arms were embrowned by the sun,
and his coarse garb indicated that he was but a peasant's child. The air
rang with his merry laughter, as he tossed his flowers in the aircaught
them upon his face and hair, and thenwhile his cheeks were almost
hidden by violets and rosesreached forth his little hands to gather more.
A happy child, dressed in an humble garb, playing all alone in the
midst of the silent forest, making the air musical with his voice, and
baptizing
his stainless cheeks with freshly gathered flowers!
Paul stood very still, afraid to move or breathe, lest he might scare the
beautiful vision away. Leaning against the trunk of the great oak, he
rested his pale cheek against the rough bark, and gazed in silence upon
the laughing child.
His eyes filled with tears.
That picture of laughing innocence stood up beside the image of his
own dark fate, in terrible contrast.
The tears rolled slowly down his cheeks.
Afraid to breathe, he soon became conscious that there was another
spectator of this scene. Amid the foliage, not far from the child, appeared
the face of a young woman, with a finger pressed upon the red lip, and
the Heaven of a Mother's love lighting up her eyes.
It was the face of an humble laborer's daughterPaul remembered it
well. She was but a girl when he left the Wissahikon. One day, four
years ago, near this very spot, a girl of some fifteen years had knelt
before him, and joining her hands upon her breast, asked his blessing.
The blessing of Paul Ardenheim! Inspired by the superstitious awe
which then prevailed among the country folks of Wissahikon, in regard
to the young Dreamer, she sank at his feet and begged a blessing from
his lips.
And the face now gazing upon the laughing child, with the finger on the
red lip, was the face of the young girl who, four years since, had knelt at
the feet of the Monk of Wissahikon.
They at least are happy! The young mother, whose eyes are full of
Heaven, and the child freshly gathered from the blossoms of Paradise!
It seemed to Paul that he could gaze for ever on this scene; it was to
him a picture which memory might wear for ever in her holiest shrine.
The child centred amid grass and flowersthe mother gazing from the
foliage, her sunburnt face glowing into beauty,the profound forest all
around!
She can tell me of my father, thought Paul. At last I can know
whether he lives. I long to hear her speak the name of Catharine.
The mother started from the foliage, and stood disclosed in the centre
of the hidden road, her young form clad in the coarse attire of a poor
man's wife, while her brown hair fell loosely over the 'kerchief which
veiled her bosom.
Paul advanced; his footstep crashing down the wild grass as he left the
shadow of the oaken tree.
It is a beautiful child, he said, in that voice, which was wont to win
the ear with its rich intonationLet me take it in my arms, and learn
from its lips the song which the angels sing in Heaven.
The mother looked up, startled by the unexpected footstep and the voice.
Do you not remember me? he said, with an attempt to smileHas
my face grown strange so soon. I have only been absent two years
The young woman gazed upon this form, clad in strange attire, with
the mantle floating down the shoulder, and the plume trembling above the
dark hair and livid face. She did not speak, but her eyes dilated; her
lips parted; she was motionless.
Do you not know me?again that sad attempt at a smile.
The limbs of the young woman bent beneath her; she sank on the grass,
and with an involuntary gesture, gathered her child to her bosom. Never
for a moment did she turn her wild gaze from the countenance of Paul.
The color had vanished from her face; it was evident that she was
oppressed by some indefinable terror.
Do you not remember the day when you knelt before menear this
very spotand asked my blessing? cried Paul, as the undeniable fear of
the young mother cut him to the soulHave I become so changed, so
hideous, that you do not know me?
Do not harm me faltered the affrighted mother, gathering her child
closer to her heartThe deadthe dead
Tell me, does my father live? Catharinemy sisteryou have seen
hershe is well?
The dead should never return to earth, but to bless us! Do not
do not harm me!
The deadwhat mean you? I am living
But still the young mother clutched her child to her bosom, and with
her dilating eyes fixed upon the face of Paul, faltered, in a tone pitiful with
terror
Do not harm me! Do not harm me!
The agony of the damned rent the heart of the Wanderer, as he rushed
past the mother and her child. Never for an instant looking back, he fled
from their presence, he passed the pine, and ere he was aware, reached
the foot of the beechen tree.
From this point the road extended toward the north; had it not been
for the branches, which bent down until their leaves swept the grass, Paul
could have seen the Block-house.
I am accursed in the sight of God and man. Yes, the meanest wretch
who digs to save himself from starvation, looks on me with loathing. The
young mother shrinks from me, as if there was death in my look; the
very babe upon her bosom lifts its little hands to curse me.
Upon the smooth rind of the giant-beech, some unknown hand had
carved a name and date.
PAUL  JANUARY FIRST, 1775.
He gazed upon this inscription with a vacant wonder. He could not
trust his sight, but passing his hand over the smooth surface of the beechen
trunk, felt every letter, and counted them one by one.
What hand has dared record that date, and stamp the memory of my
crime upon this tree?
There was no answer to the question. Paul left the shadow of the
beech and staggered onward. His steps were wild and unsteadyhe
tottered like a drunken man.
It is only a moment longer,only a moment! I will stand beneath
the sycamore and see my home. Home!
CHAPTER NINTH.
HOME.
A branch
bent over his pathhe dashed it aside, and caught a gleam
of the white trunk of the sycamore.
His face like the face of a corpse, his eyes flashing with the glare of
madness from the compressed brows, his forehead damp with moisture,
he dashed onward, reaching forth his hands with an involuntary impulse,
as he saw the white bark of the well-remembered sycamore.
But ten paces intervened between him and the tree; only ten paces,
and yet every foot of the green sod seemed lengthened into a league.
Bounding forward with the last impulse of his strength, he fell prostrate
at the foot of the sycamore. He was afraid to raise his headafraid to
look, lest he might see his father's faceafraid to listen, lest he might hear
his father's voice.
Lifting his face from his hands, he gazed down the path, hedged in by
trees, and beheld the sunlight shining warmly over a green space in which
it terminated.
From that green space arose a wall of logs, and beyond that wall, a
massive structure glowed brightly in the sun.
It was the Block-Houseit was his Home.
Do not picture to yourself a Gothic mansion, with pointed windows and
roof broken into regular peaks, adorned with fantastic carvings along the
eaves, with chimneys starting into the air like minarets from the dome of
a Turkish mosquea Gothic mansion, standing in the centre of a garden,
which, in its turn, is separated from the woods by a neat lattice fence.
No! The Block-House of the Wissahikon, which we have seen in
winter, capped with snow, was only a huge square of logs, rising darkly
in the centre of an open space, separated from the woods by a high wall,
pierced by a gateway on the west. Whether the Block-House was two
or three stories high, whether it comprised twenty or an hundred
chambers
within its walls of oak and cedar, or whether it was built in imitation
of any known style of architecture, are questions that we cannot determine.
In winter time, it turned to the rays of the setting sun, a gloomy front,
broken by a lofty hall door, with a window on either side and two above.
From this hall door to the gateway was only twenty yards. And in the
winter time, this huge square of logs, standing within its wall, with its
gateway looking to the west, and its encircling trees stripped of their
leaves, rising giant and grim around it, presented an appearance full of
gloom and desolation.
18
But now the scene was changed.
It was surmounted by lofty trees, whose straight trunks rose for thirty
feet without a branch, and then their limbs, thick with foliage, met around
the roof.
The sun shone warmly over the gateway, over the wall, and upon the
fabric itself, but did not disclose the outline of a single rugged timber.
It looked not like a mass of dark logs, but was, in truth, a mass of leaves
and flowers. It was covered, from the roof to the sod, with vines, whose
foliage only permitted the hall door to be seen. A garment of leaves upon
the broken roof; a tapestry of leaves upon the western and southern walls;
leaves and flowers, woven together, around the posts of the gloomy
door-way
thus
attired, the old Block-House looked cheerful in the rays of
the summer day.
Even the wall which encircled the space in which it stood, was covered
with vines and flowers. The gate posts of cedar were clad in green, in
crimson, in scarlet, in azure and gold.
Standing thus, amid its encircling trees, the Monastery no longer
resembled
a gloomy mausoleum. It did indeed look like a monument built over
the ashes of the dead, but it was a monument clad in the leaves, the
flowersthe rainbow drapery of June.
Paul could not repress an ejaculation of joy.
It looks so beautifulmore beautiful than in the olden time!
Olden time! He had seen scarce twenty-one summers, and yet he talks
of the olden time! There are some minds, we must remember, which do
not measure years by the succession of winter and summer, but by their
Thoughtsby their Sufferingby their Hope and by their Despair.
The stillness which dwelt around the Monastery, was only disturbed by
the murmuring of the breeze among the foliage. The subdued light which
invested its walls, came through the canopy of woven branches, but no
glimpse of blue sky was to be seen.
Paul hurried forward. It was no time for thought. He was determined
to meet the pale face of his fatherhe was nerved to encounter the sad
welcome of his sister's eyes.
Leaving the sycamore, he hurried toward the gateway. The gate was
open, but wild grass and flowers started thickly between its vine-clad posts.
The doors, formed of solid oak, hung on their rusted hinges.
It has not been closed for many a day, thought Paul, as he hurried
through the tall grass.
He beheld the door of the Monasterya dark mass of oaken panels, with
an iron knocker near the topappearing in the midst of the tapestry of
vines, which fluttered over the front of the edifice.
To leave the gateway, to hurry over the space between it and the
mansion
a
space overgrown with grass and briersto place his feet upon the
flat stone in front of the doorwas the work of a moment.
He nerved his arm as for a desperate efforthe seized the iron knocker
and beat the panel with repeated blows, and stood cold and shuddering, as
he listened for the echo of a footstep.
He heard the echoes of the knocker die away along the corridor, within
the mansion, andwas it a fancy?he heard the sound of voices; voices
very faint and far away. Then a dead silence ensued.
Againtorn by emotions beyond the power of words to describe or
analyzeagain he lifted the knocker, and again the gloomy echoes
resounded
through the corridor. And once more that sound, which resembled
voices mingling in low whispers, followed by a dead silence.
Paul could endure this horrible suspense no longer.
Another moment, and I am mad, he cried, and dashed his clenched
hand against the door.
It opened before himthe wooden latch, crumbled by age, fell in
fragments
at his feetthe light of day streamed in upon the corridor, while a
gust of damp chill air rushed in his face.
This corridor traversed the entire extent of the Block-House, from west
to east, dividing the rooms which stood upon the lower floor of the mansion.
Into that corridor opened the doors of various chambersthe room of
his fatherof Catharinehis own cellthe room in which the Deliverer
had uttered his vowand that apartment, which concealed in its bosom
the Urn enshrining the Deliverer's name.
There too was the fatal door traced with the figure of a Cross; the door
of the Sealed Chamber.
Paul stood on the threshold, gazing into the gloom of the corridor,
listening
intently for a sound. From a nook near the door the old clock
glared in the sun, covered with cobwebs and dust. The hands stood still
on its face; one pointing to the hour of Five, the other to the figure
Two.
Ten minutes past five! exclaimed the WandererIt struck five the
moment when I left that fatal roomand since that hour has ceased
to move!
It seemed to him that every dumb object which he saw, was armed with
some fearful memory. The inscription on the beechthe hands of the
clock standing still, and pointing to the hour, the moment, when he dashed
his father from his path,the silent records of the past, looked like the
work of no human hand.
Father! Sister! cried Paul, but he started at the sound of his own
voice.
Advancing, he opened the first door to the right, crossed its threshold,
stumbled against some object in the darkness, and at last touched the bolt
of a shutter with his extended hands. He drew the bolt, pushed open the
shutter, as far as the vines without would admit, and by the faint light
which came through the aperture examined the details of the place.
It was a square room, neatly panelled with dark oak. Near the
window
was a fire-place, and in the centre stood a large table of unpainted
pine, around which were ranged three chairs made of dark wood. Huge
rafters stretched along the ceiling, and there were two windows, one
opening
to the north, the other to the west. As the light came through the
narrow aperture, the place looked naked and desolate.
Around this table, in the days bygone, the old man and his children had
gathered to their frugal meal; which was prepared upon the hearth, either
by the hands of Catharine, or the wife of some neighboring farmer. A
frugal meal, indeed, for it was composed of the produce of the garden, the
fruits of the field, with clear cold water from the well. Neither flesh nor
wine ever passed the lips of the old man or his children.
Paul could not turn his eyes away from the table; the chairs seemed
arranged for his father, himself, and Catherine, as in other days; but there
was dust upon the board, and cobwebs hung across the fireless hearth.
He could not banish the conviction, that the room had been untenanted
for many months.
He is deadmy father, he cried, in a tone of agony. I return to
my home, and the old place is silent. No voice but mine awakes the
echoes. No foot but mine brushes the dust from the floor. Father
sisterboth deadI am alone in the worldalone.
Sinking on a chair, he rested his arms upon the table, and buried his
face in his hands.
When he raised his face into the light, every feature was resplendent
with joy.
Thank Godmy father is dead! The iron hand of Fate is lifted from
my breast!
Uttering these words with a burst of unfeigned rapture, he sank on his
knees, near the table, and raised his glowing face toward heaven.
The sod is on his breast, the grave-cloth on his limbsthank God,
thank God! There is no stain upon this hand!
It was his right hand which he lifted in the light.
Mad and incomprehensible triumph! Even amid the tears which fall
for the death of his father and his sister, he thanks God that the father is
indeed dead, that the sod is upon his breast and the grave-cloth on his
limbs.
His face, at all times remarkable for its thought, embodied in features of
bronze, and lighted by eyes of dazzling lustre, now shone in every line
with an extravagant joy.
The Fiend who pursued me over the oceanover Europenever for
one moment pausing in his terrible chasenow hovering near me like a
shadow, now descending upon me like a cloud, now drinking my life-blood
drop by drop, from the fountains of my heartthis Fiend shall pursue me
no longer! God of mercyI am free!
Amid these wild words and incoherent figures, it was plainly to be seen,
some thought of appalling intensity was hidden.
Free to begin my life, as I would have begun it, had I not entered the
Sealed Chamber he shuddereduntil my father was dead.
His chest shook as he bowed his head and wept aloud.
But he may livelive to blast me with the sight of his pale face and
mild blue eyes.
He arose and advanced to the fireplace. There was a shelf above the
hearth, and on this shelf Paul discovered, with much astonishment, a box
filled with tinder, and near it flint, steel, and a package of matches; in fact,
the requisite materials for creating fire. Covered with dust and cobwebs,
they had not been used for many a day; it may be, not even since the last
night of 1774.
From the ashes of the fireless hearth, Paul drew forth a pine-knot slightly
charred at one end.
It will serve me for a torch, while I traverse the unknown chambers
of my home, he said; and in a few moments, with the red light of the
pine-knot flashing over his features, he stood in the corridor again, his back
to the sunlight and his face toward the shadow.
Then, as if nerving himself for a desperate deed, he passed along the
corridor, he drew near the door of his father's chamber.
How the memories of other days came crowding over his soul!
Not a board in the floor, nor a panel in the walls, but was remembered
by him, and remembered well. The very echo of his footsteps brought
back the sounds of other days.
Soon the pine-knot, burning and glaring over his head, flashed upon the
door of his father's room. The moisture started in big drops from the
forehead of the son; he felt his heart contract and dilate by turns.
He may be there, waiting for me. The thought chilled his blood, as
he stood in front of the door.
He listenedstanding perfectly still, while the torch lighted up his face
with a gloomy ray, he listened for the sound of his father's voice, for the
first echo of his father's step.
All was still.
And yet, torn by a horrible doubt, Paul could not advance; he remained
gazing upon the panels of the door with an absent stare.
He had but to extend his hand, to touch the latch, and the door would
open before him. But he dared not do it.
He is thereslumbering upon his bed, while the Sad Image scowls
upon his withered face and venerable hair. In his dreams he murmurs
the name of the outcast; in his dreams he writhes at the memory of the
sacrilegious blow; in his dreams he repeats the story of the broken oath,
and heaps a father's curse upon the head of the guilty son.
Paul could gaze upon the door no longer. He advanced but a step,
holding the light above his head. It was the door of his sister's chamber
which met his gaze.
Catharine! he whispered. There was no answer.
My sister! he bent his head against the panels. In that moment of
suspense, a gentle face, whose clear blue eyes revealed a guiltless soul,
rose vividly upon his memory, over the mists of the past. Still no answer
greeted him; there was no footstep tripping lightly over the floor; no
gentle hand touched the latch; no voicefull of melody, hallowed with the
tones of other daysmurmured the brother's name, and bade the wanderer
welcome home.
The deep stillness was undisturbed even by the faintest sound.
Sister! cried a voice, whose accents were choked with agonyIt is
Iit is your brother, who, sick with wandering, maddened by remorse, now
stands trembling at the threshold of your chamber, afraid to look upon the
innocence of your face, afraid to speak your name. Catharine! Catharine!
You do not answer me. You avoid the sight of the blasphemer's face.
It is well. I have deserved this, and more.
Again he bent his head and listened. No step, no voice, not the faintest
sound.
Paul passed on.
It was the door of the chamber which shrouded within its shadows the
name of the Deliverer. The name written by the Deliverer himself, and
by the old man deposited in the Urn.
It was not to be opened until a year had passed. The year has gone,
two years and morebut I dare not cross the threshold, for I am
accursed
of God, disowned by the dead, abhorred by the living!
He longed, earnestly longed to cross that threshold, and place his hand
within the Urn, and read the words which his Father had written beside
the Deliverer's name.
But his heart was too full of fearful memories, his brain was dizzy and
his sight was dim. He advanced with trembling steps, and as the
pine-knot
flashed through the shadows, he beheld the Cross upon the dark
panels.
It was the door of the Sealed Chamber.
Paul saw it and rushed forward with a bound. That Cross traced on
the panels pierced his brain with an intolerable torture. For a moment
he stood before it, swaying to and fro, like a drunken man; he reached
forth his hand, and touched the key which was inserted in the lock.
He was about to enter the Sealed Chamber, and confront his Fate once
more.
It was here that I came forth with the blight upon my soul, the mark
of Cain upon my forehead. From that hour I have never for a moment
known even the name of Peace. From that hour my soul has been given
to the fiend, my life to a despair more hopeless than that which awaits the
damned.
His hand was upon the keyhe grasped the torch more firmly, and
placed his foot against the door.
Shall I again stand face to face with Fate, and wrap myself in the
tempest of my Destiny once more! Againagain
His blood congealed as the memory of that incredible Revelation
possessed
his soul. There was no hue of life upon his face; lip, brow and cheek
all were colorless. His eyes no longer shone with unnatural
brightness
they
were covered with a glassy film.
And then, as if the secret of that fatal Chamber had taken bodily form,
and glowed before him like a corse, invested with an unnatural light by
the touch of Satan, with the pale light of the grave glimmering from its
sunken eyes, and a low-toned voice speaking from its livid lipsPaul
groaned in agony, and muttered amid his incoherent cries
Spare me! Spare me! Mercymercy! Not with this handnot
with this hand
Exhausted by the violence of his emotions,appalled by the memory
of the Revelationafraid to know that the old man his father was indeed
dead, but much more afraid to look upon his living face, Paul sank on his
knees, and lifted the torch above his face with his clasped hands.
There is no pity for me on earth,in Heaven nothing but Judgment.
My punishment is greater that I can bear!
These words, uttered by Cain, when the burden of his remorse pressed
too heavily upon his soul, fell with touching emphasis from the lips of
Paul Ardenheim.
Many moments passed while he remained on his knees, with his face
turned to heaven.
Gathering strength at last, he rose, and turned his eyes toward the
opposite
door. It led into his own room, the home of his thought, that dearly
remembered place, where the Hebrew volume had spoken its mysterious
words, and Shakspeare and Milton blessed the Dreamer's soul.
Shall I enter? exclaimed Paul, as the brighter memories for a
moment banished the gloom from his soul.
Here the Prophet Shakspeare first spoke to me; here the voice of the
Prophet Milton first broke upon my solitude; it was here, within this narrow
cell, that I first beheld that World of other ages, which men call the
Bible.I cannot enter nowI am afraid. I cannot pause for a moment,
until I know that my father lives, or that he is dead.
He passed on toward the extremity of the corridor. Those doors on
either side, which had never been opened within his memory, were now
hung with cobwebs. Their dusky surface only spoke of silence and
desolation.
Presently the pine-knot flashed upon the last door, at the eastern end
of the passage. It was slightly open; Paul touched it, and beheld a
narrow stairway.
CHAPTER TENTH.
THE SECRET OF THE UPPER ROOMS.
It
leads to the upper rooms, of which my father spoke in his last
letter, said Paul, and for an instant he stood hesitating, with his foot
upon the first step. The stillness which prevailed, sank upon his soul,
and filled him with an insurmountable awe. At the other end of the
corridor
,
the sunlight shone, but around him all was vague and shadowy.
The light of the blazing pine-knot revealed his colorless features, while
its smoke hung in a cloud above his dark hair.
A wild hope, mingled with a wilder fear, crossed his brain, that his
father stood waiting for him at the head of the stairway, with Catharine by
his side.
Father! he whispered, and bent forward, trembling in anticipation
of an answerCatharine!
It seemed to him, that he heard a sound something like the faint echo
of a step, mingled with the accents of a whispering voice. Now it came
from the rooms above; he heard it plainly; and again it seemed to
murmur beneath his feet.
Was it indeed the sound of a human voice, the echo of a human step,
or only one of those peculiar murmurs, which break through the stillness
of a deserted mansion, on a calm summer day, reminding us of the
low-toned
whispering voicesthe half-heard footstepsof the dead?
Paul dared not speak the fear which chilled his heart. Assured that
his father was waiting for him at the head of the stairway, that the gentle
face of his sister was there, beside the withered features of the old man,
he nerved himself for a last effort. His face became calm; not a
lineament
stirred. It was very pale, but fixed as marble. His hand was firm;
he clutched the blazing pine-knot without a tremor.
If he lives, I am once more an outcast upon the face of the earth. If
he is deadthen, there is a hope for me, a glorious hope.
As this thought crossed his mind, he ascended the stairwayhis light
flashing upward, with the smoke rolling about the flame like gloomy
incense
over a demon fire, illumined the head of the stairway.
It was a narrow staircase, winding with a sudden turn, and almost
perpendicular
.
Pale and breathless, Paul attained the head; he stood on the
floor of a corridor, and holding the light above his head, endeavored to
pierce the shadows which darkened beyond him.
`My father is not here, he murmured, and traversed the corridor.
It was only half the extent of the passage on the lower floor. Seven
doors appeared in its walls; three on the right, as many on the left, and
one at its western extremity.
Paul anxiously surveyed the doors on the left.
They have not been opened for years, he said, as he saw the dust
which had gathered in the crevices; the spider-webs which hung from
the top of each door-frame.
Then turning in his walk, he marked with an eager glance, the doors
on his left.
An inscriptionhah! It is dim with time, but the letters are
perceptible
,
and he held the torch nearer to the dark panels.
A name was written there, not in the round Roman, but in the
picturesque Teutonic character:
Anselm
AnI remember. He was one of the three who, with my father,
kept the ancient faith in the woods of Wissahikon.
The next door also bore a name
Joseph
Paul passed on, until he fronted the last door of the three, and beheld
traced in the same bold characters, obscured by age, the name
Immanuel
.
Hah! There is a key in this lock. Shall I enter?
He turned the key, which grated harshly in the lock, and the door
opened. He crossed the threshold, and by the torch-light beheld a small
apartment, which contained a table, a chair and a benchall of
unpainted
oak.
Within this rude place, Immanuel passed his hours, meditating, in
silence and in night, the coming of the Deliverer. Bread and water
placed upon this table, formed his fare. This hard bench was his only
bed. Here he lived and died.
The room looked bare and desolate; a strip of parchment affixed to the
wall by a nail, alone varied the sombre hue of the dark wainscot. These
words were written upon the parchment
UNION.
Then shall the Lead become Gold, and the Sneer be changed
into a Smile
.
Was this inscription, traced upon the parchment, ever intended to
meet my eye? AhI remember! `Then shall the Lead become
Gold' my father often told the Legend of the Leaden Image. Another
door! It leads into the cell of Joseph
There was a narrow doorway opening into the next room, but the door
had been removed from the hinges, and the threshold was free.
Paul passed into the room.
The same table, bench and chair, the same blank and desolate
appearance
,
and a parchment affixed to the walls by a rusted nail. Had it not
been for the inscription on the parchment, Paul would not have been able
to distinguish this cell from the other. This was the inscription
FREEDOM.
The
Heart
reveals only when the
Hand
is boldly grasped
.
Does this also refer to the Leaden Image? What revelation lies
hidden in this cabalistic formula? `The
Heart
reveals only when the
Hand
is boldly grasped!'
There was another doorway leading into the next chamber, which
presented the same features as the othersthe table, the bench, the chair,
and the parchment affixed to the walls. It was the cell of Anselm.
Thus read the inscription
BROTHERHOOD.
At the FEET of the IMPRISONED thou wilt discover the D.
The last word is obscurethe D is plain, but the other letters I
cannot
read. Doom? Is that the word? Or Danger?
Paul sank into the chair of Anselm, and surrendered himself to the
train of thought, created by these words written on the parchment, which
were affixed to the walls of the three chambers.
First, Union; then Freedom; and last and best, Brotherhood. First,
the assurance that the Lead shall become Gold, and the Sneer be turned
into a Smile. Then the dim enigmathe Heart reveals only when the
Hand is firmly grasped. Last of all, the mysterious sentence, with its
final word blotted by time.At the feet of the Imprisoned, thou wilt
discover
the D. What mean these parchments, affixed to the panels
of the lonely chambers, whose very atmosphere is heavy and damp as with
the atmosphere of Death?
Once more Paul traversed the cells, and read again the inscriptions of
each place, while his amazement deepened fast into awe.
Was this designed as a part of my initiation into the higher mysteries
of the ancient faith? Ah, I remember
Standing on the threshold of Immanuel's cell, he repeated these words,
in a voice of indescribable melancholy
`No child shall ever call thee Father! Thy name, thy race must
end with thee, and be buried in thy grave.'
As he uttered these words, he raised his eyes, and by the light of the
pine-knot, discovered the door which stood in the western extremity of
the passage. Where did this door lead? As Paul stood wondering whether
it led into a larger chamber than the others, or opened upon a stairway,
his eye encountered the keyhole, and at the same time he felt the key of
Immanuel's chamber press his hand.
I will try it. He placed the key in the lock; it turned; the door
slowly opened.
It was with a feeling of indescribable amazement that Paul started back
from the threshold, as the glare of the pine-knot dimly revealed to him the
outlines of that unknown chamber.
A large room, with a ceiling like a dome, he murmured, as he
crossed
the thresholdThe windows are closed like the windows of the other
rooms; the atmosphere is damp and heavy. How the echoes swell around
me, like the voices of ghoststhe shadows flitting over the floor, seem
like the phantoms who watch me, as I draw near the moment of my Fate.
Presently standing in the centre of that spacious room, which occupied
at least one-half the extent of the upper floor of the Block-House, Paul
raised the light and observed the details of the place.
It was a wide and gloomy hall, with panelled walls and naked floor. There
were no chairs, no benches, no paintings on the walls, no decoration of
any kind. As Paul advanced, he beheld a circular table standing near the
western wall, and standing alone on the bare floor.
He held the light near it; there was a wooden bowl upon its surface
and near this bowl a book with the leaves spread open.
It is the Bowl of the Sacrament, resting upon the altar of the ancient
faith, with the open Bible near it.
He raised the pine-knot; from the gloomy wall above the altar smiled
a picture of surpassing beauty.
The design was very simplea Globe surmounted by a Cross. The
sun was rising on the verge of the globe, and its first beams tinted the
lonely cross with rosy light.
`
The Rosy Cross
!' ejaculated Paul, in the tone of a man who
repeats
the words of another. AhI remember
CHAPTER ELEVENTH.
THE CHAMBER OF THE URN.
Paul
was wrapt in a chaos of thought.
I will hasten to the room which enshrouds the urn,there, I will
behold
the explanation of these mysteries. At last I will read the name of
the Deliverer.
He hurried from the Chapel, passed along the corridor and descended
the stairs, while the uplifted pine-knot revealed his pale face, marked with
the indications of absorbing thought.
He thought no longer of the Sealed Chamber and its Revelation; the
memory of his father, his sister, passed from his soul for a moment. As
he hurried onward toward the Chamber of the Urn, his meditations, vague
and incoherent, became centred in one desire.
I will read the Deliverer's name. Then the darkness will be day;
the mystery will be mystery no longer. It may be, that the terrible
suffering
through which I have passed, is only an ordeal intended to prepare me
for a glorious future.
He reached the door of the Chamber of the Urn. There was no key
in the lock, but Paul placed his foot against the panel, and gathering all
his strength for the effort, forced it open. The broken lock clanged on
the floor as he crossed the threshold.
Paul gazed upon the room; it looked just as it had looked on the last
night of 1774.
There was the altar standing in the centre of the place, with the White
Urn upon its surface.
Even now I see himmy fatheras he stood beside that altar, and
placed his hand within the Urn
Paul placed his hand within the urn, and drew forth a letter stamped
with his father's seal, and bearing, in the tremulous characters of his
father's handwriting, his own name`
Paul Ardenheim
!'
Paul broke the seal. Within the letter was enclosed another letter, also
sealed and endorsed with the name of Paul Ardenheim. It fell back into
the Urn, as Paul held the open letter to the light, and read these words in
his father's hand
After midnight, January 1st, 1775.
My Son
Within an hour I will exact from you a Promise and an Oath. The
Promiseyou are not to enter this chamber, nor place your hand within
this Urn, until a year has passed.
The Oathyou will not enter the chamber whose panel bears the sign
of the Cross, until I am dead, under peril of a father's curse and the guilt
of the Unpardonable Sin.
Before you look upon the name of the Deliverer, you will be made
acquainted with the Secret of the Sealed Chamber, which involves your
Destiny and mine.
Within a year I will be dead. At the hour of my death, you will enter
the Sealed Chamber; one year from to-day you will enter the Chamber
of the Urn. Thus you can obey your promise, your oath, and at the same
time learn within a year, the Secret of the Sealed Chamber and the Name
of the Deliverer.
That brief year rolls awayit is the appointed hour. * * * It is the
first of January, 1776. * * *
You have broken the sealthe letter which contains the narrow strip
of paper, on which the Deliverer wrote his name, is in your hand.
At this moment, my son, I charge theeRemember the vow which thou
didst take upon thy soul, when thou wert initiated into the brotherhood
of the R. C., on the night of the first of January, 1775.
Remember the words written in the Chambers of the Brothers, Anselm,
Joseph, Immanuel.
Has the Lead indeed become Gold with thee, and hath the Sneer in truth
been changed into a Smile? Hast thou forced the Heart to reveal by
boldly
grasping the Hand?
Hast thou discovered at the feet of the Imprisoned, the D
Hast thou, in a word, learned the truth embodied in these enigmas, and
seen Union lead to Freedom, and Freedom end in Brotherhood?
Hast thou, in the Chapel of the R. C., beheld the Altar, the Bowl, and
the Book, and been nerved by their memories for the great task which
awaits thee?
Then thou art indeed prepared to read the name of the Deliverer; but
not until these mysteries are to thy soul as the sunlight is to thine eyes,
shalt thou break the seal which conceals that name.
Your Father
.
It will be remembered, that the old man, on the Last Night of 1774,
bade Paul prepare for a solemn ceremony, which was to take place at
sunset on the next day.
This ceremony, it will be seen by the preceding letter, comprised not
only a Vow of Celibacy, but an initiation into a secret Order, designated
above as the Brotherhood of the R. C.
This letter, written after midnight, on the first of January, 1775, by the
Father of Paul, anticipates the initiation and the vow, and regards them as
having already taken place.
It will also be perceived, that the old man intended the letter to apply
to the first of January, 1776.
CHAPTER TWELFTH.
THE HEART REVEALS ONLY WHEN THE HAND IS BOLDLY GRASPED.
I have no right to break the seal. For these mysteries are all wrapt
in impenetrable gloom. The Lead has not become Gold, nor has the
Sneer been changed into a Smile. I have not forced the Heart to reveal
by boldly grasping the Hand. At the feet of the Imprisoned I have not
discovered the Doom, oris it Danger?
Paul dwelt with a painful intensity upon these cabalistic sentences.
Ah, fatal, fatal night, when I dared to violate my oath, and rush
uncalled
into the presence of my fate!
Strange it was that no word of reproach passed his lips in regard to the
beautiful woman who had urged him to his ruin, on that fatal night! Not
a word of reproach, nor yet of memory. Since he crossed the threshold
of the Block-House, an hour ago, he had not spoken her name.
Placing his hand within the Urn, he drew forth the sealed letter which
concealed the name of the Deliverer.
One movement of my finger, and it is broken; but nono! I am not
worthy
He gazed upon it with an earnest eye and dropped it back into the Urn
Hah! a light breaks on me he murmured, and hastened from the
room without closing the door behind him.
He did not stay his footsteps until he stood in front of the door which
opened into his father's room. Not an instant did he hesitate. The door
opened at his touch, and by the torch-light he beheld that chamber, where,
on the last night of 1774, he had seen the leaden Image scowling over the
sleeping face of his father.
Paul advanced; he beheld the couchit was vacant; he raised his eyes,
and with a shudder, saw that leaden face, smiling in the red rays, as with
a preternatural scorn.
Still, in the recess, at the head of the couch, stood the Image of the
Imprisoned Soul, with its form attired in the rude garments of a toiling
man, its hand extended, and that sublimity of sadness stamped upon its
sombre face.
He
is not here, cried Paul, with an accent of unfeigned joyAh!
The coverlet yet bears the impress of his form. 'Tis as he left it on the
fatal night.
He did not pause to think. To pause at a moment like this, was to
become a raving maniac. He seized the extended hand of the Image, and
pressed it firmly, at the same time looking steadily into its sad and
motionless eyes.
Had his hand touched some secret spring? A square space in the breast
of the Image opened like a doora packet fell at the feet of Pauland the
breast of the Image closed again.
Paul seized the packet; it was a scroll of manuscript, written in the
German tongue, with a few words in English on an outside leaf:
To be read by my Son, after he has entered the Sealed Chamber and
the Chamber of the Urn
.
These words were written in a bold round hand, and beneath appeared
other words, in a hand that was tremulous with age or disease.
Paul, you have often heard me relate the Legend of the Leaden Image.
It is more intimately connected with your Destiny than you may imagine.
After you have entered the Sealed Chamber, and the Chamber of the Urn,
and before you have broken the seal which hides the name of the Deliverer,
read the history of the Leaden Image, written in the German tongue by
Brother Anselm.
Do not wonder if this history is widely different from
that which you have often heard from me
. You are now prepared for all
the truth; read. And even amid the sarcasm which sometimes mars the
narrative of Brother Anselm, learn the history of the Image, which now
gazes sadly upon your face. You have seen `that the HEART reveals only
when the HAND is boldly grasped.' It is now your destiny to learn, how
the Lead will become Gold, and the Sneer be changed into a Smile. At
the feet of the Imprisoned you will discover the D.
Again that word is blotted and dim! Is it Doom or is it Danger?
Paul seized the manuscript of Brother Anselm, and still holding the
torch in his hand, hurried from the room. He was afraid to read it there,
for his father's face seemed to start from the shadows, as he looked upon
the bed, yet bearing the impress of a venerable form, the memory of the
sacrilegious blow came terribly to his soul.
In the free air, by the light of the summer sun, I will read these
pages he cried; and soon stood on the threshold of the Block-House,
with the sunshine upon his face.
He seated himself upon an old bench, half-concealed by the grass, which
started up thickly in the space before the Block-House door.
The hour was invested with a peculiar solemnity. The summer wind
rustling softly among the forest leaves, gave a lulling music to the scene.
Belts of golden sunshine, belts of tremulous shadow, flitted by turns over
the grass, the flowers, over the form of Paul and the Block-House clad
in vines.
It is yet two hours until sunset, exclaimed Paul, as he gazed upon
the manuscript and absently glanced over its pages. I will have time to
read,to know at last the reality of my fateere the moment of my
meeting
Reginald arrives. Hah! he cried, arrested by a word which seemed
to separate itself from a page of the manuscript, and force its meaning on
his soulBrotherhood of the Rosy Cross!
Let us look upon those mysterious pages, which seemed to open to his
eyes the secrets of the other world. Let us translate the bold German
into English as rude and bold.
This was the Manuscript which Paul Ardenheim read, on that summer
day in June, as he sat upon the bench, half-concealed by the grass, which
started up thickly around the Block-House door.
CHAPTER THIRTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
I. THE SACRAMENT OF THE POOR.
A wooden
cup, filled with water, emblematic, not of blood, but of
tearsa loaf of coarse bread, such as is now the food of serf and slave,
such as was once the food of Jesus * * * Behold the Sacrament of the
Poor!
These words were spoken many hundred years ago, in a wide and
lofty temple.
There was no sunlight there. Torches held aloft by the arms of
stalwart
men, gave a red light to the place of prayer. It was a Cathedral;
but no human hand had raised its arch. Almighty God was the Architect.
The torchlight glared upon the roof of the cavern, and disclosed the
forms of four thousand kneeling worshippers. Beneath that gloomy arch,
while the deathly stillness of the cavern brooded all around, they knelt;
afar from the light of the summer sun, afar from the dismal battle-fields
which blackened the valleys of Bohemia, afar from the world, the church,
the stern faces of the monarch and the priest.
In the centre of the cavern, an old man, whose rude garment and
snow-white
hair gave him an appearance at once venerable and apostolic, stood
erect, his feet placed upon a rock, which rose from the stone floor, like an
altar from the floor of a church.
Around this rock stood four men, whose foreheads bore the marks of
much toilthe scars of battle and the stolid apathy of sullen endurance
and in their right hands they raised the blazing pine-knots above their
heads. They wore swords at their sides.
My brothers said the old man, and he beheld the old men and the
brown-haired youth who knelt upon the cavern floorMy sisters and
he gazed upon the women, the daughters of the poor, who, coarsely attired,
yet with a rude, wild beauty in their sunburnt faces, had come to the
recesses
of the earth, so that they might freely worship God. My
children
the gray eye of the aged man, glancing far through the cavern,
whose expansive roof glowed redly with the torch-light, beheld the bowed
heads of four thousand men and women. A death-like stillness reigned.
Only the tremulous voice of that old man, and the murmuring of an
earth-hidden
stream were heard.
My brothers, my sisters, my children: we have come here to spend
an hour with God. Many battles have been fought: our native land has
grown rich in graves. Still there is no peace for us on the face of the
earth. Banished from Church and Cathedralhurled like savage beasts
from the light of the sun, this place at least is free. In this temple, not
made with hands, but shapen by Jehovah, we can commune for an hour
with our Father. Around this communion altar of our Lord, we can forget
all that is dark and evil in the world, and only remember that we all are
brothers and sisters, and that the good God is our Father.
He paused for an instant, while his withered hand was laid upon his
coarse garment.
Let us partake of the Sacrament of our Lord Jesus together, and with
one heart, my children!
There is no golden goblet here, to scare the poor man from the table
of the Lordno costly wine, to make him feel ashamed of his poverty.
* * * A wooden cup, filled with water, emblematic, not of blood, but of
the tears of Christa loaf of coarse bread, such as is now the food of serf
and slave, such as was once the food of Jesus * * * Behold the Sacrament
of the Poor.
On a rock which rose before him, a huge wooden bowl was placed. It
was filled to the brim with clear cold water. Beside it lay a loaf of coarse
bread; such bread as the poor have watered with their tears, and
crimsoned
with their blood, since the hour when It is finished! quivered
from the lips of a God like face, that smiled over the multitude of Calvary.
It is not for us, the aged man exclaimednot for us to drink the
blood of Christ. We can only tell him our anguish, and drink his tears.
This wooden bowl, filled only with water, this loaf of coarse bread,
the black bread of serfdom and manacled laborwas the Sacrament which
the four thousand hunted outcasts were about to share together.
The heads of the multitude were raised; kneeling on the cavern floor,
they saw the rock, the bowl and the bread; while, standing out from the
blackness, the figure of that solitary old man shone in the torchlight.
One is absent from our feast the old man said. And from tongues
innumerable trembled the name of the absent one, and prayers were uttered
19
fervently, and hearts spoke earnestly to God, at the mention of the absent
Brother.
John Huss!the gloomy cavern echoed with the name.
He has gone to Constance; gone to meet the vassals of Anti-Christ;
gone alone, to assert, in the faces of Kings, that Faith which the Lord
Jesus delivered many hundred years ago to his People, the Poor. And
all the chains, and scourges, and swords of the Priest and the King have
not been able to rend that faith from the hearts of the poor, through the
long night of ages. We hold it still, and to us it saysas it will say for
ever to our childrenthat great multitude who are born only to toil and
die!`The Lord Jesus was a son of toil, and he is the only Redeemer
of the Poor.'
The old man's voice was no longer weak and tremulous. It gathered
strength as his eye brightened into new life. His tones, strong with
almost
preternatural vigor, awoke the echoes of the dismal cavern. Not an
ear but heard his words, not a heart but throbbed quicker at their sound.
My brothers, my sisters, ere we share the Communion of our Lord,
let us pray for the absent one!
All was still as the old man knelt upon the rock. Every murmur was
hushed, but the hands of the people were clasped with great earnestness,
and their faces were stamped with a silent anguish.
It was a solemn sight to see that outcast old man, whose hairs had
grown gray in damnable heresy, kneeling alone upon the rock, while four
thousand outcast men and women knelt around him, and his lips uttered
an earnest though blasphemous prayer for the absent outcastfor John
Huss, the wretched Heretic, who had gone to Constance, to tell
consecrated
Priests that their golden garments were stained with the blood of
the Poor; to confront anointed Kings with the blasphemous assertion
Ye are guilty in the sight of God. Your thrones are built upon the
skulls of the human race; even amid the sunshine of your royal sway, I
see the darkening cloud of Almighty anger.
After the prayer was saidevery word echoed by the throb of four
thousand heartsthe old man rose, and the four men who held their
torches near him, placed a veiled figure by his side. They lifted it from
the cavern floor, and raised it with a sturdy impulse upon the rock. It
may have been a living being, or only a dumb thing of metal or of stone,
perchance a skeleton, which once was a soulbut no eye might behold
its outlines, for a veil of sackcloth covered it from head to foot.
Much wonder was there in the earth-hidden vault, as, with uplifted
faces, the kneeling people beheld the sackcloth which enshrouded the
unknown
figure. Murmurs echoed from lip to lip, until the broad arch
above flung back their accumulated emphasis, with a sound like thunder.
The old man placed his hands upon the veiled figureevery withered
line of his face was stirred by emotion.
In a few moments your eyes shall behold it. Yet, ere we mingle
around the Altar of the Sacrament, let me repeat to you all a strange
history, which my fathers told to me when I was but a little child. After
the history is told, I will lift the veil, and you shall behold
He glanced toward the shrouded thing, and while every heart throbbed
with anxiety to hear his words, he uttered the history which old men had
told to him.
Shall we, for a little while, leave this gloomy cavern, and go back from
the age of John Huss into other and more distant ages?
Shall we dare to tell the incredible history of that shrouded thing,
which, covered with sackcloth, stood on the rock by the old man's side?
CHAPTER FOURTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPR OF BROTHER ANSELM.
II. THE LEGEND OF THE TENTH CENTURY.
A captive
, rising from the straw which littered the floor of his cell, in
scribed on the dingy wall, these figures
3651.
Through the only window of the cellnarrow and high, it opened to
the east, permitting a glimpse of earth and sky to be seencame the soft
warmth of a declining summer day. That mild glow disclosed the bare
walls, the high arch, the miserable straw, which littered one corner of the
cell. It was in truth a desolate place, and the ray of sunlight only made
it seem more black and gloomy.
As the Captive rose, it might be seen that his form resembled a skeleton,
endued by a supernatural hand with something like life, and clad in coarse
attire, with thin flakes of gray hair falling about his bony forehead and
hollow cheeks. He walked very slowly along the floor, lifting his large
eyeswhich all the while seemed like lighted coals placed in the orbits
of a skulltoward the light, and bared his fleshless arm.
Then, with a sharpened nail, he pierced a shrunken vein, and with his
blood, traced on the wall of the cell the figures
3651
.
But first, he effaced from the wall certain figures inscribed in dim red
characters
3650
.
And while, with the point of the rusted nail, moistened by his blood,
he performed this singular work, like a man influenced by a solemn vow,
the sunlight shone as if in mockery upon his skeleton form, and played
right cheerily with his bony forehead, and large brilliant eyes.
The Captive stood with folded arms, surveying in silence the figures
he had written with his blood. It was as though some harrowing memory
was associated with those red characters, for not for a single moment did
his gaze wander, or the expression of his features change.
The light began to fade, and the shadows, which had assumed various
fantastic forms, gathered in one vague mass around the solitary captive.
There came suddenly through the thick walls a low, deep sound, which
awoke the imprisoned wretch from his reverie. Now it seemed like
distant
music, now like a chorus of dying groans, now like the accumulated
whispers of an affrighted, panic-stricken crowd. It was only the organ of
a chapel, thundering its deep tones through the arches, as the evening
hour brought on the darkness.
Not far from the Captive's cell, that Chapel disclosed its Image of the
Virgin to the last kiss of day; indeed, the Chapel and the cell were
combined
in the same edifice, a Monastery, whose dark spires and turrets rose
against the fresh verdure of a beautiful valley.
The Captive heard the sound of the organ, mingled with the chaunting
of the evening hymn, and bent his head lower upon his breast, raising his
eyes all the while from beneath his compressed brows, to gaze upon the
red figures3651.
In the Chapel of the Monastery, that organ spoke out with a deep voice
of music and religion, and the vesper hymn pealing from the lip of Monk
and Nun, awoke in every heart a living hope of immortal joy.
But, to the Captive shut out from all the world, withered by hopeless
imprisonmentblood, and heart, and brain stricken with the palsy of
despairthat evening mass, echoing through the thick walls, had a
singular
message.
It did not say to his leaden earLook up, child of God, the sun is
setting over hill and valley, but there is Hope for you in the night, and
glory in the cloud!
To
him
it spoke with a far different voice. As he bent his head, and
by the fading light beheld the mysterious figures traced in his blood,
growing dim and dimmer every moment, the solemn Mass, chaunted by
Monk and Nun, deepened by the thunder-tone of the organ, uttered a sad
message:It said
You were young. Your step was firm. Your eye bright. Your heart
full of life; and your brain as wide and free in its thought as the blue sky
of heaven. Now you are old, miserably old; you tremble on the floor of
your cell, an unburied corse. Once a father blessed you as you crossed
the cottage thresholdonce a Mother pressed her hands upon your head,
and blessed you, as the Hope which God had given to her old age. Once
a girl, beautiful even in her homely peasant garb, placed her hand in
yours, and promised to be your wife. Now look from yonder window,
and behold the blackened walls of your ruined home. Look beyond those
walls, and see the graves of the old man, your father, and the peasant
woman, your mother. Your betrothed? Seek for her in the living grave
in the tomb, like unto that which encoffins yourselfin the Convent
cell, a pale, withered form, shrouded in the white robe of a nun!
This was the message of the vesper hymn to the soul of the solitary
Captive. For ten years it had spoken to him in this cell, every day its
message pealing sadder, darker, and more like the accents of hopeless
despair.
To me, the image of that solitary Captive, shut out from the world, in
the Tenth Century, coffined while living in this hopeless imprisonment
of a Bohemian Monastery, his death-lighted eyes fixed upon the figures,
traced on the damp wall with his blood, presents an image of superhuman
despair.
He could see the blasted roof-tree of his home from the window, behold
the sunset smiling upon the graves of his peasant peoplehe felt that his
betrothed peasant wife, transformed into a nun`a living corse,' as the
old books have itwas near him, only separated by a solitary wall. And
yet he did not gaze from the window, nor listen for the voice of his
peasant wife. Roused from his straw, by the impulse of a stern and sullen
duty, he had inscribed those mysterious figures on the wall, and stood
gazing upon them with his large sad eyes.
The Crime of this wretch? Wherefore swept away from humanity and
its hopes, into the life-in-death of this cell? Wherefore trace with his
blood upon the wall, the figures 3651, after first erasing 3650.
We dare not give his crimehave not the language to penetrate the
mystery of those crimson numerals.
Night deepened over the scene, and by the starlight his figure was
dimly
revealed, still standing with his face to the wall, as though through the
darkness he sought to read the inexplicable inscription.
There was a sound of jarring boltsthe tread of footsteps in the passage
and the door of the cell, rolling on its hinges, gave passage to a flood of
joyous light. Still the captive did not turn; the warm light, streaming
over his shoulders, revealed the inscription, and for the first time, in a low
voice, he spoke
Three thousand six hundred and fifty-one, he said, and was silent.
And all the while, a brave company of monks clad in satin and velvet,
warriors glittering in steel and gold, came thronging through the doorway
of the cell, their fine attire flashing and glancing in the strong radiance.
And the gay bandfor even the monks, with faces round and oily,
seemed joyous in the plenteousness of flesh and soft appareltwo figures
were prominent. One was a Monk, the Abbot of the Monastery; the
other a Knight, the Lord of the broad lands, extending from the domains
of the Monastery, to far-distant forests.
There was no care upon the Abbot's face. Corpulent and complacent,
he seemed defended from all thought by his soft, silken gown; and on his
rotund form, he bore a shining cross of gold, hanging to his apoplectic neck
by a golden chain. Above the vivid redness of his cheeks, above his
small eyes, almost hidden in laughing wrinkles, some scattered white hairs
gleamed, like scanty snow-flakes trembling on the verge of a red-hot
furnace
.
He was a corpulent man and a righteous withalah! had you but
seen his complacent smile ripple upward over his unctuous cheeks!
As he beheld the captive, a look of compassion seemed struggling into
life from the fulness of his face.
The Warrior by his side. A gaunt form, cased in armor of steel, with
a gold drop sparkling here and there, and a huge swordit was two-handed
hanging from his left shoulder to his feet. A bunch of white plumes
waved over his steel helmet, and beneath its raised vizor appeared his face.
The features coarse and bold, the eyebrows thick and gray, the eyes fierce
and penetrating, the wide mouth and large jaw full of the Iron Will of an
Iron Soul.
Even his face gleamed with something like pity as his sharp eyes rested
upon the solitary captive, who, with his back turned toward the brilliant
company, gazed steadily upon the wall.
As for the Monks and the Soldiers, who, treading at the heels of the
Abbot and the Lord, came thronging over the threshold,the torches
smoking and flaring over their headsthey watched the faces of their
masters for a moment, and then took courage to gather something like pity
into their eyes.
The Abbot spoke. It would have done you good to hear him. So soft,
so bland his tone, gliding from his lips smooth as olive oil over a burnished
platter.
Wretch! he said.
It was kindly meant, no doubt, but the captive did not answer. It may
be that he did not hear the soft word. For ten years no human being had
spoken to him one word of kindness, and it was plainly to be seen, that his
ears were sealed to any thing like the sound of a human voice.
The Lord in the terrible armor, with the potent sword hanging at his
shoulder, now essayed his power. He was eloquent
Heretic! he said, and laid his hand, gloved in steel, upon the living
skeleton.
The miserable criminal turned slowly, and looked with his large eyes
at the face of the stern Knight
and
the rotund Abbot.
Three thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
this was all the captive
said, and his sunken cheeks were flushed by the torch-light, his eyes,
unnaturally bright at all times, were touched with a mocking glare.
Michael the Abbot placed a hand glittering with rings upon the
criminal's tattered garmentDo you repent of your hideous crime? Do
you renounce the power of Lucifer?
The prisoner, folding his big hands over his sackcloth, looked vacantly
in the face of the Abbot. It was a pitiful contrast. That dumb Image of
Famine, with idiocy glaring from the large eyeballs, and this rotund
embodiment
of corpulence, glowing all over with complacency and holiness.
Here a skeleton covered with sackclothThere an Ideal of Flesh,
enshrined
in satin, with such a gay golden cross, moving to the slow
pulsations
of a little heart. Indeed, it was a miserable contrast.
I will try him, reverend Father said the Knight, glancing grimly
over his servitors, all clad in armor, terrible with club of iron and sword
of steelMichael, would you like a little sunlight, a little free air? Dost
hear me? Would you like to feel your foot upon the mountain sod, and
draw a good long breath of freedom, ere you die?
Something like intelligence began to beam in the big eyes of the
wretched
man.
Three thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
, he said in a shrill voice,
slightly raising his joined hands.
We are afraid that this contrast is not one whit less pitiful than the
first. Here a living skeleton, slightly lifting his bony hands, while
something
like reason begins to beam in the dumb anguish of his facethere a
splendid warrior, glowing in golden helmet and snowy plumes, terrible
with steel armor and two-handed sword.
Noble Lord, let me speak to him and the good Abbot, wearing on
his breast a golden Cross, which was supposed to remind him of the Wooden
Cross on which a long-suffering Being died some hundred years ago, spoke
blandly to the Idiot
Mary! he said.
At once the dawning intelligence brightened into day. The Idiot's
vacant eye burned with sudden fire. There came slowly over his
death's-head
face a glow, that lighted up the sunken features, and made him look
like a living man.
Mary! he echoed, and then relapsing into his vacant mood again,
murmured with a sad smileThree thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
.
It was remarkable; he ever laid a peculiar emphasis on the word, one.
Wretch! There is no hope! the Abbot benevolently said, and turned
away.
The Monks, as though answering to some solemn litany, chorused
Wretch! There is no hope!
But the grim Knight, whose features bore the stern impress of fifty
years of blood, looked in the Idiot's face with a glance that seemed
something
like compassion.
I will rouse him he roughly said, and then laying a hand upon the
arm of the captive, began in his abrupt, impetuous wayMichael, I say,
Michael, dost thou remember me, my boy?
The Idiot's face was vacant.
Thou wert once a page in the hall of my castle, Michael. A braver
youth I never saw. Light in step, courtly in speech, thine eye bright and
thy form like a vigorous sapling. Dost remember the old castle, Michael?
Thou wert a peasant lad, the son of a serf, and yet my father took thee to
be his page. Took thee, when but a baby on thy peasant mother's knee.
And dressed thee in soft apparel, and taught thee knightly dutyGod's
blood the knight swore a knightly oathCanst thou not call it to
mind?
Still the big eyes of the Idiot glared vacantly upon him. No touch of
humanity there! A skeleton with fire-coals shining from the orbits of his
eyesnothing but a skeleton, clad in sackcloth and placed on his feet by
supernatural power.
Idiot! He cannot rememberno more sense than a rotten piece
of wood!
Here the soldiers, true to their duty, repeated their lord's ejaculation,
looking into his stern face all the while.
I will touch him gently whispered the excellent Abbot, advancing
from the throngDost thon remember me? Thou wert wont to come
oftentime, from the Castle to the Monastery, dressed like a gay page,
Michaelmany and many a time. And an aged Brother of our order
taught thee to read, to write, Michael, and permitted thee to read the books
of our library, my good child
His good child! So withered in his sackcloth, with the gray hairs
hanging over his skull-like facea very strange kind of child, I trow.
Dost thou remember me, Michael?
But the Idiot's eyes were vacant still.
And then, Michael, in thy journeys from the Castle to the Monastery,
resumed the Abbotand from the Monastery to the Castle back again,
thou didst chance upon a peasant girl, wondrous fair, and pleasant to look
upon. Thou didst exchange vows of love with her, with Mary, Michael
with Mary, I sayMary
How the sudden reason looked out again from the Idiot's great glittering
eyeballs!
Mary! he echoedMary! and he raised his bony hand to his
forehead, and seemed wrapt in thought. He removed it in a moment; his
face was pitiful and vacant again; slowly down his hollow cheek rolled a
single tear.
The grim Lord bade the soldier by his side to turn his torch away, for
said he, with a lordly curseThe light hurts mine eyes!
But the corpulent Abbot, determined to restore the wretch to something
like reason, went on in his pleasant voice
But then, Michael, loved as thou wert by all within Castle and
Monastery, pledged in vows of betrothal to this peasant maid, thou didst
at once dash thy best hopes into dust, by a hideous crime. Thou didst
blessed saints be merciful to me, for I can scarce gather strength to speak
it!violate all laws, human and divine, and crimson thy soul with the
guilt of unpardonable sin. 'Tis ten years since we endeavored to preserve
thy soul from utter ruin, by a little needful and blessed severity. We
separated thee and thy peasant bride. We consigned thee to the silence
and seclusion of this cell; first foreing upon thee the solemn vow of our
order. And as thy father and mother, Michael, participated in thy guilt,
we made a blessed example from their ashes
I remember the day when they were burned suggested the Knight.
Mary, my page he looked into Michael's vacant facewas
forced to take the veil in the convent
after
He paused suddenly. At the word
after
the Idiot's eyes again flashed
with a sudden consciousness; his lips moved. His long knotted fingers
were clenched with a violent gesture.
After? What did it mean, that word which died half-uttered on the
tongue of the noble Lord? Perchance some allusion to an illustrious
custom of the ancient days, which gave to the Lord of broad lands
unlimited
control over
the life and person of any serj who might chance to be
born upon those lands
.
Thou didst, Michael, commit the unpardonable crime, the good
Abbot continued, crossing his hands upon his robust bodyDost thou
repent of it, now?
The Idiot's eyes were blank as white parchment.
Didst not, Michael,I speak, my good child, for the good of thy soul
go into the hot fields, where the serfs were at their toil, and tell them,
that the good God would one day give to themthe hewers and the
diggers
the
land on which they spent their sweat and blood? Didst thou
not dare to take the Bible from our Monastery, and tell the serfs such
damnable falsehood as this, and also assert, that it was written on the
holy page?
The Monks groaned in horrorthe soldiers joined in chorus.
Three thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
, murmured the Idiot.
Didst thou not stand by the wayside, and tell the gaping serfs, that
the Church was a Lie, built up in stone and plaster; and the Castle a
Blasphemy, cemented in blood; and that both Church and Castle stood
upon foundations of human skulls? That Monk and Lord were combined
in an unholy league, whose motto was evermore,`
Shame to the
Carpenter's Son, and death to his brothers and sisters, the Poor
.'It
makes my blood run cold to speak it!
Thou didst call the Lord Jesus a Carpenter's Son cried the
awe-stricken
Knight. Thou didst. With my own ears I heard thee!
In answer to these terrible accusations, the Idiot-captive said never an
intelligent word; only unclosing his shrivelled lips to murmur, Three
thousand six hundred and fifty-
one!
And then, Michaelpoor boygrown bold in crime, as the serfs
followed
thee in crowds to the mountain side, and listened to thy ravings all
day long, thou didst even spread the Bible before their unlearned eyes, and
utter a heresy too damnable for repetition. Yet I will repeat it, in order
to impress upon thy soul the full enormity of thy crime. `
The day comes
,'
thus thou didst speak`
when there shall be nor Priest, nor Lord, nor
Castle, nor Church. Then shall the earth become a garden, and all men
be brothers, in the name of the Lord Jesus, the Messiah of the Poor
.'
The Monks and the soldiers started back with one impulse of horror,
leaving the corpulent Abbot in his satin, and the Knight in his armor, alone
with the blasphemous wretch.
But I came upon thy serfs and thee, with my good riders the
Knight said, benevolently. It was at night, and ye were standing on the
mountain side. We came upon your band of Rebels and Heretics, with
club and sword. Only one was spared.Michael, thou wert the only one
out of some fourscore. We spared thee
In mercy! smiled the Abbot, smoothing the creases in his robe with
his fat handsIn compassion.
The Idiot-Captive raised his arm, withered as a branch of dead pine, and
marked with innumerable minute scars.
Three thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
, he muttered, turning his
large eyes from face to face.
What means he by those idle words, which he repeats so often? and
the good Abbot turned his round face toward his dear children, the Monks.
A Monk with thin sharp features gave answer
It has been my office to bring bread and water to
him
, he said,
pointing
to the captive BlasphemerAnd I have noticed every day a different
number writ on the wall, in blood-red letters. Yesterday, 'twasI
marked
it well,three, six, five and a nought. To-day, 'tis three, six, five
and one. 'Tis writ with a sharp nail, and a little blood from his arm.
Strange! passing strange ejaculated the good AbbotWhat can
the Idiot mean!
Days! exclaimed the captive, in a shrill tone, whose maniac boldness
startled every spectator. Days!
And with his long bony fingers he pointed to the blood-red figures on
the dingy wall.
At once a light dawned on the Abbot's soul.
Holy Apostles! The heretic means to say that he has been imprisoned
just three thousand six hundred and fifty-
one
days. Malignant even in
his madness! He has written it upon the wall, with his blood
Extending his hand, the reverend Abbot pointed to the wall, while his
round visage, glowing with a godly fervor, was turned toward the stern
countenance of the Land-Lord by his side.
There was a pause of breathless stillness.
To write the number of days with his blood! gasped the Abbot.
It seemed a thoroughly blasphemous thing, in the eyes of the reverend
man.
But we must not forget our purpose, suggested the KnightI have
the gold, and it may as well be turned to account for the good of my soul.
'Tis a holy impulse my son, which guides thy actions. In a battle
with a Lord whose estate is next thine own, thou didst sack his castle,
put his people to the sword, and take his daughter for thy leman. Thou
wouldst make friends with Heaven and St. Peter, by giving unto our
Monastery a goodly store of gold. Is it thus, brave Knight?
Even so. I would have the gold transformed into an Image of the
Blessed Saviour, which shall stand above the Chapel-Altar, as a token of
my pious thought
And as Michael here was somewhat cunning in the arts of painting
and sculpture,that is, before we imprisoned himit was thy purpose to
offer him life and freedom, on condition that he moulded an Image of the
Lord from your gold?
It was, said the KnightBut there is no hope. His mind is utterly
gone. See! How he clutches at the light!
Indeed the appearance of the wretch was very pitiful. Fixing his great
eyes upon the light, he seemed to behold phantoms, invisible to all other
eyes, for his extended hands clutched nervously at the vacant air.
Michael, said the AbbotLet me clasp thy hand. Turn thine eyes
upon me. Thou mayst be free. Thou shalt behold thy Mary once
more
The great eyes, glassy with a vacant stare, shone with soul.
Mary! and the miserable man clasped the fat hand of the Abbot, and
looked with intelligent earnestness into his face.
Again the Abbot uttered his words of mercy
Free, I say! Thou shalt be led forth into the open air and the warm
sunshine. Thou shalt behold thy plighted wifeDost hear me, Michael?
Dost repent of thy heresy?
Heresy! echoed the captive, in a mild toneI had a wild dream,
but it is over now. Do with me what you will, only let me feel my foot
upon the mountain side, and inhale one long breath of airfree air, and I
will come to my cell again, and die. I promise this, good sirs,I swear
itI
He knelt at their feet, joining his knotted fingers, as he rolled his eyes
from face to face.
He consents, said the Abbot, with a smileHe will mould for us
the
Golden Image
of the Redeemer!
Far through the blackness of night glared a vague mass of flame, now
looking like a luminous cloud, now like an immense ball of fire. It shone
half-way up the mountain side, and was regarded by the serfs of the
Bohemian
valley with great wonder and awe. Even those who were in the
secret, and knew the cause of this light, could not see the glaring through
the darkness without a sensation akin to fear.
It was nothing more than the light of a furnace shining from the mouth
of a cavern.
Before that cavern, on the rocky ground, men-at-arms, cased in iron,
strode to and fro, and within its walls, the captive Michael toiled steadily
at his task. They had built him a furance, supplied him with wax, with
clay, with lead, with heaps of gold, and given him the aid of sinewy arms,
so that he might mould, even from the intense flame, a glittering Image of
the Redeemer.
For many weary days, for countless long and dreary nights, the
men-at-arms
kept watch in front of the cavern, while the Heretic toiled within.
They could see him hurrying to and fro, in the glare of the intolerable
flame; his skeleton form and haggard face, touched by the intense light,
making him resemble the Demon of some monkish Legend. And the
stern soldiers, accustomed to battle, and familiar with blood, trembled at
the sight of this miserable wretch, who toiled near the furnace in the
mountain cavern.
Sometimes, at dead of night, while his work was in progress, he would
come to the mouth of the cavern, and standing thus, between the mountain
and the light, gaze silently on the slumbering valley. No one spoke to
him. Even the serfs, who aided him in the mere physical portion of his
task, shrank from his touch. They beheld him hover round the flame,
they saw him shape his model of wax and encase it in a rough coffin of
clay, and at his command, piled the fire-wood all about it, until the heat
blasted their eyesight. But no one dared to speak to himHe was
accursed
;
he had made a compact with the FiendHeretic! they
whispered
,
pointing with a stealthy gesture at the skeleton figure near the flame.
At last the statue was done. Word was sent to the Castle and
Monastery
that the Image of Jesus, moulded of bright and beautiful gold, lay on
the cavern floor, amid the embers of the dead fire, enshrined in its shell
of baked clay.
It was a morning in the fall of the year, when the serfs and
men-at-arms
,
thronging over the rocks in front of the cavern, saw a gorgeous
cavalcade wind slowly up the mountain side. Around extended the woods,
touched by autumn; in the blue dome of heaven, a single mountain peak
arose; from afar, on the bank of a winding river, gleamed the turrets of
the Monastery, while the gloomy wall of the Castle rose in the east, over
the tops of the brown forest trees.
And the cavalcade of Monks and Soldiers wound slowly up the
mountain
side, with the peal of trumpet alternating with the chaunted hymn,
and the glittering steel armor contrasting with the flowing robes of priestly
grandeur.
Conspicuous among the band, two forms were seenthe grave Knight
and the jocund Abbot. The white plumes of the Lord fluttered over his
golden helmet, and the glittering cross which the Abbot wore on his breast,
shone from the distance like a star.
And the music came merrily up the mountain side.
Now winding around a cliff, now lost in shadow, the cavalcade drew
near and nearer. At last they reached the mouth of the cavern, the Monks
in their white robes extending to the right, and the warriors in their
burnished
armor spreading to the left.
In the centre of this brilliant crescent, stood the Abbot and the Lord,
the dark mouth of the cavern yawning before them. They awaited the
coming of Michael the Heretic. The fire was extinguished; all was dark
within. All was silent as the moment of his approach drew near. Not
an eye in all that throng but longed to look upon that beautiful statue.
Every heart beat quicker as the echo of footsteps ascended from the cavern.
On the threshold, just where the warm sunlight encountered the
midnight
of the cavern, appeared a skeleton figure and a wan and withered
face. It was Michael, clad in his humble garb, and holding in his knotted
fingers a lighted pine-knot. The expression of his face, so hollow in the
cheeks, and skull-like in the brow, was mild and subdued; with his eyes
cast sadly to the sunlight, he stood on the threshold of the eavern, folding
one hand upon his shrunken chest.
It is done? exclaimed the Abbot. You shall be freeyou shall
behold your plighted wife
Michael the Heretic serf did not speak, but bowed his head in mute
assent. It was evident that the miserable man was scarce able to maintain
his feet. Ten years of imprisonment has withered him from strong and
beautiful
youth into hopeless and premature old age; the thought and toil of
his cavern task, has almost extinguished the last spark of his wretched life.
Come! he said to the Abbot and the Lord, and turning his face from
the light, went slowly into the cavern, torch in hand.
With hasty steps the corpulent Abbot followed the ray of his torch:
the Knight, lean and muscular, advanced with measured strides.
It will be a beautiful image, no doubt chattered the Abbot, as he
picked his way among the loose stones; for the fellow, though a serf,
has some witand it will be a mass of gold, solid, heavy, shiny gold,
'twill be an honor to our Chapel, and fourscore masses shall be said, Sir
Knight, when thou art deadfor the repose of thy soul
Rather let them be said without delay, before I die, that I may live a
few years more growled the pious Lord.
Behold the Image! A hollow voice resounded through the cavern,
and the Heretic Michael stood motionless, holding the torch above his
head. That light, while it left the cavern wrapt in dismal gloom, shone
vividly over the features of the Heretic, and revealed the Image of the
Redeemer.
It was placed erect upon a rock. The form clad in the garments of a
Bohemian Peasant, the hand extended, the brow stamped with a peculiar
expressionall shone vividly in the light.
The Abbot and the Knight could not stir; the Image held them
motionless
,
with a sensation of involuntary awe. They did not utter a word, but
gazed upon it with fixed eyeballs.
They beheld, not a figure of bright and glittering gold, but an Image of
the Saviour moulded in lead, the form grimly arrayed in the costume of
serfdom, and the face stamped with a look of unutterable sadness. The
large motionless eyeballs, the lips moving in a smile that had more of
sorrow than joy for its meaning, the great forehead impressed with a
sublime
despairall moulded, not of bright and beautiful gold, but of dull,
sullen lead, thrilled the spectators with sensations such as they had never
felt before.
It may have been that the sad hue of the lead deepened the impression
which the Image produced, but as Michael held his torch near and nearer
to it, the thought rushed upon the spectators that they did not merely
behold a form of lifeless metal.
I cannot banish the thought gasped the Abbot, as his rubicund
cheek assumed the color of a shroudNo! No! There is a soul
imprisoned
in that leaden mass! A Soul that watches me nowhears me
as I speak, and reads my soul with those fixed eyeballsah! Heretic!
What have you done? By what infernal sorcery have you imprisoned a
living Soul in that Image of lead?
The Heretic sank on his knees, and a smile broke over his livid face.
But as he sank he raised the torch on high, and by the varying light,
his face seemed to smile, to frown, to sneer by turns.
The Knight uttered a fierce oath.
I am afraid! he cried, leaning upon the hilt of his two-handed sword
There is a Soul there,thou'rt right, Sir Abbota Soul imprisoned
in those fixed eyeballs
What hast done with our gold? cried the Abbot, turning fiercely upon
the kneeling wretchWhere The words died on his chilled lips.
For the eyes of the Leaden Image were upon him; they seemed to pierce
his heart; the sublime despair of that forehead congealed his blood.
Kneeling on the cavern floor, every nerve trembling with the last throb
of life, the Heretic lifted his face toward the light, and his voice was heard,
clear and distinct, through the silence of the cavern
You asked of me an `Image of the Saviour triumphant over Death
and Evil, as he appears in your Church.' I could not mould a Lie into
Gold, for I felt that my hour was near. So I moulded HIM of Lead, and
moulded HIMnot as he appears in the Bible, the friend of the oppressed,
the Redeemer of the Poorbut as He
is
in your Church, a Sullen Spectre,
scowling upon the agony and anguish of mankind. Behold him, not pure
and beautiful as he shines from the Bible, but as he isimprisoned in the
hollow forms, the blasphemous ritualof your Church
The voice of the dying wretch became faint and fainter; the hand which
grasped the torch, quivered over his distorted facequivered for a moment,
ere it fell motionless in death.
Behold him, not as he walked the sands of Palestine, a free, beautiful
Spirit, full of Godlike love for Man, but as he is, chained by the satanic
body of your ChurchBeholdthe Imprisoned Jesus!
The Abbot and the Lord started back, awed and terror-stricken, from the
dying blasphemer.
And yet the day comes he staggered to his feet again, and held the
light near the sad, sullen face of the Image,And yet the day comes, O
Lord, when thy Spirit, no longer imprisoned by creeds, shall walk freely
once more into the homes and hearts of Men. Then shall the Lead
become Gold, and the Sneer be changed into a Smile!
As he uttered these incomprehensible words, the torch fell from his
stiffening fingers, and darkness possessed the cavern, gathering in its folds
that sullen Image, which seemed to bear within its leaden bosom a
Living Soul.
What had he done with the Gold? Neither the Abbot nor the Lord
could ever give answer to this question; for, stricken with terror, they
commanded that the cavern's mouth should be choked with a wall of
impenetrable
stone, leaving the dead body of the Heretic alone with the
blasphemous Image. Here, shrouded by darkness, alone in night, they
remained for ages, until the day of Huss, when this cavern became the
temple of four thousand worshippers. But a wild tradition hinted, in
obscure
terms, that within the leaden Image was concealed a bright and
beautiful statue of Gold. Was it ever discovered? Did the leaden shell
ever fall aside, revealing the face of the Loving Spirit.
CHAPTER FIFTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
III. THE IMAGE.
Once
more we turn our gaze to the scene which occurred in the days
of John Hussto the aged man who, placing one hand upon a shrouded
Image, saw four thousand worshippers prostrate on the floor of a spacious
cavern.
Ye have heard the history, he exclaimed, glancing afar over the
multitude
,
who had listened to the Legend of the Statue in breathless stillness
Now behold the Image!
He flung the sackcloth aside, and suddenly descended from the rock.
Sad and alone, the leaden Image towered there, with the torchlight
quivering
over its motionless eyeballs and broad forehead. As the light,
agitated
by the subterranean air, flitted in gusts of radiance over the dusk
countenance, it seeemed at once to sneer and smile, to frown with sullen
anger and brighten into a holy joy.
Every face was raised to look upon it; every tongue was sealed; but
the vast crowd moved with an unceasing undulation. At last, from a
thousand
lips, confused murmurs pealed upon the silence of the vault
It is no statue, but a Living Soul. See! The eyes brighten and the
lips move! The Lead will become Gold at last, and the Sneer be changed
into a Smile!
These words might be distinguished amid that wildly whispered chorus,
and the white-haired man, leaning against the base of the rock, looked up
into the leaden face, while something like a radiant hope began to burn in
his eyes
Lord! Lord! Shall thy pure Soul, no longer imprisoned in creeds,
walk freely once more into the homes and hearts of men? Shall all thy
people gather around one altar, sharing the bread which is thy body, and
the water from the wooden bowl, emblematic of thy tears? Or shall the
day come, when the Poor will dare to claim the cup filled with pure wine,
symbolical of thy Blood? Shall the Lead indeed become Gold, and the
Smile chase the anguish from thy face?
The light flashed fitfullythe Image seemed to smile; it did smile upon
the crowd of Bohemian Poor.
But as their solemn cry of triumph rose to the vaulted roof, a way-worn
man rushed through the prostrate crowd, his garments torn, his face
covered
with roadside dust.
Darting forward, he sprang upon the rock, and his facemarked by the
consciousness of a dread messagewas contrasted with the leaden
countenance
of the Image.
Brothers, Sisters, People, I come from Prague he shouted, with
the faint gestures of an exhausted manI saw John Hussexpire
amidthe flames
He sank exhausted on the rock, and a silence, more eloquent than
groans or tears, descended upon the kneeling worshippers.
Soon they arose, and trooping silently around the altar, shared the bread
of the Serf with each other, and drank the water from the bowl, in
memory
of their Lord, who said, many centuries before, that his Mission was
to his Brothers and his sisters, the Poor.
And all the while, the leaden Image, glowing faintly in the torchlight,
looked upon their Rude Sacrament with eyes of unutterable sadness. Yet
even in the sadnessso it seemed as the light flitted to and frothere
seemed mingled a mocking sneer. Was it for the Poor, or for the
Oppressor
who trod them into dust?
The aged man lifted up his voice
It is not yet time!' he criedBut at last, after the People of the
Lord, whose tears and blood have not ceased to flow for five thousand
yearsat last, after they have suffered enough, and the cup of their
anguish
is fullthe Lead will become Gold, and the Sneer be changed into
a Smile!
Has this Legend of the wild Boheman land no meaning for the people
of all ages?
Let us seek for the Image amid scenes and men of all ages, that have
died since the day of John Huss, and ask an answer to these earnest
questions
Did the Lead ever become Gold? Did the Sneer ever change into a
Smile? Did the pure beautiful Spirit ever escape from the leaden form of
ereed and ritual, and walk freely into the homes and hearts of men, as in
the days of Gethsemane and Calvary?
These questions we cannot answer; but a singular tradition prevails
we cannot prove its correctnessthat the Leaden Image has appeared on
various occasions in the history of the world. It is a tradition, to be sure,
and yet there may be embodied, in its wild details, some rude Truth, or
perchance the gleam of a rude Truth.
One day a white-haired man was burned to cinders, in the open square
of a Protestant city. Ere he died, and while the flames were slowly de
vouring his flesh, he never ceased to cry, Jesus, Saviour of sinners, have
mercy on me! Christ, pity me! And all the while, from a window of
a neighboring house, a gaunt man, with hollow cheeks and sunken eyes,
watched the agonies of the burning wretch, and said, in a low voice, The
Church hath power to put down all heresy by the sword.
20
The watcher was called John Calvin, and the wretch whose slow
agonies
he watched bore the name of Michael Servetus.
And as the cindered bones of Servetus crumbled amid the ashes of the
firewhile Calvin took up his Evangelical pen and wrote a Thesis in
defence of the Deedthere appeared to the other spectators of the scene,
a singular vision of a Leaden Image, standing very near the stake, with a
fathomless scorn upon its motionless lip and fixed eyeballs.
It seemed like an Image of Jesus, not the Jesus of the Biblepure,
loving and serenebut the ferocious creation of John Calvin's vindictive
soul.
So we might trace the history of the Leaden Image through various
scenes and ages. There are persons who maintain, that such an Image
never existed, but that a Spectre, something like it, stamped with a sullen
grandeur on its dusk forehead, has appeared at certain intervals in the
history of the world; appeared as a Warning, an Omen, an Incarnate
Scorn.
CHAPTER SIXTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
IV. THE PARLIAMENT OF THE WORLD.
There
was a night, when a band of earnest men, who believed that
God might be adored and man be loved without the medium of church
or creed, assembled in the solitudes of a mountain cavern. They were
but few in number, and yet it seemed as if all the nations of the earth had
sent their representatives to this secret Congress of Brotherhood, this
obscure
Parliament of Love.
History, or that fabric of falsehood, which is promulgated to the world
as history, does not record the names of these men, who formed the
little band; and yet, their deliberations went forth from that mountain
cavern over all the world, like the voice of a Regenerating Angel.
The fair-haired German was there; and by his side the Spaniard, with
his bronzed cheek, and eye of fire. There, the Italian, full of the ancient
glory of his land, and the Frenchman, with his story of Protestant and
Catholic wars. The Swede, the Dane, the Hungarian, and the Turk,
all were mingled in that band. Even the far land of the New World was
represented there in the person of a Colonist, fresh from the witchcraft
murders of New England.
These men, grouping round a rock which started from the cavern floor,
talked with each other in low, earnest tones. A single torch, inserted in
the crevice of the rock, gave its faint light to the scene, and dimly
revealed
their various costumes, and the passions as various, which flitted
over each face.
Near that rock, a solitary figure towered erect, his face and form
concealed
by a dark robe.
While all the others conversed in agitated whispers, he alone was
silent.
Not a gesture betrayed his emotion, nor indicated that he was in truth
any thing but a dumb image of wood or stone.
There was but one in the little band who knew his name.
Wherefore this assemblage in the mountain cavern of Germany, at
dead of night, by the faint ray of a solitary torch?
Wherefore these signs, by which the various persons recognised each
other? and what meant that password in the ancient Hebrew tongue,
which echoed round the place until the gloomy arches seemed agitated
into voice by the sound?
It will be remembered, that this meeting took place when the first quarter
of the seventeenth century was near its close.
The German, with his fair hair and blue eyes, arose
Reformations are in vain for my fatherland. A new Luther must
arise and work out a broader and bolder Reformation. The last has but
substituted one creed for anotherGermany festers with the unburied
corses of those who have been slain in the war of Creeds. The
Reformation
only agitated the atmosphere in which Kings and Priests swelter
into bloated power. It left the Poor where it found themthere, under
the hoofs of Priest and King, doomed to dig and die, whether a Pope or
a Synod reigns. Earth calls to God for a new Reformation, which shall
overlook the world, as with the eye of God himself, and behold in God
but the common Father of all mankind; in nations and races, however
divided or styled, but a common family of Brothers.
As the German took his seat upon a ledge of rock, near the central
rock, a murmur of deep emphasis filled the cavern.
Then, one by one, the members of the little band arose, and spoke the
thought of their souls freely, and with no fear upon their faces.
The Spaniard rose
In Spain exists the Inquisition
As if these words comprised all that man can know of degradation, all
that Priests can inflict, or Kings contrive, in the form of Murder, he said
no more.
Next the Frenchman
St. Bartholomew's corses have not yet mouldered into dust, he said,
and was silent.
After he had ceased, an Irishman arose. He had no word to utter, or
perchance his heart was too full for words. He laid upon the rock, in
the rays of the light, some leaves of withered shamrock, and a broken
harp. The withered leaves and the broken harp were stained with blood.
Without a word, the Irishman glided into the shadows again.
Then the voice of the Englishman was heard
Some time ago there was a war in my native land. The People, that
vulgar race, whose life is comprised in three wordswe are born, we
suffer, we die!The People, I say, came up bravely to that war, and
spoke with an ominous murmur to an anointed King, telling him in their
rude way, that he was but a man. That, forgetting his Manhood in his
Kingship, he had committed murders enough to have hurled a thousand
men to the scaffold. Therefore, said the People, King as you are, with
the royal blood of twenty generations in your veins, with the anointing
oil of all the Priests in the land upon your brow, you must die.
They put their King to death upon the scaffold, and said in the face of
God and Man`We will have no more to do with Kings. They have had
the world long enough for their Murder groundlong enough have they
set men at one another's throats, and turned the Image of God into an
engine of carnage.' This was a brave thing, which the English People
said, but the time was not yet come; they had not yet learned the great
lesson of our order. First, Union; then Freedom; and last Brotherhood.
They could not yet recognise in God, but a loving Father of all
mankind
,
nor in nations and races, but a family of Brothers.
Therefore, after having put their King to death, and buried the word
`King,' with his headless body, they became the slaves of Faction. They
quarreled about creeds and forms, leaving the great fact of all Truth
Brotherhood among men
a dumb and mangled thing beneath their
bloody feet.
At this time, a bold Son of the People cast his eyes about him, and
saw the danger of his brethren. He saw the word `King' start into life
again from the headless body of Charles the Firsthe saw the People
once more kneeling in their blood, under the iron feet of Power.
He determined to save his race, but, alas!pity us, good Lord, for
we are weak!he could think of no better way of saving his people
from the name of `King,' than by usurping the Power without the Name.
Therefore, the Lord delivered him not into the hands of his enemies,
but to the remorse of his own soul. Delivered his great heart to the
terror of the Assassin's steeldelivered his giant intellect, blinded and
bound, like the Samson of old, to that terror which fears a shadow, and
trembles at a sound.
At last he died, and England, forgetful of the blood which had been
shed to achieve her freedomforgetful even of the greatness of that
Brewer, who had made the name of Protector nobler than the name of
EmperorEngland, I say, forgetful of the brave men who had died,
by tens of thousands, to redeem her from the name of KingEngland
rushed to the grave of Charles the First, and took the crown from his
fleshless skull, and put it on the head of Charles the Second, and hailed
him`King!'
Yes, my brothers, Charles the Second is King in England now, and
while he reigns, there is a headless trunk amid the offal of the ditch, there
is a bleeding head nailed up to scorn, upon the gate of London. That
headless trunk, and that bleeding head, once embodied the Soul of Oliver
Cromwell.
The Englishman could say no more. Charles the Second on the
Throne, and Oliver Cromwell's body cast forth to feed the hunger of
dogs, Oliver Cromwell's head nailed up to the gate of Londonit was
enough.
The Representatives of the Nations uttered a groan for fallen England.
Then, one by one, these men gathered from the quarters of the globe,
assembled at the mandate of some Invisible Chief, or by the watch
word of a universal brotherhoodarose and told, in various ways, in
every tongue, the same story.
Kings everywhere, Priests everywhere, and everywhere slaves.
It was a horrible catalogue of enormities, which fell from the lips of
these brethren.
Indeed, it seemed as if the Worldits men and women, its little
children, and its babes unbornhad been given up by some ferocious
Destiny into the hands of Superstition and Murder.
The Turk, the Arab, the Hindoo, and the Swede, all told the same story
in various forms. In every land a King, and for the People nothing but
chains and graves.
There was a black man in the throng; from his voice and manner
it appeared that he had received the education of the white race.
The story that the black man told, was of petty Kings, on the soil of
Africa, selling the flesh and blood of Africa to eternal bondage in a New
World. A bondage that had no parallel in the history of crime, for
under the name of Servitude, it comprised Murder, Incest, Blasphemy.
As the word New World fell from the black man's lips, a shudder
agitated the throng.
Slavery in the New World! cried the GermanAlas! Alas! then
God has indeed given the earth into the power of Satan
Do not blaspheme, said the voice of an aged SwedeThe New
World is the last altar of Brotherhood left on the surface of a desolated
globe. We have looked to the East for lightit will come from the East;
but it is in the West that the light will reveal to us the perfect image of
human brotherhood.
At this word the Representative from the New World arose. Every
one was silent; they all gazed upon his rugged features and
backwoods-man
attire with an absorbing interest.
The New world is the last altar of human Brotherhood! he said,
echoing the words of the aged SwedeThere was a band of friendless
exiles, driven from the shores of England by the lash of persecution.
They sought a Home and an Altar in the forests of the New World.
They landed one day, on a Rock which they called Plymouth, and the
red men of the woods bade the wanderers welcome.Brothers, this was
not many years ago, and yet I stand among you, an exile and an outcast
from the New World
An exile and an outcast from the New World! His words were
echoed on every side.
He has committed some horrible crime and the aged Swede
shrunk from the side of the Colonist.
Yes, I am guilty of crimea horrible crime. I could not believe in
my neighbor's creed. I could not think that Murder was any the less
Murder, because it was done by grim Priests, in the name of God, and
the victims were old men and defenceless women. Yes, yesI have
stood upon the soil of the New World, and seen men given up to the cord
and scaffold, because they could not believe in an Orthodox Protestant
creed
Even as I, a Spaniard, have seen them racked and burnt in the Act
of Faith of an Inquisition!
But I have seen that Image which we love in a Wife, reverence in a
Sister, adore in a MotherI have seen the Image of Woman lashed naked
through the streets, amid the jeers and prayers of cadaverous Priests,
who saw the blood start from the quivering flesh, and shouted, `Scorn to
the Heretic, Praise to our God.' This on the soil of the New World
this in the land which God hath set apart as the most sacred altar of
human Brotherhood!
Bathed in tears and blushes, the American crouched into a seat. One
groan quivered from the hearts of the listeners.
We all looked to the New World for light, and lo! we have it, but it
is the light from the flame of persecution, the red blaze which Bigotry
has stolen from the fires of hell.
From the verge of the circle which the brothers formed, as they
clustered
around the light, a tall form advanced. It was a man clad in a
blanket, with a wampum belt wound about his waist; a man of aquiline
nose and high cheek-bones, eyes like sparks of flame, and skin that
resembled the deep red of autumnal leaves.
I am an Indian, he said in a guttural toneBut the language of
your Brotherhood has become my language. The altar at which you
worship is also mine. I am an Indian. Twenty winters ago, I dwelt
among my people, beside the river which flows from the forest to the sea.
Our numbers were as the leaves in the forest, as the sands by the shore.
From the wood to the river, extended our wigwams, thick as the birds in
the sky, when the sun is low. The White Man came; he was attired in
black. There was a Cross upon his breast. He taught my People a
new Religion; he built his temple in our midst. The Great Spirit whom
we had seen in the sky, we now beheld in a Cross, and worshipped in
the form of a Silver Cup. And yet his Religion made the heart warm
within us, for it spoke of a Great Being, who had come from the sky, so
that he might suffer among men, and die despised and scorned upon a
tree, in order that all men might love one another. It was a beautiful
Religion, and we loved it. Our warriors knelt at the foot of the Cross
our maidens placed that Cross upon their bosoms, and set it, bound with
flowers, amid the folds of their raven hair.We loved the Religion, and
the man in the dark robe who taught us to love it, grew white-haired
among us.
One morning in summer, as we were gathered in the temple near the
river shoreas the old man lifted the Cup on high, while our nation knelt
at his feeta bullet pierced his brain. He fell at the foot of the Cross.
A red blaze streamed through every windowthere was a sound like an
hundred thunder-claps in the air. There were an hundred dead bodies
on the floor of the temple.
The grass without the temple was burdened with the deadthe river,
near us, grew red with blood on every wave.
From the rocks on the opposite shore, streamed one incessant sheet
of flame.
Evening came at last. The sun was setting. I was the only living
man, and I stood alone amid the harvest of death.
A cry of horror pervaded the cavern.
Who was it that did this deed? Who were the murderersthe
savages
of other tribes, your foes among the red men?
They were white men who did this deed. They believed in the
same Being whom the man in the dark robe taught us to love.
Wherefore this murder? asked the Swede.
These white men, who came upon us as we knelt in prayer, and shot
us down, and stabbed us, as we rose upon the river's wave, and pierced
our skulls as we crept into the bushesthese white men believed in the
same Cross in which the old man believed, but a sad smile stole over
the red features of the Indianthey only believed in the Cross as it
was written in a Bookwhile the old man believed in it as it was carved
in wood or sculptured in stone. Therefore they murdered us.
There was a pause of stillness, unbroken by a sound.
Brothers, cried the Indian, I come to you in the name of the Red
Men. We melt away before the white race like snow before the flame.
They kill us with the sword, they poison us with fire-water, they sweep
us away with the plague. Help, or we are dead.
The appeal of the Red Man touched every heart.
An Italian, with every line of his animated countenance stamped by
thought and endurance, next arose.
Italy, he exclaimed, is palsied by a Nightmare, which crouches
upon her breast, and slowly drinks the blood from her heart. The
Night-mare
changes its form every instantnow it is a Priest, now it is a King;
now the Priest and King, combined in one, realize the idea of an Incarnate
Devil. Help for Italy, ere the last drop of her blood is spent!
Then by the side of the Italian appeared the dark figure of a Jesuit.
Every eye shuddered to behold him thereall wondered why he had dared
intrude upon this band of brothersnot a man but shrunk away from him,
afraid of the very folds of his dark robe.
Help for the Catholic Church, he exclaimedHelp, Brothers of
Love, for that Church which once overspread the earth, and sheltered all
men under the wings of her Divine Unity! She now lies bleeding in the
hands of Princes who call themselves Priests, of Murderers who call
themselves Pastors!
The smile that had agitated every face when he commenced, died away
in a look of sympathy as his last words fell on their ears. They extended
their hands; they encircled him.
There is hope for man, when the Jesuit invokes the aid of
Brotherhood
in behalf of the Church!
And all the while, that solitary figure stood veiled,speechless and
motionlessnear the rock, alone amid the throng.
CHAPTER SEVENTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
THE ROSY CROSS.
Only
one in the secret band knew his name and history. The time
now came for that man to speak.
He came from the shadows, and stood disclosed in the light, his tall form,
arrayed in the gray garb of a peasant, standing distinctly into view. His
features were darkened by exposure to the wind and sun; his large brow
projected over eyes which shonw steadily with an unchanging lustre.
Those eyes shone into every heart, and all the brethren in the cavern felt
that a Great Soul was embodied in their light.
This man, in the coarse peasant garb, leaned one handcramped and
knotted by toilupon the shoulder of the veiled form. In a voice harsh
and abrupt, he began to speak.
He spoke of a Secret Order extending over all the earth, and dating its
origin back to that dim time, when history becomes a fable, and
chronology
a shadow. Of the rites, symbols and customs of the Orderwhich
spoke to the heart through the eye, and formed a universal language,
intelligible
to brothers of every race and clime. Of the most sacred sign of
the Order, which was written on the pyramids of Egypt, and the
Monuments
of Mexico, and stamped upon the dumb stone and mortar of past
ages, in every quarter of the globethe most sacred sign, a Cross placed
upon a globe, and lighted by the rays of a rising sun, and therefore called
the red or
Rosy Cross
.
This Cross, placed upon a dark globe, with the dawn breaking over its
darkness, was the emblem of the great purpose of the Order,the
regeneration
of the millions of mankind, by three great ideas, Union,
Freedom
,
Brotherhood.
The Globe was a symbol of Union; the Light, breaking upon it from
the darkness, an emblem of Freedom. The Cross, standing above upon
the globe, and blushing into radiance in the fast coming light, was a type
of
Brotherhood
.
This Order was known among men,known only in vague supposition
and unaccredited traditionas the
Brotherhood of the Rosy Cross
.
As the brother in the peasant garb went on, his harsh voice became
melodious, his manner, no longer hesitating, grew firm and bold. He traced
the history of the Brotherhood from the far gone ages, down to the present
time. In language vivid and eloquent, he pictured the elaborate
ceremonial
,
the giant organization, the fascinating mystery, which characterized
the Order, and made its power felt over all the world, in all time, like the
hand of a God.
And yet, with all this Powerthese symbols, that form a common
language
for Brothers of all nations, these rites, that elevate with their beauty
and bewilder with their mysterywith all this power, felt through all
ages, over all the world, like the hand of a God, behold the degradation
of mankind. In vain our labors, in vain the labors of our fathers. In vain
this tremendous organization, in vain the universal language, the rites, the
symbolsall in vain. Man still bleeds under the feet of Priest and King
the world is still given up to Satan. Even that holiest name, which we
have written upon our banner, embalmed in our hearts, consecrated with
the baptism of our tearseven `
Brotherhood
' has fallen prostrate, afraid
of the darkness which broods over the earth, trampled into dust by the iron
feet of Evil.
These words thrilled through the cavern, and a breathless stillness fell
upon every tongue. Faces, wet with tears, that glittered in the dim light,
attested the truth, the power of the speaker's words.
Still resting his knotted hand upon the shoulder of the unknown, the
peasant in the gray garb continued:
But the contest is not yet over. `
Brotherhood
' is clouded by mists
of blood-red smoke, but it is Divine, it is Eternal, it will live when the
stars have faded from the sky. For it is of God, and therefore cannot die.
But we must embody the idea of `Brotherhood' not only in rites and
symbols, but in such a form that the meanest of earth's trodden children
may behold it and love it.
Do you hear me, my brethren?
This idea of Brotherhood, nay, this Eternal Fact, this deathless
manifestation
of God, must be embodied in a form, that will speak to the hearts
of men, and through their hearts regenerate the world.
Do this, cried the Swede, and Kings and Priests exist no longer.
Every face was lifted in earnest hope to the visage of the speaker, and
a murmur filled the cavern, a murmur swelled by many tongues, but with
only one meaning.
Let the Divine Truth of Brotherhood be embodied in a form that will
speak at once to the hearts of men, and our work is done. Man will
indeed be free; there will exist no longer on the face of the globe, either
a Lord or a Slave, to blaspheme, by their existence, the goodness of
our
Father
.
But how shall the idea be embodied? In what form shall we personify
the holy Truth?
Listen, my brothers, and I will tell you. We will embody this idea
in the history of some individual life, whose every word shall melt the
souls of men into tenderness and love. Shall we take the life of some
great Philosopher,some of those weird sages of the ancient time, who
surveyed the world from the casement of their cell, and reasoned boldly
upon Man, but could not feel for him? Shall we summon Pythagoras,
or Platoor even that bravest and most manful of them allSocrates? Ah,
I see the smile steal over your facesI hear your murmurs, What have
Philosophers to do with the millions of mankind? Have they suffered,
any moment of their lives, that stern Martyrdom which is ever the lot of
the Poor Man, from his birth to his deaththe martyrdom of Poverty,
that has no couch for its tired head, but in the grave; the martyrdom of
Toil that is without a Hope in this world or the next. Have these
Philosophers
drunk of the poor man's cup; have they wept with him in his
desolate
home; have they measured his anguish, or sounded the depths of his
immeasurable Despair?
Away then with Philosophers. Cold reasoners, shrounding themselves
in the mountain cloud of sophistry; they never descend to the plain, and
feel with the millions who are only born to be trampled and to die.
The world does not demand abstractions. It calls, even from the
kennel of its degradation, it calls for some great Heart, to feel for its
despair, and win it tenderly into light and love once more.
Shall we embody this Idea of Brotherhood in the life of some Priest,
or tell the world how lovely it looks, how wonderful and sublime in the
life of some King? As well embody the Idea of Heaven in the image of
a Satyr, or personify the angel-tenderness of childhood in the dusk
countenance
of Satan!
Noaway with Priests and Kings,away with all like these, who
do
not live in the same world
with the millions of mankind.
But we will give this idea shape, color, voice. We will embody the
principle of Brotherhood in the life of a Mechanic.
His words were followed by a breathless stillness; and then the
murmur
roseWhere will you find a Mechanic, who has risen from the hut
of the poor man into the light of fame?
In the life of a worker, toiling with the workers of the human race, a
Son of the Poor, living and dying for the Poor. Listen, my brothers, and
do not treat with scorn my crude Legend of other days. But I will tell
to you the story of the Mechanic whom you seek, the son of the Poor
whom you desire.
One day,in the ages long agothe Son of a Carpenter looked out
from the window of his father's workshop, and beheld his brothers and
sisters, the Poor, trodden down under the gathered infamies of four
thousand
years. His garments were very rude; clad like a child of the
People
,
he wiped the laborer's sweat from his brow, and from that workshop
window, he cast his eyes over a world in darkness and in chains. A fire
that was of God suddenly lighted up his eyes; that forehead, damp with
the sweat of toil, became radiant with a Thought. His lips unclosed, and
he uttered the travail of his soul in these brief words`Over all the earth,
one sound swells up to God. It is the groan of the Poor man, who has
no joy in this world, and no hope in the next.'
Then, as if a voice from God had penetrated his soul, the Son of the
Carpenter laid aside the tools of his father's craft, and, clad as he was, in
the coarse garb of labor, yet with a Thought shining over his brow, went
forth into the world, and said to the Poor, as he met them on the highway,
or saw them bending under the hot sun, in the rich man's fields, or beheld
their wan faces from the windows of the prison, `Brother! There is a God
in heaven; he is our Father! He marks the sparrow's fallthink you,
then, that He looks unheedingly upon the anguish of his children, the
Poor, who bear his image, and have every one of them a ray of his
Eternity
in their hearts?'
Such words as these, thrilling from the lips of a Carpenter's Son,
stirred the hearts of the Poor. They followed the young man by
thousands
;
now by the lake shore, now on the slope of the mountain side,
now in the desert woods, he talked to them, as much with his radiant
forehead
and calm deep eyes, as with his voice; and he always ended his
teachings with a word like this`
God is our Father, and all men are his
children
.'
I might spend the hours of this silent night, in telling you how this Son
of the Carpenter dwelt with the Poorshared the crust of the Poorwept
with the Poorlived for the Poor, and died for the Poor. As for the Rich
Man, whether he appeared in the form of a Priest or as a King, the Son
of the Carpenter only spoke of him with pity, with reproach, with scorn.
His mission was to the Poor. And without arms, without Priests, clad
only in his humble garb, he spoke to the Poor of his native land, and his
voice moved the earth like the pulsations of the Heart of God.
He diedat last, after a brief mission of three yearshe died; I need
not tell you how!
What death is reserved for those who endeavor with a single
heart to do good to Man? Not the death of the pampered Priest, who,
reclining on silken couchesembosomed in the chambers of a Palace
looks, with sorrow too deep for tears, upon the rich viands and the genial
wines, which he cannot take with him to the grave. Not the death of the
Conqueror, who makes himself a couch of the bodies of the slain, and
expires most royallya tiger clad in glossy fur, crouching upon his
victims and tearing them with his fangs, as he dies.
No! But the death of the Felon, nailed to an abhorred tree, which
towered alone and hideous, upon the height of a craggy steep, with the
black sky above it, and the dark mass of countless spectators around and
beneath it.
This was the death of the Son of the Carpenter, who had said to Man,
that Religion consisted not in palaces or jails, nor in Priests or Kings, nor
in churches, or costly ceremonial, butmark the simplicity of the
Carpenter's
Sonin LOVING ONE ANOTHER.
O, that I could paint to you the radiant forehead and earnest eyes of
this Carpenter's Son, and show him to you as he lived among men, their
Brother: clad like themselves, their Friend: for he said to them, `
God is
OUR
Father
.'
But he has been dead many centuries.Behold him, not as he walked
the sands of his native land, but as he is!
He swept the cloak aside, which enveloped the limbs of the unknown.
The cavern echoed with a cry of amazement and terror.
For there, very near the light, towered the Leaden Image, whose
forehead
stamped with despair, and motionless eyes full of unutterable anguish,
and form clad in the garments of toil, seemed to imprison a Living Soul.
It was the Image of the Imprisoned Jesus.
This is what Priest and King have made of the pure and beautiful
spirit of the Carpenter's Son! They have robbed man of his Brother,
his friend; they have coffined the soul of the Mechanic in the creed and
ritual of their Church; they have taken to themselves that Man of
Nazareth
,
who never spoke of Priest or King, but with pity, reproach, or scorn.
Brothers! Be it our task to take this Son of the Carpenter, to
separate
his loving spirit from church and creed, and lift him, once more,
before
the eyes of millions, not as the Incarnation of a Church, or the
Imprisoned
Christ of a ferocious superstition, but as the Carpenter's Son,
who first embodied the truth of Brotherhood, and made it blossom in the
hearts of men.
With these three words
The Carpenter's Son
we can regenerate the
world. We will go to the Poor. We will ask themnot to believe in the
Trinity, or in the Unity of God, nor in Catholic, nor in Protestant, nor in
Buddhu
,
nor in Mahommedwe will not waste time in comparing speculations,
or analyzing creeds. Armed with this Christ of the Poor, we will say to
the Poor, He was a Poor Man, such as you are. Like you he toiled. Like
you he hungered. At the graves of Poor Men like you he wept. He
lived for youfor you he died. Then listen to his voice, which utters
all truth, in simple words
Love one another
.
The Peasant, whose animated features contrasted with the motionless
lineaments of the Image by his side, now glanced around from face to face,
speaking by turns to every one of the brothers. As he spoke, his voice
became tremulous; his sunburnt features were wet with tears.
And can we not accomplish the great work for man? Is there a
Brother here, who can say no! who has the heart to say it? Here we
are, men of all nations, colors and creeds. Can we not join our hands
around the rock, as though it were an altar, and sacrifice our prejudices,
our creeds at the feet of the Carpenter's Son?
Mahommedan! I speak to you. In your traditions you have read of
Jesus the Prophet. Do you object to Jesus the Carpenter's Son?
Hindoo! Your traditions speak of a mysterious incarnationof a
sublime
manifestation of God enshrined in the fleshcan you refuse to
acknowledge
and love the Spirit of God, enshrined in the form of a
Carpenter's
Son?
Protestant, it is your boast to read the written word of God. Can you
refuse the Carpenter's Son?
Catholicyour traditions speak of Church, of Authority, of Popes
invested with God-like power, and men sunk beneath the degradation
of the brute creation, and yet, amid this horrible mass of error, there is
here and there a worda true word of the Carpenter's Son. Are you
willing to sacrifice ChurchAuthorityPope and Council, at the alter
of Brotherhood, at the feet of the Carpenter's Son?
Deist! It is to you I appeal. It is your delight to cherish the idea
of one supreme God, only revealed to man, by the forms of external
nature
.
Do you see God in the leaf and flower, and yet refuse to behold
him in the radiant forehead, the peasant garb, the deathless words of the
Carpenter's Son?
Atheist! Yes, there is one in this band who cannot believe in the
existence
of a God. Let me have a word with you, my brotherlet us talk
with each other, in kindness. You are, perchance, so constituted that the
power to believe is not in your nature. All reason and no faith. And
yet your heart beats warmly for the good of man; it is your earnest
desire
that all men may be indeed brothers. Can you find in the page of
any history,in the record of any age or countrya Spirit at once so
loving and so actual, so like a God and yet full of sympathy for man, as
that of the Carpenter's Son? Point me to the pageproduce the record
and I will love you all the better!
His eye gleaming, his forehead radiant, the impassioned Peasant glanced
around, and paused, as if to note the effect of his words. There was
stilness,and then the air was full of sobs and groans.
They were not altogether sobs of anguish, groans of sorrow. They
rose from their seats, they gathered round the sunburnt Peasant, and rent
the air with incoherent cries.
Strange words were audible amid their cries
It is the Truth which our fathers sought for agesit is the great Secret
which will regenerate the World! Not the Christ of Theology, not the
Catholic Christ, nor the Protestant Christ, but the Jesus of the Heart!
The Carpenter's Son, seperate from all creeds, and only known as the
Incarnation of Brotherhood!
The Peasant took in his hand the veil which he had lifted from the
dumb Face of the Imagehis form was raised to its full staturehis eye
burned as with fire from Heaven.
Hold! Do I understand you, my brethrenare you willing to bury
your creeds at the feet of the Carpenter's Son, and believe only in the
Brotherhood which shines from his face? Is it so? Then let us look
for the day after the long night of hopeless Evil. And I too am willing
to offer up my creed at the feet of the Carpenter's Son!
Listen, for I have a confession to make. I have been educated to
believe
that Christ was in truth the very God. That the awful Being who
made the stars, and dwelt in Eternity, was presentliving, throbbingin
the breast of the Nazarene. Was enshrined in the Carpenter's Son, made
manifest in the flesh of that humble Son of the Poor. This I was taught
to believe, and it was to me a holy thought, that Omnipotence became a
suffering child of Toil, and dwelt, for a while, very humbly in the huts of
the Poor, and diedfeeling every pang of mortal anguishupon a Felon's
tree. Died for youfor mefor us all!
And yet, my brothers, I am willing to sacrifice this beliefto
consider
it merely a form of wordsonly so that we may all meet upon one
common ground, that we may all join our hands around one altar, and all
bind to our hearts the Spirit of the Carpenter's Sonthe Incarnate form
of Brotherhood among men!
As he paused, he dropped the veil over the sad Image.
Thus, he cried, Thus let us hide the Imprisoned Jesus of the
Church. The Christ of the Heart moves in the bosom of the world
Soon the nations will know his spirit, and Kings and Priests will tremble,
as the earth quivers at each throb from the Heart of the Carpenter's Son.
CHAPTER EIGHTEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
THE PROPHECY OF THE PEASANT.
Embody
the history of the Carpenter's Son, let the Spirit of his life
become the Soul of our Organization, and Ia rude Peasant man, born
of the humble Peoplecan predict to you the Future of mankind!
Not fifty years from this hour, the voice of our Brotherhood will
reach the heart of a young man, in the city of Paris. Even as he sits
amid a band of boon companions, the cup in his hand, and his ruddy
English
face contrasted with the faces of the brown Frenchmen, the voice
will reach him, and he will dash the cup to the floor, and feel the
impulses
of his great mission stir his soul.
His great mission? Yesthis young Englishman, encircled by the gay
youth of Paris, is destined by Almighty God to conquer the New World,
armed with an olive branch instead of a sword. He will cross the Ocean, he
will rear a People in the Wilderness, he will send forth his voice to the
oppressed of all the earth, saying to them all`Come! Here is a Home
for the down-trodden, here is an Altar for the exile and the wanderer. We
know neither Priest nor King, in our New World at home. We are
Brothersour Father is God.'
And the exile and the wanderer will come, and, with this Apostle to
the New World, rear the Altar of Brotherhood in the wilderness.
Indian! The Apostle will be just to you, and to your race! Even
now, as the mists which cloud the Future roll aside, I behold him
standing
amid the red men, near a calm river's shore,I hear the words of
the Covenant which they make with each other; a Covenant made
without
oath, or priest, or sword, and yet it will live when oaths, and priests,
and swords are known no longer upon the face of the earth.
After the Apostle has done his work, he will pass away. Years roll
onthe colonists, the emigrants, the exiles of the New World begin to
grow into a People. That New World, which the Almighty has reserved
for the down-trodden of all nations and races, strengthens rapidly into an
Empire, such as the world has never seen beforenot of Kings, or of
Priestsbut an Empire of Men.
That New World, which the Almighty has destined to be the young
Heart and the young Brain of a decrepit Earth, thinking for all Peoples,
the bold thoughts of freedom; feeling for the wrongs of all races, and armed
with the power to right those wrongsthe New World is assailed by all
the infamies of the Old World, incarnate in the person of a King.
He would enslave the young Empire with those customs and laws,
which have drained the sap and the blood from the veins of the old, and
turned an Eden into a Hell.
But lo! The same God who sent an Apostle of Peace to plant the
Olive Branch of Brotherhood on the shores of the New World, now
sends a Deliverer to assert the sanctity of the New World from all
Kings, in the face of God and Man, and carve out a way for Brotherhood
with his battle-sword.
Among his legions I behold him, armed for the fight, and with the
consciousness of a good cause flashing from his eyes, and investing his
bold forehead with a sublime resolve.
The Deliverer will come in the year 1775. He will combine in his
own person, all those qualities which the world has never yet seen
combined
in one man. He will be a man of vigorous passions, fiery blood,
temper as ardent as the southern sky. He will learn first to govern his
passions, and rule his own soul, and therefore be fitted for the
government
of men, and the sway of an Empire. Years of danger and toil in
the untrodden forests, will harden him into iron manhood. He will serve,
he will suffer, so that he may always feel with those who are enslaved,
and know the anguish which falls to the lot of the poor man, who never
ceases to suffer and endure.
This Deliverer will rise in the darkest hour of Despotismhe will
achieve the freedom of the New World, and then
But hold! There the cloud overcasts the Future; I cannot read
the Future of his life after the hour when he has won the battle for
freedom.
He may repeat the story of Cromwell, who saved his country from
Kings, by usurping the power without the name.
Yes, he may descend from his calm grandeur, as the Father of his
Country, and mingle in the herd of Kings, of Tyrants, of Conquerors,
bartering immortal glory for the bauble of an hour.
Then woe to America, and woe to Man!
The New World will become the theatre of battles without an
object, bloodshed without an aim. It will become a land of robbers, and
of graves. The freedom, which the Deliverer might have achieved in all
its details, in the year 1783, will be postponed until 1890. A terrible
postponement, a fearful delay, only marked by murder in various forms
by petty Kings, conflicting with each other under various names.
Let it therefore be our care, my brethren, to leave to our children as
a holy trust, the Life of this Deliverer! Yes, his life! A Brother of our
Order will go to him, as he prepares for battle, and confront him with a
Dagger and a Sword. `This Sword is consecrated for thy defence, so
long as thou art true to thy country, and to man. This Dagger is
consecrated
for thy Death, the moment thou art false!'
Let us write it in our records, let us teach it in our solemn
ceremonies
,
that upon the Truth or Falsehood of this Deliverer, who will
come in the year 1775, hangs the destiny of mankind, for at least three
centuries.
Does he prove true? Then the fire of Brotherhood lighted by the
Apostle, in the wilds of America, in 1682, and defended by the Deliverer
in 1775, will illuminate the world.
The name of that Deliverer will become the universal word for
`
Freedom
.'
Does he prove false to his great trust? Ahthe picture is too dark
it spreads before me, but I dare not contemplate its incredible details
In case he faithfully fulfils the awful trust confided to his hands, then
behold the Future of America, and of the World!
America, as I have said, will then in truth become the young Heart,
and the young Brain of a decrepit Earth. The pulsations of that Heart,
and the thoughts of that Brain, will shake the World.
France, beautiful Francethe land desecrated by religious wars
and saintly massacres,will be the first to feel the throbbings of that
Heart, and echo the name of the New World Deliverer amid her songs
of Brotherhood.
France will be chosen by God to fight the first battle on the soil of
Europe in the cause of Man.
The heart sickens and the eye grows dim, but to gaze upon the details
of that battle, fought by France in the name of Men, against the Priests
and Kings of an enslaved world.
Even now I see itit is therethat solitary glimpseit is a river of
blood, swelling fast into an ocean, with a corse upon every billow. It is a
people, degraded by the slavery of centuries, suddenly transformed into a
horde of Demons, who not only sweep Priest and King into the bloody
21
wave, not only level palace and jail, beneath their crimsoned feetbut
O God! can it be! they blot the name of God from the sky, and write
upon the grave`There is no Immortality. Death is but a sleep.'
At this period there will arise in France a Prophet of Blood. He is
thereI behold him standing amid millions of slaves, drunken with their
first breath of freedom. His throne, a strange engine of murder, erected
on a platform, with an axe gleaming from its timbers. A slender man,
with a haggard complexion, eyes filled with injected blood, features
compressed
,
as with the impulse of an unrelenting will, he stands upon the
platform, and shouts to the freed slaves in a shrill voice, as the rich, the
noble, and the beautiful, fall headless at his feet. `More heads,' he
shrieks, `more heads for the altar of the Revolution! More bloodmore
blood to wash the record of the poor man's wrongs from the history of
ages! The Rich have had the world long enoughit is now the day of
the poor.'
It will be a terrible day for Kings, and for the rich men, who believe
in Kings, when this Messiah of Carnage comes up from the cloud of
Revolution; a lurid Meteor, shining with a pale, gloomy grandeur over a
world of blood!
He will arise in France, I say, he will arise after the Deliverer of the
New World hath done his work, and he will prepare the way for the
coming of a Crowned Avenger.
And even he will feel the divine beauty of the Carpenter's Son, and
hope for a calm time of Brotherhood, after the tempest of infernal passion
is over.
At last he will fall beneath the gory wheels of Revolution,beneath
those wheels, which were hurled onward by his own armbut in the
moment of his fall, he will foresee the coming of the blessed day of
Brotherhood
.
Nayhe will die upon that unknown engine of murder, which was
his throne, by the very axe which has drunk the blood of royalty and
beautyhe will die a wretched and accursed thing, his last groan
chorused by the demon yells of that Mob, who were yesterday his
Brethrenbut in his last moment, a Hope will brighten over his glassy
eyes, and his clotted lips will tremble with the accents of Prophecy
`After me a Crowned Avenger comes! When my body is in the
ditch, and my name given out to all the world as a Proverb of loathing,
the Crowned Avenger will start from the Peoplehe will build himself a
palace from the Thrones of fallen Kingshe will write his name upon
the Globe in characters of fire. He will avenge me!
`Without me, this Crowned Avenger could never have appeared. I
have prepared the way for himI go to darkness, and no one pities me.
And he, too, will be crushed beneath the weight of his greatness, he too,
will prepare the way for another, and a Nobler Man.
`And, when the day of that Nobler man, that Universal Liberator,
comeswhen nations and empires, and dynasties, and sects and creeds
have crumbled into dust before the light of Brotherhood, and the freed
earth shall glow with gladness under the eye of God,then shall justice
be done to my memory, and men shall no longer couple my name with
curses, but speak of me as of one who sacrificed, not merely life, but
fame, for the sake of the Poor.'
CHAPTER NINETEENTH.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
THE SUPREME CHIEF OF THE ROSY CROSS.
And
this faltered the speaker, wiping the moisture from his brow
this will occur before the Eighteenth Century is doneyesI behold
even now a terrible date, written in black characters upon a lurid cloud
the date is 1789!
Yes, Priests and Kings will drink to the last dregs the cup which they
filled for the lips of their slaves. They will have to combat, not merely
a horde of Slaves, but a Mob of Demons.
But in order that the freedom, so fearfully won by the People
transformed
into Demons, may not be lost in endless massacre, a Man will
arise, who will place his foot upon the necks of Kings, and mock their
power to scorn, by assuming a power, unknown before in the annals of
the human race. That boundless power will be assumed and worn in
the name of the People.
The New World demanded first an Apostle, then a Deliverer. Europe
demands a crowned peasantan
Avenger
.
Rising from the common herd, this man will become the Cromwell of
a World, believing not so much in the people as in armies; not so much
in God as in his own Destiny.
His bold forehead, stamped with more than kingly grandeur, his eyes
lighted by a soul conscious of its own Destiny, his features shadowed into
the warm bronze of the south, and marked by the outlines of the oriental
races, appear before me now, like the face of a Demi-God.
He traverses Europe, leaving his bloody foot-prints upon every shore.
He stands upon the Egyptian pyramid, and, with his sad, thoughtful eyes,
surveys a world that is to be conquered by him. He girdles one-half the
world with a belt of cannon and musquet, bayonet and sword. Not a
land in the Old World but is peopled by his armiesalready he stretches
forth his arm toward the New.
And this man,the Crowned Avenger of the Peoplewith all his
bloodshed
,
is a holy thing in the eyes of Heaven, compared with the noblest
King on the face of the earth.
He comes to begin for Europe that work which the Apostles and the
Deliverer accomplished for the New World.
And after his work is done, and he has scourged the Kings as with the
lash of a God, and made them the humble ministers of his will, he will be
delivered into their hands; and, afraid of the Man, even when they have
possession of his body, the Kings will bury the Crowned Peasant in the
profound solitudes of an Island that stands alone in the centre of an ocean.
There, isolated from mankind, and secluded with his own heart, the
Avenger will die, his last gasp embittered by the persecutions of petty men,
with brows of clay and hearts of stone.
After the body is dead, and Kings have worked their will upon it, the
Soul of the Avenger will come back to France, and throb with terrible life
in new revolutions.
That soul, redeemed from the stains which darkened its beauty, will
hover, like a good omen, over the destiny of mankind, and dwell in the
hearts of the French people, as the thunder dwells in the clouds of heaven.
For that soul prepared the way for the coming of a Deliverer for
Europe
,
even as the thunder and the lightning precede the glorious calm of
the summer day.
And he will comeyes, the Deliverer of Europe,of the world, per
chancehe will come at last. There are various figures written on the
clouds of the Future, and I may not read them now.
Thereglorious date, that tells of a world enfranchised by the spirit
of Brotherhood embodied in the Carpenter's Sonit tosses before me,
amid clouds of rainbow beauty. Is it 1848or is it 1884?there is a mist
before my eyesI cannot trace the figures plainly, but
The Deliverer of Europeof the worldwill come at last, and
come with the arm to avenge and the spirit to love!
Kings will shrink from their thrones at his coming; the slaves of the
Old World will start into a people, and even the black slaves of the New
will dare to claim a portion for themselves in the Love of God, and grasp
for themselves a share in the Brotherhood of Man.
Even the red man of the forest, smitten by the iron finger of White
Civilization, which poisons his heart and withers his brain, will look up
and see the face of the Carpenter's Son, smiling blessings upon him even
from the ruins of Despotism and Superstition.
Thus, my brothers, you have before you the three great Epochs which
will mark the history of Man, within the next three hundred years.
First, the Epoch of the Apostles, who, armed with the Love which dwelt
in the breast of the Carpenter's Son, will rear the altar of Brotherhood on
the shores of the New World, thus promulgating to all manking the Divine
Truth, that the New World is not for Priests nor Kings, nor for any form
of superstition or privilege, but for Mansacred and set apart by God
for the millions who toil.
Second, the Epoch of the Deliverer, who, called by God, will take up
the sword, and even as the Carpenter's Son scourged the money-changers
from the Temple of Jerusalem, so will he scourge the oppressors of body
and soul from that holiest Temple of Brotherhood, the land of the New
World.
In case the Deliverer, after giving freedom to the New World, proves
false to his trust, and takes to himself a Crown and Throne, then the
history of the Future is beset by clouds that have no ray to lighten their
omnipotent gloom.
But should he prove faithful to his great trust, and after accomplishing
the work of freedom, yield his sword into the hands of the people, and
become
,
for the sake of the Holy Cause, a Man among Men, a Brother among
Brothers, then will follow
The Third Epoch. The Epoch of the Crowned Avenger, whose
tremendous
battles, supernatural glory, and Death sublime in its very
isolation
,
will prepare the world for the approach of the Holiest Epoch, for the
Coming of the Universal Liberator.
The Epoch of Brotherhood among menthe Liberator of all classes,
nations, and races of the great family.
In the year of the Carpenter's Son 1848, or in 1884, this Epoch and
this Liberator will be announced by convulsions over all the world.
Monarchy, grown drunk with its habit of oppression and bloodshed, will
press the millions who toil, to the last extent of sufferance and endurance.
Rich Men will say, triumphantly, that there is no God but Gold, no
Heaven but in getting more wealth, no hell but in Poverty. They will
regard the Poorthat is, nine-tenths of the human family, as old fables tell
us, the Damned are regarded by the Fiendsas the objects of alternate
mockery and vengeance; as things of dumb wood and stone; as beasts; as
any thing but souls born of God and redeemed by his Spirit, incarnate in
the Son of the Carpenter.
Rich Men will gather round the Throne in England, and urge
Monarchyalready bloated with crimeto new exactions, and place in its
grasp incredible improvements in the kingly art of murder.
Rich Men in Ireland will pour into the cup of that People's woe,
that cup which has been slowly filling for centuriesthe last drop of
bitterness. The cup of Ireland's despair will be full at last, and the Rich
Man will have to drink it from the hand of a Demon, who was once a
peasant, once a man.
Rich Men in America will strengthen the chains by which millions of
the Black race are held in bondage. They will regard these millions of
the Black race as beasts of the field, and herd them together in profitable
Incest; selling the fruit of the mother's womb before it has seen the light,
and holding Property in Human Flesh, in Human Blood, in Immortal
Souls.
A groan echoed from the assemblage.
This in America? This in the New World?
Yes! This in the land for which the Deliverer has consecrated his
sword! In order that Man may know the value of freedom, it is
necessary
that he should first suffer the pains of hell, in the ditch of slavery.
And, of all the forms of slavery which the world ever saw, or ever will
see, that which will curse the American Continent, in the year 1848 or
1884under the name of Black Slavery, stands arrayed before my vision
as the most appalling. It ispardon the warmth of my utterance, for over
the mists of the future I see it, even now, in its garb of crimesit is an
Infernal Trinity, composed of three Fiends, who are called Atheism, Incest,
Blasphemy.
Atheism, but not the honest Atheism which denies a God in Nature,
and blunders upon a something called chance; but a ferocious Atheism,
which builds altars to God, worships him with the pomp of priest and
ritual, and at the same moment shows that it does not believe in his
existence, does not fear his vengeance, for it degrades his Image into
a brute.
Incest, for in order to make Flesh and Blood more profitable, it
encourages
Blasphemy, for it not only makes the New World a reproach in the
lips of the Tyrants of the old world, but it turns all that is holy in religion
into a Lie. It cries, Hail, Lord Jesus! and with that cry, treads the
Black Brother of the Carpenter's Son deeper into bondage.
When the blessed Epoch is very near,when the footstep of the
Universal
Liberator begins to move the earththen the Black Slaves in
America
,
the White Slaves in Irelandin fact, the Slaves over all the world
will rise upon their masters, rise without an object or an aim, but urged to
ferocious action, by an impulse which cannot be resisted or controlled.
Then will occur the Jubilee of brute force, the Saturnalia of Murder.
It will be a day of reckoning for the Rich Man over all the world. He
will learn at last, that it is better to give some light of education, some
gleam of immortality, even to a slave. He will, I say, learn that it is
better to combat an educated slave, whose nature retains some ray of its
Divine origin, much better, as God lives! than to combat a Brute in human
shape, who knows no limit in his vengeance, and sacrifices, in his hellish
fury, not only the rich man, but the beautiful wife who nestles in his arms,
and the little child who clings to his knees.
It will be a terrible going out of Egyptan Exodus of incredible
carnage, which the Poor will accomplish, ere the great day of their
Redemption
.
The Israelites of old, chained in Egypt, went forth one day, and the
sea, parting on either side, left bare a safe pathway for the liberated slaves.
Their pursuers followed, and were lost in the waves. The freed slaves
beheld their livid faces, and heard their impotent cries of despair. This
was indeed a terrible sight for Egypt, but a glorious day for Israel.
Remember, however, that the Israelites, enslaved by the Egyptians,
only symbolized the Poor Man all over the world, enslaved by the Rich.
Therefore, I say, it will be a terrible going out of Egypt which the
Poor Man will accomplish, when all at once he escapes from thraldom,
through a Red Sea. That Red Sea nothing but the blood which flows
from the veins of the tyrants of the Poor.
It will, I repeat, be an Exodus of incredible carnage, which the Angels
will behold on that day, when the Poor Man shall hear the voice of God,
calling upon him in his bondage`Arise! The hour hath come. The
cup is full. Arise, ye millions of the human race,Arise, ye races and
tribes of the Poor! Go out from this bondage, though the way of your
redemption is paved with the bodies of the Rich, though their blood rolls
before you like a sea. Go out from bondage! For it is the Exodus of
the Poor, for which ye have waited and endured, and wept your bloody
tears so long!'
And the same God who gave a Moses to the chained Israelites, will
call forth, from the shadows of Poverty in the year 1848, or 1884the
Liberator of a World.
The man with sunburnt features and knotted hands, stood alone, near
the veiled figure, the centre of a group, agitated by emotion too deep for
words.
They looked upon him, as he arose in their midst, clad like an humble
peasant, and felt that he was a Prophetdespite his toil-hardened hands
and coarse attirea Prophet called from the ranks of the Poor, to foretell
the future of a World in chains.
Overwhelmed by the intensity of his thoughts, the Peasant rested both
hands upon the shoulders of the veiled figure, while his chest shook as
with intense physical torture, and the cold damps stood in beads upon
his brow. His eyes grew brighter every moment, while the brown hue
of his bold countenance was marked by a death-like pallor.
At last, he murmured amid the writhings of his inexplicable agony.
At last, Blessed Lord, the Lead will become Gold, and the Sneer be
changed into a Smile.
It was a long time, ere the sensation created by the words of this rude
Prophet, permitted the members of this secret Brotherhood to give
utterance
to their thoughts in speech.
The aged Swede arose.
His white hairs waved in the wind, which came in fitful gusts from the
mouth of the cavern, and the faint light imparted its gloomy radiance to
his withered features.
In a tremulous voice, he spoke of the great object which had called the
Chiefs of the Rosy Cross from all quarters of the globe.
They had been called, not so much by the command of a Supreme
Chief, as by the voice of a tradition, which had been treasured in the
innumerable branches, or Circles of the great Brotherhood, since the
earlier years of the Tenth Century.
That tradition pointed out a particular year in the seventeenth Century,
which would witness a new Era in the history of the Order.
On the appointed year, at a certain hour of a certain day, the Chiefs of
the Brotherhood, from all quarters of the globe, were to assembleso the
tradition enjoinedin the cavern of a German mountain, long known in
the history of the Order.
They were to choose by lot a Supreme Chief, who would be known all
over the world, to all the Brothers of the Rosy Cross, and to all secret
orders, beneath the Brotherhood, by a certain symbol, engraven on a
golden medal.
That Symbol was a Globe, a Rising Sun and a Cross, encircled by the
Hebrew words, in the Hebrew character
Vayomer eloheim yehee aur vayehee aur
.
These words, continued the aged Swede, indicate the light which,
shining from the councils of our Brotherhood, shall illuminate all the
world. A light spoken into existence by the voice of God, which shall
do the work of God in every human heart. Brothers, to me, as the oldest
of the Chiefs, has this Medal been entrusted. It was given into my hands,
by a Chief who had reached the venerable age of one hundred years. I
now surrender it into your handsI place it upon this rock, which forms
the altar of our worship. Let no one touch it, nor gaze upon it, until the
Supreme Chief of the Brotherhood is elected.
He placed the Medal on the altar, where it glimmered with a pale
golden light.
An inexplicable sensation pervaded the assemblage, as every eye was
centred upon this most sacred symbol of the Order. It was endeared to
their hearts by a thousand ceremonies; it was linked with the
overwhelming
associations of the ancient renown and almost Godlike power of the
Brotherhood, in the days of old.
The Hebrew words rudely graved upon it, gave some color to the
tradition
which taught that it had been coined by the hand of the High Priest
Aaron, in the days of the Wilderness.
True, the globe and the cross seemed to indicate a much more recent
origin. Yet the globe was known as an emblem in the secret
Brotherhood
,
long before it was discovered that the earth itself was a globe. The
Cross is found in the pyramids of Egypt, erected thousands of years before
the era of the Carpenter's Son.
In a word, this medal, glimmering dimly upon the surface of the rock,
overwhelmed the Brothers with the memories of three thousand years.
Now commenced the ceremonial of election.
Every chief wrote his name upon a tablet. Their tablets were given
into the hands of the Swede, who placed them in a hollow of the rock,
which supplied the place of an Urn.
One by one, you will advance, my Brothers, and draw a single tablet
from this hollow in the rock. It is asserted by the traditions of our order,
that the great work of Supreme Chief will fall upon the Brother
who draws the tablet on which the sign of the Cross is traced. Advance,
my Brothersbut holdlet me first ask every Brother to raise his clasped
hands above his head, and swear by the Globe, by the Rising Sun and the
Cross, to be faithful to the Supreme Chief, whom we are about to elect
from our midstto obey his commands without hesitation, scruple or
reserve, and to recognise his Power, whenever it is attested by the most
sacred symbol of our Order!
There was a pauseand then from every lip arose the solemn chorus;
We swear by the Globe, by the Rising Sun, and by the Cross!
Perchance the outward history of the world, that history which only
pictures the appearances, not the realities of things, never described a
scene of sterner grandeur, than that which was now in progress within
the walls of the mountain cavern.
The Representatives of the various Destinies of Nations, were met in
awful Council, to decide the Destiny of all mankind, to elect, in fact, one
man, who should in his turn embody the destiny of a World.
One by one they came toward the hollow in the rock. The torchlight
shone upon their various costumes, and displayed the workings of those
contrasted faces, every one the representative of a People, the type of a
race. The blanket of the Indian, adorned with the many-colored
wampum-belt
,
contrasted with the turban and flowing robes of the Moslem.
The tawny Hindoo, the bronzed Spaniard, the florid German, mingled
together in that throng; and the hardy Colonist from New England stood
side by side with the stern soldier of Cromwell, and the down-trodden Son
of Ireland.
The Jesuit, too, folding his hands over his black robe, with a deep
thought upon his tonsured brow, stood near the worshipper of Con-fav-tse
from the far land of China
The Black Man was not alone. His jet-black features, scarred with
the traces of that incredible thraldom from which he was a fugitive, he
joined hands with the agile Son of Italy, whose sculptured lineaments
spoke of the races of Ancient Rome.
The gray-garbed Peasant stood alone, leaning upon the veiled figure
with his knotted hands. Few could guess his country or his race. His
bold features, darkened by the sun, spoke somewhat of an Oriental race.
The rumor ran from lip to lip, that he was from an island in the
Mediterranean.
His thoughts were absorbed by the overwhelming solemnity of the
moment.
They were about to elect a Man, who would control for good or evil,
for good or evil in the present age, and through all future timethe
immense
organization of the Brotherhood.
On whom would the great work fall?
The Turk, the Hindoo, the Arabthe eyes of the Peasant roved along
the throngor perchancethe Black Man? By the chance or fatality
of that mysterious lottery, the destiny of the Order and the World might
be embodied in a Negro;a Negro! One of that thrice degraded race,
who have been ever doomed to drain the bitterest dregs of slavery, and
wear its heaviest chain upon their lacerated souls.
Meanwhile the aged Swede sat apart, his white beard floating over
his breast. His days were numbered; he was not a Candidate for the
great office; and more than this, he had been the last keeper of the Sacred
Symbol of Brotherhood. He was therefore not a Candidate, but a Judge.
While the Peasant stood leaning against the veiled figure, the other
brethren advanced one by one to the hollow in the rock, and turning their
faces away, drew forth a single tablet from the darkness.
The Peasant was aroused from his reverie by the voice of the Swede
Brother, it is now your turn, he said.
The Peasant looked around with a stare of vague amazement.
Have all drawn but me? he exclaimed.
Even as he spoke, he beheld the brethren standing against the walls of
the cavern, with their tablets in their hands.
Is not the tablet with the Cross yet drawn? he ejaculated, while a
tremor seized his limbsand have all the Brothers advanced to the rock
all but me?
No, answered the SwedeThere are three others besides you
The Peasant followed the extended hand of the Swede, and beheld
standing near him, the Indian, the Colonist from New England, and the
Black Man.
On one of the four will fall the office of Supreme Chief! exclaimed
the Swede.
Then it was that a wild suspense seized every breast, and all eyes
were turned upon the four. The Indian and the Black Man stood on
the right of the veiled figurethe New England Colonist on his left.
The Peasant, leaning upon the leaden image, trembled from head to foot,
and veiled his face.
Advance, Brother from the New World, he cried in a husky voice
The tablet marked with the Cross is yours!
The Colonist advanced with a firm step, but his hand trembled, his
face changed color, as he drew a single tablet from the hollow in the rock.
He dared not look upon it, but stood gazing with a vacant glance in the
face of the Swede.
Is it the tablet marked with the Cross? interrogated the Peasant, as
he raised his facehis voice, changed and hollow, resembled a prolonged
groan.
The interest of the Chiefs became intense and painful.
The tablet! The tablet! was heard in murmursand in various
tongues on every side.
The Colonist at last gathered courage; he gazed upon the tablet
My own name! he said, and turned away.
The stillness which succeeded, was like the grave.
The contest was now between the Peasant, the Indian, and the Black
Man. The Indian next advanced. Stern and proudly erect, he wound
his blanket over his broad chest, and his aquiline profile was described in
bold shadow on the wall of the cavern, as he drew near the hollow in
the rock.
Extending his hand without a tremor, he also drew forth a solitary
tablet, and held it toward the light.
You could not hear the faintest echo of a sound. All was terribly
still.
The name of my Hindoo Brother, said the Indian, as he resumed
his place.
The office of Supreme Chief now lay between the Peasant and the
Black Man.
As for the Peasant, seized by an uncontrollable emotion, he bowed his
tall form once more against the Leaden Image, and concealed his face
from the light.
The Black Man advanced a stephesitatedand returned to his place.
Brother, it is your time, and as he spoke, he turned his harsh features
toward the Peasant.
There was no reply. The Peasant, who but a moment ago had seemed
a Prophet, inspired for a great work, now rested his arms upon the Leaden
Image, and hid his face, while his strong frame shook with agony.
Advance, brother, exclaimed the Swede to the NegroThe office
of Supreme Chief is within your grasp!
The Peasant heard the words of the Swede, and a cold shudder
pervaded
his limbs. So near, so very near that Power, which held in its hand
the Destiny of the human race, and yet it was about to glide from his
touch. He heard the footsteps of the Black Manhe knew by the dead
stillness that the Negro was standing near the hollow in the rockhe felt
as he heard the universal ejaculation, that the Negro had become the
Supreme
Chief of the Order.
Yet hark! The voice of the Black Man is heard
I have drawn a tablet, on which my Red Brother's name is written,
he said, and all was still again.
The heart of the Peasant bounded within his breast. Possessed in every
nerve by an intense ambition, he had writhed with all the agony of
suspense
,
and now his blood became fire, with the pulsations of a boundless
joy.
The Tablet on which the Cross was traced was his ownwith his form
bowed and his face concealed, he awaited the salutations of his brethren.
But suddenly his blood grew cold again, as the voice of the Swede fell on
his ear:
Brother, advance. You are the last. Two tablets alone remain in
the hollow of the rock. On one your name is written, for it has not been
drawn by any of the brethren. On the other the Cross is traced.
In case
you do not draw the Tablet with the Cross, a new election will be held
.
The Peasant heard the last words, and raised his head. Every eye
remarked
the pallor of his face.
Two tablets! he echoed, with a vacant stareI had forgotten
he paused, and turning his eyes upon the throng, exclaimedI am not
worthy of this awful trust. I will not place my hand in the hollow of the
rock. Let the tablets be cast into that hollow once more, and the great
office will doubtless fall to the lot of some more worthy brother.
But they silenced him with their murmursevery one, from the Swede
to the Black Man, bade him advance.
It was a terrible moment for that rude Peasant, with the gray garb and
sunburnt face, when, crossing the cavern floor, shading his agitated features
from the light, he placed his knotted hand in the hollow of the rock. He
felt the two tablets beneath his fingers. He knew not which to take. One
moment he desired the great office with all his soul, the next, he felt
unworthy
,
and hoped that he might draw the tablet inscribed with his own
name.
It is an awful Power to be placed in the hands of one man, he
muttered
,
as he raised his hand, and without daring to gaze upon the tablet,
held it behind his back toward the light.
The Swede arose.
You suffer, my brother, he whisperedyour face is like the face
of a dead manI will read the tablet for you.
The Peasant could not speak a word, but he listened to the footsteps of
the Swede. There was a moment's pausehe could feel the intense
interest
of the Brotherhood, as he heard the sound of their deep-drawn
breath.
Brothers, behold!it was the voice of the Swede, and the Peasant,
with his face turned from the light, heard the cry which filled the cavern.
That cry echoed from the very hearts of the assembled brethren, as every
eye beheld the tablet which the old man held toward the light.
And yet the Peasant dared not turn and know his destiny. That
murmur
was so confused, so vague, he could not divine its true meaning, but
he felt the hand of the Swede upon his own, and felt himself urged gently
to the light.
Brothers! salute the Supreme Chief of our Brotherhood! the voice
of the Swede swelled through the cavern.
For a moment the Peasant tottered to and fro, while his sight grew dim,
and the figures of the brethren flitted before him like the confused shapes
of a dream. But that moment over, his sight grew clear, his limbs were
firmglancing around with unwavering eyes, he beheld himself encircled
by the Chiefs of the Brotherhood, he felt the Golden Medal in his hand.
Now he said, while a deep rapture softened his bold features, and
his form, clad in humble peasant attire, towered in the centre of that throng
Now, indeed, my work is before me. It is for me to embody in the
ritual of our Brotherhood, the life of the Carpenter's Son!
Joining hands, they encircled him, and pronounced with one accord, in
the unknown tongue, the ancient formula of the Order. The Swede laid
his withered hand upon his brown hairs and blessed himHindoo, Turk,
Jesuit, Indian, Englishman and Spaniard, Dane and German, gathered
around, a rampart of living hearts.
The Negro, as the most degraded and down-trodden of all earth's
children
,
pronounced the last word of the consecration
It is from a Child of Toil that the Children of Toil must look for their
redemption.
The Supreme Chief of the Brotherhood raised the Golden Medal toward
the light, and examined its details with a careful scrutiny.
On one side the Globe, the Cross and the Rising Sun, with the
inscription
,
`
Vayomer Eloheim yehee aur, vayehee aur
'`Then spoke God, Let
there be light, and there was light.' The reverse of the Medal is blank.
It bears no inscription. One day it will have an inscription, a glorious
inscription
,
but not until earth is redeemed and all men are Brothers!
Yes, long ages after we are dead, my brethren, some Chief of our
Order will write upon the blank side of the Medal
`
Earth redeemed by the Spirit of the Carpenter's Son, embodied in the
Brotherhood of the Rosy Cross
.'
The speaker took a sharp-pointed dagger from his breast, and resting
the medal upon the rock, traced in rude characters, two dates, beneath the
symbol of the Order. These dates were 1777 and 1848-84.
Then turning to the silent brotherhood, he exclaimed
In the year 1777, another general convocation of the Chiefs of the
Brotherhood will be held in the land of the New World. Then the Golden
Medal will again he placed in the hands of a Supreme Chief, elected in
accordance with the injunction of the most aged Chief. Until that time,
in case I die before it arrivesthe office of Supreme Chief will remain
vacant. And in the year 1848or 84, a general convocation will be held,
at a point to be designated by the Supreme Chief elected in the year 1777.
Glancing into the faces of the encircling Chiefs, the Peasant, now become
the Supreme Power of the Order, beckoned with his hand to seven brethren,
who separated themselves from the throng, and took their places at his
side.
These are the Supreme Elders of the Brotherhood, appointed by me
to assist in the government of the Order, and to receive the sacred symbol
in case of my death. They are known in our traditions as
the Seven
.
Brother, he continued, turning to the first of the SevenYour name
and country?
The First of the Seven was a man of commanding presence, with a face
traced with the indications of a serene soul.
I was born in England, he said, but now that my native land is a
home no longer for freemen, I have no country. I am about to depart to
the New World. Not to New England, for it is accursed by the Demon
of Persecution, but to a more southern clime. My name is Lawrence
Washington.
The Peasant wrote that name upon the Tablet marked with the Cross.
Washington! he murmured, as though he had heard of it before.
The Supreme Chief turned to the Second of the Seven. A man of
slender frame, sharp features, stamped with an iron resolution, and eyes
full of enthusiasm.
Your country, Brother, and your name?
I am of France, responded a shrill, discordant voiceMy name is
Robenspierre.
The Supreme Chief shuddered as he wrote that name underneath the
first.
I have seen it, he murmured, in a tone inaudible to the Brethren
I have seen it in my dreams, written in red characters, upon the timbers
of that unknown engine of Murder.
To the Third he turned. The harsh features of the Black Man met
his gaze.
I have no name, cried the NegroI am called Isaac the Slave.
After he had written the designation of the African beneath the other
names, he turned to the Fourth. The Indian, standing alone, with his
blanket falling over his broad chest.
My country? Wherever the White Race leaves our people a
wigwam
or a hunting-ground. Write, Supreme Chief, that my name is
Talondoga, and my country the Land of the Setting Sun.
Thy children, murmured the Peasant, shall yet sweep the white
race with fire and sword.
The Fifth answered proudlyI am a German. A tiller of the soil.
Write John, the Serf; and as for country, say that I have no Fatherland
but the grave.
It was now the turn of the Sixth. A dark-visaged Hindoo, clad in the
garb of the lowest order of Hindoo priesthood.
Buldarh of the far Eastern landa Pariah, who has no lower
caste
beneath him.
Thy country shall be given up awhile to Moloch, incarnate in the
English Monarchy. But when the oppressor has trampled you for a
hundred years, you will learn his cunning, and crush him with his own
weapons.
Thus speaking, this Peasant Ruler wrote the name of the Pariah beneath
that of the German Serf.
The Seventh: an Italian, whose face seemed oppressed with the Doom
of his country.
Giovanni Ferreti! murmured the Supreme Chief, as he wrote this
name beneath the others. Fear not, Italian! Humble artizan as you
are, it is from your race that there will spring a high-souled Man, who
will strike astonishment into the hearts of all men, for he will embody in
his own person, the functions of Pope and Liberator!
There are the names of your Eldersof the Seven, exclaimed the
Supreme, after a pauseLet us behold them, and write them on our
hearts
And he held the tablet before the eyes of the Brethren. These names
were written underneath the Cross.
1. Lawrence Washington.
2. Robenspierre.
3. Isaac the Slave.
4. Talondoga the Indian.
5. The German Serf.
6. Buldarh the Hindoo and Pariah.
7. Giovanni Ferreti.
It only remains for me to write my own name, said the Supreme
Chief, with a sad smile. These words excited a universal interest. Every
Brother was anxious to know the name of this man, who had been called
by Destiny to the supreme sway of the Brotherhood.
My father, he said, was an Arab, who, cast ashore upon an Island
in the Mediterranean, was enslaved by a Lord, whose castle is built among
the rocks. My mother was a native of the island. As I do not know the
name of my father in the Arab tongue, I willafter the manner of slaves
over all the worldtake the name of the lord who enslaved my father.
The race of that lord has become extinct; himself, his children, all his
people, were swept away by plague; but the Son of the Arab Slave will
perpetuate their name
And beneath the names of the Seven, he wrote the words
Leon Buonaparte of Corsica
.'
His bronzed features grew radiant, his dark eyes gathered new light, as
he gazed upon that name.
Perchance, at some future day, he said, that name of the extinct
Italian noble, who built his castle on the rocks of Corsicathat name, now
assumed by his Slave, may shake the world, and read, to the eyes of
Kings, like the handwriting on Belshazzar's wall!
And raising his right hand, which grasped the Golden Medal, toward
heaven, he stood motionless as stone, while his eyes, shining with
prophetic
light, seemed to behold already a world of slaves starting from their
chains, and building, upon the wrecks of Despotism and Superstition, the
sublime altar of human Brotherhood.
The day is breaking, my brothers, and we must separate, he said, as
he took the torch and drew near the veiled figure once moreBut before
you hasten to your stations, in the various regions of the globe, we will
meet again. Then,at our next meeting, which shall not be many days
from the present hourI will reveal to you the regenerated ceremonial of
our Brotherhood. Yes, I will reveal to you the new organization of the
Order, in which the Spirit of the Carpenter's Son shall throb and burn as
the life of all life. Armed with this spiritembodied in ritual and
constitution
you
will hasten to your various circles, scattered over the surface
of the Globe, and swell your divisions of the great Fraternity, by new
converts
,
and go on in your great work, until the masses begin to feel that the
Spirit of the Carpenter's Son, freed from the body of the leaden Church,
walks divinely over the earth again, speaking to the poor, words that are
mightier than armies.
YesI anticipate the question which rises to your lips and shines in
your eyes. You ask me, what manner of scenes from the life of the
Carpenter's Son, I would embody in the ritual of our Order? The
question
is not difficult to answer.
Have you ever heard of the day, when that Carpenter's Son arose in
a Nazarene Synagogue, and proclaimed, clad, as he was, in the gaberdine
of toil, proclaimed in the face of the Rich Man and the Priest, that the
Spirit of God was upon him to preach good tidings to the Poor, liberty to
the bondman, the good time of Brotherhood to all men?
Or, have you ever heard of the Rich Man, who came one day to the
Carpenter's Son, and, won by the divine beauty of that Spirit which shone
in his eyes, asked sorrowfully, `Master, what shall I do to inherit eternal
life?'
The Carpenter's Son looked in the face of the Rich man, marked his
robes of fine linen and purple, and then said, in that voice which melted
the souls of all who listened to its music
`
Sell all thou hast and give to the Poor!
'
Such scenes as these we will embody in our ritual, and make the life
of our life! Yes, to the Poor we will preach good tidings, liberty, light!
But to the Rich, armed with the Justice of the Carpenter's Son, we will
thunder the sentence which God has pronounced upon their heads`
Sell
all thou hast and give to the Poor! Restore to the mass of mankind the
lands which ye have stolen from them, and baptized with their blood!
Divide among the Poor
your
ill-gotten goldgive back, give back, in the
name of God, your
usurped power, and let your tardy Repentance be
aided by a strict and universal Restitution!
The words had not passed his lips, when he dashed the torch upon the
ground, and the cavern was enveloped in darkness. By the last ray, the
Brothers beheld his sunburnt features flashing as with a divine radiance,
and through the darkness, they heard him speak in a low, deep voice,
tremulous with unutterable joy
Then, indeed, shall the Lead become Gold, and the Sneer be changed
into a Smile.
HERE ENDETH THE MANUSCRIPT OF BROTHER ANSELM.
CHAPTER TWENTIETH.
THE LILY.
Completely
overwhelmed by the revelations of this Manuscript, which
he had taken from the breast of the Leaden Image, Paul remained like a
statue upon the oaken bench, for some moments after he had finished
those incredible pages, without the power to speak or stir. His eyes
were fixed, their brightness dimmed by a misty film. He looked upon
the trees, the grass, the flowers, but did not behold any thing save the
Phantoms of the Manuscript.
The sun was low in the heaven, and the thick shadows began to gather
round the Block-House.
But Paul did not mark the declining sun, nor call to mind his promise
22
to meet Reginald at sunset under the Blasted Pine. His soul was
absorbed
bewildered
by the Revelations of the Manuscript. The forms
of the Secret Brotherhood flitted between his eyes and the light; he saw
that Prophet-Peasant in his gray garb stand beside the veiled figure, while
words full of divine inspiration fell from his lips.
His thoughts in truth were crowded and tumultuous; a thousand
images whirled through his brain.
And yet, amid the very chaos of his musings, there came certain
well-defined
ideas shooting through the gloom, like stars through the darkness
of night.
The Golden Medal is in existence! I may possess it, and with it
grasp the power of the Brotherhood. A strange Prophecy, and yet it has
in part been fulfilled. The Apostle of the New World came long years
ago in the person of William Penn. The time of the Deliverer is at
hand. I saw him consecrated, and it is my destiny to guard him from
the hands of his foes.
He turned the last page of the Manuscript, and started from the bench
as he recognised the handwriting of his father.
You have read, my Son, and it is now your duty to obey.
A great work, a sublime destiny is yours!
It is your destiny to claim the Golden Medal; to unseal the Book of
the Rosy Cross, in which are revealed the signs, symbols, and all the
mysteries of the great Brotherhoodyours, to read the name of the
Deliverer, and confront him with the Sword and the Dagger.
You will read this when I am dead, after the Revelation of the Sealed
Chamber, with its unrelenting Curse, has passed from your soul, and left
your heart serene, your arm nerved and free for the accomplishment of
your great destiny.
When you are worthy, you will discover the Golden Medal, which
bears the Symbol of the Globe, the Cross, and the Rising Sun.
When your soul is calm, you will learn the truththen, at the feet of
the Imprisoned, you will discover the D.
I have often told you, my Son, that the cause of my departure from
Germany, was a vision which rushed upon my eyes, while bending over
the body of your mother, in the vault of the castle, which rises above the
Rhine. I heard the voice of God; it bade me go forth into the solitudes
of the New World, and await the coming of the Deliverer.
This was the truth, Paul, but not all the truth.
After you have read the Revelation of the Sealed Chamber, you will
be able to determine how far the Curse,the Doomor shall I say, the
Maladyof our house and race, shaped my purposes, and urged me to
become either a Wanderer upon the face of the earth, or a nameless Dweller
in the solitudes of a trackless wilderness
.
And yet, aided by the
Revelation of the Sealed Chamber
, you
will not be able to arrive at the whole truth, until you have read the
Manuscript of Brother Anselm.
Even then, another word is needed. Listen, my Son.
While absorbed in the mysteries of the Divine Prophecies, about the
year 1755, I first acquired the friendship of Brother Anselm. He was
then a very aged man. He had been present at the convocation of the
Brotherhood recorded in the Manuscript, and he was one of the seven.
He was, indeed, the only one living in 1755. He was the last of the
Seven appointed by the Peasant, who was elected Supreme Chief at least
a century before he assumed the name of his dead Master, calling himself
Louis Bonaparte.
The Supreme Chief had been dead many years, when I first met
Brother Anselm. That aged man, who had lived far beyond the common
term of human life, was the only remaining guardian of the Sacred
Symbol.You will find his name written in the manuscript, as the
German Serf.
By him I was initiated into the Brotherhood; and at his feet I
learned the symbols, the ceremonies, and the universal language of the
Rosy Cross.
At the time of the
great calamity which befel our house
you have
read of it in the Revelations of the Sealed ChamberBrother Anselm
pointed to the New World, as the place appointed for the next
Convocation
of the Chiefs of the Rosy Cross. There the Deliverer would
appear, who was to re-create the New World, and thus prepare it for its
imposing share in the regeneration of the human race. This Deliverer
was foretold not only by the Prophecy of the Rosy Cross, but also by the
Revelations of St. John.
Sick of the Old World,horror-stricken by the calamity which befel
our housewishing to save you from the Destiny, or the Malady of our
raceI listened to the persuasions of Brother Anselm. I came to the
Wilderness with you and Catharine; accompanied by the Venerable
Anselm, and two other brethren of the Rosy Cross, Joseph and
Immanuel.
I vowed to Brother Anselm a solemn vow, as I have told you before,
that you should be educated in solitude, afar from the world, so that you
might take the Oath of Celibacy, and thus be prepared not only to become
a Brother of the Holy Cross, but its Supreme Chief. Not only the
Guardian of the Deliverer, but the Regenerator of our Order, and the
embodied
Destiny of the human race.
The solemn Convocation of the Chiefs will be held in June, 1777on
the last night of the second week.
It may be, that the hand of death, the canker of disorganization, have
been terribly at work to crush our Brotherhood. It may be, that those
innumerable Circles, which, at the time of the last convocation, were
scattered
over every land in the Globe, and yet connected with each other by
a mysterious bond of union, have suffered their ritual to decay, their
ceremonies
to degeneratethe great bond of Union itself, which was once a
belt of iron, to fall to pieces like a rope of sand.
It is even possible, that on the last night of the second week in June,
1777, while you await the coming of the Chiefs, in the appointed place,
not a single one will appear. Yes, the tradition which commanded them
to meet, may have been lost in the mists of time, and the clamors of battle,
and the changes of circumstances.
Even in that case your Destiny is still glorious. For then the Golden
Medal will be yours, and by virtue of the last testament of Brother Anselm,
(contained in the Book of the Rosy Cross,) you will become the Supreme
Chief of the Brotherhood.
This Medal, combined with the symbolic knowledge which you will
derive from the Book of the Holy Cross, will give you entrance into all
other secret organizations on the face of the globe, and with the right of
entrance will come the power to command.
For the Brotherhood of the Holy Cross is not only superior in symbolic
knowledge to all other secret organizations, but, in truth, all these
organizations
,
however styled, are but illegitimate branches of our great order.
For examplethat which is taught dimly among the Masonic Fraternities
is fully revealed in the Brotherhood of the Rosy Cross.
Behold your destiny, my sonweigh it wellponder long on every
minute detail of your great work.
In order that you may become the Supreme Chief and the Regenerator
of the Brotherhood, you must first sacrifice at its holy altar, every thing
like the ambition of the world, or the love of woman.
As the Supreme Chief, your name will not be known in history. You
will be lost to the sight of the world. You will, in truth, stamp your
almost supernatural impress upon history, and sway like a Destiny the
fate of nationsof mankind. But as an individual, as a man, you will not be
known. Cut off from all ties of friendship or of love, sacred and set apart
from the ambitions or the fears of common men, you will fulfil your awful
task, glide away, and leave your work, but not your name or your
memory, to tell that you ever had an existence.
This is one side of the picture, Paul. Look upon the reverse of
the medal.
Reject the mission which is offered you. Go forth into the great
world, determined to war, to conquer, to love and to hate, to gather gold
and scatter it again, like common men.
What will be the result of a course like this? I do not prophesy,
Paul, nor pronounce a Judgment; I simply address your reason. The
result then, is not very difficult to determine. Rejecting the great mission
for the ambitions of common men, you will undoubtedly acquire fame,
rank and gold. You will be loved by many beautiful women, and feared
by many powerful men. Your wildest ambition may be gratified; you
may place your foot upon the highest step of that golden staircase, which,
the old fable tells us, leads ever upwards, before the eyes of the ambitious.
And what will be the end of all?
The men whom you trust will betray you. The woman whom you
love may prove false. Worse than all, and most to be dreaded of all
judgments
,
she may bear a child which will inherit the horrible Destiny,
the incurable Malady of our race!
The gold which you win, may only
serve to poison your blood with the fever of luxury. The highest step
of the golden stairwayeven if you attain itmay only reveal to you a
yawning chasm at the other side. A chasm that seems fathomless, and
yet not deep enough to bury your despair, when you reflect on
what you
are
, as a Man of the houron
what you might have been
, as the
Regenerator
of the Brotherhood, the Destiny of a World.
You will read this when I am dead.
From the grave I speak to you. Choose, my son, and choose with
freedom, for my death removes from your head the Curse of our race.
Your Father
.
Paul sank on his knees and clasped his hands. The manuscript fell
beside him, among the grass and flowers.
Father! he cried, raising to heaven a face which was softened in
every feature by a holy serenityMy choice is made! Now, that thy
bones are dust, the fatal secret of the Sealed Chamber can no longer cloud
my soul, and urge my arm to that most terrible deed. I am indeed free!
Free! My choice, then, is made at once! I will sever from my heart
all ties of human ambitionI will sacrifice the love of woman, at the altar
of this holy work. No child shall ever be born, to struggle as I have
struggled, with the Cursethe Curse of our race.
Father! By thy spirit I swear to accept the destiny which thou didst
design for me. I will become the Regenerator of the BrotherhoodI will
hover round the Deliverer, his safeguard if he is true, his executioner if he
is false. Thanks, Father! Thy words have removed the Curse from
my soul.
It was an impressive sight to see him kneeling there, his eyes flashing
with the joy which flooded every avenue of his soul, his forehead radiant
with a holy energy, his voice breaking full and deep upon the breathless
stillness of the forest.
At last, after the agony of years, the cloud was lifted from his soul.
Neither the secret of the Sealed Chamber, nor the love of that beautiful
girl, who tempted him to break his oath, could now sway him aside from
his great work.
After the first outburst of joy, Paul fell into a profound reverie.
Where was the Golden Medal? Where the Book of the Rosy Cross?
What was that word which terminated the enigmatical sentence
At the
feet of the Imprisoned you will discover the D
. How should he
acquire the meaning of that word, the hidden truth of the whole sentence?
These queries agitated his mind; but amid all his uncertainties a
profound
gladness nestled in the depths of his heart, when he reflected that
his father deadthe Secret of the Sealed Chamber could threaten him no
longer, with its foreboding of thrice-infamous crime.
And yet these queries must be answered ere he had a right to read the
Deliverer's name.
While Paul was absorbed in this profound reverie, the shadows gathered
darker around the old Block-House, and the stillness of the forest grew
deeper.
It was a beautiful thing to see those masses of deep shadow and vivid
sunlight rest together upon the roof of the Block-House, like strange birds,
whose immense wings, of midnight blackness, were streaked with feathers
of shining gold.
And while the shadows deepened and the forest grew more breathlessly
still, Paul remained on his knees, his hands resting on the oaken bench,
while the manuscript lay near his side.
To night is the seventh night of the second week of June, 1777
he murmured aloud.
Was it sleep that came over his sensesbewildered as they were by
the sudden joyor did only his profound reverie deepen into a waking
dream?
For some time, he remained unconscious of all external sights or sounds
his soul was wrapt within itselfthe images of the secret Brotherhood,
the words of his father, possessed his brain.
After some time had elapsed, he started from this reverie, like a man
waking from a dream.
There was a lily in his right handa beautiful flower, with its snowy
cup still sparkling with the diamond dew. Paul gazed upon it with
indescribable
wonderinhaled its delicious fragrance, and pressed it to his lips.
Then glancing to the right and left, he sought to behold the giver of this
fragrant blessing. There was no one in sightall was silent and shadowy
about the Block-House.
It seems to have fallen from Heaven! he cried, pressing it once more
to his lips.
Paul started to his feet; the sun was hidden behind the trees; his beams
flashed among the huge trunks like arrows of tremulous gold.
It was the hour of sunset.
At once Paul remembered his promise to Reginald, and his vow to sever
from his heart all ties of friendship or love.
I will see him for the last time,tell him the story of my life,and
then, still brothers in heart, we part for ever!
He hastened toward the gate,but suddenly paused ere he advanced
five paces.
It is my duty to remain. The Golden Medalthe Book of the
Brotherhood
the
name of the Delivererthese all demand my earnest thought.
And to-night is the seventh night of the second week in June! But
Reginald
he
has been a brother to meah! I will see him, and return
within
the hour!
He turned his face from the door of the Block-House, and once more
hastened toward the gate. His step was buoyant, his manner joyous, his
face full of bloom, his eye lighted up with new fire.
Again the lily which he grasped met his eye.
A good omen! he cried, and hurried through the gate.
Near the sycamore tree, he paused for an instant, still holding the lily
in his hand.
It is very near sunset, and I cannot reach the appointed place in time,
if I follow the windings of the Wissahikon. There was a path which led
directly to the south-west; I remember it well!
To follow the windings of the Wissahikon, until he reached the Blasted
Pine, was to traverse a distance of at least two miles. The direct path,
leading through the woods and fields, was scarcely a mile in length; it
encountered the Wissahikon near the Schuylkill. After a moment's
hesitation
,
Paul determined to take this path.
Turning his face toward the west, he sought earnestly among the leaves
and shruberry for traces of the path, but his search was in vain.
It is very near sunset, and I will be too late! he cried, in despair, and
at once, with his face turned toward the south-west, plunged into the mazes
of the thickly grown brush-wood. His way was choked by branches of
trees, interwoven with the foliage of the laurel, which covered the ground,
between the trunks of the oaks and pines; plunging deeper into the gloom,
without a ray of light to break the depth of shadow, he still endeavored
to keep his face toward the south-west.
At last he came upon an open space, where there was a carpet of moss,
sprinkled with flowers, and framed in the trunks of huge beechen trees.
A gush of sunlight warmed the place, and Paul, at the same instant,
beheld the lily, which he had not ceased to grasp for a moment, and the
entrance of the path for which he was seeking.
The sunlight shone warmly over the pure white flower, and Paul could
not turn his eyes away from its beautiful cup, tinted as it was by golden
beams.
Where did I obtain this flower? he murmured, as he paused in the
centre of the glade, his dark attire and impressive countenance shown
distinctly
in the sudden sunlight.
Had he gathered it in his slumber? There were no flowers like it in the
vicinity of the Block-House. Perchance it had been left upon the oaken
bench by some wayfarer. And yet its fragrance was still fresh; the dew
sparkled in diamond drops upon its petals.
Paul stood very still, in the rays of the sun, his countenance shadowed
by thought.
This incident of the lily, which he had found in his grasp, when
awaking
from his reverieor his slumberexcited a train of strange emotions.
It has been placed in my hand by a living being; some unknown friend
has stolen to my side, as I was lost in thought, and dropped it gently upon
the oaken bench. Some unknown friend!
Paul pressed his hand upon his forehead; a sudden ejaculation was
forced from his lips, by a vivid thought.
Catharine! he exclaimedshe lives! Yes, even as I knelt by the
oaken bench, she has stolen to my side, pressed her kiss upon my
forehead
,
and left this flower in my hand, as a token of her love. It is indeed
a beautiful symbol of a sister's love.
The thought filled him with a sudden joy, but the joy was linked with
an inexplicable horror.
Catharine is living, andmy fatheris he still living?
He felt the cold moisture upon his forehead at the thought.
For with that thought all his madness came back again. His dread of
the Sealed Chamber and its Revelation, his Remorse at the memory of that
fatal night.
But the level rays of the sun, shooting over the sod, reminded him once
more of his promise to Reginald.
He hurried onward, entering the hidden path, as he dashed aside a
beechen branch whose foliage swept his face. But no sooner had he
entered the path, than his steps were arrested by a sight which at once
enchained his eyes.
On the right of the path there was an open space, but a few yards square,
encircled by a rudely constructed fence. That open space was
surrounded
by the great trunks of chesnut, oak and poplar, but their branches,
parted above it, and suffered the sunlight to fall upon it, like a smile of
golden rays.
There was a gentle elevation of sod in the centre of the space, encircled
by the fence, surrounded by the great trees, and blessed by the golden rays.
A gentle elevationa mound of moss, whose dark green surface was only
varied by a solitary wild rose, whose leaves were touched with perfect
bloom. Beside the rose, was the broken stalk of another flower.
Paul glanced upon the broken stalk, and then upon the flower which he
held in his hand; an irresistible conviction rushed upon his soul.
It is the stalk of the lily which I hold in my grasp, he cried, and
I am looking upon the grave of Catharine!
Won by the strange beauty of the place, he leaned against a tree, and
gave his soul to the influence of the golden atmosphere which invested
that lonely grave.
It was a very pleasant spot for the sleep of the dead; there, in the
bosom of the wild forest, among the giant trees, with a little sunshine to
bless the place, and a solitary rose blooming over the grave.
Paul could not turn his eyes from that lonely mound, framed in a rude
fence, and with a single flower upon its green bosom.
There was no stone to mark the spot, no elaborate inscription, to tell
whose ashes slumbered there.
In truth, it seemed as if the dead were left alone to the eyes of the
Angelsperchancealone with the tenderness of God.
It was no human hand that placed this flower in mine! the thought
crossed the mind of PaulIt is a good omen, sent to me from the Other
World!
And he knelt there, and spoke the name of his Sister to the still air, and
in his dreamy way conversed with the dead.
As his clasped hands rested upon the rude fence, his yearning eyes
were fixed immovably upon the grave, and the sunlight touched his
forehead, his waving hair, as with a blessing, while his form was lost in
shadow.
O, beautiful, upon the cold bosom of a desolate world, blossoms that
holiest flower, living when all beside is dead, blooming on, when every hope
is cold and witheredthat flower which angels plant, and the smile of
God nourishes into lifea Sister's Love!
Paul could not restrain his tears. He suffered them to flow freely.
There was no one to witness them but Heaven,and perchance the Spirit
of his dead sister was hovering in that sunlight, near the solitary rose,
which trembled on the bosom of the grave!
And Paul forget every thingthe Past and the Future, his Remorse
and his Hopeas he gazed upon his sister's tomb. Forgot every thing,
and felt his soul filled with an unutterable yearning to sleep there, beside
her, and be at rest, with some sunshine and a stray wild flower over his
ashes.
At last, the Lily which he graspedthat flower which had been sent to
him by a supernatural handcalled him back to life.
It is a good Omen, he said, once moreIt tells me to bury the
Past, and look forward to the Future!
He arose, and in a moment had passed from the quiet grave into the
shadows. Yet ere he went, he lingered for a moment on the verge of
the glade, turning his eloquent eyes over his shoulder, as he exclaimed:
Catharine! Catharine! There may be women in the world, with
lovelier faces than thine, but nevernever lived a truer spirit; never was
the divine tenderness of a Sister's love embodied in a countenance more
angel-like than thine.
He turned away with a shudder. With the image of his sister, arose
another image of a far different nature. A woman's face, shaded by raven
hair, with the fire of a maddening passion shining in her large dark eyes!
It came with the memory of his sister's pale, golden hair and azure
eyes; it spoke to him of the last night when he trembled on the
threshold of the Sealed Chamber.
She also is with the dead, that strangely beautiful woman, who with
a look urged me on to Ruin. Soon I will stand upon the sod which
guards her ashes. And all her mad hopes, all those desires, for which
the universe itself seemed but a narrow shrine, are now hidden in a little
space of grassy earth. FatherSisterthe beautiful Tempterall dead!
I am indeed alone! The friendship of Reginald alone binds me to the
world. And that last tie I must sever, and say to all the common hopes
and ambitions of mankind, farewell. When I am indeed alone, I will be
prepared to enter upon my solemn Destiny.
Paul plunged deeper into the shadows of the forest.
The path which he followed, wound into the wildest recesses of the
Wissahikon. Now its traces were almost lost amid rude forms of rock,
which, scattered among the trees, seemed like the fragments of some hill
of granite, and again it skirted a rill whose waters were concealed by wild
grass, while the willows bending over it, shut out the light of the sun.
Emerging from the wood, he beheld an undulating field, stretching far
to the west, and clad in vivid green. It was a field of clover, ripe for the
scythe. Not far from the wood, a bold elevation was marked against the
western sky. Paul pursued his way through the clover, and in a few
moments stood upon a rock, which crowned this elevation.
Looking to the east and south, he beheld the forest extending in the
form of a crescent.
That crescent marked the course of the Wissahikon.
Beyond the tops of the trees which formed this crescent, he beheld a
broad green hill, on whose summit frowned a grove of pines. Amid their
deep shadows, he beheld the walls of a mansionit was the mansion of
Isaac Van Behme.
Paul trembled at the sight, and at once, the memory of the beautiful
woman bewildered his soul.
It looks sad and desolate! he said, gazing upon that distant grove
of pinesI soon will discover her grave among those shadows.
Turning his gaze farther to the west, he saw a white form, gleaming
dimly from a clump of magnificent trees, clad in the luxuriant foliage of
June.
The Blasted Pine!
And then, gazing over the clover field, he beheld, at its western
extremity
,
a farm-house embosomed among orchard trees.
Over its steep roof, the disc of the setting sun was only half-visible.
A cloudless sky, a field of clover, a farm-house embosomed among orchard
trees, and a forest extending in the form of a crescent,all illumined by
the sun, whose broad disc was half-concealed by the horizon.
This was the view which Paul beheld, as he stood on the rock, with
his soul still awed by the shadow and the silence of the forest, which he
had only a moment left.
It was a beautiful sightthe Ideal of rural beauty,ranged side by
side with the dark old forest, whose profound solitudes overwhelmed the
heart with thoughts of wild grandeur.
I have but to descend into the valley of the Wissahikon, cross the
stream by means of the rocks, and in a few moments I will stand at the
foot of the Blasted Pine. But I must hasten my steps, for the sun is
half-concealed
by the horizon.
Paul stood upon the rock, and surveyed the scenes of his life.
We have, indeed, wasted pages without a purpose, and expended words
in vain, if we have not succeeded in impressing the mind of the reader
with the peculiar strength and genius of an organization like that of Paul
Ardenheim. He was one of those natures which, indeed, do not often
appear in the lower worldnatures made up of Good and Evil in large
proportions, and swayed to either side by the hand of Fate, or perchance
the accident of the merest circumstance.
While engaged in the old records, which tell of his life, we have found
it difficult to avoid loving this strange man, and admiring his genius,
despite his wayward Destiny. Under other circumstances he might have
become a Poet, a General, or the Dictator of a Revolutionary age. As it
was, he only hovers over the page of history, a vague shadow, that may
appear an Apparition of Good, or the Ghost of Evil, according to the
vision of the spectator.
Had he been reared amid the scenes of every-day life, accustomed to
those vulgar realities which chafe enthusiasm into dull but practical
energy, he would doubtless have made his mark upon the age, a stern,
rugged, but powerful Man. Had he, from infancy, grown up amid scenes
of cold, unpoetical Wanthabituated to all that the direst extreme of
poverty can inflict upon the child of the poorwith here and there a ray
of education gleaming in upon the squalor and nakedness of his existence
he might, yes, he would have found a rugged joy in battling against his
fate, and in striking a way for his genius, even through the wilderness of
Hunger, Temptation and Wretchedness.
But his education was altogether different. He had been reared in the
profound solitudes of an almost untrodden forest. His mind had been
fashioned amid scenes of the wildest grandeur. The lessons of
fanaticism
,
mysticismor superstition,which he had received from his father,
seemed embodied again in the stillness of the awful forest, through whose
depths the stream of Wissahikon, like a spirit, sung its unceasing song
in the glory of sunrise, when the tops of the trees were touched with
gold, and the last star trembled ere it faded into airin the majesty of
sunset, when the green meadow and the dark woods lay side by side,
mellowed by the same rayin the profound shadow which came down
at night upon the scene, wrapping the stream and the leaf, the cavern and
the flower, in its bosom, as the pall shuts in the dead.
He had been reared aloneset apart from mankindand yet, every
moment of his life, in close and awful companionship with the Other
World.
It will be seen at a glance, that this kind of education rendered his
nature at once sensitive and fearless. He unitedsays the old MSS.
the tenderness of the woman, with the single-heartedness of the child, and
the iron strength of one of those Demi-Gods of ancient story. His mind
was susceptible of the most delicate shades of impression; the ten thousand
voices of external nature were intelligible to his dreaming soul; he found
connecting links between this world and the other, in the innumerable
forms of creation; as well in the humblest plant or flower, as in the lone
majesty of the silent stars.
It will also be remembered, that the supernatural part of this work, or
that which appears supernatural, and which in some cases we have
endeavored
to explain, does not, in the Original Records of Paul Ardenheim's
life, admit of doubt or speculation. The author of those Records believes
in all that partakes of the Supernatural. He sees nothing improbable in
a direct, continual and intelligible communication between this world and
the Spiritual World, between disembodied Spirits and actual men and
women.
He beholds in Paul Ardenheim, not so much a Man, born to eat, drink,
sleep, toil and die like the herd of mankind, as a Spirit from the Other
World, embodied in human form, and sent hither to work out a strangely
terrible Destiny.
Perchance(this is the language of the Ancient MSS.)the Spirit of
some great Man, who lived in far distant ages of the world, returned to
earth again in the body of Paul Ardenheim.
Even while we smile at what we esteem the Credulity of this Writer
of the Original Records, and treat all supernatural appearances, and the
long train of thoughts which they involve, as idle delusionsvainer,
indeed, than a Lawyer's honesty, or a Priest's sinceritywe must also
remember, the Punishment of Witchcraft forms a part of that which
Blackstone calls the perfection of human reason, the English Common
Law. That Lord Bacon believed in Witches, and in Wizard Craft;
that Sir Matthew Hale, arrayed in the pomp of his solemn office,
sentenced Witches to death. That New England was deluged with
blood in a war, waged by its Priests against Witches, Wizards, and Devils
embodied in human form. That Cotton Mather, the author of the
Magnolia
,a
Son of the School of Calvin, worthy of his Masterheld the
belief in Witches, Spirits, and Apparitions, much dearer than he held the
Love one another of the Divine Redeemer.
Indeed, it will be hard for us to find a man at all distinguished, who is
not controlled in his greatest actions, by some form of belief, which
teaches the direct communication between this world and the next.
Even Napoleon believed in his Destiny embodied in a Star.
Paul after a pause of dreamy thought, hurried through the clover field
toward the wood, whose shadows embosomed the Wissahikon.
AhI remember it well! he cried, as some memory crossed his
mindThat spring which, half-way down the hill, bubbles up from the
rocks at the foot of the chesnut tree. This path leads near it, and
without pausing for a moment, I may look upon it once again, and think
of other days.
He had reached the verge of the clover field. Springing over the
zigzag
fence, he hurried along the firm sod, and presently entered the shadow
of the woods again. The murmur of the Wissahikon was heard once
more, filling the air with a low-toned and indistinct melody.
The clump of chesnut trees is yonder. Already I behold the foliage,
varied with pale golden blossoms. Beside that spring, at the foot of the
chesnut trees, I spent many a happy hour in those days that can never
come back again. Oh, it seems to me as if the Soul drank peace, while
the lips are moistened by that clear, cold water, fresh and virgin from the
caverns of Old Earth!
Hurrying onward with renewed haste, Paul presently stood under the
branches of the chesnut trees. Four hardy trees they were, starting from
the sod together, their joined trunks looking like one great column, and
their foliage meeting overhead in one impenetrable canopy.
At the foot of these trees, from a hollow in the rock, bubbled forth a
limpid spring, with a wild flower or two bending over it, like maidens
surveying
their faces in a mirror. A level space of green sod spread for
some paces around the spring, encircled by the thickly grown shrubbery
as by a wall. It was all the same as in other daysthe rock in whose
hollow lay the clear water,the flowers aroundthe level space carpeted
with mossand the foliage which formed the walls and canopy of this
wild forest bower.
But Paul had no time to gaze upon the flowers, no time to drink from
the spring, for the sun was setting, and Reginald waiting for him beneath
the Blasted Pine.
With a glance, he turned away,
At last you have come! said a voice.
CHAPTER TWENTY-FIRST.
THE INDIAN SPRING OF WISSAHIKON.
Paul
started at the sound, and turned once more toward the spring.
I have waited for you. It is the appointed hour. Again he heard the
voice.
And the figure of a man advanced from the shadows of the forest bower.
Waited for me? echoed Paul, gazing upon the figure of the speaker
in undisguised wonder.
Beside the spring stood a man of slender frame, and pale features lighted
by large gray eyes. He was clad in brown velvet, with ruffles on his
breast and about his colorless hands, diamond buckles on his knees and
shoes. Paul looked at his pale face, and thought him sixty years of age;
but when he caught the clear light of his eyes,which now softened into
azure, and now deepened into dark grayhe could not imagine, for an
instant, that the unknown was more than forty years old. Around his
forehead floated waving locks of pale golden hair, which seemed golden
indeed, in the rays of the sun, but in the shadow, appeared touched with
the frosts of age.
The appearance of this man struck the mind of Paul, at once, with a
deep and peculiar interest. He was attired like a man of rank and
station
;
his form was slender, but unbent with years; there was a singular
sadness upon his features, a strange light in his eyes.
Where have I seen that face before? thought Paul.
Yes, you are the one
who was to come
, said that singularly mild
voice, which had arrested the steps of Paul. Attired in black, a dress
such as is worn by the students of Heidelberg, a cap with a waving plume.
Every thing is just as it was described to me. Not only the dress, but the
face. A face of bronze, lighted by eyes that are full of inspiration and
prophecy!
As he spoke, gazing into the face of Paul, he extended his hand. Paul
took that pale, thin hand, and, unable to speak or move, shuddered as though
he had encountered the hand of the dead.
Where have I seen that face? the question again crossed his mind
Was it among the solitudes of the Hartz mountains.No! no! But
I have seen it beforeI know not where!
You have waited for me? he said aloud, still pressing the stranger's
hand.
I have waited for you, calmly replied the unknown, smoothing his
waving hair aside from his forehead. `
At the Indian Spring of Wissahikon,
on the last day of the second week in June, at the hour of sunset,
you will behold the man who is destined to aid you in the Good Work
.'
These words were spoken to me in a distant land, far over the ocean, two
months ago. But I believedand am here.
It seemed to Paul that he could not have spoken, had the salvation of
his soul hung on a word.
I have seen that face before! again the thought flashed over his
bewildered soul.
`
He will be clad in black; he will wear the dress of a Heidelberg
student, and on his forehead a cap with a waving plume
.'
Paul dropped the hand of the unknown, and started back a single step.
These were the words which I heard two months ago, in a far distant
land; continued the unknown. Your dress was described to me, and
more than this, your face. `
A face of bronze, lighted by eyes that are full
of inspiration and prophecy
.'You are, in truth, the man whom I seek.
You are destined to aid me in the good work.
The good work! echoed Paul, in a whisper.
And he looked first upon the face of the unknown, then upon the spring,
the trees, the flowers, as if to assure himself that he was not bewildered
in a dream.
I have seen that face before, again the thought camebut it was
older when I saw it last. It was covered with wrinkles, the eyes were
dim, and the head bowed on the breast.
Ah, you doubt me, said the unknown, with a smile, which played
over his features, cold and impassible as moonlight over snowThen
listen to another proof. `
This man, whom you will meet by the Indian
Spring, has, like yourself, a great mission to fulfil
'
Paul interrupted him with an incoherent ejaculation.
`
But his great mission and your good work are one
.'
The spring, the trees and flowers, the pale face of the stranger, all
seemed whirling in mad confusion, before the eyes of Paul.
`
But in order to satisfy your mind, and know that he is indeed the
man whom you seek
,' those were a part of the words uttered to me, two
months ago`
you will address him in the language of the ancient seers,
You will ask him
'
He paused, and watched the changing face of Paul, which was pale and
red by turns, with a scrutinizing glance.
You will ask him, exclaimed Paul, unconsciously echoing the words.
`
You will ask him whether he looks forward with hope to the time
when the Lead shall become Gold, and the Sneer be changed into a
Smile
.'
Ahthou art of the Brotherhood! exclaimed Paul, his face flushing
with overwhelming joyThou art sent to me to reveal the deeper
mysteries of the good work
And he seized the small, bony hand of the unknown, and pressed it to
his heart.
Said I not so? You have a great missionI, a good work. But
your mission and my work are one. But why need we exchange signs
and watchwords with each other
Signs and watchwords! echoed Paul, his mind reverting to the
Brotherhood
of the Rosy Cross.
Are we not of one Brotherhood? Yea, in your eye I behold the
prophetic
fireyour hand is destined for the holy deed!
And then taking Paul by the hand, he led him to the spring, and said
Let us sit beside each other, and converse about the holy work.
The memory of Reginald, and the meeting by the blasted pine, had
passed from the mind of Paul. He was wrapt in the unknown. He
could have listened for ever to his low, musical voice, and gazed for ever
upon his pale face, which, in the passing ray, seemed touched with fire
from Heaven.
Who was it, he asked, as they sat down together on a rock near the
spring, that spoke to you, and bade you expect me at this hour?'
Who? echoed the unknown, his features suddenly clouded. Are you
of the Brotherhood, and yet ask
his
name? Who, he continued, in a tone
of singular emphasis, as he shaded his eyes with his handWho but the
mightiest of the fallen?
That pale face, with the light gleaming on the forehead, while the eyes
shone brightly beneath the thin hand, impressed Paul Ardenheim with
indefinable awe.
The mightiest of the fallen? he echoed.
Yea, the first of the Seven who watched around the Throne before
they fell, exclaimed the unknown, his voice sinking with every word
That Spirit, so powerful in his very desolation, so grand in his ruin, whom
men call by various names, AstarothLucifer
Satan
! whispered Paul, with a shudder, as he shrank from the touch
of the stranger.
As he spoke, the forest nook seemed to grow more breathlessly stilla
ray of sunshine lingered on the brow of the stranger.
And do you shudder at that name? Are you also bewildered by the
fears of beldame Superstition? Have you not yet beheld that awful
Being, clad in the majesty of a Mind, that feared not to battle with
Omnipotence
,
and did not despair when all but Eternity was lost to him? Not
the vulgar image conjured up by Priests and Fatalists, embodied in the form
of an ancient satyr, with obscene body and grotesque hoof and horns.
No! But the awful Spirit himself, standing, with his immortal face and
eloquent eyes, before the vision of all mortals, who would grasp his
immortality
even at the price of his despair.
The features of the unknown were violently agitated; his eyes,
changing
to deep gray, flashed like lighted coals.
AhI have seen that look before! half-muttered Paul, while the
blood congealed in his veins, as the vague memory rushed upon him.
Yeait was Satan, who, two months ago, in a foreign land, came to
me, as I stood at noon-day by the shore of a dreary lake. It was Satan
that bade me come to Wissahikon, and expect you beside this spring.
Nay, two years and more ago, on that well-remembered night
Paul echoed the words, he knew not why, and felt the moisture start
upon his forehead.
On that well-remembered night, he came to me as I stood amid the ruins
of a Thought, which had been struggling into birth for twenty-one years;
he came, I say, and bade me take a drop of blood from the heart of a
tempted but sinless maiden.
`Do this,' he said, `and you are immortal. The boon for which the
ancient sages sighed, the boon which the mass of mankind deem an idle
fancy, is in your grasp.' I obeyed. I sought the tempted but sinless
maiden, I placed her unconscious form before the altar, in which the liquid
of immortal life was struggling into maturity.
And you killed her? cried Paul. This tempted but sinless maiden?
Lured by the dream of immortal life on earth, you killed a defenceless
woman, killed in cold blood that which should have been sacred in the
eyes of a devil.
The features of the unknown became horribly distorted.
No! She disappeared, even from the light of the altar. I left that cell,
in which I had toiled for twenty-one years, for a moment only. When I
returned, she was gone. I searched each chamber of my mansionin
vain, in vain! And then, as if to crush my despair into a despair still deeper
and more terrible, I discovered that the last wreck of my wealth, the
fragment
of the millions which I had expended in this search, was gone. It
was but a thousand pieces of gold, and yet it was all
He paused an instant. Paul could not turn his eyes away from his face.
In a moment he seemed to grow older; his face became wrinkled, his eye
vacant and dim.
Ah! It was here, in the woods of Wissahikon, that I saw you, in
other days! he exclaimed.
But the unknown did not heed his words.
Imagine my despair, he said, in a whispering tone, which made the
blood run cold in the veins of Paul. My gold was gonegone the body
of that sinless maiden, whose heart contained the drop of blood, which
would have infused immortal life into my withered veins. Yet even in
this moment I heard a cry,I rushed from my cellI beheld the maiden
who, but a few moments before, lay a corpse beside my altar. She lived
there was bloom on her cheeklife in her young eyes
23
And thou didst murder
As I sprang forward to grasp her form, I heard his voice. That sad,
terrible tone, which speaks words of deathless knowledge
The voice of Satan? cried Paul.
The voice of Satan. He bade me leave the maiden. `
Hasten to your
cell. Ere an hour is passed, thy desires will be gratified
.' I obeyed. I
waitedwaited, sinking my nails into my flesh, with the mad infatuation
which possessed me in that weary hour. At last it was over. The door
of my cell openedI uttered a cry of disappointment, as I beheld in the
doorway the form of a poor Idiot, whom I sheltered in my house, in pity
for his weakness and deformity
An ejaculation burst from the lips of Paul.
The Idiot approached. `Master,' he saidnot in these words, it may
be, but this was their meaning`A dark man bade me kill the girl. It is
done, and here is what thou dost desire.' He placed in my hands a phial;
it was filled with a red liquid
The blood of the murdered girl exclaimed Paul.
One drop, one only, I mingled with the liquid which was concealed
within the altar of my thought. The work was done. The Water of
Life was mine. Ere the day had broken upon that terrible night, I drank
I become young again. Yes, I, the withered old man, with the weight
of years upon my brow, I felt my blood bound with new life. The
wrinkles vanished from my brow, the film of age from my eyes
And the murdered maiden whispered Paul, as the last rays of
sunlight
shot through the gloom of the place.
The deformed Idiot buried her. I knew not, cared not where. What
was the sacrifice of one poor life to the accomplishment of my thought?
And his thin lips curved with scorn, while a satanic rapture shone from
his eyes.
To say that Paul Ardenheim listened to the Revelation of this unknown
man with horror, with an awe too deep for words, would but imperfectly
convey the truth. He was without the power of motion; the eyes of the
stranger enchained him with an indescribable fascination. And the ray
of sunshine, stealing into the gloom of the nook, the profound solitude,
undisturbed
by a sound, only served to deepen this fascination.
A deformed Idiot! murmured Paul, as that confused memory began
to struggle into shape.
The secret of immortal life was mine, and with it the power of
boundless
gold! Doth it not turn thy heart, young man? Thine eye shines
with the Prophecy of a great deed, thou art formed to conquer all
difficulties
.
With thee, in truth, `
Will the Lead become Gold, and the Sneer be
changed into a Smile
.' But what are all thy conquests, when death may
claim thee any moment, even in the glow of thy best hopes? What are
all thy plans, when the greatest of them all is sure to terminate the same
as the wish of the humblest bornat the grave?
Paul was silent; a multitude of thoughts oppressed his soul, as the words
of the stranger penetrated his ears.
Would immortal life aid thy plans? I know not what they are, care
not how sublime the mission which you cherish,it may mount to
Heaven
,
but it is certain to be buried in your grave. Speak! have you ever
thoughtnot dreamed,but thought in plain, palpable, every-day
meditation
,
of living for ever, even on this earth?
We may live upon the tongues of millions, when our bones are dust
cried Paul.
A soundemptier than air! What is the fame of Homer? Ha! ha!
There are learned men who can prove to you that Homer never lived
Or, even the English poet, Shakspeare. The millions praise him, but
what care they for his actual life? Little thought have they of his
hours of hunger, suffering, and despair; now writhing under the rich
man's contempt, now crouching at the door of that Lord, eager to gain a
crust, in exchange for his immortal thoughts. But could Shakspeare
live for ever on this earth, walking on through all ages, freed from the curse
of death, growing mightier in intellect with every year, and asserting his
own grandeur in the face of all timewhat say you to this, my friend?
One living Shakspeare were worth all the dead bones of Stratford or
Avon, multiplied by millions.
There is a destiny before me, cried Paul, which death itself cannot
wither or destroy. It is my fate, not to mingle with the mass of mankind,
and share in their feverish strife, but to guard the Deliverer of this land,
to defend him while he does right, to sacrifice him the moment he betrays
his trust.
Does your mission, then, assume that form? exclaimed the unknown,
while a smile stole over his features, and he looked young againYou look
for a Deliverer of this land, a benefactor of the human race. Is it so?
You will defend him while he does right, and sacrifice him when he
betrays
his trust. It is well. But suppose the hand of Death cuts you off
ere your work is half-done!
Death, exclaimed Paul, with the prophecy of a great destiny lighting
up his eyes, Death cannot strike me, until my mission is fulfilled.
Let us imagine that your work is done. You behold the Deliverer
standing among the monuments of a liberated Nation. He has proved
faithful to his trust. Your work, I say, is done. You die. After your
bones are dust, this Deliverer becomes a tyrant, this land his property,
the people his slaves. How then, my young friend? Where is the end
of all your great thoughts?
But God is above all, whispered Paul, as a shade of profound
melancholy
came over his face.
The shadows grew darker. The last ray of sunlight was gone
Through the vague gloom, the cold water in the rock glowed with a
faint ray. It was the image of a star, which shone from the blue heaven,
through an interval of the leaves.
Paul, with his face buried in his hands, was absorbed in thought.
But instead of Death, let us picture life, he heard the whispering
voice of the unknown through the gloom. Let us admit that the New
World is destined to become the theatre of great deeds, the land of
demigods
,
the domain of regenerated millions. I will even confess that such
thoughts have visited my dreams! Wellyou, the guardian of the
Deliverer
,
do not die; your work does not end with a brief score of years.
You live; you become the Guardian, not of one man, but of a People;
your life keeps pace with their glory, and your deathless arm turns aside
the evils which menace their freedom.
Five hundred years from this hour, you may stand upon this spot,
and behold, not a wild desert of crag and forest, but a great temple, reared
without the aid of one enslaved arm, but reared by freemen, and dedicated
to the Brotherhood of Man!
That word struck a hidden chord in the heart of Paul.
You are, then, he said, gazing upon that face, which was rendered
more impressive by the twilight gloom, a Brother of the Rosy Cross?
A Brother of the Rosy Cross? echoed the unknown.
Yesa Brother of that vast Brotherhood, whose history, stretches
back into the daybreak of the world, and whose girdle of union encircles
the globe.
Still the unknown murmured, with a vacant accent.
The Rosy Cross?
Did you not speak of the blessed day when the Lead should become
Gold, and the Sneer be changed into a Smile?
It was the language of the Ancient Seers, who, like me, pursued the
great secret of eternal youth, said the unknown, and then added in a
whisperThe Rosy Cross! Do you speak of that order so often spoken
of in history, but never describedthe Rosicrucians?
Even so, whispered Paul.
Know then that the Founder of the Order, Rosencrux himself, who
gave it name, was a Seeker after the Great Secret. Nay'tis said that
he died in possession of the secret, and embodied it in a book, known in
olden tradition as the Book of the Rosy Cross.
Paul felt his heart swell, while his blood leaped in his veins. Still
disguising
his joy, he glanced around the covertlooked into the face of
the unknownand said calmly:
You are mistaken, my friend. Rosencrux was born some three
thousand
years after the foundation of the Order. Therefore it could not
have taken its name from him; as well might we suppose St. Peter to have
taken his name from the great Church erected to his memory, at Rome.
He paused: the unknown did not reply.
Ah, whispered Paul, The Book of the Rosy Cross! Could I but
obtain itthe Manuscript of Brother Anselm spoke of a day when
man might become immortal!
And, like a new world, unclosing its shores and meadows, its woods and
mountains to the eyes of a Discoverer, widening every moment, and
revealing new beauties as it expanded on the view, that Thought dilated
before the Soul of Paul Ardenheim.
Immortal life on earth! Youth that cannot witherHope that cannot
die!
He rose and paced the sod, while the unknown rested his cheeks
between
his hands, and gazed upon the bronzed face, which every moment
revealed new emotions.
You drank the draught of eternal youth said Paul, his mind still
dwelling upon the Prophecy embraced in the Manuscript of Anselm.
I drank, and on the instant twenty years were lifted from my frame.
For you will remember that in my search after the great secret, I had
grown prematurely old. Though but sixty years of age, I looked and felt
at least seventyhad, in thought and care, lived an hundred. No sooner
had the liquid passed my lips than I felt like a man of forty-eight years;
in the very prime of mature manhood.
And now said Paul, still pacing to and fro.
I went abroad. With renewed youth, came the secret of boundless
gold. I arranged magnificent plans for my new Destinyandtwo
months ago, HE appeared to me again. `The liquid which thou didst
drink was mingled, in some degree, with immortal essence, but not
altogether
impregnated with its spirit. The drop from the maiden's heart
had lost a portion of its power, ere it came into thy possession. Wouldst
thou live an hundred years, before another trial of thine energy is
demanded
?
Then rebuild once more thy furnace, and mingle with the
liquid, not one drop merely, but three drops, each taken from the heart
of a human being, who is beloved to idolatry by a Child, a Father, a Lover
or a Woman!'
I heard and shuddered before the Awful Spirit, who appeared to me at
noonday by the bank of a dreary lake.
`And if I do not obey?' I faltered.
`Then,' said the Chief of the Seven, `thy life is near its close. Thou
didst number sixty years when the liquid became thine. Sixty-two years
was the term of thy natural life. The draught, imperfect as it was, lifted
the burden of many years from thy soul, clad thee with new manhood,
yet it could not increase the number of thy years
.. Thou art still subject
to death at any moment,
after the two years
(counting from the time when
the draught was thine)
have expired
.'
The voice of the speaker faltered, and died away at last in a husky
murmur.
Startled by the sudden pause, Paul turned abruptly, and even through
the shadow, saw the face of the unknown, frightfully agitated and bathed
in tears.
He drew nearer, examining the distorted countenance with an earnest
gaze.
And then he exclaimed, bending down, as if to hear the answer,
but in reality, to gaze more closely into the face of the unknown.
There was no answer.
Paul started back with a shudder.
He has grown twenty years older in a moment, the thought forced
itself upon his mind.
And, then we conversed together, concerning the great secret, the
ways of life and death, until the shadows of night came darkly over that
lake, which was gloomy at noonday.
Thou didst converse with the Fiend? cried Paul, starting back as
he felt his blood chill.
The Fiend! You still nourish these idle superstitions! Fiend!
Does not the Religion of the Church make of him, a God; second only
to the Divine Source of Life himself? Not with the Fiend, young sir, but
with the Friend. Oh, had you but seen the dread mystery of his face, or
heard the bewildering music of his voice, as he spoke of past ages,
ranging all centuries and races before my face! At last he bade me
return
Return? said Paul, as the changed face of the unknown brought
back, in more distinct shape, the memory of other days.
Bade me return, and meet you here, continued the unknown in a
faltering voice. `
At the Indian Spring of Wissahikon, on the last day of
the second week in June, you will behold the man who is destined to aid
you in the Good Work. He will be clad in black; he will wear the dress
of a Heidelberg student, and on his forehead a cap with a waving plume.
A face of words, and an eye full of inspiration and prophecy
.' These
were the words, and thou canst aid me
The unknown rose, and confronted Paul in his hurried walk to and fro.
Thou, he continued, fixing his eyes upon the face of the Dreamer
Thou, and thou only. Refuseand I am lost. In a few days I will be
dead. My secret dies with me. That secret can aid thy plans,can
change the mortal into the deathless, and give into thy hands the destiny
of ages
How shall I aid thee? cried PaulI am young. Have but one
friend in the world. I am poorI cannot call one piece of gold my
own
With thy brain, said the unknown; with thy arm!
His tone was strangely elevated. He laid his hand upon the arm of
Paul, who shrunk unconsciously from the contact.
My arm? My brain?
The fire is lighted in my altar. The liquid which is to impart
deathless
youth, already hovers above the flame. To mature that liquid into
the immortal essence, I demand his voice fell, and the hand which
touched the arm of Paul, trembled violentlythree drops of blood, each
taken from the heart of a human being, beloved to idolatry by a Child, a
Father, a Lover, or a Woman
You demand of me three human lives! cried Paul, falling back,
cold and horror-stricken.
There was a pause.
The star sparkled in the spring, and through the stillness the
Wissahikon's
murmur came gently up the hill.
And in exchange for three lives, I will give you the power to confer
happiness on the whole human family.
The voice of the unknown scarcely rose above a whisper.
Three murders! Paul spoke with an accent of unfeigned horror.
Three Sacrifices offered at the altar of Destiny, in exchange for the
freedom of America,the Brotherhood of universal man!
Three blows with the knife or sword upon the images of God,
enshrining immortal souls! continued Paul, as he retreated a single step
from the unknown.
Does not your religion teach that `
without the shedding of blood there
is no remission of sins?
' Does not all history confirm the sentiment,
and build it up into a Fact, immovable as the Universe itself? For these
three livessay that they shall be the lives of the three best and purest
beings on the face of earthyou will receive the Power to sweep war,
pestilence, the inequalities of condition, the imperfections of physical
organization, and all attendant evils from the world, and thus bring on the
day of Human Brotherhood. You will acquire deathless vigor; and, with
your brain, to live, is to sway mankind, as with the voice of a God
Paul made no reply.
This Deliverer whom you expect, may join hands with Washington,
the Rebel Leader, and thus continue for many years the war with the
British King.
Still Paul did not answer.
Let me make a rude arithmetical calculation for you. War in every
age is the same. Count up the victims slain in all the wars, recorded by
history, from the days of the Patriarchs down to the present hour. Did
you ever make a computation like this? Let every man who has been
slain in battle be symbolized, not in a rock, nor in a leaf, nor even in a
grain of sand, but in an atom of dust. Well
count up the living souls,
who have been butchered in battle, and you will discover that the surface
of the globe, to the depth of ten feet, might be covered with their dust,
every atom of dust standing in place of a Man
.
Paul retreated another stepthe words of the unknown wrung a groan
from his very heart.
Take it to your heart, my friend. The surface of the world, the
crust of the globe, for the depth of ten feet, is made up of human souls
butchered in battle, and symbolized in atoms of dust.
The unknown paused.
This has been War. This will be War to the end of time.
You reason terribly, groaned Paul,And in exchange for three
murders
Do not use the word. Does the man who shoots a friend in a duel,
depriving a wife of her husband, and children of their father, call it a
murder? Does the peasant of one nation, who mounts a rampart, and
stabs the peasant of another nation, with whom he has had no quarrel, say
a word about Murder? Does the grave Judge, who to-day hangs a man
in cold blood for doing that which was a virtue yesterday, breathe a
whisper of Murder?
And where, whispered Paul, his pale face agitated by a frightful
smile,and where shall I find the three victims?
The unknown hesitated a moment ere he replied.
The first may be found in the person of a Man, who is deeply beloved
by a Friend
Paul trembled in every limb.
The second he gasped.
The second? Imagine a woman,a beautiful woman, for example,
who is idolized by a Lover, or Husband
Paul sank down, on one knee, near the brink of the spring, clasping his
hands in the very intensity of agony.
And the third he asked, in a hollow voice.
Take the most beloved object that the world ever saw, cried the
unknown, as he drew near, and his face was faintly illumined by a star
Take the Father,
Hold! shrieked Paul, starting to his feet, his hands clenched, his
bosom swelling with the throbs of his heart.
The Father, said the unknown, in the same impassible tone, as Paul
trembled before him, The Father whose existence is blessed by the love
of a Child
No more and Paul, with flashing eyes, and set teeth, confronted
the unknownOn peril of your life, no more
Without seeming to notice his sudden agitation, or the deadly light
which inflamed his eyes, the unknown went on, in his calm, measured
tone:
In a cause like this, I would regard as nothing, the life, of the Man
who is beloved by a true friendor of the Woman who is idolized by the
Husband or Loveror of the Father whose only joy is in the love of his
Child
Paul bent forward, and as his hot breath swept the cheek of the
unknown, he saw his face, and the vague memory of the Past was vague
no longer.
It is Isaac Van Behme, he criedHer Fatherhers! Who has
made a compact with the Fiend, and who talks of murdering the Father,
beloved by an only child!
And with that word he turned and fled.
Down the winding path, deep into the thickets, over the rocks where
there was most darkness, and the twilight flung its profoundest shadow,
he fled.
He did not pause as the frenzied cry of the old man came shricking
through the stillness of the wood.
He heard that cry, but the words which accompanied it, fell dull and
cold upon his ear.
He only wished to fly to hide himself from the sight of the Tempter's
face, to hide himself from the fever of his own soul; for the words of Isaac
Van Behme had summoned up again the Spectre of the Sealed Chamber,
and wrapt him once more in the flames of an unrelenting Remorse.
He fled.
And that cry came through the stillness, a cry deepened and prolonged
as by the agony of a broken heart.
No! No! She is dead, exclaimed Paul, as he plunged through the
thickly grown bushes. A man who has stricken from his heart all human
ties, cannot own a Daughter's love. She sleeps in the grave.
He sprang down the steep side of a dangerous rock. A single
misplaced
step, and his limbs would have been crushed, his brains scattered
against the rocks below.
But, unconscious of any danger, save that which encircled him, as with
a girdle of flamesthe Memory of the Sealed Chamberhe dashed madly
on his way.
Had a host of armed men confronted him with levelled rifles, and
warned him back, on peril of a bullet from every muzzle, he still would
have pursued his way, and rushed upon the certain death.
For he was, as we have said, unconscious of every thing in the world,
save the Remorse of his own soul.
The Remorse which had been evoked from its grave, by the words of
Isaac Van Behme, the father of the beautiful woman, who had tempted
him to cross the threshold of the Sealed Chamber.
Plunging through the thickets, dashing from rock to rock, now sinking
ankle deep in the marshy bed of some runlet, now thrusting, with a
frenzied
arm, the bending limbs aside, he soon reached the shore of the stream.
It lay there, in the bosom of the mysterious shadow, beautiful as a Bride,
within the curtains of her marriage bed.
And this marriage couch was illumined only by a solitary lightthe
first star that came smiling out upon the tremulous canopy of the heavens,
whose deep blue was softened into pale gold.
He did not heed the beautiful Wissahikon, trembling so softly there, at
the welcome of the first star, but, leaping from rock to rock, he gained the
opposite shore, and, turning his face to the west, hurried along a winding
path, which now led far up into the dark woods, and suddenly came down
again in sight of the wave and the solitary star.
Nor did he heed the thousand voices of the June twilight, which,
perchance
harsh and incongruous in themselves, came softened by distance,
melting like heaven's own music on the ear.
The rude hymn of the laborer, gushing from the unclosed window of
a hut, fixed upon the hill-side,the lowing of cattle, grouped by the
stream, where the willows bend their mournful headsthe voice of little
children, now bursting in laughter, now sinking in murmursthe lullaby
of the mother, bending over the couch of her first-born,the chirp of a
solitary bird, swinging so lonely on the topmast branch of a tall forest
tree, with nothing between its melody and heaven, but the light of the
solitary starthese sounds, mingled and mellowed into one, made the
music of the June twilight on the Wissahikon.
Believe me, it was a music that might have pleased your ear full as
well as the trumpet note of battle, whose pauses are filled by
death-groans
.
For that music said, as plainly as music ever could say, that the earth
was thankful to God for the glad June day, and the Wissahikon full of
peace, when she saw her own star shining into her soul again.
Paul did not hear this music of the June twilight; the words of the old
man were ringing in his ears. He did not see the Wissahikon, smiling
beneath the ray of the first star. The Indian Spring of Wissahikon,
sparkling
so tranquilly in its bowl of rock, as it mirrored the face of the old
man, whose pale brow shone in a solitary raythis was the only sight
which he saw, as he plunged blindly onward, now in the darkness, amid
the thickly-grown brushwood, now by the water-side, beneath the ray of
the evening star.
There came a dense thicket, without one gleam to light up, even for an
instant, its impenetrable shadow. Through its darkness, a sluggish rill,
which spread among tufts of marshy grass, and made the earth slippery
and difficult to tread, sighed slowly onward, with a low, mournful
murmur.
Paul entered this thicket, and fell on one knee; but, starting up
again,
crossed the stream, and ascended a steep hill, overgrown with stunted
pines. As if guided by instinct, he never for a moment deviated from his
course. The hill ascended, there came a level space, overspread with lofty
trees, whose massy trunks were free from brushwood or foliage.
A white object glared between the intervals of these aged trees, with
the light of the evening star playing upon its ghostly outlines.
Paul beheld it, and murmured the name of Reginald, his Friendhis
Brother. Then hurrying through the trees, he beheld the white object
more distinctly; it resolved itself into distinct shape, even as it stood alone
amid the foliage and the twilight.
It was the Blasted Pine.
The bark had long ago been peeled from its huge trunk. Its rugged
limbs, stripped of every thing like life or verdure, stretched themselves
abruptly into the blue sky, above the tops of the living trees. Around its
trunk the grass was witheredit stood in a circle of dead leaves, whose
decay was contrasted with the moss and flowers beyond.
And at its foot, a bleak rock, stamped with the impress of a human foot
beside a cloven hoof, was dimly revealed in the ray of the first star.
It need not be written, that this desolate tree, standing so lonely amid
the verdure of June, was connected with many a dark tradition. The folk
of Wissahikon regarded it with superstitious awe. Brave indeed was the
man, who would dare to linger near its trunk after night-fall. A father
had been slain by his child at its foot, in the early days of the Colonya
Pirate had been murdered there by his comrades, and his corse buried
beneath the leaves, with a portion of their ill-gotten goldan Indian
maiden had been murdered by the hand of her white loverthese, and
other legends of similar character, gave a peculiar horror to the Blasted
Pine.
But these traditions of crime, which invested the tree with gloomy
interest, were nothing in comparison with the atmosphere of terror
which hovered over the bleak rock at its foot. The human foot and the
cloven hoof, stamped together on its surface, were the traces left by the
Enemy of Mankind, in ages long ago, when the rock itself was but a mass
of clay. Even now he was wont to haunt the spot, in bodily shape, with
the fire of eternal judgment lighting up his eyes, and the mark of
unrelenting
vengeance stamped upon his blasted forehead.
Sometimes he came in the form of a beautiful woman, who, with
brilliant
eyes and flowing hair, tempted the belated wanderer to barter his
immortal soul for wealth and worldly power.
These legends, various and incongruous, originated, without a doubt, in
some terrible tragedy of every-day life, which occurred near the tree, in
long distant years.
It was at the foot of this desolate tree, upon the rock stamped with the
footprint of the Fallen Angel, that Paul Ardenheim stood, and saw the
Wissahikon gleaming from afar.
It glimmered through an opening of the forest, and over its depths, a
space of blue sky was seen, blushing with soft radiance, as the twilight
deepened into night.
Reginald! exclaimed Paul, as he stood with folded arms, and head
drooped on his breastWhere art thou?Ah, he has been here, he has
waited for me, but I have not kept my word.
He was silent, for the memory of Reginald's friendship came to him,
in that hour of chaotic thought, beautiful as a solitary ray, shining through
the rift of a midnight cloud.
And then the silence of the spot, unbroken by the rustling of a leaf,
the gloom, deepened by the contrast of the distant stream and the dark blue
skyharmonized with his thoughts, and brought home to him the strange
legends of the Blasted Pine
A vague feelingit was awe without terrorcrept over him, as he
saw the human foot and the cloven hoof, impressed upon the rock on
which he stood.
Here, a father fell by the hand of his son
These words, spoken in a low voice, were accompanied by a shudder.
A father by the hand of his son he repeated, lingering on every
word, while his eye gleamed with a sombre fire.
Here, the gold of the Pirate, every coin purpled with the blood of
women and children, was buried. And the miserable wretch who dug the
cavity for this gold, was murdered by his Chief, even as he stood before
this rock, with the spade in his hand. The cavity for the gold became the
grave of the still quivering corse. `
Thy Ghost shall haunt the place, I
trow, and guard my earnings, until I return
,' said the Pirate, as he
smoothed the earth and leaves over the warm corse and the chest of gold.
And here, an Indian maiden, who clung to her white lover's neck, and, as
she spoke of her unborn child, besought him to take her with him to his
English home, and let her dwell with him for ever,here, the dark-haired
Indian girl was butchered by that lover's hand. It was before the days
of William Penn, when the land, now swarming with the white race, was
only trodden by a few hardy Colonists, when Philadelphia was a forest,
and the huts of Germantown first began to smile in the wilderness. And
the name of the Indian maid, who fell at the foot of this tree, with her
unborn babe throbbing in her mangled form, became the name of the
wood-hidden streamWissa-Hikone,`The Lone Flower of the
Spirit-Land
.'
And here, the Fallen Angel, when this rock was clay, and these hills
were peopled by the beings of the antediluvian world, stamped the impress
of his burning feet, as he was whirled onward by the impulse of an
unrelenting
vengeance.
'Tis said that he comes here now, at dead of night, filling the solitude
with the accents of his despair, and disclosing to the star-beam that livid
forehead, scarred by the thunderbolt. He comes, to tempt poor humanity
to its ruinso the traditions of the rude peasants tell. As if the
desolation
of his own awful soul could be cheered by the perdition of souls,
inferior
to him in power and despair.
And then he often comes in a beautiful form, armed with the glance
that maddens, and the tone that bewitchesencircled by all the
fascinations
which invest a lovely woman.
Ahthere is in truth a terrible fact embodied in this wild tradition.
Satan, clad in the gloom of his eternal anguish, can only strike terror into
the gazer's heart. But Satan, incarnate in the form of a lovely woman,
whose glance can plunge you into crime, whose low-whispering voice can
make your heart forget its God, and your hand commit the Unpardonable
Sin
He covered his face, for the memory of the beautiful woman, who had
tempted him to cross the threshold of the Sealed Chamber, flashed
suddenly
upon his soul.
I hear her voice again. Her dark hair, tossed by the winter breeze,
sweeps over my forehead. Her touch fills my veins with frenzy. Through
the gloom of that corridor I see her face, flushed with passionher eyes,
radiant with the daring of a soul that believes not in God or in the
Hereafter
,
but in its own boundless Pride, dart their light into my soul.
She is before me again, he cried, raising his agitated face, and
spreading
forth his arms. Before me nowbetween my sight and the blue sky
beautiful as she was on the
last night
when she tempted me to despair.
At this moment, his convulsed features were illumined by a faint and
lurid ray. Above the dark mass of the western woods, appeared a
crescent
of pale gold, distinctly defined against the deep blue sky.
It was the new moon, trembling over the woods of Wissahikon, like a
coronet of light, shining above the dark hair of a beautiful woman.
Her beams invested the face of nature with a sad and sepulchral ray.
The countenance of Paul Ardenheim looked wan and ghostlike in that pale
azure radiance.
But she is dead, he falteredHer ashes rest beneath the sod
there are wild flowers above her grave.
Was it the rustling of a leaf that trembled gently on his ear?
That faint sound, heard for an instant and then dying without an echo,
riveted the attention of Paul Ardenheim, he knew not why.
He listened with fixed intensity, but the forest was still as a tomb.
And then once more there came a sound. It seemed like a distant voice
repeating his name. Paul! he heardor imagined he heardthat
unknown voice speaking his name, in a low accent, vague and tremulous
as the murmur of a rill.
Have you ever started from a half-waking slumber, at the sound of your
name, pronounced by a voice at once hollow and melodious?
Have you felt your flesh creep, and your heart grow cold, as you
discovered
that the word was not spoken by human lips, but either by some
fancy of your half-waking meditation,not dreamor by an actual spirit
from the other world?
Thus it was with Paul Ardenheim, as he heardor fancied he heard
a voice, at once hollow and melodious, repeating his name.
Paul!
This time Paul heard it distinctly, although the sound was low, and
faint, and far away.
Again that rustling sound, like the noise produced by a serpent trailing
over withered leaves.
Then occurred an incident which realized the supernatural legends of
the place.
Upon the rock stood or rather trembled Paul, resting one hand for
support
upon the trunk of the Blasted Pine, for he was faint and scarcely able
to stand, and the cold moisture started from his forehead.
The rustling sound grew louder; again the voice pronounced his name
deeper in emphasis, more musical in cadenceand a white object, like
a mist hovering over a stream, began to glimmer through the trees.
It is Satan! The thought crossed the mind of Paul, but he could not
speak. His eyesight grew dim; that white mist was whirling before his
eyes; it seemed to wrap him in its folds.
He grew cold, he trembled, he fell on one knee, and in the act of falling
raised one hand toward heaven.
A hand glided from behind the withered trunk, and then an arm, fair
and beautiful; the hand pressed the hand of Paul, and the blood bounded
in his veins.
No more damps upon the brow, no more ice in the veins, no more chill
and shuddering awe.
For a beautiful face was gazing upon him; a moist hand was pressing
his own; waves of flowing hair swept over his forehead, and the voice,
very near, this time, and melodious as a sound from Eden, spoke his name,
and the breath which framed the word, fanned his cheek.
That which he had imagined a mist, was the white robe of a beautiful
form. The sound like the noise produced by a snake trailing over
withered
leaves, was the gentle tread of a small foot, that beat the earth with an
impetuous motion.
Through the intervals of long flowing hair, which, in the gloom, and by
the sepulchral light of the moon, seemed of more than midnight blackness,
through the locks of that streaming hair, he saw the voluptuous swell
of a white bosom, rising in quick pulsations over a loosened robe, and felt
the light of eyes supernaturally radiant, flashing, burning into his soul.
Was it a Visionwas it Reality? He knew not, he cared not, but the
vision of the white bosom, the pressure of the moist hand, the dazzling
eyesthe atmosphere of loveliness which invested the form, and
intoxicated
his senses, as with a mingling of delicate perfumesforced his blood
in impetuous currents, from his heart to his face, and fired his eyes with
more than mortal light.
It is Satan! he gasped, and pressed the hand to his heart, and sunk
against the pine, bewildered by a vague and inexplicable languorSatan,
the beautiful!
His voice failed him: gathering the hand to his breast, he looked upward
in silent rapture.
Paul! the voice once more spoke his name, and pressed that name
upon his mouth, with the kiss of warm lips that burned his blood.
Before we gaze upon the sequel of this interview bewteen Paul
Ardenheim
and the Principle of Evil, embodied in the form of a beautiful woman,
we must retrace our steps, and return to the other characters in our history.
And first, Jacopo.
CHAPTER TWENTY-THIRD.
PHILOSOPHY!
Jacopo
was a Philosopher.
In recording this important fact, we mean to do especial reverence to the
large class of which he was an eminent member
To be a Philosopher, it is necessary to look upon Good and Evil as
highly amusing names for different forms of the same thing. When you
behold the world deformed by Evil, crimsoned with war, polluted with
the deeds of a horde of tyrants, under various names, you must not
complain
of the Evil, nor speak harshly of the war, nor breathe a whisper
against the tyrants.
You must merely say
Such things always have been, and such things
always will be
.
This is Philosophy.
When you see an innocent girl, hallowed by the ray of virginity,
struggling
for bread, and earning, by her sixteen hours of daily toil, a pittance
that would not keep a rich lady in rouge for an hour, you must not speak
of a better day for the Poor Girl, nor prophesy the coming of a time, when
honest maidenhood will be no longer poorno longer subject to the cold
scorn of the richthe vulgar avarice of the task-masterthe lascivious
attempts of the wealthy profligate
No, sir. Gazing on the wan cheek of the Poor Girl, who works `the
nails from her finger's ends' for just enough `to keep body and soul
together
,'
you must gravely exclaim
Such things always have been, and such things always will be
.
For this is Philosophy.
Or in case the Poor Girl, tired of struggling for the bitter crust, and
sleeping in the damp, cold home, while the ten thousands of the rich have
their banquets, their operas, their dresses of velvet and satin, their diamonds
and goldtired, I say of this hard, drear life, should listen to the offers of
the Rich Libertine, and sacrifice her priceless virtue for bread, clothing,
and something like a home, or perchance for the mere proposal of
marriage
,
which is never intended to be fulfilledyou must not in this case call
the Wealthy Profligate a scoundrel, worthier of the gallows than ever a
Pirate that trod a bloody deck, nor should you drop one tear for Poor
Virginity
,
suddenly wrecked into hopeless prostitution.
No, sir.
While the Rich Libertine goes to his gambling hell, and quenches the
fever of his idleness in dice or cards, or, maybefor such things are done
hurries to his Fashionable Church, and sits in his pew, with his name on
the door, in silver, and subscribes large sums to Missionary efforts, for
the benighted Pagans, while the Dishonored Girl, shut out from all pure,
all respectable society, because the Rich Libertine bought her virtue for a
Promise, has no resort but the house of infamyyou will compose
yourself
into a sober attitude, and with unctuous utterance exclaim
Such things always have been, and such things always will be
.
This, as I said before, is Philosophy.
Maybe you live in a Free Land, which was colonized, some hundreds
of years ago, by a band of wandering exiles, who followed the hand of
God, and came out from the Old World, into the virgin wilderness, and
said, Here we build an altar, sacred to the freedom of all races of men.
A Free Land, which was admitted in the family of Nations, after a long
and bloody Revolution, after many and fearful battles, after a Declaration
which proclaimed to all the world, in the name of Almighty God, `
That
all men are created free and equal!
'
May be, this Free Land, only Seventy-one years after the Declaration,
is cursed by White Slavery, that hurls men and women and children in
the hot air of the factory, or coffins them in the foul courts of a Large
City, dooming them to coin their lives into a little bread, while the Rich
Man gets all the richer for their groans and tears. Or, maybe it is deformed,
this Free Land, sanctified and set apart by God for the good of universal
manby a Black Slavery, that sells the unborn fruit of the mother's
womb, and pays a bounty for the violation of every instinct planted by
the Almighty in the heart of Father, Child, Brother and Sister. A Black
Slavery, that pays the expenses of chivalrous luxury, by selling wives
from their husbands, fathers from their children, the baby from its
mother's bosom; by trading in human flesh, as though it were meat for
the shambles; bybut there are facts so beautiful in this Black
Slavery, that the Devil himself would be ashamed to write them down,
upon the darkest page of Eternal Torment; truths so lovely, that the
Devil himself would blush to tell them to a group of listening friends.
Well; your Free Land is cursed by the White and the Black Slavery,
but you must not speak reproachfully of either. You must not say that
the White Slave, and the Black Slave, were made by the same God, and
redeemed by the same Christ, as the Rich Man and Slaveholder.
No, sir.
While the White Slave swelters in the factory, giving life and lungs,
breath and heart, to the rich man's coffers,while the Black Slave (in
many cases whiter than his Master) is sold in sight of your Capitol, and
manacled and lashed, beneath the same Flag which floated over
Washington
at Yorktown, you must compose yourself, and utter the calm
remark
Such things always have been, and such things always will be
.
Again; this is Philosophy.
As we gain some knowledge of the nature of Philosophy, we may also
form some idea of the character of the Philosopher.
He is one of the most estimable characters in the world. No wrong
committed on otherscan discompose his steady nerves, no outrage
perpetrated on his neighborcan shake the calm serenity of his soul. In
Turkey he is a great admirer of the Grand Turk; in Russia he loves the
Autocrat; in England he speaks with proper serenity of the starvation
of some millions of Irishmen; in Timbuctoo he greases his face, and
shouts hosanna to a God who, embodied in a reptile, is worshipped by
rattling
pebbles in a calabash; in America, he speaks respectfully of Slavery,
either Black or White, and in Thibet he considers the Grand Llama a
very respectable personage indeed.
Some hundreds of years ago, the Philosopher spoke with great
contempt
of certain vulgar Fishermen and Peasants, `
who turned the world
upside down
,' by a silly doctrine about the Brotherhood of Man, the
Gospel of the Poor, and other doctrines as vague and imaginary.
The sum and substance of the Philosopher's belief is comprised in a few
quaint maxims. `
Such things always have been, such things always will
be.' `Tis the way of the world.' `Take the world as it comes
.'
The last, `
Take the world as it comes
,' is a sovereign excuse in the
eyes of the Philosopher for every deed known in the calendar of Crime.
24
The Seduction of a Poor Girl by a wealthy Libertinethe murder of a
Poor Man, in the fetid atmosphere of the Factory, by the Capitalistthe
robbery of Widows and Orphans by the wealthy Bank Directorthe selling
of the babe from its mother's bosom, by the chivalrous slaveholderthese
incidents, and all others of like calendar, are chaptered in the Philosopher's
mind under one head, to wit;
Take the world as it comes
.
So glorious a thing is Philosophy.
So magnanimous and so entirely great is the Philosopher.
Jacopo was a Philosopher.
We shall endeavor to maintain and illustrate this point in the present
chapter.
We left him on the threshold of the farm-house, while the Negro stood
over the head of his unconscious Master, knife in hand, and a deep groan
echoed from the arbor.
Jacopo pushed open the door, and entered the large room, or hall of the
old farm-house.
As the light streamed in upon the gloom, Jacopo recognised the familiar
features of the place. It was the scene of the New Year's festival on the
last night of 1774. But the broad hearth was fireless now; it yawned
black and cold, in the cheerful sunlight. The huge rafters no longer
echoed the shouts of the merry-makers, nor did the floor tremble under
the dancer's tread. The room was silent and gloomy; the shutters
were closed, and the only light which enlivened its details, came through
the open door.
That light shone over a broad oaken table, which stood in the centre of
the floor.
The sight of the table brought the tears to Jacopo's eyes
Touching but harrowing memory! There sat old Peter, with his red
nose beaming over his white beard, like a beacon over a snow-drift. Here,
the turkey was placed, done to a turn too, and there the cats, which Law,
Medicine, and Divinity, by a simple act of faith, transformed into rabbits.
Upon this very spot, old Peter mixednay, mixed is a vulgar word
constructed
the sublime vision of the Dorfner punch, which made us all see
stars, and lifted our hearts into the regions of the Milky Way.
Jacopo was overwhelmed with tender regrets.
Venerable table! he cried, I have made a Pilgrimage to thee, even
as the devout of the olden time journeyed to St. Jago of Compostella!
Thou shalt be dedicated to the name of St. Dorfner, of the White Beard;
thy symbol, a Jug of Foaming Punch. Thy Pilgrim, a frail child of
mortality
,
sometimes called Jacopo, who, amid all his frailties, cherishes still,
in the inmost core of his heart, the memory of the Dorfner Punch
Zounds! Why did not my guardian, who had the care of my father's
estate, send me to school to a Poet. Decidedly I have a genius in that way.
When the summer day is near its close,
And sorrows gather ina bunch,
Then bring the balm for mortal woes,
And drown me in a DorfnerPunch.
After he had recited this extemporaneous snatch of lyric poetry, Jacopo
subsided from the regions of the ideal into sober matter of fact.
It was on this very spot that I gave the soothin' potion to Madeline,
he said, with a cool, business-like air; although, at the time, I did not
dream of drugging the aristocracy, or even its humblest member.
Through the gloom which hung over the place, Jacopo beheld the door
which opened upon the stairway, leading into the upper rooms of the
farm-house
.
`
Sleep in that room, Jacopo
,' was the remark of the respectable
Hopkins
:
`
search every closet. Whatever you find in the way of paper or
parchment, bring to me, and your fortune is made. Be particularly
careful
of every thing that bears the date, November twenty-third, 'fifty-six
.'
It was very kind in Hopkins to tell me all this; but he might have had the
decency to tell me, in plain terms, that a murder had been committed in
this house, on that particular day; or he might have insinuated, even in the
most delicate manner, that `
after the deed was done, the child was taken
away
,' or that `
Dorfner, with the corpse, also concealed certain
parchments
and papers
,' et cetera!
Jacopo glanced upon the fragments of printed paper which he grasped
in his right hand, and at the same instant his slender legs shook like reeds.
If Dorfner awakes, I am lost! he cried, and hurried to the door
opened itand ascended a dark stairway.
At the head of the stairway, thought Jacopo, is the passage which
traverses the farm-house from north to south, and at its southern end the
room of Madeline.
The darkness and silence struck the philosoper with awe. The echo
of his footsteps, the very creaking of the rheumatic stairs, frightened him.
Presently he stood in the passage at the head of the stairs, and in the
impenetrable gloom, turned his steps in the direction of Madeline's chamber.
Over the hall of the farm-house, there are two rooms, he muttered
one is Madeline's, and t'other, as I've been told, has not been opened
these eight years.
His hand touched the door of the latter chamber as he murmured these
words. Jacopo was seized with a violent nervous attack.
Madeline's door is but a step farther, he said, and advanced with
unsteady steps through the thick darkness.
His handextended at arm's length, and shaking like a weathercock
on a stormy daytouched the panels of a door.
Then it was that Jacopo belied his philosophy, and shook from head
to foot, and grew hot and cold by turns. For a distinct memory of a pool
of blood, upon an oaken floor, at the foot of a bed, not only possessed his
fancy, but floated before his eye in the very darkness of the passage.
Gathering nerve, he placed his foot against the door; it opened
suddenly
,
and he fell upon his face, on the threshold of Madeline's chamber.
With a curse and a groan, he raised his face, and cast a hurried glance
over the room.
Through the dingy curtains of the southern window, streamed the warm
sunshine, while the western window was darkened by a cloak, or some
other garment, which, hung over the small leaden panes, gave passage to
but a few wandering rays.
In the corner, between these windows, stood a bed, whose coverlet,
soiled with dust, bore the impress of a human form.
There was a dressing-bureau of dark walnut, surmounted by a small
mirror, opposite the bed, and two chairs stood against the oak panels
which covered the walls. The white cover of the bureau was white no
longer, for it was discolored by a thick coating of dustthe mirror was
shrouded in a veil of cobwebs.
These details Jacopo comprehended at a glance, as, resting his hands
and knees upon the dusty floor, he gazed nervously about him.
He arose and closed the door, and cast his eyes towards the foot of the
bed. The floor was covered with dust, and yet he fancied that a dark
stain marred its surface, and gloomed ominously upon him.
'Tis just the same as I saw it on
that mornin
', two years and six
months ago! There's the bureauthe chairsthe bedall the same as
when I saw them last. I know it's peculiar. The only change that I
see, is that cloak hung over the windowthe window which looks out
upon the chesnut tree. As for the bedu-g-h! The print of her form
is stamped upon the dusty coverlet, and
Jacopo advanced to the foot of the bed, and with a quivering hand
brushed the dust away for the space of two or three feet.
As the thickly gathered dust was swept away, and a portion of the
white oaken floor brightened in the sunshine, in the centre of that white
space appeared a dark purple stain.
Jacopo sprang to his feet, as though a snake had bitten his heel.
It's
her
blood! he cried, and again he proved untrue to his
philosophy
;
for the sun, shining upon his small nose, wide mouth, and inflated
cheeks, revealed a visage ashy as the face of a dead man. Hello! The
closet, as I'm an honest man! and philosophy came to his aid, and his
face brightened into modest blushes.
In the corner next to the western window, appeared a solitary panel,
separated from the others by an oaken frame, and reaching from the
ceiling
to the floor. On one side appeared some traces of a keyholeJacopo
swept the cobwebs away, and his mouth at once displayed its capacity in
a boundless grin.
It was indeed the closet, but where was the key?
Jacopo pondered anxiously for a moment, with his finger upon the tip
of his nose.
I must force this door; but where's a crowbar? Considering all
circumstancesthe exigencies of the casethe fact, that if Peter Dorfner
wakes up, I am a murdered manat all events, a kicked manthe
scarcity of crowbarswith other reasons, which are doubtless very good,
but which do not now occurI think that I am justified in using the
hatchet which I saw on the table down stairs.
After he had come to this remarkable conclusion, Jacopo lost no time
in hurrying to the door, and presently his footsteps echoed from the
stairs. He was not absent longer than a minute; and when he returned,
the hatchet was in his hand, and his face was enlivened by a grimace,
which buried his eyes among laughing wrinkles, while it gave his mouth
the outline of a loosened shoe-string.
Now for the closet, and the mysteries, exclaimed Jacopo, as he
stood on the thresholdand, above all things, for the Twenty-Third of
November, Fifty-Six!
The hatchet fell from his hand, and clattered on the floor, while Jacopo
staggered backward against the door-frame.
The Devil! he ejaculated, with a profound sigh, his small eyes
dilating
like the eyes of a cat in the dark, and his nether jaw separating from
the upper.
He was seized with a violent fit of trembling; he rubbed his eyes;
he pinched his thin legs; he pressed his hands upon his round paunch;
he shook himself like a water-spaniel, after a bath.
I am not dreaming! he ejaculated.
It was very much like a dream. A braver man than Jacopo might
have been frightened; a greater Philosopher than Jacopo might have been
driven from his stoical composure; for it was a very remarkable sight
which he saw, altogether shadowy and unreal in appearance.
In the centre of the room, near the foot of the bed, and in the light of
the southern window, appeared a small pine table, standing on four
rickety legs, and covered with papers and parchments. Among these
papers and parchments, which had a kind of sepulchral look, being imbued
with a musty odor, indicative of old chests, or suggestive of some
withered
lawyer's den,among these papers and parchments, I say, appeared
a pale white hand, which grasped a pen, and rested upon a broad sheet
of foolscap.
That pale white hand belonged to an elderly gentleman, clad in black,
as all elderly gentlemen ought to be, and seatedlike a man at his ease
in an oaken chair, with unpainted arms and capacious seat
It was this pine table, this pale white hand, this elderly gentleman,
which filled Jacopo with indefinable terror.
Had the pine table started from the floor, like the festival board of
some goblin story? Had the elderly gentleman been summoned, by a
spell, from some uneasy resting-place in some forgotten graveyard?
Jacopo could not answer these questions, but, cold with affright, leaned
against the door-post, his knees shaking together, like dry sticks on a
windy day.
It was a long time before he could muster courage to gaze into the face
of this indefinable personage. He was writing, very leisurely, like a good
merchant in his counting-house; his eyes were downcast, and he did not
seem to know that there was such an individual as Jacopo in the world.
You may imagine the feelings which agitated the heart of Jacopo, as
he examined, with a stealthy glance, the countenance and the attire of this
Incomprehensible.
It was the visage of a man of some sixty years. The nose was long,
the lips thin, the forehead broad and high, with short, stiff, gray hair,
disclosing
the outline of a large head. A solitary mass of his gray hairit
could not be called a curlrested upon the centre of the brow, falling
half-way down to the well-defined eyebrows. The eyes were not visible;
Jacopo was every instant afraid that they would be raised, and that their
glance would penetrate his soul.
The form of the stranger was marked by a broad chest, wide shoulders,
and long arms. He was clad, as I have said, in sober black; a waistcoat
buttoned to the throat, with a white cravat about the neck, and spotless
ruffles around the wrists. His legs were crossed under the table; Jacopo
beheld a diamond buckle shining on his black shoe, like a glow-worm on
a piece of charcoal.
And the elderly gentleman continued writing, with the light playing
over his pale forehead, while Jacopo stood trembling against the door-post.
Not for a moment did he raise his eyes, nor did he manifest, by the
slightest
gesture, that he was aware of Jacopo's presence.
This continued for five minutes or more; the cold dews began to start
from Jacopo's brow.
It is the Devil! he mentally ejaculated.
Still the stranger continued writing, only once removing his hand from
his paper, to brush a vagrant fly from his nose. A smile began to gather
about his thin lips, and widen slowly over his face, until it agitated the
small wrinkles near the corners of his eyes.
Ehem! coughed Jacopo,and shuddered, for he was afraid of those
eyes, which he had not seen.
The unknown continued writing.
Grasping the door-post with one hand, Jacopo wiped the cold dew from
his forehead with the other, and summoned all his Philosophy to his aid.
He was nerving himself in silence for a desperate effort.
Wherehe gasped, frightened at the sound of his voiceWhere
did you come from?
How his heart beat against his ribs, as he awaited the answer!
Yet the elderly gentleman did not raise his eyes, nor pause for an
instant
in his task; with imperturbable gravity he continued writing, the noise
made by his pen, heard distinctly through the silence.
Did he come in the winder? faltered Jacopo, relapsing unconsciously
into a vulgarity of expression, rather unphilosophical,Or through the
floor? Did he bring the table in his pocket? Maybe he came through
the closet? Nono, sir! It can't be. The door is still locked, and
there's the cobwebs over the lock. Ugh! This goes ahead of Italy and
France and Spainnever saw any thing like it in my life, not even in the
great German Principality of Spitzenburschendingenflotzer, where the
Devil comes dressed in breeches and flannel, and the peasants believe in
Ghosts, who eat sour-krout.
The voice of the unknown was heard for the first time; it was a voice
as low, as sweet, as melodious as the voice of a beautiful woman; and
yet Jacopo shuddered again as he heard it.
Without raising his eyes, the unknown exclaimed:
There are two kinds of scoundrels in this world. There is the grave
scoundrel, who indulges himself with magnificent villanies, and becomes
glorious from the very magnitude of his crimes. The Borgia belonged to
this class; at this hour, he is admired for his elaborate depravity. Then
there is the petty scoundrel, who ministers to the basest appetites of the
grand scoundrel, and becomes the miserable hireling of splendid baseness,
selling his soul for a piece of money, and wearing his perjuries as a fop
wears paste jewels. It is the life of such a scoundrel that I hold in my
hand
Eh! ejaculated Jacopo.
He is called by various names, continued the elderly gentleman,
still keeping his eyes upon the paper; and first we meet with him in
the south of France, as a lay brother of the Jesuits, and known as Brother
Joseph-Marie
Jacopo startedrubbed his eyespicked his ears.
Saint Beelzebub! he groaned.
As Joseph-Marie. The house of the Jesuits stood in a garden,
half-way
up a hill, whose summit commanded a view of the Mediterranean.
In the valley beneath was a convent, whose white walls looked out from
among vines and olive trees. Among the nuns who peopled this convent,
was one, a fair and beautiful thing, who had been forced by wealthy
relations
to take the vow against her will, and bury all the love and
freshness
of her virgin heart in that living sepulchre. She was called Sister
Antonia. And in the Monastery of the Jesuits was a pale, thoughtful
Father, renowned as much for his piety and eloquence, as for his youth;
as much for the brilliancy of his eyes, the singular sweetness of his voice,
as for the remarkable grandeur of his intellect. He was altogether a man
to be loved; the very children knelt for his blessing, as he passed along
the valley, and the whole country by the sea shore resounded with the
praises of Father Ignatius. But he was a man, alas! with all his
devotion
to the Church and to his Order, there lingered wit in his bosom a
spark of earthly passion, which only wanted a single breeze, to fan into
a flame. He became the spiritual Director of the convent; he met with
the young sister Antonia; through the dim lattice of the confessional, the
griefs, the hopes, the fears of that warm heart were poured into his soul.
And they lovedloved with a love beyond madness in intensityand
lingering together, in the shadows of the conventual chapel, the white
sleeve of the nun, resting on the dark robe of the Jesuit, they said to one
another, `We will cast aside these coffins which imprison our souls.
We will fly to a New World. A cabin under a hillside in the depth of
some untrodden forest, shall be our refuge and our bridal home.'
These words may have been sealed with a kiss, for the nun was
altogether
beautiful, and the
young
Jesuit felt the blood fire in every vein,
as by the many-colored casement, he drew her form to his heart, and saw
the light of the rising moon reflected in her eyes.It is a long story, but
they planned their escape. The night was fixed; the shallop which was
to bear them out to sea, was hidden under the high crags by the shore.
The night came, I say, but father Ignatius passed it in the dungeon of his
Monastery, beating his forehead against the chainsand there was a
lifeless
form stretched in a cell of the convent, the corse of a pale, beautiful
girl. For they had been betrayed, by a wretch who overheard their
plans,who listened to their vowswho counted their kissesas he
concealed
his form behind a pillar of the chapel. And that wretch was the
lay Brother, Joseph Marie.
Jacopo was white as a shroud. He grasped the door post with both
hands, and sank helplessly on his knees.
Joseph-Marie, the Englishman, continued the unknown without
raising
his eyes, the lay brother of the Order of Jesus, was the miserable
creature, who gave these young hearts to infamy and death! Let us turn
over another page of his history
No! No! Do not! gasped Jacopo on his knees, but the unknown
did not heed him. I'd a great deal rather you would n't
He has changed his name. He is called Bernard; he is the favorite
valet
of a superannuated Profligate, the Count D'Arcy. Near the chatean
of the Count, is the hut of an humble peasant man, whose life of slavery,
is relieved by the presence of an only childa daughtera pure, beautiful
girl, for all her peasant garb, and course wooden shoes. And it is
Bernard
the
valet
, who lures this child of poverty from her father s roof, and
sells her unpolluted form, into the arms of gray-haired sensualism. Oh,
my good Bernard, this is another crime, for which you will have to
answer some day
Thus speaking, while a smile agitated his thin lips, the unknown did
not once raise his eyes. Jacopo grovelling on the floor, pale as death,
and shivering as with an ague chill, clenched his hands, and exclaimed
It is no man. It is n't a human being. It's the ve-r-y devil!
And the unknown turned over another page, and resumed in his low
musical voice
In Florence we next behold him. The companion of a young English
lord, something between a Valet and a Tutor. And the young Lord loves
an Italian girl, the daughter of an aged nobleman, who is as proud as he
is poor. In the very earnestness of youth, in the very frankness of
boyhood
,
our young English lord would marry this girl, and set an English
coronet upon her white forehead. Who is it that poisons his heart? Who
is it, that tells the young lord of a father's anger, and the sneer of the
fashionable world? Who is it, that lulls the senses of the old man's
child, with a drugged potion, and yields her an insensible and helpless
victim, into the arms of infamy? Who but our old friend Joseph-Marie,
sometimes called Bernard, and now known by the name of
Don't! Don't! cried Jacopo, in grotesque dismayUpon my
word this is a very peculiar state of affairs. Indeed I'm not of sufficient
consequence to merit all this attention. I'd rather you would not speak
of it.
By the name of Jacopo, calmly continued the elderly gentlem n,
But the basest deed of all, compared to which all other infamies are
virtues,ah! Wretch it is written here! Madeline! Madeline!
At this word an overwhelming horror possessed the wretch who
grovelled near the door. His hands were clenched, but he could not
raise them from his knees; the cold dews were upon his forehead; for
the first time something like Remorse arose before his Philosophic Soul.
She was only a Peasant Girl, he cried, in broken tonesAnd
Reginald was in love with herI could n't help it.
How
could I?
It was incredible! Jacopo saw and doubted; he heard and could not
believe!
This elderly gentleman, with the sombre attire and remarkable face,
continued his meditations, without seeming to be aware that there was a
certain round-pouched, red-nosed man, writhing on the floor, not ten paces
from his chair. Much less did he appear to know, that the name of this
man was Jacopo.
Jacopo,once called Bernardsometime since known as Brother
Joseph-Marie! continued the elderly gentleman. The very sublimity
of this man's baseness fills me with unutterable loathing.What do you
think of it, sir?
For the first time he raised his eyes.
Yes, speaking in that calm, pleasant voice, with an elegant gesture of
his right hand, he lifted his gaze from the manuscripthe looked into
Jacopo's face.
Where his eyes dark, were they gray or blue?
Jacopo could not tell. Every thing about him was swimming in a
fiery haze; a sound like the murmur of a distant cataract was in his ears.
And yet, through that murmur, he heard the clear deep tones of the
unknown
through
that fiery haze, there came the glare of two intensely
brilliant eyes, shining and turning into his very soul.
CHAPTER TWENTY-THIRD.
THREE LETTERS!
What
do you think of it, sir?again that voice.
I don't know, cried Jacopo, as he grovelled on the floor, wiping the
streaming perspiration from his red faceI hardly knowwhatto
think
The unknown rested his elbow on the table,the forefinger of his right
hand on his lipand continued in a meditative tone:
Were I to meet this Jacopothis Bernardthis Joseph Mariethis
three fold traitor, on a dark night, I would be justified in putting him to
death as I would a noxious reptile. But should I meet him in broad day
meet him in a quiet room, with the sunlight playing upon his coward
faceEh? What then?
I don't know and Jacopo turned his frightened face from side to
sideI can't tell. How should I? Never had the honor of bein'
acquainted
with this JacJac-o-po
And those large eyes, shining in the pallid face of the unknown, made
the poor wretch shiver with inexpressible terror.
We will imagine a scene. I encounter him in a quiet room, on a
calm sun-shiny day. I have a pistol; he has none. He is the enemy of
the human racea reptile when it is virtue to crush out of life. I am
justified in killing him, not only by every law of justice, every instinct
of humanity, but in the name of Antonia, in the name of Marie, in the
name of Guiellietta, and in the name of Madeline!
Do you think so? Indeed, it never struck me in that light, faltered
Jacopo, completely frightened out of his wits.
For every name a seperate death, for every crime a stab, a pistol shot,
and a Curse! continued the unknown, centreing his gaze upon the face
of the grovelling wretch. What do you think of it, sir?
The elderly gentleman arose and paced up and down the chamber, with
his hands behind his back.
He limps on one leg, muttered Jacopo, and yet I can't see the
cloven foot!
He cringed nearer to the wall, for the unknown almost touched him as
he passed along. Stealthily raising his eyes, Jacopo cast a hurried glance
into that pale face, with its dazzling eyes, and bold broad forehead.
I've seen it afore, he said, and wrung his handsI remember it
by * * *!
Then, as if some memory had overwhelmed his soulor that part of
him which passed for a soulwith a new fear, he rested his hot forehead
against the wall, and shook as with an ague chill.
Rise!Jacopo heard the word, and started trembling to his feet.
The strange confronted him. Confronted him with that form clad in
black, with that massy forehead, and those eyes that seemed to turn into
his soul. He was very near Jacopohe could have touched him with
his handbut he shrunk away and cringed closer to the wall
What would you give to save your life?
Hope dawned in Jacopo's diminative eyeballs.
Most anythin'  gasped the PhilosopherOnly don't you come any
nearer. I'm a little nervous you know. Just rose out of a sick bed.
What would you
do
to save your life? asked the elderly gentleman,
in a stern low voice.
Anythin' you can mention, said the Philosopher, shaking from head
to footFrom burnin' a church to lamin' a cripple,anythin'
anythin'
The unknown turned away, traversing the floor with a halting gait,
while the Philosopher cringed closer to the wall.
It was a fearful moment for Jacopo.
He's gettin' his pistolsno! It's a knifeah! Unlucky
conjunction
of my planetsin a little while, say ten minutes or more, I'll be a
carcassstiffwith all sorts of gashes about me
You heard of the village of Germantown? said the stranger, as with
his back turned toward Jacopo, he looked from the southern window.
Germantown? What, that delightful Dutch paradise, where the
children of two years weigh a hundred pounds, and old folksespecially
old maids
can't
die? The houses are built along one street, like a row
of buttons on a great coat, and every other house is haunted by a ghost,
or a devil, or some such kind of thing. Did I ever hear of Germantown?
My goodness! I was kicked there once
You will go to Germantown. You will deliver these letters. And
your life is spared.
The elderly gentleman turned toward Jacopo, holding some letters or
papers in his extended hand.
Obey my commandsdeliver these lettersand your life is spared.
and he fixed his gaze upon the face of the PhilosopherDo you
consent
?
Do I? Do I look as if I did n't? whined Jacopo.
Listen! You will hasten to Germantown, by a lane which skirts the
forest not half a mile from where I stand
Y-e-s Y-e-s!
You have heard of the `township-line road'?
Jacopo nodded as if he intended to shake his red nose from his face.
You will deliver this letter at the corner of the lane and the `town
ship-line road.'
There's no house there, interrupted JacopoIt's as wild as a
basket of gray cats
Near the forks of the road, stands a solitary cedar, and by this cedar
a huge granite rock.Are you listening.
Again Jacopo noddednodded with frightful intensity.
In a crevice of this rock, which stands near the solitary cedar, you
will place this letter. Mark it well, and note the superscription`
To the
King
.' Do you understand me?
All over, faltered Jacopo, with a convulsive grimace.
After you have concealed this letter in the crevice, you will hurry on.
Traversing the lane, you will emerge upon the solitary street of
German-town
,
opposite the lawn of Chew's House. You have seen this lawn?
It is seperated from the road by a stone wall, nearly half a mile long
suggested Jacopo.
At the setting of the sun, a man dressed in a gray surtout, and mounted
on a black horse, will await you near the southern end of this wall. He
will rein his horse in the road, and turn his face to the west. You will
give him this letter. You will remember the superscription`
To the
Duke?
' In the peril of your soul, do not confound these letters!
If I do, may I be
Do not swear, said the elderly personage, with a smile quivering
about his thin lipsFor an oath, with you,
Joseph Marie
, with you
Bernard
do you comprehendwith you
Jacopo
,is only a Herald
sent before, to announce the coming of aLie. Do not swear.'
I wont swear. I'll be very particular on that point, I assure you.
You will remember? The first letter to the crevice in the rock, the
second to the man who will wait for you, in front of Chew's lawn, and
the third
The third?
After you have delivered the second letter, you will enter the Haunted
House, and deliver this letterit has no superscriptionto the first
person
,
whom you may chance to meet.
The Haunted House! ejaculated our Philosopher, How shall I
know it? There's two or three dozen in Germantown.
Any of the villagers will tell you where it stands. Near the southern
end of Chew's wall,a substantial fabric of gray stonetwo storied
with a cottage or cabin, on one side, and a garden surrounded by a high
wall on the other. You cannot avoid it.
And I am to enter this House? said Jacopo, with a shudder.
Yes,and mark you,without being seen by any person. You
must enter it in silence, in secresy, and once within its walls, deliver this
letter without superscription, as you see, to the first person whom you
may encounter.
Oh! ejaculated Jacopo. Excuse meonly a sudden painbut
butif this blank should happen to be filled up with
his
name?
His
you understand
He pointed downwards with the forefinger of his right hand
What mean you!
The Dev-il! faltered the Philosopher.
Do you jest with me, sirrah? said the unknown, as a cold smile
played round his lips, while his eyes so strangely lustrous, flashed with
anger. Jest with yourJudge? You are courageous! A word from
me, and you will become the Hangman's preya goodly acorn for the
gallow's tree! Jest onI will be pleased to hear you.
Mercy! Mercy! screamed Jacopo,I will obey.
Spare your cries. I
can
trust you. For you know that I hold your
life in my hands. Disobey mefail in a single item of my commands
and you are dead, before the rising of another sun.
The Haunted House! murmured JacopoYesI will obey
There was a wild light in the eyes of the unknown, a mocking smile
about his lips, as he gazed upon the cringing Philosopher, and
exclaimed
Yes, the Haunted House. The villagers avoid itnot a man in the
place would enter it for his weight in gold. They say a curse broods
over its wallsthe curse of unnatural murder. It has been untenanted
for many years; the garden is choked with weeds, and the grass grows
about its threshold stone. Strange sounds are heard, echoing from its
deserted chambers at dead of night,and lights as strange, as spectral,
flit from window to window, and shine dismally through the darkness
it is indeed an accursed place, this Haunted House.
The cold moisture started in beads from Jacopo's brow. He gazed
upon this singular personage, who stood motionless between his eyes and
the window, he heard his calm, silvery voice, he felt the dazzling lustre
of his full deep eyes, and a fear such as he had never experienced before
something more intense than physical cowardicepossessed his brain,
and made his temples throb, while his heart grew coldcolderalmost
lifeless.
I will go, he falteredThe first letter to the crevice in the rock;
the second to the horseman in gray; the third to
the person
in the
Haunted House. You see I rememberI will goI will go
Grasping the letters, he retreated toward the door, his dilating eyes
fixed upon the unknown.
It is well, said the silvery voice, and mark youafter the third
letter is delivered return to the Wissahikon. I will need your
clerical
services, before the night is over. You will meet me
He drew near the trembling wretch and whispered a word in his ear.
YesyesI'll be thereI will, cried JacopoGood afternoon,
good afternoon
He disappeared through the doorway, but in an instant his face was
seen again, and his shrill voice resounded through the room
Pardon me he cried, as his visage projected into the chamber,
But if it's not an impertinent question, how the devil did you get into
this room?
He did not pause for an answer for there was something in the eye of
the stranger, that made his heart contract and dilate by turns. He turned
wildly away.
Grasping the three letters with one hand, while the other crushed the
three-cornered hat over his face, he hurried down the dark stairway, into
the lower room, and, in an instant stood on the threshold stone, with the
light of the summer sun upon his terror stricken face.
He did not pause for a moment, to glance toward the arbor, nor did he
think of the white-haired old man, who but a little while ago, was
menaced by the knife, in the hand of the frenzied negro.
But passing around the farm house, he crossed the barn yard, sprung
over the fence, and with unsteady strides hurried through a cornfield
toward a wood, which appeared at the distance of some two hundred
yards. Once or twice he turned his affrighted face over his shoulder
cast a stealthy glance at the old fabric resting so calmly in the sunand
then urged onward with accelerated speed. It was not altogether a
solemn thing, to see him plunging in amid the rows of corn, his dark
skirts streaming behind him, while the shadow of his form was flung far
over the fieldlike the grotesque profile of an immense spider.
He soon attained the wood, and with a bound plunged into its shadows.
Through the thickly gathered brushwood, along the mossy spots of
verdure
,
now arrested by the branch of a tree, now stumbling over some gray
old rock, Jacopo, otherwise known as the Philosopher, held on his way.
Had you seen him, you would have sworn it was for a wagerthis
night-mare
racea match between his Legs and Time.
At last panting and blowing, his face covered with perspiration; his
dark attire strown with fragments of leaves and briars, he sank exhausted
at the foot of a rock, and with a profound sigh, gave himself up to his
Destiny.
Let 'em take me, he said, between his gaspsI'm ready. They
can't do more than hang me. To think those legs should ever come to
the gallows!
From some obscure recess of his capacious pockets, he drew forth an
immense handkerchiefsilken in texture, and indigo in colorand
polished his streaming visage until it shone again.
Possessed by some fatal idea, he evidently expected to be seized,
chainedand dragged away from this solitude by merciless hands.
Ah! I know
his
facehave seen it afore. The devil himself is a
fool to himHE might set up school, and all the imps of darkness would
take lessons in devilty from
him!
Completely exhausted, with his back against the rock, and his limbs
stretched out upon the sand, in the shape of the letter VJacopo the
Philosopher became the victim of various terrors. His mouth, never too
small, expanded in a chronic grimace; he polished his face with the
indigo handkerchief; fanned his heated brow with the three-cornered hat.
To go over a fellow's life in that style, and after one has reformed
and turned from the error of his ways, to rub up old sins, and make one's
tender conscience bleed in a dozen places! It was ungentlemanlyah!
Oh! How cursed hot it is!
And while our Philosopher, agitated by the memory of these `old sins,'
and perchance by some indefinable idea of punishment, surrendered
himself
to the cheering influences of the indigo handkerchiefused as a
toweland the three-cornered hattransformed into a fanthe letters
which had been consigned to him, lay scattered upon the sward.
The sight of these letters, gleaming on the sand in a wandering ray,
restored Jacopo to life and reason.
I have a duty to perform. What human being has n't? If somebody
chooses to turn me into a post office, it is my dutyposterity expects it
to see that I don't carry any thing that will do harm to even the
humblest
member of the great family of man.
And, Jacopo forgetting all his terrors, in the consciousness of duty
raised the letters, and began to examine them with a searching glance.
`
To the King
'only wafered. `
To the Duke
'ditto. ToBlank
sealed, as I'm an honest man, and with a Coronet too, and the letters R. L.
What the mischief does R. L. mean? Can't be
his
name?
For a moment Jacopo cogitated profoundly with the tip of his finger
applied to the tip of his nose.
R. L.! Reginald Lyndulfe! he cried, And in the name of the
whole family of saints, what has
this person
to do with my young Lord
of Lyndulfe? Why the thing becomes mysterious!
Satisfied that no time was to be lost, the Philosopher went to work in
a calm, business-like manner. There was method in his virtuous
curiosity. First he listened, turning his gaze from side to side. All was
stillthe foliage of that forest cover shut him out from the world. Next,
moistening the wafers of the first and second letters, by applying them to
his lips, he very adroitly slipped the long nail of his forefinger underneath
each wafer, and ere a second had passed, his virtuous labor was rewarded
by the sight of certain lines written in a firm, round hand.
This is the first letter
To the King
At twelve to-night. The placethe Block House of the
Wissahikon
.
You pursue this lane, cross the stream, and then turn to the right.
It is but little more than half a mile from the place where you will find
these words
.
This epistle without date or signature, filled Jacopo with indescribable
wonderment.
It appears to me, the thought crossed the mind of the Philosopher,
That those enigmatical words, constitute the dressing of some nice little
Plot, which known to me, might be honestly turned into coin.
And, Jacopo sealed the letter again, and then with his nail removed the
wafer of the second epistle.
To the Duke
The son of Gaspard Michael lives
.
Jacopo read, and his small eyes projected from their sockets.
`
Gaspard-Michael!
' he echoed, turning the letter in his fingers, as
though he expected a nineteen-pounder to drop from its folds. `
To the
Duke!
' Well, w-e-ll! Why is it always my fate to be mixed up in
the affairs of nations? Unhappy Jacopo! Sighing forever, for a nice
little cot under a hill, with a quiet little wife, three or four children, and
some pigs and chickens,and always whirled away from this sweet
image of domesticity, into the great Maelstrom of circumstance!
With this profound reflection, Jacopo resealed the second letter, and
turned his attention to the third.
Sealed, and with coat of arms and cypher! Shall I break the seal?
Miserable position for a conscientious man! If I break the seal, I am
sure to be found out, and if I don't I shall remain ignorant of the contents
of the letter.
The Philosopher was puzzled. Turning the epistle in various ways,
he endeavored to obtain a glimpse of its contents, but in vain.
Shall I break the seal?
Before him rose the vision of that pale visage, lighted by the intensely
brilliant eyes. Jacopo trembled, and the warm color vanished from his face.
Then he looked at the letter lovinglywith a sort of mingled desire
and fearlike an epicure surveying a delicious morsel, which his physician
tells him, it will be death to eat, or a vagrant cur observing a steak, which
is suspended just one inch beyond his reach.
`I will break it! said Jacopo, and
He sprang to his feet with a yell. Cold, trembling, seized once more
with abject fear, he grasped his hat and the letters, and, without looking
once behind him darted madly through the bushes.
For even as the words, `I will break it!' rose to his lips, he felt a cold,
hard hand laid upon his shoulder.
Afraid to look behind him, lest he might once more behold the pallid
face and burning eyes, he shrunk away from that hand, and was gone into
the thickest of the forest ere a second might be told.
He did not pause in his flight, until he stood at the forks of the road,
where the `township line' was crossed by the lane, leading from the
Wissahikon
to the village of Germantown.
It was a silent and desolate spot, centred in the midst of thickets
backed by the forest.
The hot dust of the road was contrasted with the foliage of cedar and
the pine, scattered on either side. Toward the west, the lane descending,
a hill was lost in the mazes of the woods. But in the east it wound
among cultivated fields, now skirting some wood-crowded hill, now
lingering
in the lap of some brook-watered valley, until it approached that
line of gardens and orchards, amid whose verdure and blossoms appeared
the dark gray tenements of Germantown.
Jacopo panting up the hill, beheld the cedar which stood alone at the
forks of the road, while in the shadow of its branches appeared the massy
granite rock.
Dev'lish odd post office he said, grinning through his terror, as he
inserted the letter, in a crevice of this rock, and secured it by placing a
small stone upon its superscription: Should like to see the individual
who is destined to pay the postage.
He startedthe sound of horse's hoofs struck his ear.
It was a handI'll swear it, a hand of iron, he cried as the memory
of his last fright returned in full force, and without a moment's delay, he
concealed himself from sight, under a clump of small cedars, near the
roadside.
25
He could hear, although he could not see.
Protected from all observation, by the thickly grown bushes, he listened,
while his heart mounted to his throat.
The echo of horse's hoofs grew more distinct, Jacopo crouching on
hands and feet endeavored to catch a glimpse of the unknown rider, but
in vain.
He is coming nearnearer! From the direction of Germantown,
too,ha! Here he is, and I cannot see him. Hello! The horse stops
near the cedarhark! The rider dismountsO, for a glimpse, only a
glimpse! As I'm a human being he's meddling with my post office
hey!
It was true. The unknown horseman whom he could hear, although
he could not see him, dismounted near the cedar tree, and for a moment
a breathless silence ensued.
Jacopo moved; he was determined to obtain a glimpse of the stranger.
Who's there! said a deep clear voice.
Jacopo was stone. Gathering himself in the smallest possible compass,
he held his breath, and awaited the termination of this incident, in a spasm
of mortal terror.
There's a bullet through my ribsI foresee it plainly, he thought,
but dared not speak, as he crouched in the shadows.
Who's there?again the voice was heard.
You may take my word for it, that our Philosopher did not reply.
Suddenly the tramp of horse's feet was heard again; Jacopo's heart
bounded with joy. Those sounds grew faint and more distant; he dared
to dash the branches aside, and steal a glimpse after the unknown.
Far down the lane, where it lay in full sunlight, just before it was lost
among the woods toward the Wissahikin, Jacopo saw a grey horse, whose
rider's tall form was wrapped in a long and drooping military cloak. That
rider's face was turned away, and even as Jacopo gazed, from his retreat,
the grey horse turning a point of the road, disappeared in the shadows of
the forest.
Rather warm for a military cloak, my respected friend, said the
Philosopher
,
as he gathered up his spider-like limbs and crawled from his
retreat. Let me see whether the sanctity of our post office has been
violated.
Looking stealthily over his shoulder,listening for the faintest echo of
a footstepJacopo drew near the rock, and crouching on hands and knees
examined the crevice. The small stone which had secured the letter, lay
on the sod; the crevice was empty, and of course the letter had
disappeared
.
Jacopo had been simply puzzled and frightened before this discovery;
now he was utterly confounded.
He did not even utter an ejaculation. Seating himself by the
wood-side
,
with his three-cornered hat drawn over his eyes, he silently
contemplated
the mysterious events of the last hour.
First, I find out, the guilt of the good old Peter of the white beard.
Then the Devil appears to me, and converts me into a perepatelic post
office. Urged by a simple impulse of duty, I am engaged in opening the
Devil's correspondence, when a hand is laid on my shoulder. Last of all,
a mysterious horseman, violates the sanctity of the rock, and steels the
devil's letter.
These thoughts stirred the Philosopher's soul into speech:
Such is the case. I will submit it to a committee of any three
intelligent
gentlemen, whether any thing like this, was ever heard of afore, or
can be again, within the compass of three thousand nine hundred and
ninety-nine solar years.
How far the Philosopher's reveries would have led him, had he been
suffered to pursue the subject, we cannot tell. His meditations were
suddenly
brought to an end by a new object of arrangement.
A fragment of paper, looking for all the world,like a stray relic of some
forgotten letter, appeared right before the eyes of Jacopo, nestling in the
roadside dust. This you will say, was not very wonderful, but there was
a name written upon the fragment, which at once held Jacopodumb and
without motionlike the victim of a magician's spell.
The name was very simple
George Washington
.
I have heard of it afore, said Jacopo, as a singular thought began to
take shape in his active brain, And now for Germantown.
Placing the fragment in a side pocket, and carefully grasping the
remaining
letters, he stood ready for his journey.
He brushed the dust and leaves from his attire, arranged his white
cravat
with an exactness truly ministerial, and then surveyed his shadow, as
it lay upon the roadside dust, in all its native elegance.
That graceful rotundity supported by those slender yet graceful
columns, reminds one of the terrestrial Globe, resting upon the Pillars of
Hercules. Quite a geographical figure, I vow!
Turning toward the south-western wood, he remembered the
unknown
hand
, with a shudder.
And yet at that moment, by the very rock, where the Philosopher had
felt the hand, crouched the figure of a blind Negro, with a knife in his
tremulous grasp.
It am de berry debbil and no mistake, he soliloquizedHe pull
my hand, jist as I was a-gwain to stick de ole boy. Den I run into de
woods, and feel my way, and lay dis hand on de debbil's shoulder. Sorra
mighty gosh! Dese tings make an ole black colo'd man afeard!
Little did Jacobo imagine,as he stood wondering and trembling at the
forks of the roadthat the unknown hand, laid upon his shoulder in the
woody covert, was nothing but the hand of his dark-skinned friend,
familiarly
called,
Black Sam
.
Doubtless it was the Devil, said Jacopo, and turned his steps toward
Germantown.
A pleasant walk it was, along the lane, which leading over hill and
valley,among fields and pastures, dotted with cattle, or set off by massy
barns,now down into this dell, where the brook was ever singingnow
up this hill, whose top covered with chesnut, oak and maple, was living
with the voices of the summer birdsmade the heart dream of Eden, and
the lip murmur Paradise!
Even Jacopo philosophically hardened into baseness, and rich only in
memories of crime, was somewhat won by the summer loveliness of that
sequestered lane.
Fresher than Italy! he cried, as surmounting a hill, he saw the long
line of dark gray fabrics, peeping from a chaos of leaves and blossoms
Then down the hill, into a dell, the lane wandered with rustic walls of
stone,crowned with wild flowerson either hand, and the breeze
blowing
freshly all the while, with its varied perfumes, stolen from the shrubs
by the water-side. There was a bridge across the brook which
murmured
in the hollow of the dell; a bridge formed of a few rude planks,
with wild grass growing in every crevice.
Jacopo lingered there for a single instant.
A green meadow, watered by the brook, and rising gently until it was
lost in an apple orchard. Sunlight, very rich and hazy, upon the heighths,
and in the valley, shadows deep and solemn. The air full of bees,
humming
their kimmer song, and the great sky, arching far above without a
cloud.
Something there was in this scene, that stole imperceptibly into Jacopo's
heart, as resting his arms upon the rude rail of the bridge, he drew in the
fragrance and music of the place, as you would drink a cup of rich old
wine. May be in that moment, some ember of a better nature, flamed up
within his heart, and by the sudden light he read, how base and cowardly
had been his life; how lost and sunken, from every manly purpose, his
prostituted soul. May be? Yes, it was even so. For although no tear
shone on his cheek, nor although no tremor of the lip altered a single
throb of sincere feeling, yet for an instant, the heart of the degraded Man,
went back to some dear nook of Childhood, and over the dreary wastes
of memory, he caught one golden gleam from other Days.
How shall we account for this gleam of purer feeling? Was it but a
ray from the ashes of his own soul, or was it, a wandering beam, from the
other World? Perchance, even in that moment, some pure Spirit
invisible
to the gross eyes of sensecame with sudden steps to his side, and
spoke to his sealed ear, a Word from God.
In saying that this Man felt purer, better, for a single moment, as the
religion of that silent dell melted into his soul, we profoundly beg the
pardon of those learned and pious people, who maintain, that Human
Nature is all Corrupt; born to be wicked; and destined to grow fat on
sin. Your forgiveness gentle folks. Total Depravity is a comfortable
digma, and we would not for a moment rob you of the holy consolation
which flows from the belief, that the Human Hearteven the heart of the
Babe, resting so smilingly upon its Mother's heartis nothing but a
Labaratory
of Crimes.
Forgive us, if we believe somewhat differently.
Even this wretch, who leaning upon the rail of the rustic bridge,
surveys
the silent dell,this wretch who embodies in his own person, all the
craft and cunning, the menial vice and livened baseness which forms the
very Religion of modern Civilizationappears to us, not altogether lost
and wicked; not altogether corrupt and depraved.
Search his heart, horrified as it is by the disease of selfishness, and you
will find a throb of purer feeling, beating even there,even there, you will
discover the pulse of a holier,yesa God-like nature.
If there exists such a thing as Total Depravity on the face of the earth,
you will find it in the heart of the man, who has so brutalized his nature,
as to be able to believe the Dogma.
For while the Great Father of Us All, hold the stars in the hollow of
his hand, no man can assert, that He has created one being, totally
depraved
,only
onewithout having the Lie which he utters, flung back
into his face by every star that shines in the midnight sky, by every
blossom
that floats in the summer air,by the angel-eyes of childhood smiling
some glimpses of Heaven, even into the soul of Jesus.
Jacopo lingered there until the shadows began to grow longer, under the
orchard trees, and at last with something like a sigh went in silence up the
hill. The hill-top gained, the free sun and air upon his face once more,
the town in sight, its roofs framed in foliage, he was himself again, and
all traces of better feeling, had passed away with the silence and shadow
of the grassy dell.
CHAPTER TWENTY-FOURTH.
ADVENTURES OF JACOPO.
Germantown
! soliloquized Jacopo, advancing with a most portentous
strideWhere witches are plenty as cabbages, and ghosts come thick as
onions. I must break upon the vision of the unsophisticated villagers,
gently, very gent-l-y, and yet imposing as a full moon seen through a fog.
And he passed rapidly along the lane.
There came green fields, full of the music of bees and the fragrance of
new mown hay. There came gardens too, bordered with fruit trees,the
cherry, the peach, the apple and the pear,and with little children and
brown-cheeked peasant girls, singing and laughing among the vine-covered
arbors. There came an old cottage, with the roof bent down by the gnarled
limb of a great oak tree, and its solitary window, adorned with a single
flower, set in a broken pitcher. And on the stone before the low
door-way
,
underneath the music of the restling leaves, was a gaunt old man,
with a face as brown as a russet apple, hair white as snow, and garb as
poor as very Poverty. And as he turned his face,for he was startled
by the sound of the coming footstepthe sun shone upon it, and gave a
golden glow to his cold, dead eyeballs.
He was blind, and poor and old, and yet before his cabin door, he sat,
pressing his hands together, and turning his sightless eyes to the sun, as
if tho' he was glad that he was alone, and singing all the while in a
cracked voice, some words of a rude German Song.
Jacopo glanced upon him with grimace,wondered
what the deuce he
was singing about
and without a word, passed on his way.
Soon he came to the end of the lane, and stood in the solitary street of
Germantown.
Jacopo sank on a bench, by the roadside, and for some moments
contemplated
the novelty and freshness of the scene in silence, and yet with
frequent ejaculations of delight.
He gazed to the south. The dusty road, in some places shadowed by
rows of trees, in others reddened by gleams of sunlight, descended the
slope of a long hill, and far to the south, was lost to view under an arch
of foliage. There were tenements of wood and stone on either hand;
here a cottage, with its gable-end toward the street, and a rustic porch
before the door; there a two-storied edifice with steep roof and narrow
windows, and a cool, quiet garden, sheltered from the roadside dust by
trees. Altogether, that road stretching to the south, presented an
impressive
perspective of cottages, gardens and trees, reposing half in shadow,
half in sunlight, with a clear blue sky above.
Jacopo turned his eye to the north. A wide and grassy lawn, seperated
from the road by a stone wall, and dotted with elms and oaks, with a
gray old mansion in the background, slept in the beams of the
afternoon
sun.
That lawn, reposing so quietly in the sunlight, was soon destined to
become
holy grounddrenched by the blood of martyrs, its grass and
flowersits dark gray mansion rent by cannon shot, and crowded with
deadit was soon to be known in history as the Battle-Field of
Germantown
.
Opposite the bench on which our Philosopher rested, appeared a
two-storied
mansion, which seemed invested with a peculiar atmosphere of
silence and isolation. Among the homes of that quiet hamlet, it looked
sad and deserted. The shutters were fast closed; there was grass in the
nooks of the high stone steps before the dusky hall door; the steep roof
was covered with green moss and withered leaves. It looked as though
no foot had passed its threshold for many years.
On the northern side, the foliage of its neglected garden overhung a
high wall, whose gray stones were half-concealed by a wild and luxuriant
vine. And on the south, built half way up the gloomy gable of the
mansion
,
a one-storied cabin was seen, with a little garden plot between it and
the road, and the wide-spreading branches of a solitary oak stretching
above its roof.
Through the leaves of the oak, the smoke of the cabin chimney wound
into the sky, shining and glowing against the blue heavens as it caught the
radiance of the sun.
Well! cried Jacopo, That cabin under the big tree, looks like a
solitary chicken under the wing of a fat hen, while this gloomy mansion
ugh! looks like a frozen night-mare.
Arising from the bench he crossed the road,surveyed the silent
mansion
with a careful scrutinyand then passed on, until he reached the
neatly white-washed pale fence, in front of the cabin.
Ho! Ho! A table under the oakbottles and mugs, and two or
three buglers taking the world easy! I hope I'm not intruding upon a
family party
With his hand upon the latch of the gate, he hesitated for a moment,
uncertain whether to enter or pass on, when his eye was arrested by a
board nailed upon the bark of the tree, and bearing in remarkable
characters
a most mysterious inscription.
Bier
& SiDeR.
These enigmatical characters seemed intended to convey the idea that
Beer and Cider were to be obtained for coin, somewhere in the vicinity
of the oak. Encouraged by this view of the case, Jacop lifted the latch
and entered.
The three villagers seated around the table, with pewter mugs in their
hands, did not hear his approach. Bending over the table, their heads
laid together; they maintained a low-toned and earnest conversation.
Our Philosopher paused and listened:
Chon you may dependt it's a fact, said one of the three, who
appeared
in shirt sleeves and red waistcoatDis house has bin shut up
dese twenty or dirty years. Dey do say, de man as owned it, soldt
himself
to de defil.
Jacopo started, and drew a step nearer.
Now Jake, you haint got the rights of the story, responded Chon
or John, whose sharp features were half-hidden by an extensive wool-hat.
The house is owned by somebody away there in the old country, and
there's a lawsuit about it afore somebody they call Chancery, or some
sich name, and of course it's shet up until the case is decided. What do
you say, Pete?
Pete was a solemn little man, with an apron on his chest, and some
three or four days beard on his face.We may here remark, that in our
researches into the Ancient Records, we have never been able to ascertain
the full names of those three respectable individuals; they are simply
called Chon, and Jake, and Peter. It appears however, that Jake was
a man of substance, well-to-do in the worldly sense; Pete a shoemaker,
and Chon a man-of-all-work about somebody's farm.
As Pete replied, our friend Jacopo still unobserved, drew a step nearer:
There's been lights seen in that house. Queer noises heer'd.
Rattlin' of a chain. Say somebody was murdered. Thirty years ago,
come next Christmas. It's
his
ghost. The man that was murdered.
They say so.
Lest the remarks of Peter should appear broken or abrupt, it may as
well be stated, that he punctuated with his pewter mug, applying it to his
lips wherever we have placed a full stop.
Ish it possible! ejaculated Jake, with eyes like saucers.
They
say so, whispered Pete, again punctuating with his mug.
It taint,I tell you, it taint, remarked Chon, fanning himself with
his wool hat, As to its bein' ha'nted, I'm not the man to deny that, for
we all know that ghosts in some houses are thick as hops, but as to it's
bein' owned by a man that sold hisself to the Devil, I don't believe it.
Rash man! said a shrill, screeching voice.
With one bound the three started to their feet, and beheld Jacopo
attired in solemn black, with his hands extended in the air, and his mouth
composed in an expression of remarkable severity.
Rash man! he continued, while the three stricken into statues,
listened
with vacant amazementAs an humble clergyman, I feel bound
to protest against your unbelief. You doubt that a man can sell himself
to the devil? My young friend, I pity you! Why in the course of my
journeying around this scene of terrestrial vanity, I have met with no less
than six hundred persons, who acknowledged with tears, that they had
sold themselves to the devil.
They had married old maids
, he said in
an under tone.
It's a Dominie! cried Jake.
I don't deny it, said Chon, awed and abashed by the reproof of the
reverend man, But as to this house bein' owned by sich a person
Shet up Chon. Don't you see the Minister's agin you. Take a seat,
sir,travelled far to day?
Pete brushed a chair with his apron, and placed it before Jacopo.
That reverend personage was now in his glory. Calmly surveying the
three, he begged them in a pleasant voice to be seated once more, adding
with a sweet smile that he was not at all angry, but felt rather charitable
than otherwise.
I am on my way to my little flock, he continued, as he took a seat
at the tableI have a parish in the back settlements among the Injin's
beyond Carlisle. You never heard of Hog's Run, did you?
They had never heard of this classic locality; and Jacopo leaning back
in his chair and resting his hands upon his paunch, concluded his remarks
by asking for a little cider.
Betsy! exclaimed Jake, Dis way, dis w-a-y! Dere's a gentleman
here as wants a glass of siter.
And in a moment Betsy, the proprietor of the roadside cottage,
appeared
in the doorway, holding a bowl of fragrant October in her hand.
Betsy was by no means old or thin, or ugly. A bouncing dame of some
thirty-five years, with very small bright eyes shining in a face round as
the full moon, and blooming as a garden of roses. Her capacious bust
was enveloped in a snow-white handkerchief, and her dark linsey skirt
descending but half way below the knee, left exposed to view a pair of
ankles, which encased in home-spun stockings, seemed altogether too
slender for her luxuriant form. Her feet, too, enveloped in course leather
shoes, did not seem at all adapted to bear the weight of so much
substantial
womanhood, and as for her hands, small and white and fat, with
dimples
sprinkled all over the joints, they were altogether too diminitive in
comparison with her arms, which bared from the shoulder, showed their
clear skin and full round outline freely to the sunlight.
On Betsy's chesnut-brown hair, parted neatly over her full moon face
a small muslin cap nestled like a bird in its nest; her cheeks, her chin,
her neckwhiter even than the snowy handkerchief which bound her
bustwere scattered with dimples, every one of which laughed like a
sunbeam.
Betsy was a widow; she sheltered her sorrows in the cottage by the
roadside; in the winter she knitted and spun, and helped the neighbors
on festival occasions; in the summer she bloomed and flourished like the
bee in its hive, or the seed in an apple, selling `Bier & Sider' to thirsty
villagers, or dusty travellers.So runs the quaint portraiture of the
Ancient
Records.
Jacopo opened his eyes; he was astounded by the display of so many
charmscharms at once compact and luxuriant.
Springing from his seat he darted toward the door, and took the bowl
from her hand.
And this is Betsy! he said, meditatively shutting one eye, as he
suffered
his fingers to linger upon the hand which held the cup. My name
is James, Betsy, the Reverend Jacob James. A friend of mine, who
passed this way last year, spoke of you, and of yourcider. You have
been well, Betsy?
Betsy laughed. Oh, the Poverty of language! Had you seen her
white teeth gleam out from her red lips, while her eyes danced, and the
dimples on her cheeks and chin and throat laughed in chorus! In fact,
she laughed
all over
. Then, when she spoke, every word touched with
a scarcely perceptible German accent, how the white of her teeth and the
red of her lips seemed to play bo-peep with each other!
Ha, ha! Excuse meyou must n't think anythin' of me laughin',
butbut
And away she went again. We cannot aver that Jacopo's somewhat
singular figure excited her merriment, for a black coat and white cravat,
will turn the eye away at any time from physical or moral deformity.
Jacopo as Jacopo might have been simply ridiculous; but, Jacopo as a
Reverend was decidedly respectable.
Betsy laughed for the same reason that the ripe peach looks beautiful
in the sun,or the bird sings, when perched on the topmost boughshe
laughed because she was
full of life
.
Betsy was a widow; Betsy had no care; Betsy had teeth like pearls;
therefore Betsy laughed.
Don't mindt te gal, Dominie, exclaimed Jake, It's her way.
Always
grinnin' like a chessy-cat.
Mind her? Bless my soul, I love to see young persons enjoy
themselves
.
Laugh, my child, laugh. It expands the muscles, throws out the
chest, and clears the cobwebs out of the brain. Laugh, my child, laugh!
And the venerable Jacopo, in a fit of paternal feeling, laid his hand upon
the round arm of the Widow Betsy.
`
Young
persons,' ha, ha, ha! Gott bless us! Ha! Ha! I'm an
oldt womanha! ha!
And as if to prove it, she folded her white arms over her capacious
bust, while the dimples went rioting her cheeks, and the ring of her
laugh pealed on the air, mellow and musical, as the note of a bird.
Twenty-one, said Jacopo, Twenty-one. Not a year older. Quite
a childa little girl, in fact.
And the good man patted her playfully on the downy cheek.
Tont! said the widow with a simper and a blush, that would have
done honor to a lady of fashionBe gwit tat!
Jacopo warmed into a playful humorReverend men will be playful
sometimesattempted to seize her hand. You should have seen Betsy
as she stood in the cabin door, laughing all over, as a stray sunbeam fell
on her dimples, and danced about her throat, where it began to widen into
the expansive bust!
Mindt yer own pizness! she said, with an air of offended dignity
some what modified by her dimpled visage.
Encouraged by the good humor of the buxom dame, Jacopo grew
familiar
nay,
paternal, is the word. He took her hand, he rolled it gently
within his own, as a child plays with a piece of stolen dough; his small
eyes begin to sparkle in his comely visage.
You must be careful of your health, my dear,her voice sinking
into a persuasive whisperAvoid the night air. Eschew wet feet. Your
health is delicateyour form fragilethe slightest puff of air might blow
you into a gallopin' consumption. Ah, me! What a tender flower!
Jacopo cast his eyes to heaven, and fashioned his mouth into a grimace
of frightful solemnity.
Delicate? Me! cried BetsyO Lordt! and then in the serene
amplitude of her charms, she laughed and shook, shook and laughed again,
until she looked like an immense flower, blossoming in the frame of that
cabin door, with its leaves tost to and fro, by a sudden blast.
And all the while, the sunbeam went dancing over her face now tinting
her warm lip, now lingering about her white round throat, now nestling in
a dimple of her joyous cheek.
By the bye my dear child, continued Jacopo still kneading the plump
hand of the good Betsy: They say that
it
is
haunted
.
It? and Betsy's eyes expanded while something like a cloud came
over her laughing face.
The house next door. The old house. Owned by a gentleman who
sold himself to the devil. Tenanted by
spooks
eh, Betsy?
Just as you have seen a sheet of clear and spotless letter paper,
suddenly
made hideous by a blot from an upturned ink bottle, so the face of
Betsy, round and joyous, grew black with a cloud of indignation.
Spooks? she criedand her voice grew shrillWho says it?
You, Jake? Or, Chon? Or, was it you, Pete?
The three dropped their mugs, and started backward with one impulse.
Not a word was said. Betsy stood in the doorway clenching her small
hand, while her face flashed, and her eyes shone with anger. Jacopo with
his mouth agape and his eyes expanding in a ludicrous stare, looked as
though he had suddenly stepped upon a rattle-snake.
Who says so? continued the indignant dameA pack of idle,
goot-for-nothing
vagapones to go apout tellin' lies apout a decent oldt house!
Aint ye ashamed o'yerselfs? Nefer show yer ugly mugs inside of my
toors agin. Ha'nted in-t-e-e-d!
Betsy paused for breath, and shook her clenched hand in the faces of
the affrighted villagers, who looked into each others faces, and kept
steal-thily
retreating toward the gate.
But Betsy, dey do say, dat te tefil begun Jake.
Betsy
spooks
has been seen thar' cried Chon.
An' noises heer'ddev'lish noises suggested Pete.
Betsy seized her broom. The affair grew solemn.
The broom, that peculiar weapon of all lonely and afflicted women, from
the trembling virgin who grasps it to immolate a spider to the injured wife
who rears it to admonish a drunken husbandthe Broom! It was the
sight of this formidable missile that made the pot-companions tremble.
Their retreat became a route. With one brilliant attack, Betsy worried
them over the grass plot and charged them through the gate.
Now ye
ornery fystes
ever say tat house is hanted agin if ye dare!
They went their ways, Jake cursing, Pete blowing and Chon
endangering
his blood vessels by a smothered fit of laughter.
Te
ornery fystes!
panted Betsy as she flung the broom away, and
sank exhausted into a chair, beside the wondering Jacopo.
Ornery fystes! This phrase looks mysterious. The first word is a
modification of Ordinary and is much used in the Land of Penn, to
express the last extreme of worthlessness. A spavined horse; a Bank
Director `found out' in his little speculations; a lady of fashion, whose
husband and lover come to fisty-cuffs, about her damaged reputation; a
lawyer who pockets fees from both sides, and drives a smart trade between
the Thief and the Bailiff; a sheriff elected to office by a certain party
and sharing all the plunder with the hungry ones of the opposite party
these all, in Pennsylvania language are
Ornery
.
As to the cabalistic word,
Fyste
we know not whether it is German,
Greek or Indian. Possibly it is Choctaw. It was once much in vogue
in the German districts of Pennsylvania. It is said to have been applied
in the first place, to those benevolent pilgrims, who journeying from the
land of Plymouth Rock, enlightened the benighted Germans by a severe
course of wooden nutmegs, horn flints and patent medicines.
Tat Yankee
fyste!
was the exclamation of a Berks County farmer
who had been persuaded to purchase a Patent-Right of an Improved
Wheel-barrow which was to go of itself; by
gravitation
as the Yankee
candidly observed.
But those days are passed. New England from the fountain of her
overflowing benevolence, no longer sends to ignorant Pennsylvania, her
former goodly offering of Pedlars and Horse-Jockies. She sends us
Preachers, Editors and Lawyers. They do not peddlenot they! Nor
jockey? No, Sir! Why our souls could not be saved, nor our minds
enlightened, nor the course of Justice go forward, were it not for these
Missionaries, sent to our benighted clime, by Old New England. In fact,
every path that leads to eminence or pennies, is macadamized by flints
from Plymouth Rock. They preach our sermons, they do our law, they
publish our papers, they write our histories. Pennsylvania could not get
on without them. And once a year they get together in some cozy hotel
as many of them as Society can spareand amid a wilderness of
chowder and punkin-pie, they drench themselves with Cider from Jersey
and Blarney from Plymouth Rock. Persons there are, who pretend that
New England keeps her Religion, her Intellect, her Liberality at Home,
and only sends abroad her Fanaticism, her Stupidity and Meanness. These
persons grossly err; we all know that Pennsylvania like a worn out clock
would stop forever, were she not wound up by a key, fashioned from the
iron bolt of that New England gibbet on which they hung Quakers in
good old times. Was it not a Boston Historian who told us the other
day, that William Penn was only great, because he came of true blue
Yankee stock; a kind of Quaker mastodeon from the fossil region of
Ply-mouth
Rock?
The word
Fyste!
was once applied to the Pedlar and Jockey;
now
In this modern day, the word has undergone strange modifications.
It has become a word of honor. It is no longer applied to the cheat, the
blackguard and the vagabond. It is now used to designate the learned
Judge who preaches Temperance from the Bench and sells licenses at the
Back-Door. Or, the honorable Sheriff who distributes Tracts before
he is elected, and after his election pounces upon the possessions of the
unfortunate debtor, feeding and gorging himself, even to the last shred,
until
you are reminded of a buzzard perched upon its festering prey. Or,
the Politician who hungry for office, and sworn to have it at all hazards,
prepares himself for his grave duties by a series of arduous exercises,
such as Obscenity from the stump, Libel in the newspaper and Perjury
everywhere.
These gentlemen are all known as Fystes; some of them, truth to
tell, well deserve the full force of the vernacular,
Ornery Fystes
.
My dear child, whined Jacopo, as the dame sat panting and
blowing
in the chair, whose capacious arms might scarce contain her bulky
lovelinessBe calm!
He handed her a mug of cider, and fanned her heated visage with his
three-cornered hat.
Be calm! echoed the panting dameIt's very easy to talk! But to
sit still and hear sich nonsense, apout a ha'nted house, spooks, the tefil
and all tat!
Then the house is
not
haunted, suggested Jacopo very mildly.
Good Lordt! N-o-o! and the Widow burst into a laugh.
No spooks there? Eh?
Spooks? Not even the spook of a cat,Betsy laughed until she
shook again.
Then tell me, my child, why it is shut up so closely, like a grave
vault, or a bottle of old wine, with its red cork covered with cobwebs?
The Reverend man, in the warm impulse of paternal feeling, seized her
hand, and looked quite tenderly into her eyes.
Because to folks who owns it is away in Englandt or Chiney,
replied
Betsy, with sudden gravityDo you think tat I'd live next toor
to a ha'nted house? I vos brought up rispectable, I vos. And I've
lived rispectable tis eighteen year, since I lost my huspand, poor Adam,
Gott bless him. A purty shtory inteed! Tat in my oldt tays I should
live next toor to a house wit spooks and tevils in it!
It is ridiculous, Betsy, nay it is infamous! cried Jacopo, with
becoming
gravity. For one I don't believe it. Get me a pipe, my dear.
Betsy rose in order to comply with this request, when a harsh deep
voice broke suddenly upon the evening stillness.
CHAPTER TWENTY-FIFTH.
THE VAGABOND.
And
so they say the old house is haunteddo they?
Betsy uttered a scream and Jacopo bounded from his chair.
The speaker stood very near themwithin arm's length indeedhe
had passed through the gate unperceived, and now pausing under the
branches of the oak, rested his hands upon his staff, and gazed into their
wondering faces, while the sunlight tinted his grey hairs.
He was an old man, very tall and robust, with sunburnt features and
long hair and beardboth as white as the driven snow. He stood
resting
his hands upon a knotted staff, while the sunlight revealed his gaunt
form, enveloped in miserable attire. In fact, he was arrayed in rags.
The garment that clothed his chest, and gathered to his waist by a leathern
girdle, descended to his knees, might have once been blue or black or
brown, but now its texture and color were lost in a multitude of patches.
His shoes, rent and torn, were bound to his feet by an intricate lacing of
rags and cords; his tattered buckskin leggings, clothing limbs by no means
deficient in muscle, were also fastened by strips of twine and leather.
And thus, staff in hand, the gaunt old man, clad in rags that a beggar
might have been ashamed to wear, stood between the gazers and the
light of the western sky, his silvery hair reddened at the edges by the
rays of the declining sun.
His sunburnt face and piercing eyes, shadowed by an old felt hat, and
framed in that mass of snowy beard and hair, were animated by
something
like a smile, as he surveyed the wondering pair. Here Jacopo,
with his mouth agape, his small eyes expanding in his blooming face;
there the buxom widow, her round arms crossed over her luxurious bust,
while her mouth assuming the shape of the letter O! displayed her
pearly teeth in even rows.
A very pleasant day, my friends, said the old man, his harsh deep
voice tempered to a mild and pleasant tone, while he slowly lifted the
hat from his white hairsAnd so they say his voice was harsh and
deep againthat the old house is haunteddo they?
Vonders vere he comes from, murmured Betsy.
Looks like a Ragged Rainbow, soliloquized Jacopo.
You do not answer me, continued the old man, with a smile that
showed that despite his years, his teeth were firm and white. Am I an
unwelcome guest?
Vots yer name?Betsy assumed a position of great dignity, while
Jacopo slunk quietly behind her capacious shouldersNever seed you
in tese parts pefore?
Pay-As-I-Go, responded the old man, and at the word, from some
obscure nook of his rags, he drew forth a crown of shining silver. That's
my name. And now I'll take some bread and cheese, or a bit of cold
chicken and a mug of cider, with a pipe of tobacco. Stir yourself, my
good woman.
Betsy was puzzled. Shading her eyes with her hand, she gazed
anxiously into the old man's visage, while the face of Jacopo was seen
peering over her white shoulder. Something there was in the manner
and appearance of the stranger that impressed the good dame with a
sensation
of wonder mingled with fear.
His peard is so white and yit his voice is so shtrong! His dress so
raggedt, and yit he handles money like a Lordt! Kin he want to steal
or murder?
These thoughts passed rapidly through Betsy's mind, while Jacopo,
pressing his lips against her smooth shoulderunconsciously you may
be surewhispered softly in her ear
Speak to him kind, Betsy. He may be an angel in disguise.
Betsy had heard of angels in a state of Paradisical nudity; she had
seen in her old Dutch Bible various pictures of corpulent angels, but the
idea of a Ragged Angel was too much for her gravity.
She laughed until the air rung again. But her merriment as suddenly
died away. The old man grew red in the face, he gasped for breath, and
sank helplessly in a chair, his mouth wide open and his eyes closed, as
if in a deathly swoon.
To seize a mug of cider, to moisten his lips and face with the fragrant
October, to chafe his hands with her soft palms, and slap him violently on
the back as you would slap a choking infant; all this was the work of
a moment.
Betsy was in her true element. Hovering round the insensible old man,
she looked like one of those substantial Angels, pictured in the Dutch
Bible aforesaid, while Jacopo, stirred into activity by her example, and
fanning the stranger with his coat-tails, brought to mind, a Dutch Satan
making mischief near a Dutch Eve.
Lordt if he should die on my place, we'd have the Coroner sittin' on
himGit som waterdash it in his faceshake him, shake him
The old man moved, at first very gently and then in the agonies of a
spasm. He clutched his staff and brandished it wildly to and fro, while
Betsy tried very hard to hold him in the chair. The staff came in
contact
with Jacopo's shoulder; as a matter of course Jacopo plunged rather
suddenly to the ground. When he raised himself again, and rubbed his
eyes, he saw a sight which made him doubt his eyes.
The luxuriant form of Betsy rested on the old man's knee; the old
man's arm was about her neck; the old man's white beard against her
smooth cheeknay the old manin his spasmwas kissing her violently,
kissing her warm lips, her cheeks, her chinkissing every dimple in
her joyous face. And in his spasm, he pressed her round neck in his
fingers, and gathered her massive loveliness, very closely to his breast.
Let me go! Be guit! Te tefil! screamed Betsy, completely
bewildered
by this spasmodic attackYou old fysteyou
The old man stopped her mouth with a kiss, and Betsy with one
desperate
bound escaped from his arms, and stood panting and glowing, her
kerchief disarranged and her brown hair floating loosely about her
blushing
face.
Jacopo could not believe his eyes!
The old man, recovered from his swoon, sate calmly in his chair,
resting
his hands upon his staff, while his aged face, turned from side to side
from Betsy who blushed and panted here, to Jacopo, who squat upon
the ground, rubbed his eyes without ceasingwith an expression of vague
bewilderment.
Excuse me, my good friends; he muttered wildlyWhere am I?
he continued like a man awaking from some troubled d eamO, I
remember
!
One of my spasms.
He passed his hand over his aged face,very slowly and with a
thoughtful motionlike a man who endeavors to recall his wandering
memory.
Spasms! ejaculated Jacopo rubbing his bruises.
Spasms! echoed Betsy, bursting with indignation, as she arranged
her hair and smoothed her kerchief.
Spasms, my children, said the aged man, Been subject to 'em
since I was a boy. It was beautiful to a painter's eye, to see that figure
of venerable old age, enthroned in the arm chair, under the oaken tree,
with Jacopo prostrate at its feet, and Betsy hovering near.
Get me something to eat, my good girl, or the spasm will come on
again, said the ragged venerable, while a curious light shone in his eyes.
Betsy turned away, enraged and murmuring, her great bust heaving like
an immense billow, as she entered the cabin door, while Jacopo rising
from the ground with a careful motion, seated himself as far from the
stranger as possible, observing him at the same time, as you would eye a
suspicious beast.
Devil take his spasms, he muttered rubbing his wounds.
Betsy returned, glorious in her full-blown beauty, but formidable with
festival array; a jug of cider, a platter of cold ham, a loaf of home-made
bread and a pipe of fragrant tobacco.
There, she said emphatically, Andt no more of yer
spasms
.
The old man cooly wheeled his chair, and set about his work. It was
by no means eating; it was actual work, that he displayed before the eyes
of the good Widow. With one impetuous movement he assaulted the
ham, carried the home-made bread by storm, and brought the cider to
close quarters. In silence, as though conscious of having a certain amount
of labor before him, and a fixed time for its accomplishment, the good old
man pursued his task. Jacopo sat aloof, his round visage rendered
melancholy
by a vacant stare; the widow sank into a seat, her voluptuous
mouth once more assuming an alphabetical shape, and writing a sort of
dumb O! upon her blooming face.
I thought I had an appetite, murmured the Philosopher. I say,
my good friend, did you ever in the course of your travels happen to be
shipwrecked,and if
so
did you ever happen to eat anybody,for
instance
,
a fat man, or a healthy child, or even a hearty little nigger?
To this polite inquiry the old man did not respond, until he had carried
by storm, the last bit of ham, and the last crust of home-made bread.
I feel my spasm, comin' on again, he saidhis eyes twinklinghis
staff once more in his right hand.
Jacopo moved his chair; the widow seized her broom.
26
I sometimes gits tem tings meself, and when I toes, I breaks people's
heads mit tis broom.
And that it was, that drove your poor Adam to see, some sixteen years
or so ago, said the old man, lighting his pipe, at the tinder box, which
stood on the table.
Reddening and panting the good dame started to her feet, satisfied that
the stranger was in fact, none other than the.
My husband!
Your husband (puff.) Poor Adam! (puff) He used te weep at the
memory of that broom. `Caleb,' says he to me one day, as we sat on
ship board together, if you should ever chance to get to Germantown, seek
out my wife, and tell her that the old broom was the cause of my broken
heart. (puff) Poor Adam!
The widow was dumb; the ends of her fingers trembled with a sort
of feline motion.
What would you say if Adam was to come back? continued the
aged man, Come back, sometime within a monthhe paused and puffed
within a week pause and puff againwithin a dayan hour
(pause and puff) within a minute!
My Gott! gasped the widow, sinking back into a chair, but
you
aint
him?
'
The old man leaned his head upon his hand, thus shading his face from
the light, while the Widow bending forward in her chair, awaited his
answer
in an agony of suspense.
This reminds me of Homer, muttered Jacopo, a Ragged Ulysses
and a Dutch Penelope.
Has'nt she a dog to know him, and then die? Even a cat would do.
No, Betsy; I am not
him
, said Pay-As-I-Go to give the stranger
his own name, Let me cut a long story short. Scarcely a year ago,
Adam died in my arms, somewhere in the West Indies. Yellow fever,
you understand? He told me to give you, this
He flung a small package, wrapped in brown paper and tied with twine,
into the widow's lap. The twine broke and the brown paper parted;
sixteen bright pieces of gold, started from the aperture, and glistened
vividly
before the eyes of the thunder-stricken woman.
Only dead a year! she gasped, Why ten if I'd married Chon Butz
a year an' two months ago, tey would have put me in jail forfor
Mahogany, suggested Jacopo
For mahogany, continued the widow, using this new synonym for
bigamy without a thought, that it was in the least degree incorrectOnly
a year! Poor Adam!'
She applied her apron to her eyes, and the bright pieces clinked upon
the ground.
The old man did not permit her much leisure for the indulgence of her
grief, for while the tears streamed over the blooming cheeks, he seized
his staff, and rose from his chair.
I have another commission to fulfil in these parts, he said Betsy
do you know anything about an old couple, who used to live in a cottage,
somewhere about the graveyard? Morton, I think they were called,or
what was their name?
There was a slight tremor in the old man's voice; his eyes, bright at
all times shone with unusual light.
Morgan, said Betsy looking at him from the corners of his eyes,
Very old folks they vos
Was? echoed the old man with a start.
Been deadt a year, continued BetsyNever was very well, since
their son, went away some two years ago. Old Abel and Hannah
sickened
and diedt within two days of each other.
The old man was observed to tremble, and grasp his staff, while his
features were violently agitated.
Dead! he muttered, What did you say was the name of their son?
Gilbert Morgan, said Betsy, But tell me more of Adam
Dead! again repeated the old man, And I had a message from their
son. Tell me,did they want for bread? Were their last days wretched
with povertywith hunger and cold? Speak, Betsy, forforyou
see poor Gilbert told me to see them,to give them goldand beg their
blessing on his guilty soul. Speak, I say! Did the old folks die the
miserable death of poverty and age?'
I was with 'em mesself, said Betsy, between her sobs, Tey wanted
for nothing while I was tere, andt I saw 'em laidt in te grave; but,
Gilbert
,
what ever became of him?
God bless you for that, the voice of the old man was tremulous but
earnest as he dashed a tear from his eyeYou were near them in their
dying hour. God bless you! As for Gilbert, what kind of character did
he bear in these parts? A wild fellow,drunken,eh?
Many a time have I seen him stand where you stand, when he was
quite a poy. A goot poy, too, butGilbert went away suddenly about
two years agonext christmas will be three yearsandtthere was
a young girl foundt murteredt back on the WissahikonMadeline
Dorfner
Eh, some village gossip, I suppose? said the old man with a hearty
laugh, but a laugh that from his previous tone, sounded hollow and
unnatural
.
This Madeline is dead, then,murdered by Gilbert Morgan?
There was a strange hesitation in the widow's voice, and manner as
she answered:
She has never been seen since. Gilbert murteredt herso they say.
But, as Gott sees me, I never believed it, and tont believe it nowtat's
all.
Well, well, a queer story! Little did I think when I pressed
Gilbert's
hand away in the Indies, that he'd been murderin' purty girls
on the WissaWissawhat d'ye call it? Good night, Betsy,see you
again sometimetake care that poor Adam does n't come back, and take
care of all strangers who are troubled withspasms!
Grasping his staff, the old man turned suddenly away, and with a hearty
burst of laughter went toward the garden gate, his silvery hair floating on
his shoulders, and his tall form, clad in rags, shone distinctly in the
evening
sunlight. He stood for a moment at the gate, gazing up the street
and down, laughing heartily to himself all the while, and then suddenly
dissappeared.
CHAPTER TWENTY-SIXTH.
HOW JACOPO SAW THE HORSEMAN IN GRAY; AND THEN REASONED ACUTELY
UPON A LIMB, A ROOF, AND A WINDOW.
Jist
look, cried Betsy to JacopoRun and see if he has n't sunk
in the groundt
Jacopo, however, being a Philosopher, calmly knelt at the widow's
feet, and examined the golden coin, piece by piece.
Good, all good. Doubloons, every one of them. Give yourself no
anxiety, Betsy. It is not the Devil; it's a livin' human being. Had it
been the Devil, he would have given you counterfeit money or bank
notes.
Consoled by this philosophic train of reasoning, the widow gathered
the coin in her apron, and as the separate pieces rolled together with a
musical clink, she muttered, as if by way of chorusPoor Adam! Andt
I should have been guilty of mahogany!
Jacopo sat himself very near her, and in his usual felicitous manner
attempted to lead the tearful Betsy into conversation. He laid his hand
gently on her round arm, and endeavored to make her speak of the
Haunted House. Betsy frowned, and pursed her lips at the very word.
Next Jacopo spoke of Madeline. Betsy jumped from her seat, uttering
a solemn ejaculation, which sounded very much like the monosylable
Pooh! Then Jacopo, as if determined to be agreeable or die in the
attempt, whimpered dolefully a word or two in regard to the departed
Adam, who had left his luxuriant Eve, to pine in grass widowhood, in the
cabin that nestled under the limbs of the oaken tree.
Betsy said Tush! and Pooh! in a breath, and then sailed grandly
into the cabin, the gold pieces clinking with rich music, as she entered
the door.
Lighting a pipe, Jacopo leaned his chair against the tree, and while the
smoke curled round his face,like incense hovering over the visage of
some Hindoo idolhe allowed his soul to meander at pleasure, amid the
mazes of a profound philosophical meditation.
If I ever get over the events of this day, I will forswear the world,
abandon the delights of polite society, and bury my genius and my sorrow
within the drear walls of a Monastery. NayI will found a new order
of monksthe holy Fraternity of Puzzled People. That shall be their
title; we 'll say prayers in a Puzzling garden, and the only texts for our
sermons shall be the Puzzles of this day. First, `Who was the elderly
man, who frightened Father Jacopo out of his wits, on the Wissahikon,
and converted him into an itinerant Post-office?' Puzzler number one.
Next and secondly, `Who was the old man who brought the buxom
Betsy some news of her absent Adam?' Third and lastly, `The Haunted
House, and what the deuce was in it?' There are three Puzzles, that
will occupy my Fraternity of Puzzled People for at least three hundred
years.
Thus ran the current of the Philosopher's thoughts, while gloomily
before rose the Haunted House, scowling above the humble cabin of the
forlorn widow. Jacopo's eye traversed the monotonous extent of that
gable wall, and Jacopo's heart grew cold, as he thought of the adventure
which was before him.
I am to enter that dismal den.How? Deliver this letter? To whom?
The letter was in his hand; he examined once more its blank surface,
and held its portentous seal close to the tip of his nose.
I would like to read it, but it's dangerous to meddle with the
correspondence
of his Satanic majesty. Ah! he exclaimed, raising his eyes,
That is a very important fact. There is but one window in the gable
of the Haunted House: or rather a round hole, without a sash. That
window may be reached from the top of the widow's cabin. And the
top of the cabin, in its turn, may be attained by climbing this tree, and
swinging from that crooked limb.
The solitary window, the top of the cabin, and the crooked limb, gave
our Philosopher an unusual degree of satisfaction. Leaning against the
tree, with his limbs on the table, and the pipe curling its mild incense
around his nostrils, he did not move nor speak until the shades of evening
began to darken round.
Then rising, he beheld the substantial form of Betsy, enthroned in the
cabin door, her eyes twinkling brightly through the gloom.
Betsy, my child, I will take a walk, and be back to supper in a few
moments. I have an appointment to meet a Reverend friend, up the
street. We have a theological point to settle, my dear, whether Roman
papists have souls, and if they have, what is to be done with them. After
supper, I will pursue my way. Have supper ready in five minutes,
my love.
Yes, Dominie, answered Betsy, somewhat won by the courteous
manner and profound diction of the Reverend man.
Jacopo sauntered forth, and presently arrived at the lower extremity of
Chew's Wall. The last gleam of day was playing over the verdure of
that beautiful lawn, and the evening breeze stirred with low music among
the trees.
But therenear the lower extremity of the wallhalting his horse by
the roadside, was the unknown, whose tall form was wrapped from
observation
by a long gray overcoat. His hat was drawn over his eyes; he
sat very calmly in the saddle, the rein thrown loosely on his horse's neck.
Good evening, friend, said Jacopo, as he drew near, and attempted
by a searching glance to gain some knowledge of the horseman's face:
You seem to enjoy the evening air?
You have a letter? said the horseman, in a quick, abrupt tone.
Jacopo started back as though the horse had kicked him in the breast.
That voice! a thought flashed over himCan it be
You have a letterfor me? the Horseman said again; and Jacopo
heard a scabbard clank against his boot, as the steed, covered with dust
and foam, pawed the ground with his hoofThe letter, I say!
Jacopo drew it from his pocket and placed it in the stranger's hand, still
anxiously endeavoring to catch a glimpse of his face.
Stand off,or my horse will kick you, and the Horseman, tearing
open the letter, read it by the fading light`
The son of Gaspard
Michael lives!
' he murmured, and then abruptly turned his horse's head
toward the lane by which Jacopo had journeyed from Wissahikon.
Here, fellow, is something for your trouble, he flung a gold piece in
the dust, and sunk the spurs into the flanks of his steed. Even as Jacopo
stood confounded and motionless, the horse dashed into the Wissahikon
lane; not an instant passed ere horse and rider were lost to sight.
It was many moments before our Philosopher recovered his composure.
It's
him
, he said, picking the gold piece from the dustI'd know
that nose and those eyes among ten thousand!
Absorbed in a train of novel and perplexing thoughts, Jacopo slowly
passed the Haunted Housepassed the wall, overhung by the foliage of
the neglected garden, the hall door, scowling so dark and desolate upon
the village streetand re-entered the widow's home.
The supper was spread upon the table under the oak; cheese and
home-made
bread, and toothsome ham, and a mug of spicy October. Betsy
was there, in all her charms; with a loaf in one hand, a knife in the
other, she stood ready to do the honors of the table.
Come, Dominie, here's your supper, Gott pless you
Betsy, my child, your neighbor at the corner of the lane, wishes to
see you for a moment. So she told me. You can go and see her, while
I eat my supper. That's a dear woman.
Betsy, all unconscious of a Lie from the lips of the Reverend man,
hurried through the gate, telling him in her good-humored wayMake
yerself at home, Dominie, and tont spare te vittels.
Jacopo listened intently for the last echo of her footstepsglanced
cautiously aroundand then, with the stealthiness of the cat, combined
with the agility of an ape, he sprang into the branches of the oaken tree.
It only required a moment to traverse the crooked limb; he stood upon
the peak of the widow's cabin, with the gloomy window of the Haunted
House within the reach of his arm.
Again Jacopo listenedhis heart beat wildlyall was still and
shadowy
aroundno voice nor ray came from the dark aperture, by which
he was about to enter the mansion.
Jacopo hesitated; he cast a longing glance toward the crooked limb,
and then his eye rested lovingly upon the supper, spread so temptingly
beneath the leaves.
Shall I return? I can escape to Philadelphia, and get beyond the
reach of this Demon?
Poor Jacopo was in his saddest Puzzle! To go forward was,
perchance
,
to encounter the Devil in bodily form; but to go backward was
and no perchanceto meet the Gallows!
I'll risk the Perchance! said Jacopo, as he felt for the mysterious
letter, in the depth of his pocket. Now then, for the last Puzzle?
Shivering all over as with an ague chill, he drew himself up to the
window, and with a groan plunged into the garret, and into the darkness
of the Haunted House.
CHAPTER TWENTY-SEVENTH.
THE VAGABOND AGAIN.
His
heels had scarce disappeared within the window, when the
foot-step
of Betsylight and tripping for such a substantial beautywas heard
in the garden.
Why, Dominie, how could you tell sich a fib, she exclaimed, as she
burst through the gate, Tere aint nopody at home over the way, but the
cat, andt she gazed wonderingly through the gloom, which was only
broken by a broad streak of light pouring from her cabin door. Gott
pless us! The Dominie's gone too!
The Reverend man was indeed gone; but in his place at the table under
the oak, appeared the tall figure of the old man, whose costume of rags,
combined with his sudden spasms, had made such an impression on the
good widow, not an hour before.
His cheeks resting on his hands, while his staff leaned against his
chair, he sat beside the table, with his back turned to the light. His grey
hair, stirred gently by the evening breeze, was only touched by a glimpse
of light; all the rest of his form was wrapped in vague shadow. He did
not heed the approach of the widow, nor raise his head, but remained
as motionless as the trunk of the old tree, whose branches fluttered
above him.
The widow started back when she first became aware of this
unexpected
Apparition, with as much terror as a thoroughly bred lady would
experience at the sight of a spider dangling playfully before her nose.
You here agin!
The old man did not manifest the least consciousness of her presence.
Did you put the Dominie in yer pocket?
Still the same statue-like immovability; not a word or gesture from
the ragged wanderer.
He aint teadt is he? It aint decent to come and die dis way, afore a
lone woman's toor. It's rale ornery
Betsy, the old man spoke, but in a tone so changed and deep, that
the good woman felt an involuntary thrill pervade her veins at every
accent; I've been in the graveyard
Lordt! He's peen in the graveyard! gasped the Widow sinking into
a chairToes he sleep there o' nights?
I saw a white tombstone, very plain indeed, but to all appearance
recently
placed there. It bore neither the record of a birth nor a death, only
the simple words `
To the Memory of Madeline?
' There was no grave;
no sign of a buried corpse.
Beside this tombstone, I saw another, also new and white, and without
a grave. `
To the Memory of Gilbert Morgan
.' Now, Betsy I want you
to tell me what it all means? Gilbert Morgan I'm sure did not die in
these parts, and as for this Madelineis it the same of whom you spoke
awhile ago?
The fery same, replied Betsy as the old man turned his head and
bent the full light of his eyes upon her face, which illuminated by the rays
from the cabin doorway, betrayed in every feature, a mingled and
inexplicable
emotion.
Madeline is dead, then? the voice of the old man was lower, deeper,
his gaze made Betsy afraid.
To pe sure,everybody says so, she replied, hesitating on every
word.
She is buried beneath that tombstone? You don't mean to say it?
Thus speaking the old man rose, and grasped her firmlyrather rudely
by the wrist, as she stood in the centre of the belt of light.
Betsy shrunk, she knew not why from his intense look. She `felt
afraid' at the sound of his voice. So tall, so poverty-stricken, so
way-worn
,
and yet in such an attitude of command, that white-haired old man
stood before her, while the silence of evening was all around, grasping
her by the wrist and urging his question, in a firm emphatic tone, that the
good Widow felt her blood tingle and grow cold by turns, and at the same
time could not turn her eyes away from his face.
It's none of my pizness. Go a-way! Jist let go my handt if you
please!
The blood rushing once more to her face, she shone out in all her
dignity
,
radiant as the full moon after an eclipse.
Very well, my child, the old man laughedJust as you please.
I'll light my pipe and go on my way.
And then with a cool impudence that thrilled Betsy to the heart, he
strode very leisurely along the walk, and disappeared into the door of her
cabin. She saw him, in a moment, in the act of lighting his pipe by her
candle. She waited for him to come forth, but he did not seem to be at
all hurried, for while the dame, in all the palpitations of fear and wonder,
stood hesitating under the oak, a cloud of tobacco smoke rushed from the
cabin door. Should she call the neighbors? Should she summon the
magisterial dignataries of Germantown, to take the stranger into custody,
and commit him to prison under a serious charge of poverty and rags?
But ten he may tell the folks apout my poor Adam, was the thought
of the window, as boldly turning her steps to the door, she resolved to
enter
her cottage, and dare the worst.
She entered. A tallow candle, inserted in an iron candlestick, which
stood upon an oak table, revealed the cleanly features of the apartment,
whose whitewashed walls sequestered Betsy's charms,  and cider
from the gaze of the profane world. It was the principalalmost her
only room. It was cleanly to a fault. The walls were white as her
kerchief
;
the floor scrubbed and sanded to the last extremity of cleanliness;
from the open cupboard in one corner, her burnished pewter shone like
silver; the very table on which the candle stood, looked as if Betsy had
been polishing it, under the strong impression that it was made of some
kind of precious metal, and would shine like a looking glass some day.
In the way of ornament, or luxury, there was a round Dutch clock
hung in one corner, with its pendulum and chain, swinging away, over the
whitewhashed wallfree from any thing like a caseand reminding you
of a transfixed beetle, dangling its broken legs in the air. A looking glass
too, shone from the wall, near the clock, its walnut frame, adorned with a
boquet of roses, violets, and lilies, in the centre of which, by way of
capping
the climax, was placed a huge sun-flower. Over the broad but
fireless
hearth, hung two dingy and smoke-darkened engravings, one
representing
a Shepherdess, feeding her lamb, and the other picturing the
renowned
Doctor Faustus, in the act of selling his soul to the Devil.
These pictures were evidently the work of some Flemish artist, who
deluded by no vague idea of the ideal or spiritual in beautytook for his
rule, Bulk for Expression, and Quantity for Grace. The Shepherdess
was a fat, blooming damemore substantial even than the good Widow
herselfand the lamb which she was feeding, was evidently a Premium
Lamb, in its way, for it was lost in a wilderness of white wool, and
seemed big enough to feed a whole corporation of Aldermen. As for
Doctor Faustus he was a jolly Burgomaster, with cheeks like pippins and
a nose like a red hot coal; the very Devil himself was inclined to fatness,
and looked as if his only drink was beer.
Such was the apartment into which the ragged wanderer, had intruded
with so little ceremony.
He was seated in the arm chair, near the table, anxiously perusing a
slip of paper, which he held near the light. As he read, he smoked, and
seemed determined not only to make himself perfectly at home, but to
wrap his visage in an impenetrable fog of tobacco.
Some folks seem to make 'emselves at homeany how, said the
Widow rather sarcastically.
Betsy, said the old man without raising his gaze from the slip of
paper, How shall I get inside of the Haunted House?
The question was asked very calmlyalmost carelesslyand yet the
Widow could not believe her ears. From some cause or other, not yet
revealed to us, the very name of the Haunted House, made Betsy's
dimples
disappear in one ominous frown, while her capacious bust heaved
under the white kerchief, and the color went and came on her plump
cheeks, with the rapidity of lightning.
Wot did you say? she cried,rising, folding her white arms over
her bustand looking into the old Man's face with eyes like saucers.
The Haunted House. That is what I said. How shall I get into it?
You must know. You live next door. It would be funny if you did n't.
And the old fellow puffed and read, as if for a wager.
Tont you know that house is Ha'nted? Tere's spooks and ghosts
and te oldt Sam himself in it; said Betsy waving the forefinger of her
right hand with an ominous gesture.
The very thing I'd like to see. Why bless your soul I never saw a
ghost in my life. I'd sooner see one that eat my supper.
Then go into it, and see 'em. I tont hinder you.
Yes, yes, my good girl, but you
do
hinder me. How shall I get in?
looking keenly at her, from the shadow of his uplifted handYou ought
to know?
Me! cried Betsy in a spasm of virtuous indignationDo I look
as if I had any thing to do with ghosts?
She certainly did not. No ghostsave the Ghost of a Flemish painter
but would have been frightened at the exuberant life of her full moon
face.
The old man rose, and advanced toward the hearth with a measured
stride.
This is a fine closet,this between the fire-place and the wall, and
as he spoke he turned the button of the closet door.
It did indeed seem as if these words and the accompanying action, had
frozen every drop of blood in Betsy's veins. Her hands dropped on her
lap; she muttered a prayer in German.
Let's see what's inside o' 't, said the ragged wanderer. Betsy with
colorless face and expanding eyelids, watched his every movement. He
opened the door, and the closet, wide and roomy, with oaken panels, was laid
bare to the light.
Rather singular, Betsy, the back part of the closet, is boltedd' ye
hear? Bolted just like a door! Where does it lead you to? the old man
turned his face over his shoulder, and looked at her with a sneering
grimace
Into
the next house, may be? Ho, ho, my girl did you think to
fool me?
Betsy slid from the chair upon her knees.
Tont! Tont! For Gott's sake, tont! she gasped, clasping her
hands, while a mingled look of terror and entreaty convulsed her face
You tont know what you doyou tont know what you do and she
wrung her hands as she knelt upon the floor.
The old man with his finger on his lip, regarded her for a moment with
a searching look.
There is more in all this than meets the eye, by Jove! he
advanced
,
and took the candle from the table, By the Lord Harry, but I
believe this paper tells the truth. We'll see.
Candlestick in hand, he entered the closet and drew the bolt, and at the
same moment Betsy bounding from the floor, crossed the room with a
spring, and grasped him nervously with both hands.
The old man started as he beheld the terrorthe wild affrightthe
almost grotesque entreaty painted on her face
If you go on I'll holler murter! she whispered, clenching his right
arm with both hands.
Do so! Call the neighbors, and after I've told 'em of poor Adam's
death, I'll tell them that there's been a murder committed in the next
house, and myself and the neighbors will go in together. Holler Betsy!
The widow as if utterly unnerved by this threat relaxed her grasp, and
fell back into a chair.
Gott pity me! Gott pity me! and she wrung her hands, while the
tears streamed down her cheeks.
CHAPTER TWENTY-EIGHTH
THE HAUNTED HOUSE.
The
old man drew the bolt, and the back panel of the closet opened
like a door. Light in hand, he peered across the gloomy threshold, the
rays streaming over his shoulders, and marking his figure in a bold relief
against the darkness.
A door cut through the thick stone wall into the Haunted House! he
muttered, and crossed the threshold.
Betsy as if driven to the last extremity of despair, uttered a groan,a
muttered prayer in Germanand the old man thoroughly steeled against
her groans and prayers, closed the door after him, and secured it by a bolt,
which glided into the thickness of the wall.
She's prayin' he murmured, listening at the panelWhat in the
deuce is the matter with the good woman?
Raising the light, he examined the features of the place. There are
certain faces, which strike you at first sight with an inexplicable feeling,
which mingles terror the most instinctive with fascination the most
irresistible
.
You hate such a face at first sight, and yet cannot turn your
eyes away from it. It suggests at once the idea of some terrible crime,
or of suffering too deep for tears.
So in the depths of the forest, where withered leaves give their harsh
echo to your lonely tread, and gloomy pines shuts out the daylight from
your face, you sometimes chance upon a scene that fills you with the
same indescribable emotion of mingled terror and fascination. This scene
may be a lonely pool sunken in the hollow of herbless rocks, and looking
as if the foot of man had never profaned its solitudeit may be a cavern,
hollow and vast, and agitated with the murmurs of dripping waterit
may be a grassy glade in the thick woods, full of herbage and flowers, and
yet so terribly still, so utterly isolated; without the hum of a bee to break
its stillness, or the mark of a footprint to disturb its profound loneliness.
Still in every case this scene of nature makes its mark upon your soul;
leaves there forever a sensation of fascination combined with terror.
If there are facesif there are scenes in wild naturethat possess this
singular power, so it has often seemed to me, there are chambers in old
and deserted mansions that have a character all their own; that strike you
at once with a shudder and a joy; that pervade your whole being with
the memory of a vivid pleasure and the dim consciousness of a hideous
crime.
It was a chamber such as this, in which the old man stood lifting the
candle above his head.
It was wide and spacious. The ceiling was lofty; the walls panelled
with sombre wood. Along the window,looking perchance into the
gardenhung curtains of rich texture and purple dye. The hearth was
broad and roomy, and above extended the mantle, adorned with a thousand
intricate carvings.
Such were the general outlines of the place, and yet it impressed the
heart of the gazer, with that mingled feelinga shuddering fear, an
overwhelming
fascination.
Had the thousand figures sculptured on the panelled walls, dusky now
with dust and time ever witnessed scenes of miseryof crimeenacted
upon the glittering mahogany floor? Had the lofty ceiling ever echoed
the shrieks of outraged maidenhood, or the last, low, gurgling groan of
lifelife snapt in twain by the hand of Murder? That fire place so
broad and roomy,how many scenes had its fires lighted in days bygone,
how many happy faces had clustered in its glow,faces of the Child too
new from Heaven to know Sin, of the Maiden just palpitating into Love,
of the Aged waiting with gray hairs, and sluggish blood for Death to come
and chill them into dust!
Thoughts like these steal on the mind in one of those ancient chambers
of a deserted home. It seemed to the awed intruder upon this silent
place, as if the isolated roombit with memorieshad a Soul.
The old man looked silently about the place, while the candle held
aloft in his right arm, cast its rays over his long, white hair, and beard
waving on his breast: over his tall frame, clad in beggar's rags, and made
a circle of light around him, leaving all beside in twilight obscurity.
I have seen a Face, which reminds me of this room! he saidand
started at the sound of his voice.
The Face which he remembered had a terror also, for he trembled as
he spoke of it, although his eyes grew more vivid in their light.
This is the place, he said, The very room of which poor Adam
spoke as he died in my arms. `I had thought to take advantage of
it
myself'
he said,how his white lips quivered, as the words were uttered
with his passing breath! `but I'll never see home agin'. Then he gave
me this paper, and says he, `if Betsy's alive be kind to herdon't let her
come to want, comrade, or I'll haunt you, by !' About an hour
after that he died.
The old man placed the light upon the mantel, and held before its rays
the slip of paper, which he so anxiously perused not many minutes before.
It was dingy and worn as though it had been handled many a time by
rough fingers, and the characters traced upon it, were written in a bold
yet rugged hand. The words which it bore were few,without comma
or periodand to all appearance without a meaning.
Four rooms on the lower floor The Room next the
garden south of the hall under the Harp
Under the Harp, murmured the old man, passing around the room
light in hand, and examining with a keen glance the carvings which
adorned the panels: Here are angels and devils, and all sorts of odd
images
cut in black wood, but as for a Harphey? Let's see? Nothing
o' th' kind here,nor herezounds! I must have mistook the room.
He traversed the room many times, not only perusing the panels as
though they were the leaves of some precious book, but carefully
examining
the figures carved upon the mantel-piece, and raising the candle
above his head, as he attentively surveyed the ceiling. His search was
however in vain.
Nothing like the figure of a Harp met his gaze.
Yet Adam believed in it; a straight story, too, and told just before he
died. If I find itif the story is trueififcurses upon that
if!
He clenched his right hand, pressed his nether lip between his teeth,
and muttered an oath as he glided on tip-toe along the dusky floor.
If
! Then I may escape, yes escape from this
He paused; the words died on his tongue, as though a sudden memory
had frozen his utterance. Tremblingwrithing in every nervehis face
distorted and his eyes sunken in their socketshe seemed to struggle and
struggle in all the bitterness of despair, with a more than mortal anguish.
What ray of hope? Not onenot one! Like a man buried alive,
I feel the coffin lid upon my breast, but cannot move.
He placed the light upon the mantel, and covered his face with his
hands.
We may not picture the full agony of that moment, nor reveal the
cause of the old man's measureless woe! Scalding tears were on his
cheekswith a curse he dashed them away, and raised his flashing eyes
toward the light.
I must be gone. I must leave this place. There is work for me,a
dog's work and a devil's wages!
Turning away, his eye was arrested even as he raised the light, by a
small hook which projected from the panel above the mantel. There was
a belt suspended from this hook, a belt of many dyes, whose vivid
contrasts
glared upon him from the dark background of the wainscot. He
seized the belt with an eager gesture; he held it to the light; it needed
no second glance to ascertain its use and purpose.
CHAPTER TWENTY-NINTH.
THE BELT OF WAMPUM.
It
was a Belt of Wampum, woven with those heiroglyphs which are
letters, learning, Memory to the Red Man.
The Belt of Yoconok! he gasped, in a broken whisper.
Then, as if this wampum string, rich with the enigmas of the Indian's
history, brought home to himthe wandering beggarsome memory of
his own life, in hues of terrible distinctness, he sank upon his knee and
his head dropped on his breast. Upon the broad stones of the hearth he
knelt, while the light from above shone upon his gray hairs, as they
trembled
with the strong impulse which shook his frame.
Before his fixed eyeballs, upon the very slab on which he knelt, the
figure of a Harp appeared, sculptured in the dim red stone. He saw it,
but heeded it not.
Impelled by some unknown but powerful cause, he had sought for it
earnestly and long, but now that it was thrust upon his sight, he did not
think it worthy of a moment's thought.
The Wampum Belt, which he grasped with a quivering hand, carried
his soul to other days; called up before him the face of the beautiful
andDead.
How came it here? he gasped, Whose work is this? Is it another
trick of the Devil,or can it be a token of forgiveness?
Starting from the hearth he seized the light, his features quivering and
his eye rolling wildly, as he hurried to the door of the chamber.
I must search this den, he cried, with an oathFor the living I do
not care, and as for the dead, there is one now sleeping in the sod who
would not harm even me.
Then out into the gloomy and silent hall, with its broad staircase and
dusky wainscot, he hurried, and through the rooms of the lower floor,
rooms stored with antique furniture, but still and breathless as the grave.
Massive mirrors returned the rays of his candle in broken flashes; velvet
carpets gave no echo to his frenzied step; pictures framed in gold and
seen in mingled light and shadow, seemed to sneer and scowl as he
went by.
Three gorgeous chambers were those on the lower floor, with dust and
cobwebs upon their antique furniture; with their windows sealed from the
light of sun or star; their very atmosphere breathing of desolation and decay.
The old man searched them all, and then his foot was on the wide
staircase which led toward the upper rooms of the forsaken house. He
listenedthere was no sound. A night deeper and more death-like than
the night without, reigned through the place. The old man went up the
stairs, and reached the last step, when a sudden blastlike the air
pouring
through an open doorextinguished his light.
He was alone, in the thick darkness, alone in the intense night of that
Haunted House. Haunted indeed to him, for the Wampum Belt which
he grasped, evoked the Ghosts of memory, and he saw, even through
the darkness, a pale face and a blood-bedabbled breast, as he had seen them
in other days.
Clasping the railing of the staircaseafraid of his own footstep's echo,
he peered through the darkness, while his heart leaped to his throat.
Slowly, as his eyes became more accustomed to the gloom, he became
conscious that a broad window, at the end of the corridor was open, with
a gleam of starlight and a breath of evening air stealing through its parted
curtains. This window looked out upon the neglected garden.
There was a long pause of hesitation and doubt. The old man,
completely
bewildered by a train of irresistible emotions, aroused into life by
sight of the Wampum Belt, knew not which way to turn. That vast,
gloomy, soundless old mansion, struck him with a mysterious interest and
yet with a creeping terror.
Curses on it! The light is gone, and I dont know which way to
move. What hand opened that window? Can this dreary old place be
occupied? Shall I move forward, andperhapsfall over a coffin in the
dark, or feel the bony fingers of a skeleton ag'inst my cheek.
Turning his face from the direction of the window, he peered into the
darkness of the corridor, when lo! that darkness was broken by a sudden
and quivering ray. A ray that flashed into the gloom, lighting up the
dusky walls, and then was gone!
The old man held his breath, but felt his heart mount to his throat.
Was it a fancy o' mineI believe I'm goin' mad
That ray once more, flashing, not across the corridor, but from its
farther
extremity, and quivering in a long line over the dark floor, into the
very eyes of the bewildered man!
Hah! This passage does n't extend through the house like the one
on the lower flooronly half-wayand it is terminated not by a door
no! That ray came through a curtainI'd swear it.
Hurrying along on tip-toe, like a man who is conscious that the next
moment may plunge him into some frightful surprise, he presently touched
the curtain with his extended hands. He dashed it asidehis convulsed
features, framed in the waving hair and beard, were bathed in a gush of
light.
It was the light of a tall waxen candle, which illumined a silent and
deserted apartment. Hesitating on the threshold, the old man took in
the features of the place at a glance. Circular in form, hung with dark
hangings, the ceiling lofty and the floor glittering like a mirror, this room
presented vividly to his gaze, a table or altar, covered with a snow-white
cloth, and thrown into bold relief by the sombre background.
In the centre of this altar the waxen candle, in a candlestick of silver;
above from the dark wall, an image of the Saviour glowed in the light; and
a massive volume lay open upon the altar cloth.
The old man advancedwonderingpalewith every faculty of his
soul dilating with an intensity of suspense. These objectsthe table, the
Crucifix, the Bookalone disturbed the sullen uniformity of the circular
apartment.
It's the Bible, he whispered, bending over the book, An' that
Image looks as if it came from a South American Church.
Clutching the Wampum Belt with unconscious force, the old man
surveyed
the apartment, while its silence and gloom imbued his very being
with an awe which he endeavored in vain to dispel.
Hark! Was it a footstepor the sound of the breeze, among these dim
curtains? His arms dropped by his side; he bent his head, and listened
Again that sound, like the echo of a footstep; it came near and nearer,
it resounded beyond those hangings.
The old man glided back into the darkness of the corrider, and at the
same instant that step was heard within the apartment, which he left.
There was a pause; an unbroken stillness; the old man, holding his
27
breath, in the very extremity of suspense, andit may beterror,
listened
by the curtains but dared not look through their folds.
How the images of his aroused soulthe images of memoryof crime
seemed to take shape, in that moment, and glare before him, through
the night of the corridor!
At length he gathered courage: parting the curtains without a sound,
he looked within.
A white form was kneeling before the white altar, beneath the Divine
Image, with hands like marble, clasped above her head, whose long and
flowing hair, fell on her shoulders, pure and beautiful as snow.
The face he could not see, but the white hands clasped above the head,
the pure skin of the half-covered shoulders, gleaming through the
intervals
of the waving brown hairmet his gaze and yet he could not for a
moment believe that he beheld a living being.
It was the form of a woman, rounded and full, as though the bud of
maidenhood, had just opened its leaves, and ripened into perfect bloom.
The robe which clothed it, was white and loose and flowing and yet it
could not hide the outlines of a shape, which slender and full of grace,
was yet stamped in the rich mould of voluptuous loveliness.
Beneath the folds of the robe, the feet appeared, small and beautiful, and
looking like marble, when contrasted with the dark floor.
It was like the image of a Marble Nun, kneeling in the Sanctity of
some cathedral shrine; an image of deathless purity, centered among
images of gloom and death.
It was no ghost; nor marble form, but a breathing and beautiful woman,
full of life; with warm blood coursing through her veins. That glimpse
of her shoulders, seen through the mazes of the brown hair, told the story
of a young and beautiful shape.
And the poor wretch, clad in rags, clutched the curtains with
trembling
hands, and looked,while a ray of light shining upon his eyeballs,
showed that they flashedgrew dim with tearsand burned into life again.
Was it a voice that he heard? Low, whispering, scarcely audible, a
voice breathing words of prayer.
Had the world been his to give, he would have given it, but to catch
one glimpse of her face. She did not moveher hands above her dark
hair, she seemed gazing into the face of the Crucified.
What name was that, mingling with her prayer? The wandering wretch
who looked, and listenedwith eyes, and ears and soulfelt the cold
sweat start from his forehead.
It was the name of a Criminal; of a man doomed to walk the earth
with a curse upon his soul; a man capable of the highest deeds but
immersed
in vices the most repulsive,a Murderer.
And yet the unknown prayed for this wretchbut no, it could not be.
The listener had not heard aright.
O that she would rise, and look this way! It's worth ten lives to
look upon that facebut no! It cannot be. I'm only dreamin'.
She rose, and took the light and gazed slowly around the room. And
then passed through the hangings, and all was darkness. But he had seen
her face, her neck and shoulders, with a gleam of the spotless breast,
heaving above the ruffle of her loosened robe. She was gone, but that
face was painted on the darknessstamped upon his soul.
By! he cried, sinking helplessly on the floorIt's Madeline!
CHAPTER THIRTIETH.
THE OUTCAST IN THE CHAMBER OF MADELINE.
How
long he knelt he knew not, but when full consciousness came back
again, he found himself in the darkness, grasping the curtains of that lone
room, with stiffened fingers, and clutching stillwith his right handthe
Wampum Belt of Yoconok.
An hour may have passed since that bright Presence shone before the
solitary altar.
I must begone he muttered, pressing his hand against his damp
forehead. There is work for me yonder, among the hillsthe hand that
leads me, neither man nor devil can resist. But no! Not until I have
found out the secret of this placenot until
There came a Thought which chilled every vein.
He rose, and as if guided by some strange instinctor by Destiny
he soon discovered the passage by which the beautiful form, had entered
the lone room.
Along this passage he stumbled, in the darkness of course, until he
suddenly
passed between the hangings, and found himself in a large and
spacious chamber, where a single lightthe waxen candle of the place
of prayerwas dimly burning.
It is the room above the one, by which I entered this house the
thought flashed upon him, as he gazed around. But where is she? Hah!
Yonder,in the arms of her Husbandor paramour!
A strange thing it was to see that robust old man, stand so tattered and
wayworn, in the mingled light and gloom of that luxurious chamber.
Upon the threshold, his brow knit,the eyes flashing with a look of
ominous
brightnesshis lips drawn tightly over his set teeththere he stood,
clenching his hands, as he surveyed the place.
The light stood upon an antique bureau, whose jet-black wood, was
surmounted by a large mirror. That mirror, dimly glittering, reflected the
bed which stood opposite, with snowy curtains drawn together,the
carpet
of velvetthe hangings of crimson silkand the wan haggard figure,
standing on the threshold, the livid face, gazing in scorn upon all this
splendor.
It certainly did not look like the Haunt of a Ghost. The harp near
the curtained bed, was evidently swept by no spectral hand; that dress
of black velvet, embroidered with gold was not intended to clasp the cold
form of the dead; those jewels, scattered over the bureau were not
designed
to display their radiance, save upon the white brow or panting
breast of a young and passionate woman.
Even as I write, there is a picture of that scene before me. It is
rudely sketched upon a blank space in the original Manuscript, from which
this history is derived. Rudely sketched with pen and ink, and brown
with age, and yet it makes its mark upon the soul.
It is but a picture of a wild and haggard figurethe very type of
poverty
and agestanding amid the hangings of a lofty and spacious room,
and gazing with an indescribable scorn, upon its luxurious display. In
one corner, a snow-white couch, with curtains closely drawn, glares from
the darkness; and the scene is lighted by a solitary candle, which glitters
into the smooth surface of a mirror framed in gold, like a star shining into
a waveless pool. The Harp, the costume of velvet, the jewels on the
bureau, all are sketched; and from the curtains of the bed, appears a hand
and arm, which at once enchain your gaze with their faultless outline.
Indeed, gaze upon the picture as often as you will, your eye at last
alternates
between that haggard face, and the half-revealed arm of the unknown
sleeper.
Sleeping? Hah! The sound of her breath, and
his
mingling together.
A look by Jove, only one, ho, ho! Satan peepin' into Eden
Half-muttering these words, the aged vagabond or outcast, as you will,
drew near the bed, his hand wanderinginstinctively perchanceto the
knife whose hilt appeared at his girdle, among his rags. He reached forth
his hand to grasp the curtain, but as suddenly withdrew it, and started
backward, as if swayed by a new impulse.
Treading on tip-toe he approached the antique bureau. His haggard
face was reflected vividly in the mirror, by the rays of the candle. He
recognized it with a grim smile, indeed his laughter deep and mocking and
but half suppressed, sounded unlike the mirth of a human being.
Ho! What have we here! Letters,ah, ha! Let me make myself
at home, and peruse at my leisure these precious memorials of love!
This man so uncouth in his attire, so various in his speechnow
uttering
the broken words of deep and sincere emotion, now sneering at his
very agony, and turning his Fear into a jestreached forth his hand, and
grasped a mass of manuscript, which was laid upon the cloth of the
bureau
,
among the jewels.
A fine hand, too,delicate and woman-like! Confessions of love for
the Rich and Titled, mingled with curses for the outcast and murderer.
By the Fiend! he pressed his hand suddenly to his forehead. It seems to
me that this is some feverish dream!
Then seating himself in an arm chair, with its high back between the
light and the bed, he glanced over the manuscript. While the sound of
the sleeper's breath, broke softly on the deep silence, the old man gazed
eagerly upon those pages, which seemed to reveal the mystery of a
Woman's
Life. On the first page, in a hand tremulous yet bold was written,
title of the Manuscript.
CHAPTER THIRTY-FIRST.
CONFESSION OF MADELINE.
How
shall I ever recall the events of that fatal night! My blood
chills at the memory, and yet a fascination which I cannot resist impels
me to make the record.
Afar from my native land, surrounded by scenes of luxury and
splendor
,
my heart pants forHome! Home! In all the world there is no
home for me but Wissahikon. Could I but drink of its waters once more,
stand for a moment among its rocks and trees, and sunlight and
shadows
the
next moment I would be willing to die. Then a grave amid
those scenes of Wissahikon! Alas! Alas!
When the old man had read thus far he laid down the Manuscript and
covered his face with his hand. Many moments elapsed before he
resumed
the reading.
Let me, by recording the events of that fatal night, endeavor to bring
home the rocks and trees of Wissahikon! Strange and mysterious events
was ever fate, so dark and yet so inexplicable as mine?
31
The reader paused again, and cast his flashing eye toward the bed on
which the unconscious sleeper lay.
It's no dream, he muttered I'm awake I believe!
I remember unclosing my eyes, in that familiar room of my
childhood's
home, and even now, I can see
his
face lowering upon me, as I lay
stretched upon the floor. That was a fearful looklike madnesswhich
stamped his features, as awaking from my swoon, I reached forth my
arms to
him
and murmured, Gilbert! And yet he stabbed me
The paper dropped from the old man's hands. He saw his face in
the glass, those sunburnt features framed in white hair, and livid as death,
and started back, as though horror-stricken at the Image of his soul,
painted in the glittering mirror. Again a pause ensued. Still the sleeper
rested in her luxurious couch, unconscious that the eyes of a wanderer,
an outcast, had profaned the sanctity of her chamber.
Consciousness returned once more. I awokelooked aroundthe
room of my childhood's home was gone. Could I believe my senses
was I enveloped by the horrors of a nightmare? A pale blue light shone
in my face, as I awoke, and gave a ghastly radiance to the arches and
pillars
of a grave vault. Yes, my form unclothed, my limbs arranged in
the attitude of death, I was about to be shut up forever in the slumber of
the grave. NayI was buried alreadythe arches of my tomb were
around me; that pale light, was the ghastly meteor, which hovers over
the festering decay of the charnel.
The horror of that moment I shall nevernever forget!
I started up, and dragged my stiffened limbs over the cold floor, and
felt a sharp pain shoot through my bleeding breast. I was buried alive.
Thank God! There was an open door, yes the entrance of the tomb
was open. I hurried through into the cold and darkness, and without
knowing whither I fled, ascended stairway after stairway, and fell fainting
at last upon a bed, which stood in the shadows of a large and gloomy
chamber. I had escaped the graveI knew no more
After a troubled sleep, broken by a frightful dream,in which I saw
his
face and the uplifted knifeI woke once more, and became conscious
that a woman's form was slumbering at my side. I reached forth my arm,
and with a shriek the unknown woman bounded from the bed. Looking
through the curtains I saw her stand, so beautiful in the centre of the
gloomy roomIt was the Wizard's daughter! That lovely girl, whose
face I had often seen, in the forest, althoughas she swept so proudly by
meI had never exchanged a word with her.
The truth rushed upon me; I was in the house of Isaac the Wizard.
My heart was icean overwhelming fright, made me tremble from head
to foot. I remembered the scene of the night before, when in the silence
of the wintry woods, beside the dead body of Yoconok, I met the pale old
man, Issac Van Behme. I remembered his prediction, as he took my
hand, and chilled me with the wild unnatural look of his eyes`
No Bridal
Ring shall ever cross this hand. No child shall ever bless your sight. I read
it in the lustre of your eye, which is lighted by the fire of a changeless
Destiny! Alas! Alas! I pity and rejoice! Dishonor and a Sudden
Death will soon be yours!
'
The old man raised his eyes; he was trembling from head to foot
like a withered leaf. His visage displayed at once a kind of rugged
sympathy
mingled with a vague amazement.
This was the Prophecy, which he had uttered only the night before.
What fearful, what incredible events had followed that Prophecy! Not
Dishonor, no! no! Temptation is not sin; we may look over a dizzy
height and not fall
Madeline! muttered the old outcast, when he had read this
sentence
,
Thank God! Thank God!
But the wound inflicted by Gilbert's hand was still bleeding; my
breast was stained with clotted blood. And now, for what was I reserved?
The supernatural atmosphere investing the very name of the Wizard
the wild stories told about the hearths of Wissahikon, concerning his
compact
with the Fiendhis Prophecy uttered to me, only the night before,
a Prophecy almost fulfilled by events so sad and appallingthoughts and
memories like these filled me with terror worse than death itself.
Meanwhile the Wizard's daughter, pale and beautiful and convulsed
with affright stood in the centre of the room, rending the air with her
shrieks. Two figures appeared, Black David, the miserable deformed of
Wissahikon
The old man uttered an ejaculation, and bent down to the MSS.
with a more intense interest flashing from his eye.
And Isaac the Wizard. I can only remember that with the blood
oozing from my breast, I sprang from the bed, and clutched the beautiful
girl by the knees. Save me! Save me! These words I uttered and then
all was a blank,a blank only disturbed by the never-fading vision of
Gilbert's face, convulsed with the purpose of Murder, and Gilbert's arm
quivering the knife above my naked breast.
This Gilbert must have been an infernal scoundrel, said the old
man, with a sardonic smile. I should like to meet him some day! And
then he laughed to himself as though he had uttered an excellent jest, and
turned to the Manuscript again.
How well I remember it, that day when the dream passed away, and
I found myself stretched upon a comfortable couch, with the air of spring,
fresh with the breath of violets, blowing gently through the unclosed
window
of a large and luxuriously furnished apartment. My room in the
Haunted House of Germantown!
Hah! The Haunted House! ejaculated the reader.
Then first appeared my unknown friend, that kind Protector, who
has since wound himself about my heart by innumerable acts of kindness,
but whom stillit is ungrateful, it is wicked! I can never look upon,
without a tremor, a shudder.
It was terrible to see the expression which darkened the old man's
face, as grasping the Manuscript with both hands, he held it closer to his
eyes, devouring every word with a gloating intensity.
He drew near my beside. How well I remember the impression
made upon me by his face, his form! While the sun was stealing through
the unclosed window, I saw a man of some sixty years, with short gray
hair and a pale melancholy face, stand near me, with his hands upon his
breast. His attire, which indicated by its fashion and texture, the
gentleman
of rank or wealth, could not altogether conceal the defects, I cannot
say, deformities of his shape. As he advanced, I saw that he was lame;
his limbs mis-shapen, and his broad shoulders rising in an unsightly
hump. But his face, so pale,so steeped in melancholythe forehead
bold and high, with a single lock of gray hair falling down the centre; his
lips wearing a sad yet gentle smile, the eyes seeming as though they did
not shine, but burn in their sockets.I could not help being won to that
face, and at the same time I regarded it with a shudder. Such was my
first impression of that kind friend, who has been to me, Father, World,
Home; who has unclosed to my soul the golden worlds of Music,
Painting
,
Poetry; who has borne me from land to land, and taught the poor
Orphan Girl of Wissahikon to mingle unabashed with the throngs of
fashion, the liveried crowds of a royal court. Still, one drink from the
waters of the Wissahikon were worth it all!'
Wissahikon! It's a sweet word, and yet you were stabbed there,
girl, by the hand of this Gilbertthis murderer. The old man did not
wipe away the tear that rolled down his cheek. He read on; the
Manuscript
revealed a strange escape from the grave.
He, my more than friend, near my bedeven now I hear his voice,
whose tones charm the soul like bursts of subdued music:
`The hand of the Murderer struck in vain. You are weak and faint,
my child, but the wound is healed. Well was it for you that his hand
trembled!'
`But Gilbert,' I cried, raising myself languidly upon my bed`
Gilbert
!
They have loaded him with chains, they have hurled him into
prison. O, hasten to him; let him be free! He was my friend, almost
my Husband'
`Gilbert,' said my Protector, `
Gilbert is dead
.'
`I heard no more. It was a long time before I unclosed my eyes.'
`And thou, fair child, shalt leave these scenes. I will be to thee as
Father; thou shalt be my Daughter. These people who have wronged
thee, shall never behold thy face again. Wilt thou go with me to the end
of the world?'
His gaze penetrated me with an inexplicable fascination. I could
not help itI stretched forth my arms, and said, `Father!' The tears
rolled down his cheeks, and then he muttered wildly to himself.
`How was I saved' I asked.
`On that night I was journeying through the forest of Wissahikon,
when a poor deformed wretch placed in my arms the body of a
half-naked
,
and almost lifeless maiden.
Black David gives thee this
he said,
with a wild laugh, and disappeared.'
`Black David! The poor deformed! He saved my life thensaved
me from the Wizard'
`Black David is dead,' said my Protector, in a mournful tone, and
then told me how he had borne me to this house, keeping my very
existence
a secret from the village folk, while himself and a kind-hearted woman
watched by my beside. It was many days before I recovered my
strength. One night we left the `Haunted House,' and since that hour
my heart has never ceased to long for Wissahikon.
When the aged man had read this passage, he started from the chair
and drew near the bed, whose curtains enshrined the sleeper.
Black David was more merciful to you than Gilbert! he muttered
and touched the white hand as it projected from the curtains. Touched
the hand, with a gentle and respectful movement, even as a Devotee would
press the hand of a marble divinity.
Sleep on, sleep on, muttered the Outcast, as the sound of her breath
stole on the stillness, You can sleep in safety, for Gilbert, the Murderer,
is dead.
Gliding back to the light, he contemplated the Manuscript of Madeline
with a look of profound emotion.
There's much food for thought in your words, young girl, and it
makes a man's brain boil like hot lead, but to read your sufferin's. One
more glance, and then I'll go. What business has the devil in Eden?
Once more he took up the Confessions of Madeline.
How shall I ever record that scene. There are no words in human
speech to describe it; even now, the memory of that incident perplexes
and confounds me. It occurred on the Twenty-Third of November,
1775. We were sitting in our quiet home among the hills of Yorkshire.
The leaves were falling; from our window, a wide sweep of brown heath
stretched sullenly toward the river shore, and the mists of autumn curled
slowly about the distant hills.
My Protector was unusually sad.
`My child,' said he, seating me in a chair before him, and taking my
hands within his own, `This is a day dedicated to an awful memory. The
blackest day in the long calendar of three hundred years.' His eyes
assumed a strange glassy intensity; they were fixed upon me with
overwhelming
power. `On this day, sinless virgin, thou mayst save a soul,
which without thee, will be lost forever.
His voice went to my heart. And yet, strange as it may seem, I
fell asleep, even while he held my hands and looked into my eyes. My
eyelids grew weary; I struggled and wrestled with the slumber which
came over me, but in vain. It was not sleep, in the familiar sense. No!
My body was numbed; paralyzed; I could not move a finger, but my Soul
was awake, free, and full of life. O, the calm delight of that moment! I
was conscious that my Protector was there; I heard his voice, felt his
presence, and yet my body was paralyzed in a strange, unnatural sleep.
But my soul: it was like a bird suddenly set free, soaring into the sky,
high and higher, with unbroken light upon its wings. Then it was like
a waveless Lake, set in the hollow of some mountain top, without a breeze
to stir its glassy surface, even into the faintest ripple, without a sound to
break the profound stillness of its borders,calm, calm,unutterably
calm.
*
*
Was this magnetism? The Author has experienced sensations precisely
similar
,
while in `the magnetic state,' as it is technically termed. Some years ago, he
was magnetized by the learned and eminent Dr. Nott, President of Union College,
a man above suspicion of trickery or deceit of any kind. The sensation was one
of unutterable calmness; the Physical Being in a state of paralysis, while the
Mind was in possession of all its powers, and as clear and serene as a sky without
a cloud. There are, indeed, no words in language to express this state; you might
as well try to paint a finished picture with brick dust and a dry stick, as to attempt
the delineation of the
magnetic sleep
by the words of human speech. At the same
time, the author frankly confesses, that he would not believe any thing like
magnetism
,
had he not experienced a portion of its phenomena in his own person, G.L.
Then a new consciousness crept over me. It seemed to me that the
Soul of my Protector talked with mine; that I heard the Thoughts of his
soul,
spoken in a voice without a sound; such a voice as we imagine
when reading a favorite book alone;
it was, in a word, as though his Soul
had taken the place of mine, filling my whole being with its power.
While in this state, an incidentor shall I call it a vision? took
place, which I have never been able to comprehend or explain. Let me
record it as it appeared to me; it is beyond my hope to depict either its
causes or its full details; some broken glimpses of that incidentthat
Truth or Dreamare all that the poverty of words enable me to describe.
Thus it seemed to me:
My Soul escaping from the body, which sat dumb and paralyzed, in
the chair before my Protector's gaze, My soul traversed a space of some
hundreds of years back into time, and hovering invisible in the air of a
half-lighted chamber, beheld a deed which took place in the Sixteenth
Century.
It was in a room in some guard old Feudal Castle, lighted by a single
lofty and pointed window, which looked to the western sky, where huge
white clouds, were glowing in the setting sun. Even now I can see that
chamber, with high ceiling and dark purple tapestry,nay I can feel the
atmosphere of gloom, which seemed to brood over its antique splendor,
even as the broad gleam of sunshine, came through the casement. There
was the effigy of a Knight in armor, near the window, glittering sullenly
in the light; and in the shadows stood a massive couch, overhung with
drapery, and crowned with a Lordly crest.
Near the window, where the sunshine was brightest sat a woman of
surpassing beauty, clad in black velvet, embroidered with gold, with her
hair, falling unrestrained over her shoulders. She did not look like an
English woman; there were no looks of golden hair, twining about a
sunny face. No! Her hair was black as jet; her eyes large, dark and
wildly brilliant; her pale forehead, shaded by the jetty hair, was invested
with a lofty, almost hallowed beauty. She was very young; her form,
so fragile and girlish, seemed to tell the story of seventeen venteen summers, but
her face, pale and beautiful, stamped with unspeakable grief, indicated that
in suffering at least, she had already lived a life-time.
And upon her young breastit was bare, and her black robe, made it
seem whiter than marblehung a babe, not more than three months old.
A very tiny thing, that slept so calmly in the sunset rays, and laid its little
marble hand, upon its young mother's midnight hair.
No words can tell how passingly beautiful this lone woman and her
babe, seemed to me; the babe smiling in its sleep; the mother so sad
and thoughtful amid all this splendor.
Suddenly I became conscious of another form. It was a man, dressed
in a garb, that mingled strangely the costume of the Monk with the
soldier
.
He came from the darkness, stole softly behind the Mother, and
then I saw his face. The sun shone upon it; I beheld it, and it is before
me now in clear, distinct and terrible outlines.
It was the face of my Protector!
but oh! how changed, how
distorted
as with the conflict of infernal passions!
He stood behind the Mother's chairunseen and scowlinghis lip
tightening as he saw the babe, nestling upon her white breast. Then I
heard his voice
`Leola my wife, this is the Twelfth of November, he whispered
`Dost thou remember last year?'
Before she could turn her face to look upon him, nay before her
parting
lips could frame a word, his arm rose above her heada sharp blade
flashed in the airand the face of the child, was covered with blood;
blood which spouted from the mother's breast. Yes, the blade was
buried
to the hiltthe golden hilt, which shone upon that snowy breast,
amid the gushing blood, as if in very mockery of the deed.
The young mother did not fall; she did not even stir. But even as
she sat there in the chair, grasping her babe, she raised her eyes to her
Husband's face and died. Her lips moved just before her eyes grew
fixed and glassyI would have given the world to have heard her words
but her voice was inaudible. She spoke to
him
as she died, but that
low whisper melted unheard upon the air.
And the Husband, now convulsed with a Remorse as terrible as his
Crime, bent over the dead body, as it sate erect, and with repeated
out-cries
,
seemed determined to wrench
her last words
, from her pale cold
lips.
At this moment, I heard the
voice
of my Protector's
soul
, speaking to
mine
. Yes, it may seem extravagant,madbut while my Protector
clasped the hands of my unconscious body, his Soul spoke to mine, even as
that Soul was an invisible witness to a terrible scene of a long past age.
And these are the words, which that soundless voice spoke to me:
`Madeline! Thy soul is now a silent witness of the Deed which took
place centuries ago. Thy soul now hovers above his guilty faceabove
her mangled form. Tell me, O tell me in the name of the Murdered
Mother, and remember the fate of an immortal soul hangs on thy
answer
,
tell me, didst thou hear the
last words
which quivered on her lips,
ere she died?'
My soul framed its answer:
`No! No! Her lips moved, but her words I could not hear!'
Then the entire scene passed away. The vision, or the spell, term it
what you will, passed away. I awoke; the blood stirred in my veins
with a slow, languid motion; I unclosed my eyes, and found myself
sitting
in the chair, with the hands of my Protectormy Father shall I call
him? clasping my arm.
Never shall I forget the expression of his face! His eyes burned with
more than mortal lustre, his features were horribly distorted; his
quivering
lips were spotted with foam, and the lock of gray hair, swept aside
from his forehead revealed the cicatrice of a hideous wound, in the form
of a Cross.
`Go to! Go to! Thou couldst not hear her
last words?
Is it so?
Then the blood of Leola does not course in thy veinsthou art not of
my racesome beggar's offspring, I trow, left by thy gipsy mother, in the
woods of Wissahikon!'
As his face, deformed by unnatural agony, writhed before my gaze, it
seemedshall I write it down, that vague improbable suspicion?yes it
seemed to me, that I did not behold my kind Protector, my Father, but
Black David, the poor Deformed of Wissahikon.
He turned away with curses, and fell insensible at my feet, his eyes
glassy, and the white foam hanging about his lips.
The old man lingered over this passage, while his eyes, sunken
beneath
his white brows, glimmered with a sombre and glassy light. Not
a word passed his lips; the emotion which convulsed his frame, was only
indicated by his heaving chest and corrugated features. He turned to the
last paragraph of the Manuscript. It was dated June first, 1777.
Wissahikon! I have not seen it yet, but soonvery soon I hope to
stand among its leaves and flowers, and drink of its waters. Once more
I find myself wrapt in the solitude of the Haunted Housemy Protector,
leaves me for hours, for days alone. When I beseech him to permit me
to see the Wissahikon once more, he answersalways in the same words,
and with a strange, sad smile, `Not yet, not yet. Wait my child; the
appointed time will soon be here.'
To-day as I was thinking of `the old times,' when the poor Orphan
Girl dwelt in the woods of Wissahikon, without a care, I fell asleep
and dreamed a strange dream. The branches of those dear old trees, were
once more over my head; I was seated upon the moss, beside `the Indian
Spring' whose clear waters sparkle in the hollow of a rock. Every thing
seemed full of peace; bees were humming in the wild flowers; birds
sang in the trees, a wild tremulous song, that burst upon me like music
from Paradise; the sunshine came through the thickly woven branches,
and a single ray shone down into the bosom of the spring. I was happy,
O it seemed to me as if my heart rose with the notes of the bird, and
soared away in thankfulness to God. Gilbert was there, dressed in his
plain hunter's costume, with his rifle on his knee, as in the days of old.
Nay the Wampum Belt which Yoconok gave me was clasped in our
joined hands, as a token of unbroken faith, and I looked into his frank
honest face, without a fear. There was no sorrow upon his features, and
as his eye, rested upon me, he told me in a low voice how he would build
a cottage in the woods, and I should be his little wife and. But
at this point of my dream, a drop of blood, fell from the branches of the
tree, into the very bosom of the spring. That drop widened slowly, un
til the clear water in the rocky basin, looked like a pool of blood. I gazed
upward in horror, and among the branches saw a hand, grasping a dying
Dove, and crushing it slowly to death. It was the hand of Peter
Dorfner
:
I saw his face, grinning in triumph, among the leaves. Even as I
looked, another face was there, framed in the leaves, the visage of my
Protector,his lips were impressed with a cold sad smile, his eyes were
fixed upon me, with a look that chilled my blood. I started up in horror,
and flung my arms around Gilbert's neck, beseeching him to save the
dying Dove from the grasp of its murderer, when a hand was lightly laid
upon my shoulder, and a low deep voice, breathed my name. Turning
my head, even as I clung to Gilbert's breast, I saw the face of Reginald
CHAPTER THIRTY-SECOND.
MADELINE AND THE OUTCAST.
Here
the Manuscript abruptly ended. The name of Reginald was the last
word.
The old man, sat perfectly motionless, absorbed in thought. One hand,
grasping the Manuscript shook with a nervous tremor; the other, shading
his eyes, could not conceal the tears which rolled one by one, over his
sun-burnt face.
And while he sat before the mirror,an image of poverty and
wretchedness
,
encircled by the dim splendor of that chamberthe sound of the
sleeper's breath broke gently on the stillness, mingling with his
half-uttered
groans.
Reginald! he whispered, And who is Reginald? Ah, a light
breaks in upon me! Soh,good girl, it was Reginald, who put his hand
upon your shoulder as you clung to Gilbert's neck? And you think
kindly of Gilbert, too, but your `Confessions' end with the the name of
Reginald. That means a great deal; a world o' meanin' in that word
The outcast rose, and with unsteady footsteps approached the bed. His
lips moved without a sound, as he went, and once or twice his hand
wandered
instinctively to the hilt of his knife. Presently he stood beside the
couch, his face turned from the light, gazing in silence upon the beautiful
hand and arm, which appeared among the white curtains.
An' that hand has toyed with Reginald's chesnut curls, as his kisses
warmed her lips!
Trembling from head to foot, the old man parted the curtains and looked
within,his right hand all the while laid upon the hilt of his knife.
In the mysterious twilight of the curtained couch, she slept, her cheek
resting on her bent arm, her dark brown hair, rising and falling with the
pulsations of her half-uncovered breast. The fringes of her closed lids
lay darkly on her cheek; her paried lips, gave a glimpse of her teeth; a
flush like an opening rose-bud bloomed upon her face. Her form,
presenting
in its every outline, a type of ripened womanhood, lay motionless
as Death beneath his gaze.
Even as the Fiend, looked in upon the sleep of sinless Eve, parting the
leaves which shielded her form, as his breath polluted her cheek, so this
wan and haggard Outcast drew aside the curtains, and glowered with
ominous eyes, upon the slumber of poor Madeline.
Madeline! he whispered.
She stirred in her sleep, and her robe falling lower on her shoulder,
disclosed
the livid scar which marred the beauty or her bosom. The sight
of that fatal scar, seemed to madden the Outcast.
Madeline! he hissed the word in her ear, and grasped her roughly
by the wristAwake! Awake!
She started up in the bed, and unclosed her eyes.
God pity me! she whispered, shuddering as she drew her white
arms over her breast. This is some frightful dream!
Between her and the light rose the tall form of the Outcast; she but
dimly discerned his face, but his eyes, flashing with unnatural lustre,
penetrated
her very blood, with an icy shudder. She did not shriek, nor groan,
but folding her arms over her breast, gazed upon that terrible Apparition
with a vacant stare.
Madeline said the Outcast, and his voice was broken and faint
like the voice of an aged man, I have a message for you from Gilbert
Morgan!
Gilbert Morgan? Who are you that speak to me of Gilbert Morgan?
She looked very beautiful, as clad in her loosened robes, as white as
snow, she crouched upon the edge of the bed, and gazed wonderingly
into the Outcast's face, very beautiful, but her cheek was colorless, her
eyes wildly brilliant with terror, while her bosom rested beneath her folded
arms, without pulse or motion.
Come, Madeline, sit by me: I will tell you of Gilbert Morgan, said
the old man, and with no rude grasp, he took her by the hand and led her
from the couch toward the light.
She sank into a chair, never once removing her frightened gaze from
his face, while her clasped hands gathered her robes over her breast, and
her brown hair falling to her shoulders, made her cheek seem pale and
death-like.
He sat in the shadow with his hand raised to his brow, and his burning
gaze centred upon her countenance.
Gilbert Morgan? she said, as she endeavored to collect her
wandering
senses. What mean you? Ah! Old man, your gaze fills me with
terror! Do not harm me, do not for the sake of Heaven!
Harm thee? returned the Outcast, in a faint and broken voiceThe
old man is weak; he could not harm thee if he would. Thy hand, young
girl, can crush him into dust, even a hand so small and delicate as thine.
Listen Madeline! The good woman, who lives in the cabin next door,
gave me entrance to this house, and I made bold to enter your chamber:
for I have a message  a message of life and death, from Gilbert
Morgan!
Faint and fainter his voice became; the last words were pronounced in
a whisper. At once, Madeline's terror and her paleness passed away.
Her cheek flushed, her bosom heaving, her eye radiant with delight, she
started from her chair, and laid her hands upon his arm.
Then Gilbert is not dead, she criedHe lives! Tell me,he
lives?
The Outcast did not reply. So radiant and yet so pure, in her womanly
beauty, she trembled there, her hands laid upon his arms, while her eyes
lighted up with all a woman's soul, that the old man, touched to his very
heart-strings by the sight, turned his face away, and with his toil-worn
hand brushed away a tear.
He lives. That is, Gilbert lives. He sent me to you. And he sent
this token, so that you might know me for
his
messenger.
From his rags he drew forth the token, a hunting knife with a handle
of bone, and a long blade, darkened at the point by a blood-red stain.
This a token from Gilbert to me? Madeline's face became pale
again; she started back, and regarded the old man with a dilating eye.
He held the knife toward her, but her hand shrunk back, and the fatal
weapon fell at her feet on the rich carpet, with a sullen sound.
His voice was broken, husky, as he replied:
Yes, a token from a Murderer to his victim. He stabbed you with
that knife, young girl. You know it! Stabbed as you called him by
name, and reached out your arms to clasp his neck. He paused
hesitated
and
continuedThat's the only token from a poor devil like
Gilbert, to a lady so rich and beautiful as you, my girl!
And Gilbert lives! murmured Madeline, with an absent glance. Is
this no dream? They told me that he was dead
Dead: worse than dead, answered the OutcastA man that's dead
sleeps in his grave, and nothin' troubles him. Winter and storm,
summer
and sunshine, pass on, but still he's theresafe under groundat
rest. But as for Gilbert, he's not dead, but only buried alive. That's all.
Buried alive? echoed Madeline.
Yes, he's dead, forever dead to peace,to quietnessto what the
good folks mean when they use these words, `
a heart at rest with God
and man
.' He only lives to do the devil's work; he's only awake to
crime. And then it's his curse to go about the earth, like a ghost, bound
by a frightful oath, never to permit any one to know him as Gilbert
Morgan. Do you understand, girl? He may see the graves of his father
and mother, hidden in the corner o' th' graveyard, without a stone to mark
their resting place, and he dare not shed a tear over their ashes, dare not
plant a flower there, lest somebody might know him for Gilbert Morgan.
Did you ever hear of one condemned to walk about the earth, among his
friends,the scenes of his boyhoodinvisible to every one, and at the
same time seein' and hearin' everythin', without the power to speak?
Gilbert Morgan's that man!
And who, faltered Madeline, and she felt a strange sympathy mingled
with abhorence or fear, while she gazed upon the old manAnd who
has laid this doom upon him?
Hush! Do not speak so loud.
He
may hear you, whispered the
Outcast, with a low, mocking laugh, and yet with an accent of undisguised
terror.
He? Of whom do you speak? asked Madeline, her blood chilled by
the unnatural laugh, and shuddering tone of the old man.
He bent forward, while the light fell upon his white haireyebrows
and beardand showed the contrast between these and his sunburnt
features
and brilliant eyes. He glanced from side to side with a stealthy look.
Don't you know who I mean? he whisperedThat Devil in human
shape, or rather that Fiend's soul in only a half-human body, who puts
his witchcraft upon you, an' takes away your power over your own will,
and fills your brain with his own Soul. Cant you guess his name? He
may be far away from you,and you may know itand yet there are
moments when you feel that his soul is present with you, like a cloud
from , or when his Will stirs in your brain, and makes your hand
perform deeds that your heart abhors. Don't you know yet? he hissed
the words between his set teeth, as the affrighted girl shrunk from his
fiery gazeHe's sometimes called Black David, and sometimes Mr.
Rolof Sener, and again  but no! no! I dare not speak
that
name!
Madeline's face resembled the visage of a dead woman, while her eye
burned like a flame. A shriek died half uttered on her lips.
Rolof Sener! she whisperedMy Protectormy father!
Yesyes
Black David
, your Protector! Rolof Sener, your father!
Why, girl, I could tell you a story o' that Fiend, that would drive you
stark, starin' mad. Do you ever pray, girl his voice grew husky,
choakingDo you ever kneel at night, and ask God with a free heart to
bless you? Then I beg of you, sometimes pray for Gilbert Morgan, who
is sold body and soul to the Fiend in human shape, Rolof Sener!
Do I ever pray? said Madeline, a burning flush visible in her
death-like
cheekWhy he has often besought my prayers. He, Rolof Sener,
has many a time sat in this very room, listening while I have read from
the Bibleread those words which make the dying heart feel strong again,
and nerve the weary soul with life from God.
And yet the low, mocking laughter of the Outcast broke on the
stillness of the chamber, with a hollow emphasisAnd yet you
remember
`the Twelfth of November,' do you? The dyin' mother stabbed,
while her baby slept upon her breast? And Rolof Sener sittin' near you,
holdin' your hands as your Soul
by his will, mark ye
saw this crime,
committed by
him
, three hundred years ago?
Madeline was silent; the solitary flush which had warmed her cheek
died away; she fixed her large eyes, flashing with wild lustre, upon the
half-shadowed face of the Outcast, and clasped her hands, her lips moving,
tremblingbut without a sound.
28
Is this man or devil? cried the OutcastThis
Protector
, who puts
his spell upon a pure girl, and while her body is like a corpse, sends her
soul whirling away into long-forgotten times, and shows her what hellish
things he did three hundred years ago!
A fear has crept upon meI cannot deny itmany a time, while
gazing on his face, a fear and a shudder worse than death. And yet, to
me, he has never spoken an unkind wordhis eye never rests upon me,
save with a look of love,love such as a father might feel for a dear child.
When all the world forsook me, when the wound was bleeding on my
breast, and the unconscious body of the Orphan Girl was given to the
mercy of a cold winter night, then he was my friend, my only friend.
And yetand yet
Madeline buried her forehead in her hands, as though some Thought too
terrible for utterance, had suddenly gloomed upon her soul. Her hair
glossy and brown, flowing in copious waves to her shoulders, her white
robes floating loosely around her womanly shape, she seemedcontrasted
with the Outcast, so haggard and way-wornlike a pure spirit, summoned
into life by a wizard's spell, and convulsed with grief as the realities of
the world were made known to her once more, after she had enjoyed the
untroubled calm of the grave.The wizard, the enchanter sat near her,
glowering fixedly upon her face, with flashing but tearful eyes.
That's right, he whisperedYou cannot speak too badly of
Gilbert
Morgan. The knife with which he stabbed you, lies at your feet,
and doubtless the memory of his crime rankles in your heart. He rose
and stood before her, tall and haggard, with the light upon his face, while
his form was wrapped in shadow. Good-bye, girl, I'm goin'. And I'll
tell Gilbert that you speak of him with loathing, and at the same time keep
all your love for the fiend in human shape, or perhaps for
Reginald
.
Wasn't that his name?
The young woman started to her feet, and stood before him, pale but
beautiful, all that was pure, all that was impassioned in her soul, rushing
to her eyes.
Tell him, tell Gilbert, she cried, weighing every word, and looking
him full in the face, That the name of Reginald is to me, but as a sound
uttered in the delirium of a fever. Even now, as I speak it, my heart
leaps in my bosom, and yet that name brings home to me, no memory
save that which speaks of a proud Lord, plotting the dishonor of a poor
Orphan child. But the name of Gilbert
Gilbert, yes, his name interrupted the Outcast.
The name of Gilbert speaks to me of Wissahikon her voice fell,
the tears streamed down her cheeksOf Home!
She sank in the chair, and her tresses floated over the hands which
were pressed against her brow; the old man started wildly forward,
reached forth his arms, but as suddenly sank back again into his former
positioncold, erect, and to all appearance, immovable.
Can I say more? she raised her face, brilliant with tears, toward the
lightHave I not bared my heart to you? To you, whom I have
never seen before, whom I do not know,unless indeed
She gazed upon him long and anxiously, while he awaited the result
of her scrutiny in evident suspense.
Unlesswell, well, my girl
Unless indeed, you are my Protoctor,my Fatherin this disguise!
O, say, have you not done this to test my affection for you? But it is
not kind,it is not manlyto steal thus upon me at dead of night, and
force me to lay bare the secrets of my heart, by telling me that Gilbert
lives. Gilbert, alas! who has long since crumbled into dust!
He shrunk away from her extended arms, and turned his face aside from
the light.
At this moment, as she stood with outstretched arms,her face reflected
in the mirror, warming slowly into bloom once morewhile he started
back and concealed his face from the light, an incident took place,
witnessed
by neither, and yetit may befraught with the most important
results.
A hand appeared among the hangings, which separated this chamber
from the next; a letter was thrown into the room; it alighted at the very
feet of Madeline, and yet she did not see it. The hand then disappeared,
and in its place a red round face peered in through the hangings,looked
hurriedly round with large vacant eyesand then vanished without a
sound.
Was it the face of Jacopo the Philosopher?
Come, Father, confess it! This is a merry jest of yours to test my
affection for you, and at the same time learn the secrets of my heart, in
regard to Reginald and Gilbert. You know father, that Reginald was
only a passing cloud, while Gilbert's memory has ever been to me dear
as the summer sky, which smiles above my Wissahikon home. Could
the grave give up its dead, could Gilbert come back this hour, you know
you must knowhow willingly I would share his fate, and endeavor to
atone for the past, by loving his own faithful wife among the woods of
Wissahikon!
There was music in her voiceblushes like daybreak upon her cheek
light pure as the midnight stars in her large full eyes.
But I am not Rolof Sener, said the Outcast, in a voice thick and
broken as his chest heaved, and he turned his face asideI am not the
miserable Deformedno, by ! I am taller than he,your own eyes
might convince you of that!
Yes, yes, but is this hair, this beard so venerable your own? and she
burst into a merry laugh. Comecomefather, confess it! The man
who can so well disguise his face, can certainly add a few inches to his
stature. Ah, ha! Have I found you out? But it was not kind; indeed,
indeed it was a cruel jest.
Now
you will fulfil your promiseI shall go
to Wissahikon, shall I not?
Laughing, blushing, her bosom once more beating into full life, she
sprang toward him with outstretched arms,like a beloved daughter who
has foiled her father in some merry surpriseshe clasped him by the
neck, and her hair flowed over his shoulders.
He unwound her arms,thrust her gently asideand hurried with
unsteady
steps from her chamber.
She stood there like a statue of surprise, gazingnot after himbut
upon the spot where he had been, with a mingled look of mirth and
wonder, her lips smiling while her eyes gathered new light as they shone
with tears.
And all the while the letter which had been thrown into the room by
an unknown hand, lay unperceived at her feet.
CHAPTER THIRTY-THIRD.
GILBERT MORGAN!
Meanwhile
the Outcast threading the dark passages with hurried steps,
soon reached the corridor. Through its gloom he hastened, and
descending
the stairway presently stood in the darkness of the lower chamber,
his hands extended as he searched anxiously for the door, which
communicated
with Betsy's cabin. The door was found; the bolt drawn;
and there burst into the presence of the astonished widow, an Apparition
that might have frightened many a bolder heart than hers.
She was on her knees in the closet, praying in strong German and with
copious tears for the safety of the poor Girl, who, like a Nun in her Cloister,
was enshrined in the darkness of the Haunted House. She had procured
another candle; it stood upon her table, and flung a strong light over the
luxuriant form, whichkneelingbloomed securely within the capacious
closet. The bust of the widow rose and fell like a big wave; her warm
lips gave utterance to a melancholy litany of sobs, moans and prayers.
Te oldt fyste! she cried with a decided accentTo go into tat
house witout leave or license! And fot is to becom of me? Fot, I say?
[She did not say
what
on this occasion, but with emphasis, Fot!] Te
tefil as pays me for takin' care of te girl, will carry me off in a puff o'
smoke, an' brimstonehe willI knows he will. I nefer liked his eyes
-nefer, nefer!
At this moment the bolt was drawn, and the Apparition of the old
outcast
,
with tall form and haggard face, long hair and beard as white as
snow, gloomed upon the widow's eyes. He did not seem to wait for
ceremony for leaping over the widow's shoulder, even as she knelt
in her sorrow, he plunged through the closet into her room, and began to
caper over the floor, his white hair waving like a banner, as he whirled
round and round.
Lordt! cried BetsyFot next!
The old man uttered bursts of wild laughter as he performed this lively
exercise, exclaiming between every burstDon't mind me Betsy. I'm
only crazy, that's all. Have n't got as much sense as would make a
decent
Idiot of myself. You see I had to run from the girl, or I'd a-gone
stark mad.
Presently he brought his dance abruptly to a close; he flung himself
into a chair, and the widow started to her feet, not only astonished but
completely overwhelmed in all her modest instincts.
Untressin' hisself in my room! she gaspedTis is too much!
Fot next!
It was no dream, but a painful truth. The old man was engaged in
divesting himself of his clothing with the rapidity of a tailor's apprentice.
He did not take off his miserable shoes, but simply tore them from his
feet. Nor did he cut the strings which bound his leggings, but rent away,
and ripped away, until strings and leggings lay on the floor beside the
worn-out shoes. Next, his girdle fell; and then the tattered garment,
which reached from his broad shoulders to his knees, was lifted over his
head, and dashed at Betsy's feet.
O! gasped the widow, taking one interminable breath as her eyes
dilated in her blushing face.
Do not imagine for a moment that the aged gentleman had transformed
himself into one of those elegant representations of Ancient Statuary,
known in our modern days as Artistes,qualified with the big word
Modeland renowned at once for scantiness of drapery and decency.
Do not fancy that he had turned himself into Apollo bending the Bow;
or Ajax defying the lightning; or even that most renowned of all-classic
studies, the African alarmed at the sound of thunder.
No! He had thrown aside his shoes and leggings, but in their place
appeared a pair of stalwart limbs, encased in boots of black leather, and
hose of red velvet; the ragged garment he had flung at Betsy's feet, but
where it had dangled its rags, the widow now beheld a coat of rich velvet,
green embroidered with gold, clothing a broad and muscular chest, and
gathered to a manly waist, by a glittering girdle, adorned with a dagger
with golden hilt, and a pair of pistols mounted in silver.
The long flowing beard, the waving hair white as snow, alone prevented
the widow from deciding that this sudden transformation had converted a
miserable outcast into as handsome a cavalier, as ever eyes of woman
looked upon.
Ah! ejaculated the widow, drawing another breath in a paroxysm of
delight and wonderTat is nice!
The outcast started to his feet, displaying a magnificent form, almost
of giant stature, clad in a dress which showed to advantage its manly
proportions
,
and at the same time gave it something of a military air. His
hair and beard so white and long, presented a singular contrast to his
youthful form and elegant attire.
Betsy, how do I look now? he said, lifting at once his old felt hat,
his hair and beard from his head, as you would raise your hat in the
course of a polite bow. Do you know me, girl?
There was no sign of withered age upon the face, which now caught
the rays of the light. A hardy, sunburnt face, with a thick brown beard
about the firm chin and muscular throat; a face boldly featured, lighted
by clear blue eyes, and with short and copious curls of chesnut hair,
clustering
around a frank open forehead, which was darkened only by one
deep wrinkle and a single scar.
Gott pless us! cried the widow, with her eyes raining tearsIts
the teadt come back to lifeit's Gilbert Morgan, or his ghost!
Yes, Gilbert Morgan is no longer afraid of his own name, no longer
in the power of the Fiend! As he spoke he rose to his full stature, and
his form was knit in every muscle, his eyessunken beneath the
compressed
browslighted by all the resolution of his iron will.
From this hour I defy him, and cast off his chains. If he comes to
me in human shape, why a pistol or a knife will do his work forever.
But if he is, indeed, a devil in a half-human body, why, Madeline shall
pray to God for me. Her soul is pureher prayer will be heard.
What you mean, Gilbert? faltered Betsy.
He turned to her, and the cloud passed from his face; his eyes fairly
danced with joy.
Come, Betsy, we will go to Madeline! She will know me now, and
d'ye hear, Betsy? There 'll be a cottage soon, under the shadow of a
big rock, by the Wissahikon shore, a cottage for Gilbert and his wife.
And you shall come and live with us, Betsyno more spasms, ha, ha!
Forgive me. Betsy, for I've led a wild life, but now it is over. Come
softlylet us steal gently up the stairs, and ask her where the old man
has gone!
While he spoke, his eye dancing, his chest heaving in broad and deep
respirations, every tone of his voice tremulous with an intensealmost
maniacjoy, he led the way through the closet into the lower room of
the Haunted House. Betsy followed him with hands upraised, and
eyes dilating, while her mouth assumed once more the shape of a
capital O!
D'ye see that Harp carved on the middle stone of the fire place?
There's money under that stone, Betsy, money buried there years ago by
a rich merchant, who made his millions in the slave trade, and died of the
fear of poverty. Comenever mind it now; we'll see Madeline first,
and talk of the money afterwards.
Up the stairs and through the corridor, holding the light above his head,
while Betsy follows at his heels, rubbing her eyes in order to assure
herself
that it is no dream. They reach the entrance of the place of prayer
where the white altar stands alone in the gloom, and the Image of the
Crucified smiles over the Holy Book.
Wait here, Betsy; I will go alone. Take the light and wait; in a
moment I will call you. O! if you only knew how my heart went
leapin'
to my throat, as she put her arms about my neck, and yet, I was
afraid to tell her my name.
With these words he left the good widow standing at the end of the
corridor, and passing through the silent Oratory, soon stood on the
threshold
of Madeline's chamber.
Madeline! he calledin the familiar voice of the olden timebut
there was no answer. His hand upon the curtains, which protected the
entrance of her chamber, his form veiled in their shadows, he called again:
Madeline! Madeline! It is IGilbertcome back to life again!
He listened, while the blood swept like molten fire in every vein; he
listened, but there was no reply.
He parted the curtains and entered her chamber, reaching forth his arms
to clasp her to his heart.
The light still glimmered in the mirror, shedding a dim ray over the
luxurious furniture and white-curtained bed, butMadeline was not
there.
Gilbert paused in the centre of the room, looking from side to side, with
a vague and bewildered stare.
She is gone! he cried, with an accent of inexpressible despair. The
Fiend has foiled me once again! But noshe is concealed somewhere in
this accursed mansion, I will search it from the garret to the cellar. I
will
He parted the curtains of the bed; it bore the impress of Madeline's
form, but she was gone.
I will defy the fiend, and walk abroad once more among livin' men
like a livin' man. Ah! What's this?
A white object glared from the sombre carpet at his feet. It was a
letter, the seal had the appearance of having been but lately broken; it
bore no superscription, but a single word at once rivetted Gilbert's
attention.
`To Madeline!' he muttered as he held it to the light, and then
sinking in a chair, he read the following lines:
To Madeline
!
Do not tremble, fair girl, when you behold the name, written beneath
these lines! It is, Iit is Reginald,who sought your love, under a
cowardly disguise, and sought to lure you to dishonor, on the fatal New
Year's morning of 1775. And Reginald, repenting of the crime, now
seeks to make atonement, and thus deserves your forgiveness.
Forgive me Madeline. The dream of passion, has passed away. I no
longer look upon you with the gaze of an unholy love. You are to me,
as something set apart from the crimes and woes of this mortal lifeyou
are, to me, as pure, as distant, as unapproachable, as the evening star,
which trembles serenely on the sunset horizonas a Saint enthroned in
Heaven, to whom we may present our prayers, but whose sanctity repels
the idea of earthly passion.
I seek to atone for the past. Will you listen, Madeline,can you
forgive
?
Come to Wissahikon, Madeline; my servant who bears this note,
will lead you to the appointed place, where your hand will be joined with
the hand of your plighted Husband, Gilbert Morgan. This is the
atonement
which I would make; Gilbert is my friend; and believe me your,
Lover no longerbut Brother,
Reginald Lyndulfe
.
Gilbert read this letter, examined the seal, bearing a coat of arms, with
the cipher, R. L. and then exclaimed in a tone, whose emphasis of
despair
,
no words, can depict:
And she has been cheated by this lieshe has gone to meet this
Reginald
Lyndulfe. The thrice-perjured knave! My name must serve as
a cloak for his schemes,in my name, he will complete Madeline's
dishonor
.
He rose from his seat, and stood for a moment buried in thought, his
frank, manly face, darkening slowly, with the impress of a desperate
resolve.
`His servant'hah! I thought I recognized the knave, when I sat
under the oak, this afternoon. But it is not yet too late to foil this wretch.
I will to Wissahikon, I will meet him there, and as for the Fiend, why a
true heart and a good purpose is worth the malice of a thousand devils at
any time!
As he spoke, his almost giant form, presented an impressive image of
muscular power, linked with a rugged but manly beauty, His sunburnt
cheek, flushed with new life; his eyes shone with new fire; a defiant
resolve, hung on his lip; and with his neck thrown proudly back upon
his broad shoulders, his right hand laid upon the dagger's hilt, his wide
chest swelling in the lighthe looked in every respect, the brave man,
yes the Hero.
Now for the Wissahikon! he said and was turning away from the
light, whenHis eyes grew fixed and glassy. His limbs rigid and
motionless
.
He stood as if suddenly transformed to stone, his features, livid
and immoveable as Death.
This change took place within the compass of a second. One instant
he was turning away with a flushed cheek and defiant lip; the next, he
was stonehis limbs stiffenedhis fixed eyeballs, glaring in the mirror
with a cold glassy lustre. There was something awful, beyond the power
of words, in this inexplicable transformation.
His lips moved languidly, but every muscle of his face was stiff, frozen
I hear your voice he slowly utteredAnd I will obey.
Was it Gilbert Morgan, the brave man, conscious of his fearless heart
and iron arm, who spoke? Or, was it Gilbert Morgan, the victim of a
remorseless
soul, which had deprived him of all power over his own will,
destroyed in fact, for the moment, his individualityand filled his brain
with the Soul of Another?
Like a man walking in his sleep, Gilbert strode slowly from the room,
as he fixed his glassy eyes upon the darkness, and murmured languidly,
Master, I come! I come!
Thus he reached the corridor, where Betsy awaited, light in hand. She
spoke to himhe passed her without a wordhis eyes fixed, his hands
outstretched, his gait measured and artificial.
He reached the stairway, and began to descend. Betsy filled with
wonder, darted forward light in hand, and saw his face, as she called him
by name. She saw his face, and fell fainting at the head of the stairs.
It was not a living man,the thought flashed on her, as she saw his
facewho walked thus in silence, with fixed eyeballs, and stride measured
and artificial. It was a Corpse, placed on its feet by some infernal
wizard-craft
,
and sent abroad, to chill the hearts of the living, with its sad
terrible
gaze.
Our history now returns to the farm-house of Peter Dorfner, and to the
room where Madeline on the last night of 1775, sank beneath the dagger
of Gilbert Morgan.
CHAPTER THIRTY-THIRD.
ROLOF SENER.
The
sunbeam stealing through the small panes of the narrow window,
tinted with its warm glow, the dusky stain, which dyed the floor, and
shone upon the massive forehead of the Unknown, as seated beside the
table, his gaze rested upon the papers and manuscripts which were
scattered
there.
From the moment when Jacopo left the room, in obedience to his
commands
,
he had remained in the same position, his head drooped, his eye
fixed upon those manuscripts, his pale and delicate hand resting upon the
table. Sometimes a smile wreathed his thin lipsagain his eyes, sunk
deeper beneath the down-drawn brow, and shone with a sad, gloomy
lustre
and
then his face was calm and cold again, immoveable and
statue-like
as his form.
One finger rested upon a golden coin, which bore an ancient date, and
an inscription in bold characters, somewhat worn by time. Whenever
his eye wandered to this coin, his gaze grew glassy; his lips were
compressed
;
his forehead was darkened by a single vein, which rising from
the brows, swelled beneath the pale skin, in distinct andalmost hideous
prominence.
Then his face was imbued by an expression, which gave a kindly
smile to his lips, a clear and tranquil light to his eyes. It was a look
of indescribable calm, indicating a heart full of peace, a soul at rest with
God and man.
He bent down again to the papers which covered the table, examined
them one by one, muttering all the while to himself, while his face changed
from light to shadow, from that look of indescribable calm, to one steeped
in dark and repulsive emotion.
Thus an hour passed away.
When the hour was gone, and the sunbeam wandered from the pale
brow of the Unknown, to the papers on the table, there was a footstep
on the stairway which led to Madeline's chamber. It was the footstep
of a strong man, completely unnerved by some powerful emotion; it
echoed through the passage at the head of the stairs, and Reginald
Lyndulfe
stood upon the threshold of that fatal room.
Clad as you doubtless remember, in that blue hunting shirt, which
concealed
his scarlet uniform, with knife and powder horn at his side, and
rifle on his shoulder, he paused upon the threshold, while his chesnut
hair, floating carelessly from beneath his cap, could not relieve the
death-like
pallor of his face.
He started as his gaze rested upon the Unknown, and resting one arm
against the door-post, muttered in a half-audible toneA stranger here!
What can this mean? The negro told me that the house was deserted,
and as for old Peter I passed him, as he was sleeping in the arbor.
The Unknown raised his eyes, and calmly surveyed the manly form,
whichframed in the doorwaystood hesitating on the threshold.
Ah! Is it you, Reginald! he said with a smileCome in my Lord.
Take a seat onis there no chair? Well then take a seat on the bed; it
is covered with dust, but you wont mind that.
You know my name? ejaculated Reginald, with a look of
immeasurable
surprise, and then relapsing into a look and attitude of aristocratic
hauteur
, he exclaimedYou have the advantage of me, sir. I do not
know you.
And yet I stood beside your father, when he placed this Medal about
your Mother's neck, the day before she embarked for England. It was
in the island of Jamaicaat your father's plantationtwenty-one years
ago.
These words pronounced in that calm, even voice, with an expressive
movement of the small white hand, had the effect of magic. The face of
Reginald became frightfully pale, he staggered into the room, and placed
his hands upon the table, while his eyes were rivetted to the face of the
unknown.
Youstoodbymyfather he gasped, speaking with a choking
sensation in his throatYou!
Here is the medal, said the unknown, carelessly extending his hand
You can examine it at your leisure. I saw your father place it about
your mother's neck twenty-one years ago.
But Reginald did not grasp the medal; he saw the cross and the
inscription
which it bore, and shrank away from it, as though its touch was
Death.
Your name faltered Reginald.
Rolof Sener, my child. The Swedish traveller, of whom you've
doubtless heard your father speak?
Rolof Sener! echoed Reginald, and he sunk back on the bedwhose
coverlet yet bore the print of Madeline's formpressing his hand nervously
to his forehead, for his brain was throbbing with intense torture: Rolof
Sener! Yes; my father has spoken of youoftentime. But you do not
look like a very aged man, and Rolof Sener, eighteen years ago, was at
least fifty years old.
He raised his eyes, and for the first time, discovered that the figure of
Rolof Sener was characterized by a deformity, which seemed to have been
subdued by a careful mode of dress. His shoulders were broad and high;
his spine marked by an unsightly curvature; indeed, looking at him, from
the side, instead of face to face, the head of Rolof seemed to rest against
rather than upon his shoulders. You would not perchance call him a
hunchback, and yet his deformitynot so much observable at a front view,
and with his head bent over the table, in the act of writingwas now
painfully apparent.
Yes, I was with your father on that occasion, twenty-one years ago,
said Rolof Sener, turning his chair so that he sat face to face with
Reginald
And
with him at his Jamaica plantation on another occasion.
Toward the close of the year 1757, when your father received the first
intelligence of that two-fold calamity, which converted him,Clarence
Albertthe younger, nay the youngest son, into a Peer of the Realm,
yes, Duke of Lyndulfe, with a rent roll of one hundred thousand pounds,
per year. I remember it well!
Two-fold calamity
, muttered Reginald, passing his hand over his
foreheadI have heard of it; but not from my father's lips. An aged
peasant at Lyndulfe told me not more than a year since, that my
grand-father
,
John, Duke of Lyndulfe, and his eldest son, Ranulph John, died
about the same time, by a strange accident.
A very strange accident and the face of Rolof Sener was darkened
by that solitary veinRemarkably strange! There was a mocking
smile upon his lips.
What mean you? My grand-father was thrown from his horse, and
my unclehis eldest sonwas killed, by the horse, in the attempt to
save his father's life.
The color came to Reginald's face once more; his deep blue eye flashed
with anger.
And the old Duke was found dead, beside his dead steed, continued
Rolof in an absent toneAs for Ranulph John, his body was found in a
ditch, so hideously mangled, the face trodden as though by horse's hoofs,
that his best friends, could only know him by some fragment of his dress.
It was a strange accident, and by that
accident
your father, the youngest
of three sons, became Duke of Lyndulfe.
Again that cold and mocking smile, played around the thin lips of Rolof
Sener.
Three sons? echoed Reginald with a startThere were but two
my father and his Elder Brother.
Three, my child, three. A son younger than Ranulph John, but older
than your father, who had been born on the German possessions of your
House, and enjoyed those possessions in his mother's right. His name
was Gaspard Michael; he bore the title of Count, and was something of
a German as much by feeling and education, as by his birth. Three
sons, my
Hold, Reginald once more pressed his hand to his forehead
This is not so. At least, he hesitatedI never heard of it before.
You are young, handsome, fond of the sex, and with no disinclination
for a duel, now and then; the very type of a gallant cavalier, and
therefore
it is to be presumed, that you have heard of everything. Is it not my
Lord?
The mocking scorn which had lingered about Rolof's lips, now
mounted to his eyes. There is nothing in the world, so cutting in its
calm contempt, as the sneer of an old man, who turns all the fire of Youth,
into ice with his glance, and withers its warmest hope, with one cold
look.
You are disposed to jest with me, said Reginald, while the blood
rushed to his face. Still, I must repeat, that I never heard of this
Gaspard
Michael. He died young?
He
disappeared
, soon after the double-calamity, replied Rolof calmly
There were proofs of his death, or else your father would not have sue
ceeded to the title and estates of Lyndulfe.
Of course he left no heir, said Reginald carelessly.
Suppose he
did
leave an heir, replied Rolof Sener, in that peculiar
tone which penetrated the listener's heart, Or, to carry out, the
hypothesis
;
suppose that heir is in existence at this moment? What then?
Reginald's face was shadowed by a cloud.
It is impossible, he saidYou are dreaming.
What then? repeated the singular personage, with a latent laughter
in his eye.
You mock me,and Reginald's eye shone with anger, while he
could not turn his gaze aside from the pale face of Rolof; In the first
place, Gaspard Michael, never lived. True, I have your word,or your
jestas proofs of his existence. In the second place, even if his
existence
were no fable, by your own admission, he died and left no heir.
There is no need, ha, ha, no need of your `what then?' my good sir.
It was pleasant to see Reginald laugh; his teeth were so white; his
blue eyes so full of Youth and Hope. And then he was Twenty-Two!
Twenty-Two, delicious age, when some fragrance from Paradise, still
clings to the flowers of Earth; when every pulse beats Pleasure; and the
expanding eye looks through the Future, and beholds only the blossoms
and sunshine of that glorious landscape, without one thought of the
Skeleton
whom those blossoms conceal, or one glance for the Grave, which the
sunshine only invents with rosy light.
Twenty-Two! Even I who write these words,and certainly I
am very far from being an old man yet; at least not in the almanac sense
of the phraseeven I look back over the pathway of four years, and
wonder
in what dim grave, I buried the Boy of Twenty-Two.
Twenty-Two! It is the time of Illusions; sweep them away as you
grow older; but what is there in Life to repay you for those glorious
Illusions
?
It is the day of Romanceit is soon passedyou awake to the
naked Realities of life; those grim skeletons, which the blossoms of
Twenty-Two strewed for awhile, with bloom and fragrance.Said a
Philosopher
once, who after a life of intense brain-labor, had brought himself
into communion with the Other World, and forced its Spirits to grant his
desires, `let me be Twenty-Two forever, with its Illusions, its Dreams, its
Loves, and its Hates, and I ask no more.'
It was pleasant, I say, to see Reginald laugh, for he was
Twenty-Two
.
What then? echoed the singular personage, known by the name of
Rolof SenerWhy Reginald, the Duke of Lyndulfethat is to be
will become that most pitiful of all paupers; the heir to the noble blood, and
gilded poverty of a Younger Son. A kind of genteel beggar, who is tolerated
by the great on account of his lineage; a sort of `poor relation' a
gentleman
Lazarus, in fact, who haunts the Royal Court, until his sores are
dressed with a pension, and his rags made decent, with a little golden tinsel.
Is't not laughable? Reginald Duke of Lyndulfe, Baron of Marionhurst,
of Dernberg, of Camelford, with a string of other titles that I do not now
remember, and a rent-roll of one hundred thousand a year, suddenly
transformed
into plain
Captain
Reginald, a gentleman of elegant figure, and
five hundred a year!
This is insulting, cried Reginald, glowing with indignationYour
age alone protects you!
And if I were younger, you would dissect my lungs with a sma
sword, or search for my brains with a pistol bullet, and thus vindicate
your honor! Bah! I am ashamed of you. Read that!
He took a letter from the table, and handed it to Reginald.
What is this, I see! From my father, and dated yesterday; written,
too, from our Camp in Jersey! It is indeed his own handwriting;
without
a doubt his signature. What does it mean?
Read! said Rolof.
Reginald read the letter aloud:
`Rolof:
`The plan is good; the project itself confers immortal honor on its
originator. The Army of His Majesty is now in Jersey, as you are aware,
advancing toward the Delaware; the object of the General being the
possession
of Philadelphia. But the project will pay us for a thousand
Philadelphias
;
will end the war, in fact, and bring the revolted colonies to the
foot of the throne. I will be in * * * * * * * * * * at the appointed time, and
at the place you designate. Let your messenger meet me there, with a
line from you, in your own hand, which I will take as a token to go
forward
.
You will have time to perfect your understanding with our friends
in Philadelphia; we can seize HIM away from HIS camp; conceal HIM for
a few days in Philadelphia, andthe war is at an end'
What mean these stars? asked Reginald, his face the very
embodiment
of surprise.
There are ten, answered Rolof, and there are just ten letters in the
word
Germantown
.
And my father is coming  but who is this person designated
as `
him?
'
Washington, the rebel leader. He will be here,at Wissahikon
to-night
.
Some days since, he received a letter from Philadelphia, signed
by Jefferson, and other prominent members of the rebel Congress. That
letter designated the Wissahikon as the scene for an important interview,
between Washington and these rebel statesmen; to take place on the
last
night
of the
second week
in June.
To-night!
Yes, to-night he will be here, and the rebel leaders from Philadelphia
will offer him the crown.
And my father? cried Reginald, trembling with agitation.
He will be here to-night. With a band of trusty Philadelphians, rich
men, my child, friends of the King, he will surround the house in which
the Rebel General and the Rebel Statesmen are in conclave, and take
prisoner, the heart and arm of America, George Washington.
It is a magnificent idea! cried Reginald, in a broken voice, but with
flashing eyesAnd my father, the Duke, will have the honor of this
capture. But what has this to do with Gaspard Michael?
You have not yet finished the letter. Read on said Rolof Sener.
`The papers which you have furnished me, in regard to the existence
of the Son of Gaspard Michael, are indeed appalling. Search further
Rolof; assure yourself that this person, of whom you speak, is indeed the
Son of Gaspard Michael. The house of Lyndulfe must not be shaken by
the hand of a Pretender to its wealth and honors. You inform me that
he was living
six months ago; I beseech you, my good friend, to spare
no exertions in this matter. Does he live now? What is his condition
where his place of abode? I assure you, that my first reason for
embarking
in your project, was a wish to rivet myself in the favor of the
King, and thus secure his interest against the claims of thisor any other
Pretender.
Lyndulfe
.'
Reginald crushed the letter in his fingers, exclaiming with an oath
This is indeed a terrible revelation! Then he buried his face in his
hands, and sat gazing on the floor, with a blank and colorless visage.
Rolof Sener regarded him with a searching look, but with a smile.
This Gaspard Michaelthis Sonwhere is he? shouted Reginald,
as convulsed in every nerve, he started to his feet. Speak, or by the
* * * above us, I'll throttle you!
He lives on the Wissahikon, said Rolof Sener, in a calm tone, his
face serene and smiling. Within a mile from where you stand, and
you wont throttle me.
On the Wissahikon! and Reginald sank back upon the bed. It was
indeed a crushing blow; the mere Chance of this Pretender's existence
was terrible, but the Certainty was madness. Reginald seated on the bed
printed with the outlines of Madeline's formfelt the Dukedom gliding
from under his feet, even as a hunter, gazing over the brow of a precipice,
feels the solid rock quiver and tremble ere it falls.
This room is accursedthe very air breathes ruin to me and to my
race! he muttered, in a wild tone, and gazed with sidelong glance at the
dusky stain near the foot of the bed, where the sunbeam gayly shone.
What mean you? asked Rolof, with a look and accent of wonder.
You know, you must know it, cried Reginald, starting up and
pacing the floorFor you seem to know everything that is evil. Here,
here, twenty-one years ago, on a dark and stormy night, my Mother was
murderedmurdered, even as she struggled in the anguish of a mother's
pains. They tore her babe from her still quivering form
His look ghastly, his accent ringing with an emphasis of unutterable
horror, he confronted Rolof Sener, with clenched hands and swelling
chest.
How know you this? said the elderly man, very calmlyIs that
stain near your feet, your mother's blood?
Reginald started back, with a shudder in every nerve.
Or does that dingy blood-mark bring to mind, the anguish of a poor
and friendless Orphan Girl, who, struggling in her seducer's armsin this
room, two years and six months agobesought his mercy, in the name
of her murdered mother, and besought in vain!
These words fell upon Reginald like so many mortal thrusts from the
blade of a keen and polished dagger.
Hold! he cried,Another word, and I will  he laid his
trembling hand upon the hilt of his hunting-knife, as his face grew purple
with settled rage.
CHAPTER THIRTY-FIFTH.
MY SISTER!
Her
prayers, her tears, even the memory of her murdered mother
all were in vain! Nothing could deter you, from that cowardly outrage.
You had palsied her mind, fevered her blood with a poisonous drug. And
to this bed, Siror rather
my Lord
where poor and friendless, but
innocent, she was sleepingto this bed, with your hellish purpose
gleaming
in your blood-shot eye, you crept, at the dead of night, andha, ha!
Fell back, frightened and cold, when you saw this Medal glimmering on
her bosom.
I knew it not, said Reginald, in a choking voice,I knew not that
she was my  Fiend! You will drive me mad!
You knew it not, whispered Rolof, bending forward, while a
withering
sneer crept over his pale face. That cannot excuse your purpose,
nor in the slightest degree palliate your crime. For the woman, who is
at once poor, friendless, and innocent, is the Sister of every Man, who has
one throb of honor in his breast. His Sister, not indeed by ties of blood,
but by a loftier and more touching relationship; by that Poverty, which,
while it makes her Virtue shine only the brighter, as the diamond gleams
more beautiful when in the dust, invokes protection from honest Manhood,
in a voice that a devil alone could disobey.
His large eyes dilated and gleamed with a calm deep light, while his
voice, rising as he went on, rang upon the ears of the guilty man, like the
tones of an accusing angel.
Do not shelter yourself behind that petty plea, my Lord! The man
who wrongs a poor Poor maiden, and uses his wealth as an excuse for his
fraud, in plain words, wrongs his own Sister.
Reginald fell back from the tone, the deep steady gaze of Rolof Sener,
and stood like a convicted culprit before his Judge, his hands hanging by
his side, his head sunken on his breast.
He did not raise his eyes until many moments were passed.
Come, my Lord, said Rolof, in a changed voice, How do you know
that your mother was murdered in this room?
From the day when my father saw her embark for England, not a
word was ever heard of my mother, nor of the ship in which she sailed,
until three years ago. Then, in a letter, without a signature, my father
was informed, that the ship had been taken by a Pirate vessel, and that
my mother, Alice of Lyndulfe, had been brought to Philadelphia, by one
of the pirates, soon after the capture of the ship.
29
With what object, pray? asked Rolof.
The anonymous letter gave me no motive, said ReginaldIt merely
stated that she was brought to Philadelphia, in secresy, and concealed in
the house of a good citizen, who was a confederate of the pirate crew.
One of those good merchants who go to church on Sunday, and fit
out a slave-ship on Monday morning? suggested RolofWhen the
cargo of slaves die off, or prove unprofitable, what so easy,so mercantile
as to transform the Slaver into the Pirate. Go on, my child.
It was this information, that induced my father to send me to
Philadelphia
,
three years ago. While here, in fact on the morning of January
First, '75, a London paper was handed to me, which contained the last
speech and confession of one Greiley a Pirate who had been executed
at Tyburn in the fall of '74. This speech stated distinctly that on the
23d of November, 1756, a woman was murdered, on the Wissahikon, near
Philadelphia, by a man named Torfen or Dorfner, the confederate of a
band of pirates, robbers, orslave-dealers.
You put the slave-dealer, who is a very respectable person and a
Christian withal, in very dubious company, said Rolof Sener, with a
smileWell, the motive of the deed?
The husband of the woman was supposed to have a large amount of
plate and coinall goldconcealed on some Island, in the West Indies,
resumed Reginald. This confederate Torfen or Dorfner, attempted to
wring from her lips, the secret of this place of concealment. She was
seized with the pains of child-birth, while the ruffian's hand was at her
throat. She died `
and her body was concealed in a closet, near a window
which looks out upon a chesnut tree
' so the Confession ran, `
and the child
was taken away
.'
And you came here to-day, in order to search that closet? asked
Rolof.
That was my purpose. The merchant Hopkins, to whom my Father
entrusted the matter, has never written, since the hour when I left
Philadelphia
,
more than two years ago. Therefore I conjecture that all traces
of the deed have long since been removed, or that Hopkins has been
unable
to obtain access to this room, on account of Dorfner's repulsive and
ferocious character.
Why not invoke the aid of the law?
Do you not perceive that this would foil all my father's plans? He
is by no means certain that the murdered woman and my mother, are the
same. Then the confession of the dying pirate, strong enough to warrant
a suspicion, is still by no means sufficient, to ensure a successful
prosecution
.
And yet there is the medal, found by yourself, on the breast of
Madeline
,
on Orphan Girl, whose parentage no one could trace. The very
coin, which your father placed around the neck of his wife, twenty-one
years ago, while I sat by his side, and youa very babelaughed in his
eyes.
Could I speak to my father of this medal? Could I tell him that
Reginald paused; the blood rushed to his face, and after a moment he
continued, in a hollow whisperBeside, what need was there to
prosecute
the inquiry? Madeline was deadI dare not tell my father sobut
she was dead, before I left Philadelphia, on that fatal morning.
There is the closet, said Rolof again turning his chair, and bending
over the table, You had better search it. If there's any truth in the
confession of the pirate, you may discover some traces of the murdered
woman.
Reginald gazed for a moment upon the singular being, who sat with
downcast head, and eyes fixed upon the manuscripts which covered the
table, and then slowly advancing toward the closet, `
near the window
which looked out upon the chenut tree
,' he laid his hand upon its single
panel reaching from the ceiling to the floor.
The western window was shaded, as we have said before, by a cloak
or some other garment, which only permitted a few wandering gleams of
light, to tremble over the floor.
His hand upon the panel, Reginald felt an unknown terror steal through
his veins; he dared not open the closet door.
It is dark and gloomy in this corner of the room, he muttered, and
tore the dust-covered garment from the window. A flood of light, rushed
through the narrow panes, and revealed the face of Reginald, distorted by
a new emotion, surprise mingled with Remorse.
It was the dress of Madeline, which lay at his feet. Yes dingy and
moth-eaten, as it was, that garment had enveloped her young limbs, on the
fatal night, when she clasped Gilbert Morgan by the hands, and kindled
into blushes at his kiss. It was her wedding dress.
Reginald was a man of the world; that is, he had whiled away, a year
or more at a sound Orthodox College, made some advances toward Latin
and Greek, whirled through Europe in search of the picturesque, learned
all the manners of a gentleman, from drinking his third bottle of
Champagne
,
without staggering, to killing his man in a duel without a tremor,
or crushing the honor of some unprotected woman, without a blushhe
was a man of the world. He was an officer in the service of his
Majesty
;
he was heir to a Dukedom; he was a finished specimen of
British
Chivalry, in its transition state it may be, yet still British Chivalry.
But now he trembled and shook, and grew pale like any common man.
One of the rude `blackguard people' could not have manifested more
ungentlemanly feeling. Tears started to his eyes, tears such as
every-day
people weep, only somewhat more bitter and scalding. Could Jacopo
have seen him, at this moment, he would have been ashamed of his pupil
for Reginald was no longer a man of the world, nor a gentleman, but
simply
a
man.
All the manhood, that the world had left in his breast, was now roused
into spasmodic life.
The wedding dress of the murdered girl, lay at his feethis hand was
on the panel of the closet, which was supposed to conceal the skeleton
of her murdered mother.
And the girl, who had been murdered in that room two years before,
and the woman who twenty-one years gone by, had died by violent hands,
in the anguish of a mother's pains, also in that room, were joined in the
holiest relationship, Mother and Daughter. And the blood which coursed
in Reginald's veins, was also their blood; two words started to his lips,
as he thought of them, words that crushed him into abject misery, with
their meaningMother! Sister!
Unable to speak, he bent down, and raised the dress of Madeline, and
laid it gently on the bed. Then gazing from the window, he saw the glad
sunshine, resting upon the garden and its flowerssleeping upon the broad
field, strown with heaps of new-mown hayand gilding with living light
the tops of the distant forest trees. All was calm and peaceful there, yes
all
without
breathed of day and sunshine, but
within
was darkness, the
night of Remorse, with the memory of Madeline written upon its very
gloom.
Shall I pursue this search? he said aloud, in a changed voice, and
with the desire of crushing his emotionsDorfner may come; and I do
not wish to meet him, at least, until I am certain of his guilt
Rolof Sener seated at the table did not reply; his head bent upon his
breast, he appeared lost in his studies.
Gazing through the window, Reginald saw the garden with the arbor
rising in its centre, and there, enshrined among the vines of the arbor,
appeared the round face of Peter Dorfner, its cheeks and beard and eyes,
bathed at once, in sunshine and insleep.
Peter will not disturb you, said Rolof without turning his head.
I found him, not many moments since, in a position of some danger,
sleeping with the knife of his blind Negro, poised over his head. I turned
the blow aside, and entered the house,Peter will sleep until
his time
comes
.
The last words were accompanied by a burst of half-suppressed
laughter
.
The door of the closet was unlocked; Reginald drew it open, and gazed
within.
There is nothing here, he cried with an accent of profound
disappointment
The
closet is sunken in the thickness of the wall. It is
empty. There is no sign nor mark of any secret recess.
Sound the wall with the hilt of your hunting knife, the voice of
Rolof Sener was heard.
It returns only a dull, leaden sound, exclaimed Reginald sounding
the wall to the right and left. This cannot be the place of concealment
mentioned in the Pirate's confession. Hold! What is this!
The back wall of the closet, resembling in its dark hue and time-worn
appearance, the walls on the right and left, echoed the blow of the knife,
with a sharp, hollow sound. Reginald struck again, and again with the
hilt of a knife, and suddenly it receded from him, and separated from the
body of the closet, like a door swinging on its hinges.
The scene which Reginald beheld, deprived him for a moment of all
power of speech or motion. His face was bathed in a red and murky
light, which struggled through the aperture,
and
contending with the
light of daymade his features assume a livid and spectral hue
He stood upon the threshold of a small room, whose doors and
windows
,
did not seem to have been unclosed for at least twenty years. It
was the room which intervened between the stairway and the chamber
of Madeline. Over a large table of smoke-darkened wood, a flickering
tallow candle, inserted in a rusty candlestick, shed its red and murky light,
while the rest of the apartment was enveloped in gloom. In one corner
the outlines of a bed, were dimly discernible, and near the feet of
Reginald
,
appeared a dark space in the floor. A plank had been torn away;
the dark space was the aperture, between the floor and the ceiling of the
lower room.
Pah! It smells like a vault! Ah, I remember; it was in this room
I was to have slept two years ago. Can you tell me Sir, what it means?
he continued, turning his head toward Rolof Sener, who was still seated
at the table in the Chamber of MadelineThis light burning here, in
broad day?
The light itself may satisfy your curiosity. Look on the table,
beneath
its rays.
Reginald advanced to the table, carefully avoiding the cavity in the
floor. He discovered that a portion of the table was covered by a dingy
cloth, which bore some resemblance to the fragment of an old sail.
There is nothing here, he criedNothing but a smoky candle and
piece of old sail. The room itself looks as though it might have been the
private study of a Sexton or Undertaker.
Lift the cloth, my Lord said a soft, low voice, and Rolof Sener
laid his hand upon the shoulder of the young man. Reginald felt an
indescribable
sensation pervade him at the touch of that hand; he gazed
sidelong upon the pale face, and bold forehead of Rolof Senerlighted by
the red rays of the candleand a thought came over his mind that he had
seen that face before. Where?
You seem to hesitate, said Rolofare you afraid to lift that bit of
sackcloth?
Reginald replied with a laugh, and placing his knife in the girdle of his
hunting shirt, raised the sackcloth from the table. The smile which hung
about his manly lips, the flush upon his cheek, the careless light in his
deep blue eyesall passed away, and he fell back silent and wondering.
The skeleton of a human being was stretched upon the table; and the
light tinged with red lustre every bone, and glared as if in mockery, into
the hollow orbits of the skull.
Your mother! whispered Rolof Sener. He took the hand of
Reginald
within his own, and pointed to the cavity in the floor. Behold her
grave!
CHAPTER THIRTY-SIXTH.
A LETTER FROM THE DEAD MOTHER.
Reginald
of Lyndulfe was kneeling there beside the remains of his
murdered Mother.
His face was buried in his hands, and the red light which mocked the
crumbling skeleton, shone over the luxuriant chesnut curls of the young
Lord. Not a sound disturbed the stillness; the door which led into
Madeline's room was closed, and the candle fast burning to its socket,
flung its uncertain and flickering light into the shadows of the narrow
apartment.
Near Reginald stood Rolof Sener. Picture to yourself that form clad
in black, broad in the chest and shoulders, and rendered harsh in outline,
by the deformity of the spine, while the long pallid face seems to rest not
so much upon the neck as upon the chest. His large head stood out from
the gloom, and as the light flickered and fell, his features seemed to pass
through every change of expression, now scowling in sullen scorn, now
beaming with smiles and joy.
With his finger on his lip, he stood near the kneeling man, looking like
a stern spirit, sent from the Other World to judge between the Living and
the Dead.
While the light shines upon those blackened boneswhich were once
a beautiful and living formupon that skullonce it enthroned a Mother's
soullet us leave Reginald to the first strong outbreak of his agony. * *
* * * * *.
At last he rose and confronted Rolof Sener with a pallid face, and
lustreless
eye. Every feature was steeped in dull apathy; this scene had
palsied him in every nerve.
When did you make this discovery? he said, in an almost inaudible
tone.
An hour ago, replied Rolof, urged by
motives which will be made
known in due time
, I came toward this house, and found old Dorfner
sleeping in the arbor with the Negro's knife above his head. That blind
negro was the slave of your mother; at least he fought for her in her
dying hour.
Let me go to him at once, said Reginald, starting to the doorHe
may tell us something of my mother's fate
Not so fast. Listen before you act, my Lord. For my own reasons
which will also be made known in due time,I turned the negro's
hand aside, and left the old man to his slumbers. Entering the house, I
lighted this candle, and sought the room where you discovered me. I
obtained
entrance to the closet by a false key, and did not hesitate in my
researches until I had discovered the secret door at the back of the closet.
Then, I stood confounded. The pirate's words were false. This was
my only thought. Urged onward, however, by an impulse, which I
cannot
account for
save as an instinctive interest in the affairs of your
house
I searched this room, sounded the walls, and every board of the
floor. The result of my search is before you.
He spoke in a calm and even voice, his gaze full of sympathy, every
lineament of his countenance steeped in sorrow.
But there were papers with the corse? Some word to tell of my
mother's last hour? Some record of the manner of her fate?
Reginald seized his hand, and trembled in suspense, as he awaited the
answer.
With the skeleton, I discovered certain papers said Rolof.
Where are they? Let me behold them!
I was engaged in the examination of these papers when you first
appeared
Rolof began. They are in the next room!
Ah, this indeed is the work of Heaven! The record of my mother's
wrongsthe manner of her deaththe purpose of the murderersit is all
written there; is it not?
Once more he started to the door, quivering with impatience, but the
hand and voice of Rolof held him back.
Not one word of your mother's fate! was the reply, which crushed
every hope of the young Lord into nothingness. There are letters from
your father to your mother, before their marriage, with some manuscripts
pertaining to the ancient history of your house, but that is all.
Reginald's countenance was clouded in apathetic gloom.
It is indeed a mystery, he said, and taking the light, gazed into the
cavity, which had for twenty years encoffined his mother's form. It was
a narrow place, between the huge planks, not more than eighteen inches
wide, and scarcely a foot in depth. The bottom which formed the ceiling
of the lower room, was strown with dust.
*
*
The reader will bear in mind, that the floor of this room was separated from the
ceiling of the lower room by a range of rafters, while that ceilingformed of boards
was in its turn supported by another range of rafters, which were uncovered.
A feeling of freezing awe
came over Reginald as bending down he looked into the aperture.
Ah! They must have crushed her body into this narrow space, he
mutteredIt is too horrible for thought! Her blood yet warm, they
trampled her into this cavity, and nailed the board over her mangled face,
while the breath yet lingered on her lips.
Reginald held the candle directly over the cavity, and thrust his hand
into the dustor asheswhich overspread its lower boards. Fragments
of a dress, which crumbled like the cinders of burnt paper, the moment he
grasped themthe half-severed bones of a handa mass of hair, long and
waving, and yet covered with the mould of the tombthese were the
fruits of his search. At last from among that dust, which had once been
Life, he drew a folded paper, dark and clammy, as with the taint and
stain of Death.
He opened it, and by the candle-light saw that it was covered with
writing, which was in many places, blotted by a dingy red stain; some of
the lines were altogether obliterated, and even the plainest words were
difficult to read.
He smoothed it out upon the floor, near the cavity, and bent down, his
breath coming in gasps, his eye fired with sudden light.
The twenty-third of November! he exclaimed, Joy! Thank God!
Here at last we have some words, traced by my mother's hand!
Rolof Sener heard this exclamation with a start; his face was changed
in every lineament; at once he sank by Reginald's side, and looked over
his shoulder, his large eyes dilating, and flashing with the intensity of
madness.
There was a dead silence, as kneeling together, they perused that blotted
record, which seemed, and was in truth, a voice from the Dead.
It is not for us to attempt to explain the full meaning, which that paper
was originally intended to convey, nor will we dare to erase its blots, and
read the words, buried beneath their dark red stain. But as the paper,
the Letter from the Dead, appeared to the eyes of these silent and
breathless
men, who knelt upon the floor in the dimly lighted room, and
followed
its every word with eye and soul, we now place it upon this page
of our history.
Alice
Should these lines, traced with a hand, fevered by disease ever
meet your eyes, you will learn something of the fate of your poor friend,
Cath............
the day when our ship was boarded by pirates, who threatened to
dismantle
it, and consign every soul to the waves, unless `the person and property
of Lady Alice, wife of Right Hon. Clarence Albert Lyndulfe was
surrendered
to them'..........
........ scene which ensued..
.. my poor husband, John Conwell, had died the week before,.
. a poor lieutenant on half pay.. widow a beggar.
. had received kindness at your husband's hands, while in the
West Indies, and....... I was alone in
the world; your life was valuable.......
..... notwithstanding your entreaties, I assumed your
dress, ornaments, etc., and some personal resemblance aided my disguise.
..............
..............
..............
. from the decks of the pirate vessel I saw the Artemesia on her.
way.............
......... concealed for a month or
more in the City of Philadelphia, and now am a prisoner in a house,
in the midst of a forest; how far from the city I know not
.
To day my persecutors came; they had searched your chests, but
without
finding the gold or the papers for which they sought. They assailed
me with threats, and demanded of me, either the gold plate, or papers, or
they said my life..........
from their broken hints, I imagine that yaur husband was in some
measure
,
connected with an attempt to destroy this terrible organizotion.
..............
papers containing matter sufficient to put, in peril the lives of many noble
and wealthy persons, not only in England, but in the Colonies, were
contained
in the chest, entrusted by your husband to the Captain of the
Artemesia
..........
........ slave traffic and
pir........
..........
a hope of deliverance dawns upon me! A poor negro, whom I saw on
board of the pirate ship, and whom my husband, had rescued a year ago,
from a severe punishment, in Jamaica, has followed me, discovered the
place of my concealment, and it is to his hands that I entrust this let
.
..........
..........
...
and O! Alice! if the child that now throbs within me,
ever should see the light, to you and to yours I dedicate...
.............
..... be called, Madeline
.....
Catheline Con
Such was the letter, blotted with blood and tears, which Rolof and
Reginald
perused by the uncertain light, as they knelt side by side on the
floor of that room, whose atmosphere breathed memories of crime and
death.
What does it mean? gasped Reginald, after a long pauseand the
letter shook in his quivering fingers. It is a letter to my mother
written
by whom?
Rolof was silent.
Resting his arm on his knee, he bent his head, low on his breast and
remained for many moments absorbed in profound thought.
Reginald gazing over his shoulder, at his motionless form, saw his lips
move, while his eyes grew spectral, glassyas though the Soul of the
strange man was buried within its tortuous thoughts.
Again he repeated his question
By whom was it written? It is like a dream! Thoughts as vague
and frightful as the visions of a night-mare crowd upon me. Speak! You
that seem to know the history of my race, as though you were its
Destiny
speak!
Rolof raised his face, and while his gaze was fixed upon the pallid face
of Reginaldlooking at him and yet seeming not to see himhe spoke,
in those measured and musical tones, which at once enchained the
listener's
ear.
This appears to me, to be the truth of the matter. The ship
Artemesia
,
bound from Jamaica to England, at the close of the summer of
1756, in the second week of her passage, was boarded by pirates. Their
chief threatened to destroy the vessel and murder the passengersin fact,
sacrifice every soulunless the person and property of Alice, wife of the
Right Honorable Clarence Albert Lyndulfe, were surrendered to him
His object, interrupted ReginaldWherefore demandmy
mother
?
The widow of a poor officernamed John Conwell, who had died
the first week of the voyageassumed the dress and ornaments of the
Lady Alice, and was transferred to the deck of the pirate vessel in her
place. It seems she bore a striking personal resemblance to your mother,
at least she reasoned thus, `You Lady Alice are rich and noble; a
husband
,
a child are yours. I am poor and
alone in the world
. I will
assume
your place, and leave the rest to Heaven!'It was a silly and yet a
noble thought, especially for a poor woman.
But the Captain of the vessel was basecowardly! cried Reginald
To permit the sacrifice! Better have gone down with his ship, or blown
her into the air. Better, much better
From the deck of the pirate ship, Catherine Conwell, saw the good
ship Artemesia pursue her way, continued Rolof, without seeming to
regard the presence of ReginaldPossibly saw the beautiful Lady Alice,
waving her 'kerchief to the breeze. That was the last that ever was seen
of the good ship Artemesia; foundered in a gale perchance; or destroyed
by fire, it may be; she never reached her destination. Of course all on
board perished with her.
Reginald uttered a groan.
As for the widow of the poor officer, on half-pay, we find her next in
Philadelphia, whither she has been taken by the pirates and their
confederates
.
How she was taken there, or where concealed it is not for me to
say. After a month or more, she was removed to the house of Peter
Dorfner, on the Wissahikon, and with her the chests and so forth,
containing
the property of Clarence Albert Lyndulfeyour father. The good
Peterand may be some virtuous merchants of Philadelphiasearched
the chests, stamped with your father's initials, but searched in vain.
For what did they search? again interrupted Reginald.
Perhaps for gold plate,it may be for doubloonsI cannot tell. But
Clarence Albert, had become a very rich man, in the course of three years.
It has been said that he was largely interested in the slave trafficnay, I
have heard it stated that he was connected with a wide-spread
organization
,
whose object was the most comprehensive system of stealing and
selling, human flesh and blood.
A base calumny!
Let us for the sake of argument admit that he was connected with this
organization. That having made money enough, by its members, he was
determined to confide their darker secrets, to the ears of the Royal
Ministry
,
and thus reap a rich harvest of reputation for loyalty and other
valuable
qualities
This is too much! cried ReginaldYou slander my fatherI will
hear no more!
Therefore he conceals in a certain chestconfided to the care of the
Captain of the Artemesia continued Rolof, without regarding the
angry
tone of the young Lord A series of papers, which embody secrets,
very dangerous to the lives of more than one, rich and titled personage,
not only in England, but also in his Majesty's colonies. These papers
reveal the existence of a wide-spread organization, whose banner bears
but two words, Man-Stealing... Piracy. In a word, these papers, strike
at reputation, fortunes, lives, and the members of the aforesaid
organization
,
gaining intelligence of Clarence-Albert's loyaltyor
treachery
determine
to seize his wife and property, at one swoop.'
But this is a dream, exclaimed ReginaldA fancy thin as air!
They have the chest in their possession, and with it, Catherine
Conwell
,
the silly woman who personated the Lady Alice. They search the
chest, but do not find the object of their search. They threaten the poor
woman with death, unless she tells them, in what part of
Clarence-Albert's
plantations, the secret is concealed. She cannot tell them, for the
rather forcible reason, that she does not know herself. And on he 23rd
of Novembera fatal, fatal day for the house of Lyndulfe! the poor
woman
beholds the face of a negro slave, who having seen her, on board the
pirate ship, is determined to rescue her or die.
The same who now lives with Dorfner?
The husband, it seems saved the black from a severe punishment, the
year before. He is grateful; a proof of his incapacity for civilization.
And on the fatal Twenty-third, the poor widowwith her unborn child
beating in her bosomwrites the letter, which you hold, determining to
send it by the hands of the negro to your mother, or to your father. How
the miserable African was to find them, is another question. Catherine
Corwell seems to have had faith in the fellowhe was grateful. Well
I hope you are listening to my story. I would not weary you for the
world.
You mock me. Go ongo on. Curses upon this scoundrel,
Dorfner!
Well, to continue my story, resumed Rolof, still fixing his glassy
eye upon the floor. She has written her letter, or rather, she is in the
act of signing her name, when her `persecutors' appear. They question;
she cannot answer. They proceed to violence; crush her with blows, or
maybe, only frighten her into premature labor. The negro appears, fights
for her,in vainthey blind him with their knives. She dies in the
throes of a mother's agony, and they huddle her corse, still warm, into a
cavity made by removing a board from the floor. They bury her there,
and with her bury the letter, whose last word is the name of her child
of Madeline.
He paused. His voice was soft and musical no longer. It was harsh,
husky with emotion, and his glassy eyes, gazing so vacantly upon the
floor, were wet with tears.
Such is the history which I gather from this letter, blotted with the
blood and tears of a poor woman. Wellwell! What matter's it?
These poor creatures are only born for the service of the rich and titled.
She died in the path of her duty.
Vain were the attempt to paint the mingled emotions which contended
for the mastery on Reginald's face. Kneeling stillthe cavity which had
been the coffin of the poor woman, yawning before himhe found no
utterance for the thoughts struggling within his breast.
MadelineMadeline he gasped, as the fast-crowding emotions
swelled in his throat, and filled the ball of each eye with injected blood
Madeline was not mySister!
His soul was tossing in a fiery whirlpool of joy; a mad delighted
boundless intoxication pervaded his whole being.
Starting to his feet, he placed the light upon the table, and saw the
skeleton once more, but without a shudder
And my motherthe Lady Alicedied notdied not he wrung
his hands in the very madness of delightShe died not by the hand of
violence!
Meanwhile, Rolof Sener, folding his arms upon his breast, watched his
raptures with a calm smile
Madeline was a poor girl, after all, whispered Rolof, The medal
which you found upon her breast, was taken by Catherine Conwell, from
your mother. The aristocratic interest which poor Madeline first
inspired
,
seems now to disappear in a measured pity? Does it not, my
Lord?
She was very beautiful! answered Reginald, gazing absently toward
the light, with his head slightly dropped, and something like a tender
memory in his deep blue eyeVeryvery beautiful! And yet
and yet
She was poor! interrupted Rolof.
True, sir, true. Beauty by the side of a forest spring, with a
milk-pail
in her hand, is very touching,no doubtbut something there is, in
high birth and ancestral associations, which gives a nameless charm to a
lovely woman, and bathes her whole form in a dim and yet luxurious
splendor. I could never touch a woman's hand with so much pleasure,
as when I felt, that the blood which bounded at my touch, had coursed
through the veins of women, as fair and noble, a thousand years before!
The handsome face of the young Lord was warm and glowing once
more; every feature indicated that his soulfreed from the pressure of
almost supernatural terrorwas wrapping itself in luxurious dreams.
Your remarks indicate a cultivated mindyes, the delicacy of taste
which is born with true gentlemen, and which the vulgar herd can never
never attain: as he spoke, in his usual tone, so calm and penetrating,
Rolof Sener folded his arms and regarded the young Lord with a fixed
and tranquil gaze. Search the history of England's aristocracy, and
what do we see? The men all gallant and chivalric; no brutal murders,
no dastardly assassinations; not a single perjury from an English
nobleman
in the course of six hundred years. Can the world furnish a picture
so commanding, so astounding in all its details? Behold the Lord of all
noblemen, the British King! From Henry the Eighth, who reformed
Religion in the arms of his courtezans, down to Charles the Second, who
made Lust a God, and Chastity a crimehow grand, how heroic the British
King! Their noble blood, transmitted without taint, through the course
of six centuries; ah, it is touching, it is sublime; this pure stream of
aristocracy, flowing on so serenely, through the veins of men, noble above
allhonor; and women, too pure forsuch slight things as marriage vows!
The untainted blood it is that touches us into tears, as if no base born
lacquey ever trailed his livery over the velvet of a Ducal marriage bed, or
as though the loftiest Dukedoms that England reveres, did not date their
origin from the moment, when some new `court beauty' grew loving with
`Faith,' in the person of its Defender, a British King!
A Royal Race, beginning with William, a robber, and ending in our
day with George, an idiot. Between this Alpha and Omega, what an
alphabet of chivalrous virtue, colored with the hues of every crime, from
murder done openly on the scaffold, murder done sublimely on the
battle-field
,
down to the solemn bestialities of James the First, a Solomon, whose
life was one incessant Song in praise of filth, whose noblest thought was
a Proverb of blasphemy against all things holy to God and man. Range
these noblemen side by side, adorn their spotless ranks with the wives of
Henry, or the concubines of Charles; let Elizabeth, the Virgin, stand at
one end, with her platonic lovers at her feet, and Mary the Butcher at the
other, with odors from Smithfield curling like incense to her very nostrils,
and then, contrast with these, the embodied forms of Royal virtue and
Gentle blood, that rugged Clown,that base born Peasantthat image of
the rugged PeopleOliver Cromwell.You will excuse my warmth,
when you remember, that I am an enthusiast on the score of noblemen;
and British nobility, its lineage and virtues, was always my passion.'
Reginald burst into a laugh.
Ha, ha, you are disposed to be severe, my good Rolof, he said,
There is a sort of pungent malice in your remarks, which gives your
conversation the flavor of old wine!
Your own family, young Lord, the race of Lyndulfe, present a striking
embodiment of the stern, heroic virtues of the British aristocracy
Rolof's
face was perfectly pale and passionless, his tone low and emphatic
Did you ever chance to unclose the pages of your family history?
Never, cried Reginald, smilingThe very idea smacks of black
letter and cobwebs.
Yes: you are right, that history is stamped in black lettersthe
black letters of madness and murder! It is hung with cobwebscobwebs
which cover the records of Parricide!
You take strange liberties, sir. It is not for me to hear language such
as this
Ah, and is it so? Your delicate ear revolts at my uncourtly speech!
Let me have your handsohthis is the hand of a brave man, a Lord.
It can wield a sword or pen a love ditty, or mingle poison in the wine-cup
of some beautiful Italian damsela noble hand, by my faith!
Reginald felt the blood rush to his cheek, but the large eyes of Rolof
held him motionless. He stood there, helpless as a culprit in the
hangman's
hands.
And yet this hand, within twelve hours, may be stained with the blood
of a Father! Pah! I see the loathsome dye upon it, even now'tis a
brave hand!
He flung the hand from him, as though it had been an adder.
Your deformity protects you, sneered Reginald, choaking with anger.
At that word a change, as sudden as frightful, came over the face of
Rolof Senerthe black vein swelled out upon his massive foreheadhis
eyes, sunken beneath the downdrawn brows, glared with deadly lustre.
He spoke again, his voice lower and yet more distinct, every measured
syllable falling on Reginald's ear, like a separate torture.
CHAPTER THIRTY-EIGHTH.
THE CURSE OF THE HOUSE OF LYNDULFE
You
have come to Wissahikon,to seek the murderers of your
motherto weep over the ashes of Madeline? Notrickster, your
schemes are webs for fliesthey do not blind the eyes of men. You
come hither, in the uniform of his Majesty, your life at the beck of any
rebel who may chance to spy the scarlet under the blueyou come hither
to prosecute an amour with the daughter of Sir Ralph Wyttonhurst. Do
you intend marriage?Perchance to-night? Well, the bridal party is
assembled, the Preacher is waiting, book in hand, when your father breaks
in upon the scene, and tears you from your beautiful Leola!
He dare not, gasped Reginald, By Heaven, he dare not'
Said I not so? He lays his hand upon you'tis a way the
Lynqulfes
have! You submit, and like a child caught in the pantry among
the sweetmeats, are dragged away to receive your chastisement. You
would not strike your father?
The brow of the young Lord was corrugated; he stood panting and
trembling, with his hand upon the hilt of his knife.
He dare not, he dare not, the muttered words came through his
set teeth.
Read, O read the history of your race, and then look into the mirror
and behold your own visage, stamped with the curse, which has descended
from father to son, through the dark course of two hundred years! The
blood which now forsakes your cheek, and rushes to your heart, young
Lord, is impregnated in its every throb with that curse. It only demands
a Time, a Circumstance, and the work is done, the hand of the Son is
reddened with the father's blood.
You remember the Medal which you tore from the heart of Madeline?
It bears a cross, a name, a date. `
Eola
' and `
November the Twelfth
.'
Can youdare you call to mind, the deeds which through the course of
centuries, have marked that fatal day, in the history of your house?
`November the Twelfth,' in our modern language, simply means `
November
Twenty-Third.' On that day, your grandfather, John of Lyndulfe,
was found dead in the park of his ducal mansion, and near him, the
mangled
carcase of his eldest son, Ranulph-John. What does this mean? It
has but one meaning; you are a brave man, read it
Parricide
.
No word came from Reginald's lips; he gazed into the face of the
speaker, and was dumb.
On that day, Catherine Conwell, the victim in place of your mother,
died within these walls, her last groan mingling with the cry of her
new-born
child. On that daybut let us go back at once to the reign of the
Eighth Henry, when the destinies of your house were sown in the luxuriant
soil of Murder, * * * * * * and Parricide. It was in the year 1538, that
the baptism of unnatural crimes first descended upon your Race. It was
in the silence of nightafter a day spent in drunken revelrythat a
Father and his Sons were linked together, in a series of crimes, whose
blackness might make the Devils weep; weep for shame, at the thought,
that even in the sublimity of Satanic crime, they were outstripped by this
poor creature, Man. Three Lords of your house were bound together in
the deeds of that night; one of those Lords, your Ancestor. Of the
nature of these crimes, I cannotdare not speakbut they took place on
the Twelfth of November. A year passes; and one of the Three,
the Parricide, on the anniversary of that day, glides behind the chair of
his wife, whose babe is sleeping on her breast. Then, as she turns her
face to the setting sun, as the babe awakes, and toys with her flowing hair
the Parricide lifts the dagger
From that hour, the Race of Lyndulfe has been accursed. The Head
of your house, whether Baron or Duke,he that wears the title and rules
the domainsdies by the hand of his son. Do you tremble: come, this
is unmanly! Laugh, my Lordyou are wittygive speech to those
merry jests, which even now flit over your brain.Dies by the hand of
his son, either by accident or design, and from this curse there is no
escape
;
for it is not the work of an Evil Angel, it is not the judgment of a
blind Fatality,
it is simply in your blood, transmitted with your organi
zation, bequeathed by every father with the life which he bestows upon
his child
.
As though a dark truth had changed his whole being, Reginald, with
pallid aspect and vacant and lustreless gaze, began to speak in a hollow
voice:
Yes, yes,one day while wandering in the park, near the spot where
the dead bodies of the old Duke and his son were found, an aged peasant
breathed into my ear, a tradition of our houseI laughed then, but I
shudder now. I remember its every word. `
The Baron of Lyndulfe,
who committed these crimes ages ago, was doomed to live until he had
expiated his guilt by sweeping every one of his race from the earth; or
until he ascertained that the wife whom he so basely slew, was innocent.
From the lips of a woman descended from this wife, and wearing the
Medal which he coined in memory of his Father and his Wifefrom the
lips of a woman, and a woman onlycan he obtain the word which will
permit him to die. Until that word is pronounced, he is doomed to live
and destroy
.' These were the words of the old peasant, and this Demon,
the embodied Curse of our racelives at this hour, as he has lived for
centuries. Yes, he glides by us in the sunshine; at dead of night, he
stands near us as we sleep, and breathes the pestilence of his infernal being
into our souls. And I saw him, two years agoon the rock which stood
near the wayside, as I came to Wissahikoneven now his words ring in
my ears.
He turned and gazed upon the strange man, whose words had stirred
these dark thoughts into life.
Rolof Sener crouched upon the floor; he had fallen like a man wounded
by a pistol shot; he lay with his face buried in his hands and his limbs
quivering as with a death-spasm.
Reginald attempted to raise him, but in vain. His struggles were like
the writhings of a person seized with epilepsyhis hands shook with an
incessant tremor; he sunk his nails into the boards, and uttered a low,
faint moan.
Reginald turned his face to the light; it was the visage of a dead man,
the features rigid, the eyes fixed as stone.
And the young Lord, heir to the fortunes of Lyndulfe, stood
contemplating
this inanimate form, with a look of vague curiosity, while the
flickering
light shone full upon those motionless eyeballs.
Is he dead? he faltered, while a shudder pervaded his veinsHah!
He breathes again, and something like life shines in his eyes.
And so, Madeline was not of your blood, were the first words
which trembled from the lips of Rolof, as he looked around with a bewildered
glance: Only the daughter of Poverty and Innocence! Hah! Is't you,
Reginald? he started to his feetPardon me. I have been subject to
these attacks from childhood. Some wild words have passed between
30
us,it is over nowyou would marry Leola, to night? It is well; I
will be your friend. The Duke comes to Wissahikon, but he shall not
know of your presence here, much less of your intended marriage.'
He seized Reginald's hand while a kindlyalmost paternalsmile
stole over his face.
You have seen Leola?
I have; her father's house is thronged with guests from the city. We
met not an hour ago, in the grove which skirts his place. Something was
said between us of a private marriage, to night, but these guests may
recognize
me as a British officer; I have no other dress than the uniform
which I wear. Then there is no clergyman
Go to! These guests are all good Tories; stout loyalists, sworn to
the king, every man and woman of them. As for your dress and the
clergyman, when you return to Sir Ralph's you will find them both in the
care of one person, to wit, the knave Jacopo, otherwise known as the Rev.
Jacob James.
Jacopo!
Aye, Jacopo; he will dress you for the wedding, and marry you
afterward.
You speak in mysteries
Is he not clergyman enough, for the occasion? Go to, Reginald! I
read your eyes; I translate your heart into words. Leola is a fair girl,
beautiful as a syren,
She is indeed beautiful!
That tone reveals your heart! Beautiful she is, without a doubt, and
her form might lure a saint into the madness of passion; but the daughter
of a Baronet is no match for Reginald, heir to the Dukedom of Lyndulfe.
Jacopo is a clergymandost comprehend, my child? A convenient
clergyman, whose signature to your marriage parchments may one day
melt into air. Go to, boyI am your best friend. I serve you and at
the same time rescue your House from the shame of an ill-assorted
marriage.
With downcast eyes and averted face, Reginald listened, and after a
pause replied
Yes, I remember, Jacopo is a clergyman. Did he not take orders
last year? But I must away; even now Leola looks for me, and ah!
I had well nigh forgotten; Paul Ardenheim awaits me at the Blasted
Pine.
Paul Ardenheim? A student-like youth, who strangely disappeared
from Wissahikon, two years ago?
A noble fellow; every inch a man. He is my friend. He went with
me to England; in a word, we are as Brothers.
He is rich?
While I have a guinea.
A dependent then upon your bounty?
No! Paul would blush at the idea, with the true instinct of a
high-minded
and honorable man.
And yet he is poor!'
But his heart is true, his arm brave! One night, I was beset by
assassinshe saved me at the hazard of his own life. It was a generous
deed, but it left a scar upon his forehead. Paul will carry that scar to the
grave; and while it endures I am his friend.
Nobly spoken! Worthy of your race. Go, Reginald, Leola awaits
you.
Reginald grasped Rolof's hand, some whispered words passed between
them, and then he hurried from that charnel-room, as the light was
flickering
in the socket. As if recalled by a sudden thought, he turned upon
the threshold, and exclaimed
This Son of Gaspard Michaelwas that also a dream?
To-night, replied Rolof, I will tell you all. We meet at the
wedding.
With a light heart and a glad step, Reginald turned away from the
gloomy chamber, leaving the skeleton of Catherine Conwell and the
memory of Madeline to silence and the grave, as he hurried onward, with
the name of Leola on his lips.
Rolof Sener closed the door, and turned him once again to the
memories
of that silent room.
The light was burning fast into the socket, and its wan and uncertain
glare gave his face a wild and haggard look.
He stood perfectly motionless, his folded arms and vacant eyes and fixed
features, giving him the appearance of some quaint effigy, on an ancient
tomb, rather than a living man.
Washington comes to Wissahikon, and comes to receive a Crown!
The purity of his soul, the sublimity of his patriotism will be triedit
would bring a smile to a cheek of marblethis Hero of an hour will
attempt to repeat the old story of Oliver Cromwell! Should he prove
true to his missionwhat then? Must he still be surrendered, blinded
and bound, into the hands of the Royalists?
Twelve o'clock to-night will decide it all.
The Duke, too, comes to Wissahikon, comes to secure his prisoner,
andto confront the Son of Gaspard Michael. Well, well, the Duke was
ever a cautious man, full of `business tact,' and attentive to the main
chancehe smiled.
Reginald goes to meet Leola, with all the fire of his race in his eye,
and solemn vows on his lips, vows, the more to be relied upon, when we
remember thatJacopo is to be clergyman. 'Tis a brave youth, this
Reginald!
Paul Ardendeim!
And thus, as the clouds, toward the close of a warm summer day,
hasten from every point in the sky, and at the hour of sunset unite
in thunder and lightning, so they gather allthese men and women,and
before the morrow comes, there will be a storm.
And I
The light flashed its last, and darkness enshrouded the form of Rolof
Sener.
CHAPTER THIRTY-NINTH
SATAN, THE BEAUTIFUL!
Beautiful
Satan! muttered Paul, as he felt the clasp of that warm
hand, which led him gently into the shadows of the wood, and then by
an uncertain ray of moonlight, he saw the white robe, gleaming through
the twilight, while the waving hair, swept his fevered brow.
His brain was whirling, as in the mazes of an intoxicating dream. He
heard a low and gentle voice whisper, Come! but the face was turned
away. He followed the Unknown in silence, while the blood bounded in
every vein.
Through the woods, and down into the shadows of a glen, up the slope
of a hill, overgrown with laurel, the hand led him, and at last emerging
into the moonlightit was wan, pale and spectralhe beheld a scene
which broke upon him like a vision from fairy land.
Only a moment he paused, to drink in the beauty of the sight, and
then the hand of the unknown urged him around.
Let us behold that picture of a moment.
He stood on the verge of a smooth and grassy lawn, bordered by noble
pines, and with a mansion, lighted in every window, shining like a
funeral
pyre through the half-twilight. Bells of radiance gushed from the
windows of that mansion of dark stone walls, and high roof, crowned
with a tower; and the lawn, the gloomy pines, were touched with rays of
living light.
It was the mansion of Isaac Van Behme, the thought rushed over the
mind of Paul, but no! This mansion so gay with lights in every
casement
,
this lawn crowded with marble images, which looked like ghosts
in the mingled radiance, did not in the least resemble the isolated home
of Isaac Van Behme, as he saw it on the fatal night.
Then the ground was wrapped in snow, and the dark evergreens, waved
their gloomy branches, about the desolate mansion, like mourners attired
in funeral robes and sorrowing for the dead.
But now, the lawn, overarched by the pure blue sky, and bordered by
the tall pines, was crowded by throngs of men and women,or ladies and
gentlemenwhose gay costumes shone in the light, and gave a festival
appearance to the scene. The quaint attire of the olden timefull
bottomed
wigs for the men, and head dresses like the tower of Babel for the
women, coats with wide skirts, and gowns resembling a peacock's train
in all its varied and ingenious details Music too, came in bursts of
melody
,
softened by distance and filling the deep sad sky, with a low
murmur
,
like the lull of a distant fountain.
While Paul at a glance beheld this scene, the Unknown was
half-concealed
from sight among the shadows of the path. The hand still pressed
his own, and sent its magnetic thrill to his heart, but the form clad in the
white robe, was shrouded by the foliage, and the face was lost in the folds
of a veil, whose snowy lace fluttered around the raven tresses, like a cloud
of pale and impalpable mist.
They stood, Paul and the Unknown at the entrance of a secluded walk,
which extended in a magnificent perspective, until it was lost in the
shadows
.
A line of towering pines, separated the walk from the lawn, and
between their huge trunks, the light rushed in upon the gloom, in fitful
rays, while their branches, bending to the evening air, formed a canopy
overhead.
It was the walk of all walks in the world,thus on the very verge of
light and life, and yet separated from the gay scene, set apart, as a haunt
sacred to solitudefor a scene of love, when the heart talks with the
silent
pressure of the hand, and the low whispers of the lovers, melt into
noiseless kisses.
Along this walk, now in light, now in shadow, Paul was led by the
Unknown; he did not seem to walk on the solid earth, but to tread in air,
trees, mansion and lights, were whirling round him in a mad dance, while
a vision of a beautiful form, and dark eyes, flashing through a snowy veil,
floated before him on waves of golden mist.
Who art thou! whispered PaulAm I awake! Am I dreaming?
Or is this a delusion invented by Satan, to cheat me into my ruin? Speak!
Who art thou? There's madness in thy touchthine eyes tear the Soul
from my brainI am afraid of this wild loveliness!
The tresses floated on the light, the head was turned, and a low voice
breathed his name through the stillness, and whispered Come!
The walk at last came to an end, and the Unknown plunged into
the thick shrubbery, which grew in fragrant and leafy luxuriance along
the western wall of the mansion. All was dark and noiseless here; while
the front was blazing from every window as with a festival illumination,
this wall, silent and gloomy, was overrun by a leafy vine, which clung
along the eaves of the roof, and flung its festoons quivering in the air.
Paul was alone in the gloom with the Unknown; he could not see the
sky, nor did a single ray shine through the thickly-woven foliage. He
could not see the beautiful shape, whose bosom heaved above the loosened
robe, nor the snowy veil which covered her face and midnight hair. But
the soft,gentleyet maddening pressure of the hand, assured him of
her presence, and her breath mingled with his own, as her lips pressed
his mouth, murmuring
Paul, I love thee!
Very simple words, you say, yet many a time, have words as trite and
plain, been warmed into overwhelming eloquence, by a kiss from young
lips, lips rife with youth and passion, lips throbbing madness into the lips
they press!
Among the shrubbery appeared a narrow door, sunken in the gloomy
wall, and overhung by the tendrils of the creeping vine. A white hand
was extendedthe door opened inward, or receded into the wallthe
entrance of a stairway was visible.
Ah! I remember! Here on the last night exclaimed Paul, as his
confused ideas began to condense themselves into shape.
Come! cried the Unknown, and Paul sprang over the threshold
the door was closed,and in the darkness, he was led upward by that
gentle hand.
Suddenly a door was opened, at the head of the narrow stairway, and
Paul's face was bathed in light.
I remember! he mutteredIt is the door of the mirror, through
which I passed on the
He stepped over the threshold, the mirror glided back into its place,
and Paul looked around, with the bewildered gaze of a man but half
awakened from some luxurious dream.
It was many moments before he recovered his entire consciousness, and
gazed about him with a steadfast eye.
A soft, voluptuous light prevailed throughout that spacious chamber.
Curtains of lace, resembling wreaths of floating mist, trembled along the
solitary window, and gave entrance to the breeze and star-beam of the
glorious night. The lofty walls were animated and impassioned with
many a beautiful form, that seemed to live, to breathe on canvass, and
from the shadows of a niche, sunken in each corner of the room, a pale
marble image stole gently on the sight. The floor returned no echo to
the tread; it was covered with a velvet carpet, whose warm dyes,
subdued
by the dim light, harmonized with the luxurious atmosphere of the
chamber.
There was a mirror too, reaching from the ceiling to the floorit was
the secret door of the secret staircaseand Paul as he looked upon it,
felt the blood mount to his cheek.
It is the chamber! the thought flashed over him;the chamber in
which the Wizard's daughter first dawned upon his eyes.
But where was the gloomy atmosphere which had once invested the
place, where the dark hangings, and dusky floor and sombre couch?
Paul turned, and in the recess, where the bed with the dark hangings,
once had stood, appeared a snow-white couch, with a canopy of satin,
white as snow, arching above its spotless coverlet.
It was in a word, the luxurious chamber of a Woman, at once refined,
beautiful and voluptuous.
Do you not know me, Paul?
That voice breathed of the days of old!
She stood before him, like the Spirit of the scene, gathering her
flowing
robe over her breast, while her hair rested in midnight waves upon
her half-uncovered shoulders. Not a Spirit cold or pale, or spectral, by
any means, nor a form of marble enshrining the idea of Beauty, as
passionless
as ice.
It was a proud spirit whose fast heaving bosom, spoke of the impetuous
blood; whose large eyes, veiled in the shadow of the long lashes, gleamed
with the moist light of passion in its fullness, and love in its most
bewitching
langour. There was a rose blooming on each brown cheek; an ivory
line, gleamed through the parted lips, and on the brow so pale and
eloquent
,
a Thought was struggling into life. It was not the Thought born
of a love, calm and tranquil as the stars, but a Thought fiery and
impetuous
,
as the blood which was bloom on her lips and cheek.
Was it the form of a Maiden, just ripening into the consciousness of
her being?
It was the form of a Woman, in the first flush of her matured
loveliness
;
a woman whose shape was only beautiful, because its outlines
mingling grace, with warm voluptuous loveliness, presented the
incarnation
of a Soul, lofty in its ambition, boundless in its passion, andit may
beremorseless in its revenge.
And before this beautiful shape, clad as much in those dark tresses, as
in the loosely flowing robe, stood the bewildered man, whose dark attire,
displaying a bold, a muscular form, by no means harmonized with the
luxurious hues of the dim-lighted chamber.
His pale brow, relieved by his dark brown hair, his boldly defined
features
shadowed by an inexpressible melancholy, his eyesso deep, so
clear, so full of wondering lightpresented a picture which was strongly
contrasted with the warm countenance of the beautiful woman.
It is no vision then, he said with an absorbing look, and a voice, that
rung bold and deep upon the silence of the chamberYou are before
me, once morelivingbeautiful as when I first beheld you in this room!
O much more lovely, O wondrously beautiful! And as I gaze into your
eyes, there is no longer a soul left within my bosom, I look and I am lost,
for my being is at once mingled and dissolved in yours.
He said no more, but looked into her half-veiled eyes, with a long
unchanging
gaze.
Lost, Paul? she saidDo you fear me? Am I then hideous in
your eyes?
Hideous! She came gently to him, and laid her hands upon his
shoulders, and breathed upon his cheek. Hideous! Her eyes hazy with
liquid light were looking into his ownher breast was near to his heart,
thrilling his every nerve with its impetuous throb. Hideous! Her fingers
trembled gently through his clustering hair; her tresses, floated over his
hands; he was wrapt and lost in the atmosphere of her bewitching
loveliness
.
And you were lost to me! she whisperedLittle did I dream,
when I wandered forth into the wood, an hour ago, that the next hour,
would bring to me, a moment like this!
Have a care brave Paul! Remember the beautiful Tempter, who
maddened
you, until the oath was broken, and the Sealed Chamber profaned
remember the words of the old man, whose forehead felt your sacreligous
blowremember Monk of Wissahikon, the solemn Destiny which cuts
you off from all ties of friendship or of love, from all sympathy with the
hopes and ambitions of common men.
Remember
Paul felt his knees bend beneath him, and in a moment, he looked up
and saw that beautiful face, glowing over him, while his upraised arms,
encircled that voluptuous shape, with a quivering embrace.
It was not love, nor passion, but madness.
Beautiful Satan! he criedfor his senses were wild and wandering
his blood was molten flame again, as on the fatal nightTempt me to
my ruin, and I will give my soul to thee! for thee I crossed the Sealed
Chamber, for thee I dashed my father's gray hairs into dust, for thee I
became as Cain, a wanderer upon the earth, with a mark upon my brow,
that scared even the outcast and the felon from my path. Look! I am
thine again!
And he bowed his head upon her throbbing breast, even as he knelt at
her feet, and girdled her in his arms, and wept aloud, for there was
Despair
in his Love, a bitterness like the Death of a Soul, in his delirious
transport.
Woewoeto Paul the Monk of Wissahikon.
He raised his facea Hope had broken in upon his soul.
Beautiful Spirit! cried PaulBe merciful! Do not tempt me
again to my Despair!
Tempt you to your despair! she whispered, as her form was girdled
in his trembling arms, You are dreaming Paul!
O the wild beauty of her face, as she lifted her arms, and swept aside
her raven hair, while her eyes, dilating with an irresistable fascination,
shone steadily upon him, and her voicesoftened to a whispercame to
his ear, like the voice of his own heart, the very accents of his Destiny.
Do not tempt me again to my despair, he wildly cried, unable to
turn his gaze from the impassioned beauty of her faceI hear your voice
again, and all is madness in my veins. It was that voice, which tempted
me, on the fatal night, the night which is graven into my soul, in
characters
of deathless Remorse. You remember! While Catharine clung to
my knees, you whispered in my ear, and I crossed the threshold of the
Sealed Chamber, never to know peace or rest again. You remember
The Sealed Chamber! echoed the beautiful woman, as her robes,
floating so loosely about her voluptuous shape, could not hide the sudden
swell of her impetuous bosom. I do remember, Paul. Ah, how pale
and terrible you looked, when you came forth from that gloomy chamber.
No word for me, not even a look! And when I saw you last, you were
near the end of the corridor, and your father come trembling from his
room, and
I struck him to the earth Paul's voice was faint and broken, his
face clouded with an unutterable RemorseWith this hand I smote his
gray hairs.
He was silenthis head sank on his breast, and as if in mockery of his
woe, a burst of music, from the lighted lawn, pealed merrily through the
window.
She gazed upon the kneeling man, and saw his form, writhe at her feet,
with an agony too deep for a murmur or a tear. His hands withdrawn
from her waist, supported his bended head, but she placed her hands upon
his dark hair, and leaning over him, suffered her tresses to enfold him,
like a veil.
Paul, she whispered, I love thee. Would die for theefor thee,
tempt ruin and despair!
Slowly he raised his face, and saw her face so near him, that their lips
almost met. Her eyes were shining into his own; her breath fanned his
cheek; all the beauty of her countenance, glowing into the life of passion,
overwhelmed his gaze.
Come, she cried, or no! she said it in a voice so low, that her lips
did not seem to speak, but her soulCome! Let us talk of other days.
Nay let us talk of the night when first we met, here in this chamberDo
you remember it Paul? The history of our love is brief, very brief when
measured by time, but in eternity when measured by our thoughts. Come,
Paul let us talk of the olden time!
It seemed to him, that he could kneel forever there, bathed in the
brightness of her gazewrapt in her look, her accentenfolded in her
midnight hair.
He could not answer her; his heart was full; his eyes began to blaze,
not with the serene light of thought, but with the madness of passion
passion, such as stirs the heart, which has not leadened its pulsations,
with the loves and hates of common life.
As the pallor of his face, vanished before a sudden warmthas cheek
and lip and brow, glowed in a moment, into a new lifehe presented an
image of manly, and impassioned beauty
And the voice spoke my name before we met, he whispered, And
told you that one day, we should mingle our destinies, and become
one soul.
The Voice! she echoedAh! I remember! That Voice which
spoke to me, from the air, and guided my life with its words. But it is
gone, now, Paul. I have never heard it since that night. But the voice
which thrills me now, and melts on my soul, as the voice of my Destiny,
speaks from your lips, Paul from yours!
She bent near and nearer to him as he knelt at her feet, and his face
and hers were lost in the mazes of her flowing hair
The mirror reflected those forms, palpitating with youth and passion,
and centred among the images of that luxurious chamber.
Was it the echo of a kiss that broke upon the breathless quiet, or the
echo of voices, mingling their accents, as the lipswarm with the life of
youthclung together?
Paul! she cried, raising her radiant face, as his countenance stamped
with the frenzy of passion was revealedNow tell me the secret of that
well-remembered night. Tell me the secret of the Sealed Chamber.
His hands fell from her waist; he was pale and cold again. Where
but a moment before had been a man fired by passion, was now, only a
kneeling form, clad in funeral black, with a face livid as Death.
He rose to his feet and turned his face away.
There he faltered, his face averted, as he extended his hand toward
her, ThereRead it alland do not let it work such madness in your
soul, as it has in mine.
It was a Manuscript which he had taken from his breast, where it had
been concealed among the folds of his dress, close to his heart.
Her hand trembled as she took the Manuscript. One gaze toward his
form, as with his face turned away, he stood voiceless and immovable
before her, and she opened those dark pages stained with the blackness
of dead centuries.
She read, her bosom slowly heaving, her eye gradually dilating, with
the light of a wild yet fearful curiosity.
Not once did he turn and look upon her.
She read, and a smile gleamed over her features,gleamed from the
lips to the eyesonly to die again, in an expression of vague and
apathetic
horror. Her breath came tremulous and broken; she crushed the
Manuscript in her fingers, and gazed around with a look of fright and
terror
,
and thenwhile silent and statue-like he stood near hershe fixed
her eyes upon its dark pages once more.
Her beautiful face lost its hues of youth and passion; the hair which
streamed over her shoulders, swept a forehead, white as marble, and damp
with beaded moisture.
CHAPTER FORTY.
THE MANUSCRIPT OF THE SEALED CHAMBER.
To nightso ran the quaint history of Monk Eustacewe will look
upon the double-crime, whose unnatural gilt, forever clouded the House
of Mount Sepulchre.
*
*
The reader will perceive that this is a continuation of that part of the
manuscript
contained in the
Prologue
at the commencement of this work.
It is a spacious chamber, with a ceiling like a dome, and a floor paved
with alternate slabs of black and white marble. Four pillars adorned
with fantastic curvings support this dome, and in front of each pillar
stands the figure of a Crusader, in the armor of Richard the Lion heart,
with a red cross painted upon his breast
The walls are hung with purple tapestry, on which are emblazoned the
deeds of Richard the Lion Heart and his knights; here a picture of the
shores of Jordan; there, a fray with Saladin; a little farther on, King
Richard standing with hands clasped on his sword, while he gazes on the
Holy Sepulchre. Therefore, this chamber, illuminated by lamps of
perfumed
oil, is called the Hall of Palestine.
In the centre of the place, around a board groaning under the weight
of viands and beakers, behold Lord Harry and his brave Twenty-Four.
He looks right noble in his attire of blue velvet, set off with diamond
stars and chains of gold. His head is proudly placed upon his broad
shoulders, and his long golden hair and brown beard slightly tinged with
red, gave a noble appearance to his bold features and florid complexion.
One hand upon the hilt of his sword, the other lifted a well-filled
goblet
,
as he glances round the tablenow, looking upon the wreck of beef,
ham, capon, and all imaginable pastries, defended by a solemn array of
bottles and goblets, now, gazing into the faces of his gallant
Twenty-Four
.
Vain were the power of language to picture the contrasted expressions
of their various facesthe costumes of every fashion and devicethe
conversation now echoing in discordant chorus, now broken by peals of
laughter.
Lord Harry glanced upon his company, and arranged himself more
comfortably in his gilded chair, as he surveyed all these indications of pomp
and state, and murmured as the cup pressed his lips,
It is a right good thing to be Lord of Mount Sepulchre!
It cannot be denied, that it was a scene of luxurious display, worthy of
an Eastern Sultan.
Around the board were ranged a band of attendant servitors, clad in
silks and laces, their eyes anticipating the commands of Lord Harry and
his Twenty-Four.
The curtains drawn aside toward the north, revealed a glimpse of a
garden, full of rare plants and flowers, whose perfume imbued the
atmosphere
,
while many fountains glittered in the light of the setting sun through
the thickly clustered foliage.
A health to our King! cried Lord Harry, extending his goblet to the
Servitor by his sideA health to the brave Harry of England and
France, the Eighth of his name!
Goblets were raised and drained with many a loyal shout.
To the King, and confusion to Luther! cried a fair faced Knight,
whose youthful lip was scarce burdened by a shadow of manhood's down.
To the Spanish womanconfusion! shouted a grim old Knight,
whose cheeks bore traces of the civil wars.
To the Devil with the Pope and all enemies of our King! ejaculated
a courtly Lord, whose eyes were affected with an inordinate habit of
winking.
Baron Henry, like a true knight and sworn Courtier as he was, emptied
his goblet, and exclaimed in a joyous tone
Vassals! More wine! We'll have a merry bout of it together, and
hark ye, let our steeds be saddled for a merry ride by torchlight after our
feast is over!
At this moment there was a heavy foot-tramp by the side of the noble
Lord, and a hoarse voice exclaimed, with an accent of rude courtesy
Noble Sirthe Italian craves a word with your Lordship
Hah! Iron Dickon is't thou?
Turning suddenly he beheld Iron Dickon standing by his side. Iron
Dickon was a stalwart retainer, who stood some six feet seven inches in
his boots, and could fell an ox with a blow of his fist. He looked, indeed,
like Samson of old, encased in a costume of deer's hide, defended by
plates of iron armor, with a dagger in his girdle, and a sword by his side.
His features were coarse, his head somewhat large even for his large body,
and there was a sort of settled vacancy in his large gray eyes, almost
hidden
by his thick eyebrows.
He was a rude fellow, and his appearance in this scene of wine and
laughter was almost as welcome as a death's head at a marriage festival.
In what capacity the stout Dickon served the young Lord, few persons
could guess; he could not have been attached to him merely as a common
soldier, for they were too familiar, too often closeted together for that.
And yet, he was no knight; he was called simply Iron Dickon, and ever
since his sudden appearance, some years before,ere the old Baron was
stricken blindhe was regarded by the other servitors of the castle with
a feeling akin to fear.
A murmur of surprise, mingled with something like anger or loathing
was echoed by the brave Twenty-Four, as they beheld the gloomy
retainer
standing beside the young Lord.
Noble Sirthe Italian craves a word with your Lordship repeated
Iron Dickon, scowling gloomily at the festival array.
The Italian? Let him wait our pleasure
Iron Dickon drew nearer to his master's side, and whispered
But he will not wait. `Tell thy master I must see him this moment,
or I depart from the Castle without further words.' This was the
message noble sir, which he gave me
Is it so? He shall see me by the Rood cried the Baron, starting
from his chair, and flinging his goblet on the tableWoe to the knave
if he but thinks to cross my humor. Gentles he added, turning to the
Twenty-FourIt is but a matter of a moment's absence. I will be
with you ere a goblet is drained.
He turned to the door of the Hall, assuming his cap, which was
crowned with white plumes, bound together by a single jewel which
glittered like a coal.
Dickon, I saywhere is this knave? whispered the young Lord, as he
drew near the door.
In the Tower of Saladin, your Lordship, whispered Dickon.
Was it only a fancy, or did the Baron of Mount Sepulchre change color?
The tower of Saladin? he echoedKnave! How came
he
there?
Are there no other rooms in Mount Sepulchre, but you must put this
stranger in the tower of Saladin?'
There are many rooms in the tower of Saladin, bluntly replied the
vassal, on the first floor there is a large hall, which has served us for
a guard room ere now. Down among the foundations there is a dungeon.
On the second floor where there are two chambers, one opening into the
other, I have placed this Italian and his page
His page! cried Baron Harry, as his foot touched the threshold.
And on the third floor, continued Iron Dickon, without heeding his
masterOn the third floor, I say, there is a chamber which overlooks
the country for a score of miles, and there
Be silent! whispered the Baron, as he laid his hand upon the wrist
of his servitorThere are other ears listening beside mine.
The servitors stood ranged beside the lofty door, as their Lord crossed
the threshold, followed by Iron Dickon.
Curious it was to see the amazement pictured on the faces of the
redoubted
Twenty-Four. They whispered one with the other, while the
wine-cup stood untasted; they cast anxious glances toward the door; and
soon a breathless stillness pervaded that hall, so lately echoing with the
shouts and laughter. They spoke of various matters with the manner
and look of men who talk of things forbidden. Of the Italian, with his
bronzed visage and eye of flamewas he indeed a Magician? Had he
in truth sold his immortal soul to the enemy of mankind? Of the elder
brother, Ranulph, who had died abroad, they also spoke; and one, bolder
than the rest, whispered somewhat of the old man
the Father
. At the
word, there rose an universal murmur, for Lord Harry had forbidden the
mention of his father's name or existence, by any tongue within the
castle-walls
.
Strange it was, to see the fear which had descended upon the
brave Twenty-Four.
Was this strange stillness, this sudden fear, an
Omen
of the
Calamity
which that night befel the house of
Mount
Sepulchre
?
An hour passed and the Baron had not returned.
Suddenly the door was opened; every face was turned to look upon
the Baron, and from the manner of his countenance, gather some
indications
of the nature of his secret counsels with the Italian.
It was not the Baron who appeared.
A man of tall form, clad like a monk, and with a cowl dropped over
his face, crossed the threshold, and with hurried steps passed through the
gaily-lighted hall. Not once did he turn and look upon the guests; no
eye caught one glimpse of his facehe appearedhe crossed the hall
and was gone through an opposite door while the joyous Twenty-Four
gazed in each others eyes, in blank amazement.
The Italian! the murmur burst from every lip.
It seemed, in truth, as if that tall form, clad in monkish robes, and
crossing
the marble floor with a soundless step, had imbued the air with a
spell, and left a mortal fear in every heart. It is even said, that the
fragrance
of the perfumed lights was lost in the odor of brimstone; but of
this I am not assured.
The Italian! murmured the stout Twenty-Four, and set their
half-drained
goblets down.
Another hour was gone. Some of the joyous Knights were sleeping in
their chairs, others were conversing in low whispers; the Servitors stood
idle in the shadows of the lofty pillars, when the silence was broken by a
footstep. There was no dismay, no fear this time. It was the bold step
of Baron Harry, Lord of Mount Sepulchre.
He crossed the threshold with a flushed cheek and sparkling eye, while
Iron Dickon walked scowling and sullen at his heels.
Gentle sirs, I cry your mercy for this discourtesy, he exclaimed, as
he stood at the head of the well-filled board, the light shining upon his
noble form, and revealing his animated face, which seemed framed in his
red beard and golden hairMatters of some importance claimed my
ear. This Italian tells me, that he can restore the poor old man, my
father, to strength and health again
Much wonder looked from the eyes of the Twenty-Four, as they heard
the young Lord pronounce that name of all names the most forbidden
My Father!
And while he was closeted with the old man, in the third floor of the
Tower, Iha! ha! 'Tis a merry thought! I was engaged in exploring
the mysteries of this Italian's den on the second floor. I 'faith 'twas a
rare hour I had there alone. Alone, did I say? Yet hold, I must tell
you the history in the proper way. Why sit ye, staring like monks,
between
the hour of prayers and dinner? Fill goblets, all, and I will tell
you the merry history of my adventures.
The Twenty-Four filled their goblets, but even as they drained each
cup, their eyes were fixed upon Lord Harry's comely face
Behind his Lord, his scowling visage half seen above the young Baron's
head, stood Iron Dickon, fixed and immovable as one of the effigies which
encircled the board.
Ha, ha! 'Tis a story that will burn your ears, my joyous Knights,
brothers of this Companionship, which finds its only prayer in woman's
eyes, its only altar in a well-filled board, its only worship in a brimming
cup. But listen. There are two rooms on the second floor of the Tower
of Saladin, two rooms, separated by a narrow door. Dickon, my gay
Death's head, didst thou not force the door,ha, ha! In the first room I
found alembics, crucibles, skulls, and parchments, and all other indications
of this Italian's wizard-craft. But in the second room, when Dickon
faced the door,the Wizard all the while was in the room above, with
the old man, my father, you must remember,I found apage! Not a
page from some black-lettered prayer book, my good Knights, but a living,
breathing page, bound in a close-fitting dress of black velvet, with eyes
like stars, hair like a cloud, and a bosom young and warm asasis
your blood, after the first cup of rich old wine!
Wondrous it was to see the curiosity which stamped every face of the
Twenty-Four.
A woman! the word burst from every lip.
A woman! echoed the hoarse voice of Iron Dickon
The page was sleeping on his,or hercouch. A light, very dim
and flickering shone over her face, as I drew near the bed. She lay with
one cheek resting on her bent arm, and her dark hair, half-hidden under
a velvet cap, half-straying over her cheek and neck, only made her
complexion
seem more white and beautiful. Although truth to tell it was rather
brown than white,a ripe brown, with red bloom on the lip, and a
rose-bud
on each cheek. And she was sleeping as I drew near the bed, her
limbs clad in black velvet resting upon the white coverleta right
pleasing
sight, by my knightly word. Do you know, gentle Sirs, what thought
stirred in my brain, as I beheld the sight?
`Ho, ho, you carry it bravely, Sir Sorcerer,' I muttered`You come to
Mount Sepulchre, your purpose, the restoring of my good father to health,
and sight. Days pass, and my father is still palsied and blind. But you,
Sir Magician, console your hours with the caresses of your Italian leman;
yes, Sybarite that you are, you turn this chamber of Saladin's tower, in
a bower for your lady-love.' Is't not enough to mad a saint? The
insolence
of this swarthy caitiff?
'Tis incredible! chorussed the Twenty-Four, 'Tis hideous! The
conjuring knave!
But the page? cried a grey-bearded Knight, and Twenty-three others
echoed the question.
Baron Harry seized the cup, and did not take it from his lips until he
had drained the last drop. He passed his hand through the curls of his
golden hair, smoothed his red beard, and his eyes grew brighter, his cheek
became more flushed and glowing.
Thoughts like these stirred in my brain,
while Iron Dickon held
the door
. I resolved to punish the insolence of the knave, even as he sat
with the old man in the room above. Therefore I gently touched the
sleeper's cheek, and at the same moment crushed the light beneath my
cap. She awoke in darkness, she took my hand, and whispered `
Raphael
is it thee,' I answered her with a kisswithout a doubt she
mistook
me for the Italian.
Then the brave Lord burst into a fit of boisterous laughter, accompanied
by sundry twitchings of the face and workings of the eye, which seemed
to be well understood by the Twenty-Four, for they laughed and shouted
until the Hall of Palestine rung with the deafening uproar.
Meanwhile
, gentles, Iron Dickon held the door, continued the Lord
of Mount Sepulchre, And the Italian, having brought to an end, his
interview
with the old man, descended from the upper room, but did not
attempt
to enter the love-bower in which I was conversing with his page.
May be he did not see Iron Dickon in the darkness
He passed by me, said Iron Dickon; I could have touched him
with my arm. Well for him that he did not attempt to enter that room!
He raised his brawny arm above the head of his Lord, and growled an
oath.
We saw the Italian pass through the hall, cried a youthful Knight
But as to this page
I left
him
only a moment ago. This is my purpose good Knight, and
joyous companions! We are very much like monks, here in our good
castle of Mount Sepulchre. We pass our hours in earnest worship, but
woman's smile, never cheers our prayers,woman's eyes never shine
upon our solemn festivals. What say ye to a beautiful woman, who shall
preside at our board, direct our worship, become, in a word, the Lady
Abbess of our mysterious rites?
The Twenty-four had simply laughed and shouted before; now they
started from their seats and flung their wine-cups in the air, and filled the
room with one thunder cry.
The Lady Abbess! The Lady Abbess of Mount Sepulchre!
Dickon hie thee to the castle gate. Give orders there, that this Italian
never enter our castle again, or if he does, let him come in chains, as our
prisoner, and let him be conveyed in secresy, to the deepest cell, beneath
the Tower of Saladin. Dost hear?
Iron Dickon growled assent, and without a word departed on his errand.
He departed through the Western door which led towards the castle gate:
the Eastern door be it remembered led to the Tower of Saladin.
It is well, cried Baron Harry, his eyes flashing with all the joy of his
young blood, Thus are we free from the intrusion of the Sorcerer. He
has gone to the ruins of the Monastery in yonder woods; at midnight he
will return, but Iron Dickon will take care of his prisoner. As for the
Lady Abbess she shall never behold him again; we can coin some brave
story of his treachery and flight. Is it not a brave plot my good
companions
?
Amid the shouts and laughter Baron Harry took his seat, and filled his
cup and drank to the Lady Abbess of Mount Sepulchre. And the lamps
which hung from the dome of the Hall, shed their mild light over the
scene, revealing those faces convulsed with laughter and drunken with
wine, with the comely face of Lord Harry seen at the head of the board,
encircled by its golden hair. And the massive pillars glowed in the light,
until their fantastic carvings seemed to live and move, like the uncouth
shapes of a dream. And the figures of the Crusaders, clad in the armor
of the time of Richard the Lion Heart, and standing beside the lofty
columns
,
with the Holy Cross upon their breasts, gazed upon the scene of
uproar, and seemed to smile, as if in sympathy with the boundless revel.
The purple tapestry, too, which hung from the dome to the marble floor,
quivering its heavy folds to and fro with a gentle motion, caught the rays
upon its painted forms, until they also seemed to live and stir. The figure
of Richard the Lion Heart alone, with its hands clasped on the massive
31
sword, gazed upon the Holy Sepulchre, and seemed to turn its eyes away
in looking from the banquet scene.
Merry were the songs they sung, joyous the tales they told, without
limit or number the goblets they emptiedthe right noble Twenty-Four.
The old knight told many a marvellous legend of their bravery in the
wars; the young spoke of the dread King Henry, and his last Queen,
the winsome Anne Boleyn, and of the merry time which brave lords and
fair dames, kept at his court, where the days of King Solomon lived
again, and Love and Religion went hand in hand. Tis true the Love was
somewhat of the basest, and the Religion seemed but another name for
Lust and Murder, but still King Harry was a dread Monarch, and his
court was a joyous place.
And amid all the uproar, Lord Harry never ceased to lift his cup, and
pledge the health of the Lady Abbess of Mount Sepulchre!
My Lord the Italian has not returned, said a sullen voiceBut
I have obeyed your behests. When he comes, he will be conveyed in
secresy to the cell, under Saladin's Tower.
Iron Dickon, that rude Samson, stood at the shoulder of his Lord,
scowling gloomily over the festival board.
Hah! You have done well; the knave shall trouble us no more.
What say you gentles? he cried as he started from his chairShall I
lead the Lady Abbess, into this Hall, to receive the homage of her
humble
devotees? While the Italian rests quietly in the darkness of the cell,
shall we confess our sins, to the beautiful Saint, nay the High Priestess
of our Temple?
But will she come? cried one.
Dare you lead her hither? exclaimed another.
The Abbess! The Abbess! Let us behold her! yelled the others
of the Twenty-Four.
Dare I lead her hither? Whose voice spoke there! Ha, ha! You
will soon behold her, in all her loveliness, at the head of our board. A
very Venus, by my faith! In a moment, Sirs, I will return!
He turned toward the Eastern door, but paused a moment to call Iron
Dickon to his side.
Away, Dickon. Watch by the castle gate. Do not appear again,
until the Italian returns.
And as the gloomy Servitor departed by the Western door, his Lord,
attired in garments of price, sprinkled with stars and jewels, glided through
the Eastern door, his white plume waving over his laughing face.
The Twenty-Four were alone with their cups again, but their eyes were
incessantly turned toward the Eastern door, over whose threshold the
beautiful Abbess was soon to glide, with the step of a Queen, and a face
worthy of Lady Venus, the Saint of Love.
Ten minutes passed away, but the brave Baron did not appear.
What detains our Lord? Does the dame prove reluctant? said one.
Ah, ha! laughed another, It may be that she recognizes her `
Raphael'
in person of Lord Harry. 'Twas a brave trick by the rood!
At this instant a dagger, dripping with blood, fell upon the table, and
clanged against the golden platters, as its blood-drops were sprinkled over
the board.
Vain were the attempt to picture the surprise, the dismay of the
Twenty-Four
.
Their eyes were fixed upon the dagger, a long blade with a hilt
of gold, and then they gazed pale and wondering into each others faces.
That dagger was flung there by no human hand! faltered the old
Knight.
At this moment, the Twenty-Four, gazing toward the head of the table,
beholdBaron Harry with the beautiful woman leaning on his arm? I trow
not. But a tall figure, robed in something like a monkish garb, with the
arms folded, and the cowl drooped over the face.
The Italian! the cry burst from every lipHis hand hath flung this
dagger on our board. Seize him,seize him, in the name of our Lord!
They started with one impulse from their chairs, but not a hand was
extended to grasp the sombre figure, which without voice or motion, stood
like a dumb image of wood or stone, at the head of the board.
The face was lost in the shadow of the cowl; they could not trace a
single feature.
The contrast between this solitary form, robed in funeral black and
those gay figures attired as if for a marriage feast, was striking and
wonderful
.
And yet they did not stir; not an arm was lifted to strike him to the
floor; it seemed as though the strange awe, which fell upon the
Twenty-Four
,
was his protection; as though his very presence chilled every heart
into ice.
Seize him, cried the old Knight Remember the words of the
Baron; seize the Sorcerer!
A voice come from beneath the shadow of that gloomy cowl. It was
not loud,far from boisterousand yet it pierced every nook of that
spacious
hall.
That dagger is stained with your Baron's blood. Go! and minister
to him in his dying hour. You have shared his pleasures; now behold
his agonies. He lies on the threshold of the second chamber of Saladin,
even, upon the spot where I struck him down.
The hall rang with shouts of vengeance, and the light disclosed faces
distorted by rage, but not a hand was raised against the Italian's breast.
Our Lord murdered! The gallant Harry slain by this Sorcerer!
Go! cried the Italian, still speaking from the shadow of his cowl
Bring hither the body of the dying man. In his presence, I will submit
to your judgment.
The aged Knight spoke to three othersCome, he whispered we
will do as this wretch advises. But look ye he cried aloud turning to
the rest of the bandLook ye, one and all, that the Assassin does not
escape!
With these words, the aged Knight and the three others left the hall by
the Eastern door, while the remaining Twenty, folding their arms, stood
in dead silence around the board, their eyes fixed as if by some unearthly
spell, upon the veiled form of the Murderer.
Not once did he raise the cowl; not once did he remove his folded
arms from his breast. Silent, erect, immovable, he seemed to fix his
eyes,from the shadow of the cowlupon the dagger, which lay amid
the platters and goblets of gold, its blade glittering with blood.
Wherefore didst thou do this thing? asked one of the Knights, after
a pause of breathless stillness.
Was it for the sake of thy leman? added another.
By the body of your dying Lord, I will confess, answered the Italian
in a low voice.
The tramp of footsteps was heard from the Eastern door, and soon the
four Knights appeared, bearing a body, which was covered by a dark
cloth, resting upon face and breast like a pall.
He is dead, said the aged Knight, and they laid the veiled corse at
the feet of the Murderer. Now sir conjuror, look first upon the face of
the dead, and then upon thy death.
He drew his sword, and the others followed his example, and formed a
circle around the Italian and the body of the dead. And the Servitors,
pale and shuddering, looked over the shoulders of the Knights, and awaited
in dumb suspense the issue of the scene. Iron Dickon alone was absent.
A breathless awe such as comes upon the souls of men, when a deed
of Murder has been done, and when the very air seems to be hushed by
the presence of Death, fell upon the lips and hearts of the spectators of
this scene.
Beneath that robe lies a dead body, still warm still bleeding; and
only a moment ago that foul thing of clay, was my Lord Harry Baron of
Mount Sepulchre!
It was this thought that sealed every lip, and roused even the drunken
knights, into the consciousness that Death was theregrim and brooding in
the luxurious Hall of Palestine.
Tell us, sir conjuror, said the old knight, even Ralph of Grey-wolf
between his set teethWhat urged thee to this deed?
A murmur swelled through the hall, and then again that brooding
stillness.
The Italian did not lift his cowl. No man might trace the emotions of
his face. But he trembled; the hands which were crossed upon his breast
shook as with a spasm.
Gentle sirs,he began in a sad and humbled toneYe have read
in the Holy Book of a poor man who had a lamb, only one, and even
that the Rich Man coveted and tore from its shelter near the poor man's
heart
Read us no monkish lesson, growled Ralph of Gray-wolfThere
lies the corse! answer for that deed, and pray; for the time grows short
with thee!
There was a Maiden, gentle sirs, whom the poor Scholar had gathered
to his heart, not as a wife or mistress, but as a sister, a holy thing, too
pure for one taint of earth-born love. She had been as a blessing from
God, to him in his weary march through the worldshe shone in his
dark cell, like a good Spirit sent by Heaven, to cheer the brain when it
was sick, to nerve the heart when it was faint, to thrill some life into the
soul, when it grew cold within its corpse-like shell. Through many a
land, that true maiden disguised in the apparel of a Page, walked with the
forlorn Scholar,his good Angel in every dark hour. And when his
destiny
led him from the court of your King to this Castle of Mount
Sepulchre
,
she was with him still, the only thing for which he lived. Your
Lord wished the Scholar to create Gold for him, and spoke something of a
sick old man, blind and palsied, whom the Scholar might restore to sight
and health. And while the Scholar bent down amid his wierd studies in
one chamber of the Tower, this angel in the shape of woman, this pure
maiden whose lip had never throbbed to one unholy kisseven from his
lips, who had worshipped herwould come gently over the threshold,
and lay her hands upon his fevered brow, and press that brow against her
virgin breast.
The knights began to gaze upon this strange man with involuntary
interest. So humble and mild his tone, that even Ralph of Grey-wolf was
moved despite himself. He dashed a tear away with a curse, and bado
the ScholarGo on, Sirrah! and make brief your words, for the
moment
of your death is near!
To night I summoned your Lord from the hall. Gold, I assured him,
I would create at his command, but he must give me sight of the old man,
whom I came to Mount Sepulchre to cure. He denied me; I turned to
leave the castle, when at last he bade me seek the old man in the upper
chamber of the tower. Ascending a stairway built in the thickness of the
wall, I came into the room, in the summit of the tower, and by the light
of my lamp, struggling with the moonbeams, that shone through the
solitary
window, I beheld a scene that might have moved a Devil into shame
and tears. The old man was there, his white beard waving over his
breast, but his wrists and ankles, were chained to the floor, as though he
had been a savage beast. He was blind, he was palsied, but his own
child had blinded him, his own child had stricken his veins with palsy.
Aye, three years ago, from the bed of fever, the old man was hurled
into a dark and loathsome cell; his sight was gone, his brain was dead,
when his Son brought him into light again, and chained him to the tower
floor. Your young Lord wished the Lordship of Mount Sepulchre ere
his father was dead.
It is false! Knave the lie blisters on thy tongue! shouted Ralph
of Grey-wolf, but the rest of the Twenty-Four was silent. Murmurs such
as the belated wayfarer, hears from the Ghosts that haunt accursed burial
places, began to creep from lip to lip.
And I struck off his chains. And I raised him from the loathsome
floor of that foul den. And I, the Italian, the Sorcerer, spoke to him the
first word of kindness he had heard in the long night of blindness, yes,
yeshis dead brain throbbed into something like life at the sound of my
words. Meanwhile your young Lord, crept into the chamber, sacred
with the presence of a pure woman, and in the darkness, aye, like a
coward who does a coward's murder in the dark, he went to his infernal
treachery. He, pressed that lip which I had never touched, even with a
brother's kiss, he dishonored that form, which I had never looked upon,
but from afar and with the reverence of a holy worship.
She was thy leman, said old Ralph bluntlyThis castle is no place
for the loves of a wandering beggar and his mistress.
But the Twenty-Four did not chorus his words. Something like
sympathy
subdued the ferocious resolve, which had impressed their faces;
whispering one with the other, they said with a shudder that it was an
infernal deed, and that my Lord Harry of Mount Sepulchre, had deserved
his death, not so much on account of the Italian woman, as for the
blindness
and palsy of the old man, his father.
Still thou must answer for the deed said the youngest of them all,
and an ominous murmur echoed his words, as sword in hand he advanced
from the groupAnswer for it now, and with thy life!
First uncover the corse! said the Italian, clutching his dark robe
with trembling hands.
Old Ralph with his dagger between his teeth, and his sword under his
arm bent down, and touched the dark robe, which veiled the dead,
Hold! cried the young knightLet him answer first how the deed
was done. We all beheld thee cross this pall, an hour and more ago, on
thy way to the castle gate. Thou didst not return this way. How didst
gain entrance to the castle? Answer me?
The Italian simply replied, in his low sad voice
Uncover the corse, and I will tell you all!
Old Ralph grasped the dark cloth, and the interest of the group, was
manifested in their straining eyes, when their circle was increased by a
new spectator, a man with haggard face and blood-shot eyes, who stole
unobserved behind the grim knight, and looked upon the motionless Italian
with a vague and horror-stricken gaze. As every eye was fixed upon the
bony hands of old Ralph, grasping the robe which covered the dead, this
new spectator of the scene passed unobserved, until the Italian raising his
glance, beheld that haggard face, with its eyeballs discolored with injected
blood.
At the sight the Italian started back, wavered to and fro like a man
drunken with wine, and then his lips gave utterance to an ejaculation
which pierced every soul:
The Lord of Mount Sepulchre come back to life! and dropping his
face, covered by the cowl, upon his breast, he stretched forth his white
hands toward the haggard form.
They raised their eyes, and a cry such as never was heard before within
those walls, pealed echoing to the dome:
The Lord of Mount Sepulchre come back to life!
It was even so. The haggard form, with dress disordered and golden
hair matted upon the browdamp with beaded sweatand blood-shot
eyes rolling in a livid face, was none other than Lord Harry of Mount
Sepulchre.
He gazed into their affrighted faces without a word; his eyes rolled
with an idiotic glare.
If thou art the Lord of Mount Sepulchre the Italian whispered, his
white hands extended and his head drooped on his breast,Then who
was it, that fell beneath my steel in yonder chamber?
Old Ralph stripped the dark cloth from the breast and face of the dead.
And every knight moved one step backward, even old Ralph shrank
shudderingly away; the haggard Lord and the Italian confronted each
other beside the corse.
It was an aged man, whose gaunt form was clad in rags, but whose
white beard, flowing to the breast, was dabbled in blood. The eyes wide
open, fixed in death; the jaw fallen, the hands cramped and distorted,
stretched stiffly beside the lifeless framea sadder sight the eye of
man never saw.
It was the old Lord, Hubert of Mount Sepulchre.
And around this hideous image of Sudden Death, thronged the affrighted
spectators,knights and servitorsevery face blank, every lip sealed.
The Italian knelt beside the corse, and stretched forth his hands over
its face, muttering to himself in a low voice.
Lord Harry, like a man ridden by a night-mare, looked vacantly into
the face of the dead, and then into the eyes of the spectators, as if to ask
the meaning of the scene.
The dead awe which rested upon the hall of Palestine, was disturbed
by a low and gentle step, and there came a woman's form, half hidden in
the raven hair which flowed to her knees, stealing through the throng, and
taking her place, in silence, between Lord Harry and the prostrate Italian.
Through the meshes of her hair, her white arms were seen folded over
her breast, and her eyes, unnaturally large, dazzled the spectators with
their brightness, as they vacantly turned their glance from face to face.
The Italian's leman!
So pale and yet so beautiful she stood there, attired as much in the
waves of her black tresses as in her loosened robe, that the spectators
thought they beheld no living woman, but a spirit from the other world.
Raphael! she whispered, bending down beside the Italian,I am
innocent!
The words were simple, but the sound of her voice seemed at once to
break the spell which chained the Sorcerer to the corse, and bound the
spectators in breathless awe. At once the Italian started up, and dashed
her from him, yes, dashed her beautiful form upon the breast of the dead;
at once the knights rushed forward, brandishing their swords, at once Lord
Harry, recovering from his idiotic apathy, raised his voice, and called for
vengeance upon the Assassin of his Father.
Amid the infuriated throng, the Italian stood erect, hemmed in by a
circle of interwoven swords, that glittered in the light like fiery serpents
shut out on every side from hope and life, by brawny arms and faces
reddening
with the lust of blood.
But at this moment occurred a scene, which, witnessed as it was, by
thirty living men, seems so strange, so utterly incredible, that I, humble
Eustace Brynne, the writer of this chronicle, tremble as I record it upon
my page.
Even as the Knights rushed forward to sheathe their swords in the blood
of the Italian, the lights were obscured and the wide hall darkened by a
cloud of vapor, which rolled from the dome to the floor in vast and
undulating
columns. This vapor blinded every eye; no one could distinguish
the face of his neighbor; they tossed to and fro like men bewitched, and
grappled with each other in the gloom. And from that rose-colored cloud,
their shouts and curses swelled into the dome, like the confused cries of
drowning men from the vortex of a whirlpool.
When the vapor cleared away, and the lights shone brightly once more
throughout the hall, and the knights beheld each others' faces, they found
themselves standing sword in hand, around the corse of the old man; Lord
Harry the most infuriate of the throng, rending the stillness with curses
as he shook his dagger over his head.
But the Italian and the Woman had disappeared.
In vain they searched the wide hall; in vain they thrust their swords
behind the hangings; in vain their angry questioning of the frightened
servitors. There was no trace of the Italian and his mistress. No one
had seen them fly; no door had been opened to give them egress from
the Hall.
But they were gone; their place beside the body of the dead was vacant.
They had vanished like forms of cloud before the morning breeze.
When this consciousness was impressed upon the hearts of the Knights,
they gathered again around the body of the old man, resting the points of
their swords upon the marble floor, as they looked with fixed eyes upon
the dead. Lord Harry was in their midst, his arms drawn tightly over
his breast; his eyes sunken beneath the downdrawn brows, were rivetted
upon his Father's face.
No one dared question him concerning his knowledge of this terrible
deed, but that which no one asked, he told himself in broken tones.
It is the work of Sathanas! he muttered, as though speaking with
himselfMy hand was on the door of her chamber, when I heard voices
withinhis voice and hersmingling in low and hurried tones. I listened;
she was telling him that he had been there, but an hour before, and that
he had pressed his kiss upon her lip, andhe denied in cold and
angry tones, and my name trembled from his lips, followed by the sound
of a footstep, approaching the door by which I was listening. I drew
back deeper into the shadows; the door was opened, and by the blaze of
light which rushed into the cell, I saw his arm lifted, and saw my father
fall bleeding beneath the blow.
He
, too, had been concealed within the
cell; he had started up as the light flashed in his face, and received the
blow intended for me. For, as the caitiff struck, he shrieked, `
this for
thee, my Lord Harry of Mount Sepulchre!
' Then, without turning to
look upon the corse, he fled. How came my father there? True, the
stairway of his cell opens into the Wizard's room, but who unloosed the
old man's chains? It is the work of Sathanas! he turned with a flushed
cheek and rolling eye, to his brave Twenty-Four, Yes, the Enemy of
Mankind hath been among us!
There was no answer for the young Lord of Mount Sepulchre. The
Knights, young and old, looked upon his face and upon the cold face of
the dead, and kept their peace.
What do I see? Do you shrink from my touch, gentle sirs? Is there
poison in my look? Comethe good old man is deadSathanas has
been herelet us forget it all in a brimming cup! God's death, my good
companions, your pale visages are enough to make a man afraid!
The brave Knight seemed to have forgotten the wine-cup and the board,
in the dumb horror of the dead man's face. Old Ralph alone gave answer
to the Lord of Mount Sepulchre
Cover his face, my good Lord, and let us to our beds. As for me, by
to-morrow's light, I am bound for France or for some other land, where
there is Priest and Shrine, to wash out the stain of sin, from my Soul.
This night's work my good Lord, hath made me think strangely of the
wild life, we have led together.
The young Lord answered him with a curse, when Iron Dickon's huge
form appeared in the Western door, his hand extended in the act of
beckoning
to his Master. The Baron crossed the marble floor, and conversed for a
moment with his vassal, and after a little while, returned once more to the
group, as Iron Dickon disappeared.
He knows nothing yet of
this
, said the young Lord, pointing to the
corse, And as for me, I had neither heart nor time to tell him now. By
my faith, he waited tenderly upon the old man while he lived! He tells
me now, gentle sirs, that an hour ago he secured the Italian, and conveyed
him by a secret passage to the cell beneath Saladin's tower. You may
make of that what you please, but for the present, Iron Dickon brings
strange intelligence to us all. What say you, my good Knight? A
messenger
from our King waits at the Castle gate. He demands instant
audience
with me. Let the body of the dead be removed; hide it behind
the hangings. I will await the coming of this Messenger, where I stand.
They raised the corse, and wrapped it in the sombre robe, and hurriedly
concealed it, behind the drapery of the Hall. Lord Harry, with one hand
laid upon the banquet table, and the other resting upon the hilt of his
sword, stood in an attitude of calm dignity, awaiting in silence, the
coming
of King Henry's Messenger. His cheek was bloodless, his lips
without
color, his eyes blood-shotten, and yet he was calm. Behind him,
ranged in a half circle were grouped the renowned Twenty-Four, their
faces, one and all, wearing a look of blank awe, while their gaze was fixed
upon the Western door of the Hall. They awaited the appearance of the
Messenger with a vague curiosity and suspense.
He will leave his men-at arms without the castle gate, and enter the
Hall alone, exclaimed Lord Harry: 'Tis a privilege of Our Race, thus
to receive the Messenger of the King. I' faith he does not seem in a
hurry to fulfil his message. Shall we wait for him, till morning dawns?
The words had not passed his lips, when the Western door was opened,
by Iron Dickon, and unannouncedeither by trumpet peal or the voice of
Heraldthe Messenger of the King entered the Hall of Palestine. As
he crossed the marble floor, advancing toward Lord Harry, every eye took
the measure of his form, and a murmur swelled through the Hall, as the
light shone on his face.
He was in good sooth, a man of remarkable bearing.
His form, tall and majestic, was clad in a close-fitting garment of
purple
velvet, which set off every grace of his figure, and gave new dignity
to the kingly composure of his carriage. The velvet, which looked black
by the rays of the lamp, was only relieved by a single diamond, which
shone upon his left breast, and dazzled every eye. On his right arm, he
carried a mantle of dark velvet, which hung in easy folds, as he advanced;
and his left hand, grasped his cap, shaded by a cluster of jetly plumes.
His brow was uncovered and every eye beheld his face.
It was a noble countenance, every feature looking like the work of the
Sculptor's chissel, firm, regular, and cold as marble. Around the great
forehead, unseamed by a wrinkle, but pale as death, clustered his hair, in
profuse masses, which seemed even blacker than the mantle hanging on
his arm. His eyes, somewhat sunken beneath the brows, shone with
inexpressible
lustre; they were black, and yet more bright and dazzling
than the star which glittered on his breast.
In a word if the form, would have attracted your gaze among a crowd
of a thousand, the face would have won your eye, and chained it too,
among ten thousand faces. While the form indicated the warrior, the
face brought to mind, the countenance of a Monk; not a joyous Monk
red with the juice of the grape, and swollen with good cheer; but a
Monk buried in the awful silence and breathless solitudes of his
earth-hidden
cell.
Your pardon, gentle sirs, for this unwelcome intrusion, said the
Stranger, as he surveyed the knightly throng, But I seek the Lord of
Mount Sepulchre, on business of the King. Will it please ye, to inform
him that the Count Capello, craves an interview on behalf of his dread
Majesty Henry the Eighth?
These words pronounced in a measured voice, and with an air of great
dignity, produced an impression as sudden as it was various. Not a few
of the knights, murmurred such words as, Foreigner! One of the
out-landish
favorites of the King! others gazed in silence upon the
commanding
face of the Stranger, while Ralph of Grey-wolf exclaimed with
a deep sighA true Catholic by the Rood! Mayhap a Cardinal in
disguise
.
I will confess to him!
As for Lord Harry, he felt the blood rush to his face, as the quiet tones
of the Count Capello penetrated his ears:
I am the Lord of Mount Sepulchre, Sir Count, he said, and drew
himself up with a haughty air.
Thou! cried the Count with a start. I cry your mercy noble Sir,
but I was told that Lord Hubert was an aged man. I pray you, lead me
to him, or at least, give me audience with Lord Ranulph his elder Son.
I am Lord Harry, Baron of Mount Sepulchre, cried the young Lord
in a burst of indignation, for the gaze and look of the foreign Count,
roused his bloodAs for Lord Hubert, he is blind and old, and never
again will give audience to any one, not even to the King himself, were
he to honor my poor mansion with his presence. And Ranulphhe died
abroad years ago. Sir Count, I await the message of the King!
Beautiful it is to see, the native dignity of a high-born English Lord!
There was Baron Harry, as gallant a Knight as ever rode to battle, raising
himself to his full stature, his proud lip curling, and his blue eyes full of
icy scorn, while the Foreign Count, abashed by his commanding presence
drew back a step, bowed his head and held his jetty plumes before his
face.
There is the message of the King, gracious Sir, he said, and
without
raising his face, extended a folded parchment, which was burdened
with a heavy seal.
The Seal of his Majesty! murmurred Lord Harry, as he opened the
parchment, Hah! What is this I behold! `
Thy Brother Lord Ranulph
lives
'  with a flashing eye, he drank in the briaf words of that Royal
missive.
The hand which grasped the parchment dropped by his side. He
turned his facenow bloodless and ashytoward the Foreign Count,
who still preserved his attitude of mute respect, and held his plumed cap,
before his face.
The King writes me that my Brother, Lord Ranulph lives, aye, and
by the Mass! that he will be here in a few days. What say ye,
my good Knights? Has not our dread Lord, been deceived by some
perfidious
follower of the Pope!
There was wonder and consternation painted upon the faces of the
Knights, beyond the power of my poor pen to describe. Murmurs
pervaded
the air, and old Ralph swore somewhat blasphemously, that he was
bewitched, and given over to Stahanas on account of his sins.
Sir Count, perchance you will make plain this mystery, said Lord
Harry, in a tone by no means bold or deep, while his pallid cheek and
quivering lips, contrasted somewhat strangely with his golden curls
and red-brown beard. You have seen my brother, or is this but a merry
jest of the good King?
The stranger Count raised his head, and the light fell upon his pale
visage
,
as it was agitated by a smile of singular sweetness.
Brother, dost thou not know me, even yet? he whisperedMy
features I know are changed, but methinks some pulse of our father's
blood, throbbing about thy heart might have told thee ere this, that it was
I, Ranulph thy Brother!
The gallant Harry staggered backreeled wildly like one bereft of
reason
and
would have fallen to the floor had it not been for the extended
arms of old Ralph.
Thou! he cried with chattering teeth and corpse-like visage, as he
struggled in the arms of the old knight: Thou my brother! Thou,
Ranulph! NaynayRanulph is dead, Ranulph has been grave-yard
dust long, long ago. It is all a cheata mockery!
Then it was that the Stranger, rising to his full height, surveyed the
silent throng, with a calm gaze and a sad sweet smile. Every one
confessed the majesty of his presence and the noble lineage written on his
brow.
He does not know me! he sadly said, Alas! the woeful hour! I
come back to the castle of my fathers and mine own brother does not
know me!
He raised the plumed cap as if to hide his tears.
Lead me, he muttered, in a voice broken and hurried, Lead me to
the old man, my father. Let me feel his hands upon my brow again,
he at least, will know his long lost son!'
Silence reigned throughout the hall, silence dead and leaden as a
Wizard's
spell. The Knights fixed their affrighted eyes upon the stranger,
and with curdling blood, confessed within their inmost souls, that he was
indeed Lord Ranulph, or his Ghost. Meanwhile, Harry struggling from
the arms of the old Knight, tottered forward and extended his hand:
Brotherforgive he gaspedI was but a child, when I saw thee
last. Forgive and take my hand!
Lord Ranulphfor it was the elder son of Baron Hubert, in good sooth
lifted his pale face once more, and his dark eyes shone with tears, as
that peculiar smile, at once sad and sweet, hung on his lips.
Thy hand my brother. Hah! It makes the heart swell, to touch the
palm of a Mount Sepulchre once more. Wine, my gallant Sirs, wine!
For I would pledge my brother in a brimming cup, and my fair dame,
shall press it with her lips, ere he drinks, in token of her sisterly love!
Thy dame? exclaimed Baron Harry, and his surprise was echoed
by the Knight.
Behold her! The Lady Eola, wife of Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre!'
and from the shadows, came a woman of beautiful shape, clad in a garl
of rich velvet, with a dark veil drooping over her face. She had glided
unperceived over the threshold, and now stood by her husband's side, her
white hand, laid gently upon his mantle. The dark habit which she
wore, disclosed the outlines of a form, at once slender and voluptuous,
while the thick folds of her veil could not altogether hide the dazzling
brightness of her eyes.
Beshrew my heart, but it was right wonderful, to behold the
thunder-stricken
faces of the gallant knights!
He brings his good dame with him, from other lands, cried one,
'Tis Venus herself in funoral garb, with a black veil over her face!
A form like Anne Boleyn! exclaimed another.
And all the dignity and presence of our late Queen! added a third.
Lord Ranulph took a golden cup, brimming with old wine, from the
hand of Sir Ralph, and spake to the beautiful lady, in an unknown tongue.
She answered in a voice, low and sweet, but the wondering knights, could
by no means comprehend her words.
The Lady Eola cannot master the rude syllables of our English
tongue, said Ranulph, turning to his brother, But she greets you as a
Brother, my true Harry, and consents to press her lips to the cup, ere it
passes to yours, in token of her sisterly love!
True it was, that the brave Harry, pallid and amazed, looked not unlike
a man enchanted. He saw the white hand of the beautiful dame lift the
cup; he bent forward eager to gain a glimpse of her face, as she parted
the folds of her veil; but the sight of her lips, warm and red, pressing the
golden rim of the goblet, was all that rewarded his gaze.
And in a moment, that white hand held the cup towards him, and as
he took it, their fingers slightly touched each other. 'Twas a circumstance
of no moment; but that touch, slight as it was, filled his blood with fire.
Drink, my brother, drink to the return of Ranulph, Lord of Mount
Sepulchre! Drink to the Lady Eola, his own fair dame, and henceforth
thy loving Sister, Harry!
As he spoke, the Lord Ranulph contemplated his brother with an
earnest
look, while his great forehead, grew radiant, as with a joy too deep
for utterance.
Harry of Mount Sepulchre,no longer Lord, but simply, `the Lord's
younger Brother,' slowly raised the cup, turning his gaze from the
veiled Eola to the Lord Ranulph, as the golden rim touched his lip.
The golden rim touched his lip
From that instant the place of the brave Harry, in the Castle of his
Race, was vacant forever.
Even as his lip touched the golden rim of the cup, he fell dead at his
Brother's feet, his face pressed against the marble floor, and his hands
resting by his side, without one convulsive tremor. No groan came from
his lips, as he fell, nor did his eyes roll and glare, as if struggling with
the night of death. He touched the cuphe fell. That was all. Every
eye beheld it. When old Ralph came to him, thinking that he had fallen
into a swoon, and tried to raise him from the floor, the body slipt from
his grasp like a pulseless thing of wood or stone. The gray-haired knight
turned him to the light, and his face was seen by every eye. There was
no blackness on it, but a rosy blush pervaded the cheeks, and the eyes,
fixed but not glassy, lay dull and leaden, under the half-shut lids. He
was dead. The golden cup lay near him, and a strong odour,like the
perfume of old wine, mingled with the scent of laurel blossomspervaded
the Hall of Palestine.
Never in all the world was there such a Night as this, whose every
hour was marked by a Death or a Crime. The nameless wrong committed
by Harry upon the Italian womanthe murder of the old man, by the
Italian Sorcererthe sudden death of Harry, before his brother's eyes
these deeds all took place on the night, which marked the return of Lord
Randulph, to the Castle of his ancestors.
The hearts of the spectators were too full for speech; clad in their
festival
attire, the gay Knights, gay no longer, looked in the dead face of the
brave Harry, in dumb apathy.
The veiled lady clasped her hands, and murmured a prayer, in an
unknown
tongue while a shudder, agitated her beautiful shape, from head to
foot.
Lord Ranulph stood for a moment, horror-stricken and spell-bound like
the rest, his gaze fixed upon the face of his dead brother, while his broad
high forehead was darkened by a single vein, swelling upward, from
between
the eyebrows. At last a smile broke over his face; a smile
sad as a star-beam twinkling through the gloom of a charnel:
He is dead! My Brother? he said in a subdued tone: He has
died of a strange disease of which I have heard in foreign lands. A
disease
that turns the avenues of the heart to bone, while the cheek is full
of life.
*
*
An anachronism? Had Lord Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre, any idea of the
circulation of the blood?
Slowly, silently, through the course of long years, this disease
builds up the channels of the heart, until at last, when some sudden
emotion
,
makes the blood bound like a torrent, `the work is done,' the heart
throbs no longer, and life passes away, without a sigh. My poor brother
died of joy; the emotion was too strong for him! A terrible disease!
He knelt beside his dead brother, while old Ralph of Grey-Wolf
muttered
with an idiotic stare:
A terrible disease, by the Mass, anda right strong smell of laurel
leaves, or laurel blossoms, by my soul!
And these are the deeds which took place on the night, when Lord
Ranulph
came home to the Castle of his fathers. And I, Eustace Brynne,
who have written this history, which is intended to be deposited in the
archives of Mount Sepulchre, do hereby avow, on mine own knowledge,
that these are the deeds which were done, and these the words which were
spoken, on that fatal night.
And all other histories of that night, and all rumors which conflict with
this chronicle are lies, born of the Devil and the Pope, and uttered by
their minions, in order to taint the good fame of the House of Mount
Sepulchre
.
So that their lies may be known, and branded forever, with
their proper infamy, I will here, add certain of the rumors, which have
been raised by the Pope and the Devil aforesaid, against the House of
Mount Sepulchre.
I.
That the Italian magician, and my Lord Ranulph were the same
person
. In support of this rumor it is stated, that my Lord Ranulph
studied the black art in outlandish parts, and came to the Court of King
Harry, disguised in his Sorcerer's robes, and was there encountered by
Lord Harry, who besought him ardently to come to Mount Sepulchre, and
turn him some lead into gold straightway. Ranulph wishing to see with
his own eyes, how the young Lord bore himself, to his Father and to the
vassals of the Barony, accepted the proposal of Baron Harry, and came
to the Castle, with his outlandish wife, disguised as a page, having at the
same time, the letter of the King about his person. This is a most
atrocious
falsehood. Were it to be believed, only for a moment, we should
be forced to regard Lord Harry, as the wronger of his brother's wife or
mistress, and Lord Ranulph as the Murderer of his Father. 'Tis a
fiendish
calumny.
II.
That the death of Lady Eola, which took place on the Twelfth of
November
, 1539, (something more than a year after the events recorded,
as aforesaid,)
was the work of her true Lord and Husband, Ranulph of
Mount Sepulchre, because he was poisoned with the thought, that the child
sleeping upon her bosom was not
* * * * * * *. This is indeed a lie
worthy of Satan or the Pope. In order that future generations may know
the truth of this matter, I, Eustace Brynne, sometime Prior of the
Monastery
,
but now a true believer in our gracious King, have written this
Chronicle, at the command of the noble Lord Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre.
Thus ended the Manuscript, written by the Monk of the Sixteenth
Century. It was connected with other Manuscripts, written by various
hands, and narrating the history of the House of Mount Sepulchre from
age to age, until the middle of the Eighteenth Century.
But the beautiful reader had not courage to proceed. The mass of
Manuscripts fell from her stiffening fingers, and as they fluttered to the
floor, the harsh sound disturbed the breathless stillness of the place.
CHAPTER FORTY-FIRST.
WHAT PAUL BEHELD IN THE SEALED CHAMBER.
It
is too horrible for belief! The Father murdered by his own child,
the brother poisoned by the brother, and the beautiful woman sacrificed
by a nameless outrage. A maze of misery and crime! It is indeed
terrible
the
very paper on which these deeds are written, breathes of the
charnel. But Paul, you turn your gaze away. You do not look upon
me. Tell me, I beseech you, what has this Revelation to do with your
fate.
And the beautiful woman, whose death-like cheek contrasted with her
raven hair, gave a wierd and spiritual loveliness to that face, not long ago
so ripe with passion, glided over the floor, with noiseless steps, and laid
her hands upon the shoulders of Paul Ardenheim.
He stood motionless, his averted face buried in his hands. He felt her
touch, but did not turn and look upon her, for the nameless revelations of
the Sealed Chamberrevelations even more dark and harrowing than
those embodied in the Manuscriptsnow clouded his whole being with a
stifling horror.
Paul! she whisperedI dare not read farther; I have not the
courage. The very touch of those pages chills my blood. Speak to me,
Paul. Tell me the secret of this mystery.
Read on, muttered Paul, still hiding his face in his handsRead
on, and learn the history of our race, and drink in, with every page, some
portion of the madness which has cursed my existence, since the fatal
hour, when your voiceyourspersuaded me to cross the threshold of
the forbidden chamber. Read on!
Do you reproach me, Paul? whispered the Wizard's child.
He turned and confronted her, grasping her wrist, while the light fell
upon his ashen and colorless visage.
Reproach you! No! No! For so much sorcery there is in your look,
so much witchcraft in your tone, that even now, as I stand before you, at
once conscious of your presence and of my own dark fate, it seems to me,
that for you I would sacrifice my immortal soul,yesat a word, a look
from you I would strike my father's gray hairs into dust!
He had been wild,madbefore, but now his pale face and settled
tone, his look at once fixed and dazzling, overwhelmed this beautiful
woman with a freezing awe. His wild reproaches, his wandering
ejaculations
,
his eyes rolling vaguely, his cheeks flushed with passionall these
she could have borne, and borne with a secret triumphbut this calm
madness, this conscious despair, palsied every vein with the leaden apathy
of terror.
Take up the dark record, once more, he exclaimed, while she felt
his hand, as it clasped her wrist, grow cold as ice: Let not the breath
of the charnel fright you, let not the atmosphere of unnatural crimes make
your soul afraid. Read on! Learn the history of our Race by heart;
steep your soul in every damning detail. Learn how Lord Ranulph of
Mount Sepulchre, stained with the blood of father and brother, crept
behind
the chair of his beautiful wife, and sheathed his dagger in her bosom,
even as her babe was sleeping there. Learn how the man who had
stabbed his father, and poisoned his brother became the Assassin of the
woman, whose love and life had been mingled with his in the veins of
that innocent child. Nay, do not tremble and turn pale; you have asked
of me, the Secret of the Sealed Chamber; I will tell that secret, although
every word costs me an agony, deeper than the tortures of the damned.
He paused for a moment, and passed his hand over his forehead; the
beautiful woman shuddered as she beheld the expression of his features.
The child was not his own. The blood that flowed in its veins, was
poisoned in its every throb, by his brother's unnatural crime. Thoughts
32
like these cankered the soul of Ranulph; his heart became corroded by
suspicion. Therefore, he stabbed his wife; stabbed the pure woman, who
at least, had been no partner in his brother's wrong. She was dead; the
child smiled in his face from her mangled bosom. But the history of our
Race does not end here. That child grew to manhood, and became the
Lord of Mount Sepulchre. He, too, became a father: and he, like his
Grandsire, died by the hand of his son. Since that hour, through the
course of two hundred years, there have been eight Lords of Mount
Sepulchre
,
and every one has gone to his grave a Parricide, slain by the
hand of Parricide. You will say that there is madness lurking in our
blood, from the moment of birth; you will attempt to explain this red
history
of unnatural murder, by the idea of a constitutional malady,
transmitted
from father to son, for two hundred years. But no! no! Had
you crossed the forbidden threshold, and seen what I saw, and stood face
to face with Fate, as I stood, hollow words like these could never pass
your lips.
Paul! Your words fill me with horror beyond the power of
utterance
,
cried the Wizard's child, attempting to free her wrist from the clasp
of his icy hand.
Read on! Take up the blood-red record once more. You will there
discover, that my father, the younger son of this accursed House, soon
after the last Parricide, which took place not more than twenty years ago,
determined to leave the Old World, and bury himself and his children in
the profound solitudes of the New. He was resolved to save me, his
only son, from the curse of our house. Therefore, he renounced the
world, gave up his very name, and crossed the ocean. No human eye
tracked his course, no human eye recognized in the pale old man of
Wissahikon
,
the Last Lord of Mount Sepulchre. He had defied fate; he had
evaded destiny. The hand of his Son should never be stained with the
guilt of Parricide. This was his thought; a thought which breathed a
blessing on his solitude, and turned the wild Wissahikon into the very
garden of God. Now mark the sequel. All his planselaborated and
woven together through the years of a life-timewere crushed, not in a
day, not in an hour, but in a moment. Scattered to air, by the breath of
a woman!
He fixed upon the Wizard's daughter the light of his eyes, flashing
with scorn, and every lineament of his face was agitated by a smile,a
smile which was Satanic in its very mockery of joy.
A woman! he repeated: Her breath destroyed the Hopes of a
life-time. Again he smiled in mockery.
Nay, you must listen. My father had preserved that Record of Mount
Sepulchre, in all his wanderings. He had concealed it within the
chamber
,
whose door was marked with a cross. It was his thought, that his
Son should never know the history of the parricidal race, until the Father
was dust. And even then, this Son could not be won from his seclusion,
into the great world, by the temptations of rank and power, for the name
of Mount Sepulchre had long ceased to the title of his Race. It was the
name which our house had borne in ages past, but it had been replaced,
for a hundred years at least, by other names and more swelling titles.
Therefore, Paul, the son, reading that Chronicle after the death of his
Father, would not dream that his Race, or their once immense possessions,
had an existence any longer. He would only know, that he was the last
of the Mount Sepulchres; that he was buried in the forests of
Wissahikon
;
and that the once boundless domains of his fathers, their Castles in
England and Germany, their gold counted by millions, and their broad
lands measured by leaguesall were now embodied in theruined Block
House of Wissahikon. That the great name of the Race, their fame
ennobled
by titles only second to Royalty, had dwindled down into the name
of the friendless boy`Paul Ardenheim!'
Again he pausedlooked sadly in her facewhile her eyes brightened
with a Thought which she dared not speak.
His race may exist at this hour, in all their wealth and power.
Another
may count his gold, and wear his titles, while the true Lord remains
unknown and friendless among these forests.
And as Paul stood gazing in her face,his death-cold hand upon her
wristthe music from the lawn came gushing through the window, like
the joyous peal of a Bridal Festival.
Read that record, beautiful woman! Paul continued, after a breathless
pause. Then you will know something of the mysteries of that fatal
chamber; but the full mysterythe complete history of the hour which
I spent thereI may never tell to mortal ears. But listen! There,
within that Sealed Chamber, which I had entered by a Perjuryentered
because the sorcery of your eyes and voice had maddened methere, I
stood face to face with Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre, who lived three
hundred
years ago.
Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre! This is a dream! The hand which
clasped her wrist, had changed from ice to fire.
I stood face to face with him, and looked into his eyes, and heard his
voice. It was not a Corpse which touched me with its handit was not
a Spirit evoked from the Sepulchre, like Samuel of old, which conversed
with me as I stood enveloped in the horrors of that forbidden place. But
it seemed to me, as if I stood in the presence of a Corpse, animated by a
living Soul. Even now, my heart writhes and grows cold at the mere
remembrance of that hour.
As though the memory of that incredible interview, had transformed
him into the very image which his imagination pictured
a dead body
instinct
with a living Soul
,Paul Ardenheim paused, his lips moved but
framed no sound; his form was motionless, his face without life or color
his eyes alone, shining with intense light, told that the life still lingered
in his breast.
And the Woman so imposing in her voluptuous beauty, this
incarnation
of all that is lovely or bewitching, among the forms of external
nature
,
this creature whose touch was madness, whose kiss kindled every
throb into living flame, whose glance paralyzed the reason, or only roused
it into frenzied action,even She shrank with terror from the face of
Paul Ardenheim. Her finger on her dewy lip, one hand placed upon her
breast, as if to still its throbbings, she retreated a step, and gazed upon
him through the meshes of her unbound hair.
At this moment she looked like Esther, beautiful and voluptuous,
queen-like
in form and stature, and yet with an unutterable fear, creeping through
every vein, from her heart to her eyes. Yes, she seemed like the
impassioned
Jewess, summoned suddenly from the silence of her luxurious
chamber, by the death-shrieks of her murdered People, or by the blind
anger of her Monarch-Husband.
Paul you spoke with Ranulph who lived three hundred years ago,
she exclaimed after a pause, and her low voice, resounded through every
nook of the still chamber: You stood face to face with this living Soul,
enshrined within the breast of a Corpse? It was a dream Paul, only a
dream, believe me. Your imagination was excited to madness, by the
revelations of this manuscript.
Paul fixed upon her a vacant gaze, which looked into her eyes, without
seeming conscious of her presence.
I crossed the threshold, and at once my light was drowned in a
luminous
radiance, which shone around the fatal chamber. In the centre of
that radiance appeared the corpse-like form, and from the dead face, the
eyes gazed upon me, and at the same time, filled the place with light,
unlike the rays of sun, or moon, or star, but resembling the pale radiance
which flutters over the graves of the newly-buried dead. And he spoke to
me; his lips did not move, there was no sound, and yet I heard his voice. It
seemed, as though that Soul, enshrined in the breast of a Corpse,
conversed
with mine, in the language of the other World, without one accent
or syllable of mortal speech. Was this a dream? Oftentimes I have
tried to hug that idea to my soul, but in vain. It was no dream, but
reality
,
as cold and palpable, as that which thrills through your frame, when
your hand, for the first time, encounters the dead face of a beloved one.
Do you remember the words, Paul? faltered the Wizard's daughter.
Could you look upon my heart, after death, you would behold those
words written thereyes, stamped upon my very being.
`Until the last descendant of that incestuous Child is swept from the
earth, I am condemned to live. From the hour, when my hand, smote
the bosom of Eola, until this moment, when I stand face to face, with you,
Paul Ardenheim, I have walked beside the Lords of your race, and
infused
the poison of my accused existence, into their being. One by one
they have died; the Parricide father by the hand of the Parricide son;
it was my Soul, that prompted every murder; it was I, that nerved every
arm, and Iin spite of all my Remorsehave stood smiling, while
Parricide
after Parricide, was gathered to the grave-yard dust.
`Think not to escape me, Paul of Ardenheim, in whose soul I
recognize
some portion of my own. Your father has traversed half the globe;
he has forsaken the wealth, the honor of his race; he has reared you
afar from the world, reared you in ignorance of your race, your fortunes,
and your very Name. But I, Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre have been
near you, from the hour of birth; have watched every moment of your
existence; have loved you, as I saw your Mind grow into shape and
power, and at the appointed time, I will nerve your arm, for the deed of
Parricide.
`When the hour comes your Father will die by your hand.
`Because I have looked upon your life with love, because I have been
somewhat won from the cold horror of my existence, by the spectacle of
a heart, so young and brave as yours, nurtured into vigor, even amid these
virgin solitudes,do not think that my arm can spare, or my soul
relent.
`I can never know the blessing of Death, until allallof the race of
the incestuous Child, even the child of Eola, are swept from the face of
the earth.
`When the last is dead, then, and then only, I can die.
`It is true, that sometimes,after long intervals of hopeless Evila
hope has dawned upon my soul. From a woman, descendant from Eola,
and like Eola in mind and form, I may obtain the blessed words, which
will permit me todie. Those words, nothing more, than the last
accents
,
which fell from her lips; accents which will assure me, that she,
no willing partner in my brother's crime, and that the child which slept
upon her bosom, as I killed her, derived its life, from my veins. Yet
this Woman cannot appear, until the eighth Lord of your race, has fallen
by the blow of Parricide. And she must wear upon her bosom, a Medal,
which I hung around the neck of my dead wife, and buried with her
corse, on the Twelfth of November, 1539; a medal, which I had
prepared
in anticipation of her death, bearing her name, the date of her
murder
,
and the sign of the Cross.
`This medal, or this embodied record of my crime, I saw twenty-one
years agosaw it for the first time, since Eola's deathand upon the breast
of a beautiful woman. But the Eighth Lord, the head of the eighth
generation
was not yet dead. With the consciousness that this medal, was at
once, the token of past crime and future forgiveness, I replaced it upon
the neck of the beautiful woman, descended from Eola, and resolved to
complete the long chain of Parricide, with the death of your father's
father, the Eighth Lord of Mount Sepulchre. He died, by the hand of
your father's brother, but the beautiful Woman was dead. She was
buried
in the Ocean. The medal lies there, with her bones. That hope
has gone out in utter darkness; I am left to my Remorse and to my career
of Crimes.
`Do not fancy, that it is an impalpable Spirit, a vague form of air, that
converses with you now. Paul Ardenheim I live,have lived, for
well-nigh
three hundred years. Learn at once the mystery of my beieg. When
I was young, when I first left my home of Mount Sepulchre, for other
lands, a latent hope was in my breast, that I might one day, achieve the
great secret, for which the Seers of ages had sought in vain, and become
Immortal, even upon this earth. The days and nights of long years, the
toil of my hand and my brain, were surrendered to this search. At last,
beneath the foundations of old Rome, in the Catacombs, those awful cities
of the dead, which spread beneath the feet of living millions, I grasped
the Secret; the Problem of ages was solved; the Truth for which the
Seers of forty centuries had sought in vain, became mine. I discovered
the hidden principle which Men call life, and even from the forms of the
dead, I wrung the knowledge, how to perpetuate that Life, and make it
Eternal even upon this earth.
`But at the same time, there passed from my Soul, all power to believe
in another World; all consciousness of a race of beings, superior in
intelligence
to Man; all knowledge of an all-paternal Creator, whom men
call God. To me, from the moment when the pulses of a deathless life,
stirred in my veins, there was no longer Another World, nor a state of
being, higher and better than this earth; nor Saint, Angel, nor God. In a
word, the
power to believe
, passed from my nature; I became conscious
that I was to live on this earth, while the earth itself endured; to grow
old in knowledge; to become familiar with every principle of the
machinery
which moves the Universe; and at the same time, to be as utterly
incapable of Faitheven Faith such as lights the beggar's heart, and
throws a halo round his very ragsas the dumb stones on which I trod.
`Was this existence, this Life which I myself had won, for Good or
for Evil?
`It seemed to me, as I stood palpitating with my new being, amid the
damps and shadows of those earth-hidden Cities of the Dead, that I might
become the Destiny of mankind. Watch over them, while ages rolled
away, and replace Superstition, Bigotry and War, with the calm and
omnipotent
Unity of Universal Brotherhood. That I would reveal the great
secrets of the Universe, to a chosen few, and teach men to love one
another
,
by a simple disclosure of the sublime harmony, which pervades all
nature, from the Star that rolls surely on its way, through an orbit of
millions
of miles, to the little flower, that only demands an inch of earth and
a drop of water for its existence. Yes, I said with unutterable rapture, I
will gradually lift mankind into my own walk of Being. From year to
year, from age to age, I will swell the number of my chosen band, and
encircle myself with men re-created and purified by the Knowledge of the
great laws of the Universe. And at last, when ages shall have passed
away, I will select some one, superior to all others, in love and power,
and fill his veins with the same immortality that throbs in mine. Should
he prove faithless to his trust, and use his deathless life for purposes of
Evil, I can, at the worst, meet him in a sublime although terrible combat
oppose my own immortality to histrack his footsteps over the globe,
surround him with the atmosphere of my Powerpoint him out to all
the world, even to the humblest of men, as the Wretch who would mar
the Divine Harmony of the Universe, by the spasmodic throbs of his own
selfish ambition:
`Divine Harmony of Universe?
`It is the law that guides the Star more surely on its accustomed
course, than your arm, in the moment of full health, can follow the impulse
of your Will. But let the Star depart but a moment from its orbit, and
lo! entire creations of Stars, of Suns, of Worlds, are wrecked in hopeless
chaos. And the man who suffers himself to perpetrate a wrong upon
man, his brother, arrests the very Order of the Universe with the deed;
and creates a chaos more dark and discordant, in the vast family of souls,
than the wandering Star in the boundless fraternity of Worlds.
`Thus I mused beneath the foundations of old Rome, in the Cities of
the Dead.
`It was my purpose, to use my deathless existence for the Good of
mankind.
`Behold the manner in which this purpose of boundless Good was
wrecked into a Necessity of hopeless Evil.
`A memory of Home came over me. I thought of my aged father, of
my younger brother; I resolved to leave the scene of my deathless toil,
the catacombs which had been the Alembic of my deathless life, and
return to England, and look once more upon the faces of my people.
`Eola was my companion. Her previous history need not be told, nor
is it for me to relate the manner in which her life was first interwoven
with the life of a man like mea Student in the vast labarynth of
unrevealed
Naturea Scholar, whose book was the Universe, whose Masters
were the dead Seers of forgotten ages.
`But she had joined her fate with mine. When my brow was pale
with the horror of the night-long watch among the dead, when my eye
was mad with the glare of Thought,Thought indulged and prolonged at
the expense of the physical being, until the heart was pulseless and the
nerves palsiedthen Eola, who knew no learning but the instinct of
Woman's all-trusting Faith, would call me back to life with her presence,
wake the heart into motion with her voice, thrill the nerves into serene
consciousness with her touch. In those moments, she was to me what a
calm lake is to an arid landscape,what the eye is to the human face,
what the first gleam of life was to the visage of the dead Lazarus.
`She was beautiful beyond all the daughters of earth. Had it not been
for the pure Soul, which shone calmly from her eyes, her form would
have presented only a type of animal beauty in its most exciting shape.
All that you can imagine of physical loveliness was hers. The rounded
limb, the clear skin, ripe with the young blood of virgin passion, the
bosom blooming with the very fulness of life, the gesture that bewitched
and the voice that held you dumb with its ever-changing music,all that
you can picture of shape, color, sound, life, combined in one breathing
Harmonyall were hers. Never did the eye of the sensualist rest upon
a more voluptuous shapenever did the gaze of the devotee linger upon a
face more hallowed by calm and spiritual beauty.
`Such was Eolaa pure Soul, incarnate in a young and passionate form.
`And she was mine. Think not that her lip had ever quivered to my
kiss; do not for a moment dream that all this treasure, of untold
loveliness
,
ever became even by a single caress, less pure, less virgin, than
when it first came from the hand of unpolluted Nature.
`Eola was my virgin-wife. Never should the rites of our marriage
ripen into the consummation of full enjoyment, until her Being became
deathless as my own, and until the Wife, instinct in every vein with the
pulses of immortal life, might become the Mother of a deathless child.
`This was my resolve. For I had resolved to raise Eola to my own
sphere; to lift her from the decay that withers and the death that corrodes,
into beauty that could never fade, and youth that could never die.
`And with this resolve impressed upon my being, I came to England.
As the way-worn Scholar, under a false name and in an humble disguise.
I came to my father's Home. Where I expected to find an aged man, no
less rich in years than in the respect of men, a Patriarch encircled by his
grateful People, I only found a blind old man, chained and imprisoned,
like a savage beast. Where I had hoped to meet an honorable Brother,
with truth in his heart, and the atmosphere of a generous soul, kindling
noble deeds into life wherever he turned, I only met a brutal Debauchee,
surrounded by brutal Sensualists, and growing more debased every hour
in an atmosphere of pollution. From this wretch nothing was sacred.
The poor man, the serf who was forced to dig for a crust, and barter life
itself for an untimely gravethe mistaken vestal, who had thought to
crush all the passion and the hope of her young life, within the walls of a
Convent,the good old man, the Father, who for years had looked
forward
to old age, as the appropriate time for the full development of his
son's reverence and filial loveall these, alike, were the victims of the
base animal, My Brother. The Serf to his mere love of cruelty; the Nun
to his brutal lust; the Father to his no less brutal avarice.
`And this wretched animal, this creature, who ere his youth was gone,
had grown hoary in the hyena's appetite, and the tiger's lust,this
Brother
of mine, it was, who mingled the pollution of his being with the pure
life of Eola, and made her bosom thrill with the life of a child as base as
himself.
`Eola became the Mother of
his
child, * * * * * * * * * * * *
* * * * *.
`He had roused the mere animal part of her natureher soul was lost
in the delirium of the gross and earthy sensesshe became the partner
of his appetite, and the Mother of his Child.
`And, for
him
I stained my hands with my Father's blood, and stamped
upon my deathless forehead, the hand of Cain!
`Do you begin to read the destiny of your Race, Paul of Ardenheim?
This woman whom I had destined to become the mother of a pure and
glorious Child, became the Mother of a Child, which as it kindled into
life in her breast was impressed in every fibre of its existence, with the
terrible necessity of Parricide. The Mother was conscious that my hand
had slain my father, and this consciousness was instilled into her Child
before it saw the light. This consciousness was the seed of a rich
harvest
of unnatural crimes.
`The Child was sleeping on her bosom as I raised the steel, which
deprived
her of life. There it slept with its father's baseness, the latent
impulse
of Parricide, and some portion of its Mother's better nature, written
upon its stainless face. She died, but the Child I could not kill, for even
then a hope burned in my soul, that the life which beat in its veins was
derived from mine.
`I resolved to permit it to live, so that its very life might prove its
liveage.
`It lived; it grew to manhood; it struggled awhile with temptation,
soared awhile above the dust, and then sank with open arms into the
embrace
of pollution. That child was at last a hoary old man, tottering to
the grave under the triple burden of age, disease and lust. And, even the
little space of life permitted to the aged sinner, was coveted by his son.
The Son slew his Fatherthen the lineage of Eola's Child was no
longer a doubt, no more a mystery to me.
`From that Child, Paul of Ardenheim, your race have descended. In
vain have the Lords of your Race attempted to escape the curse which
rested upon the birth of that childand, as for youthe purity of Eola's
better nature may shed a halo around you for a little while, but the
baseness
of my brother's blood, and the dark necessity of Parricide will work
their inevitable results at last, and like every one of your race, you, Paul
of Ardenheim, will sink into the grave of the Sensualist, with your brow
seared by the mark of Cain, your hand red with the dye of Parricide.'
Thus far, in a voice unbroken by a single tremor, had Paul Ardenheim
repeated the words of the singular Being, whom he had encountered in
the Sealed Chamber. As he went on, his form immovable as an image
of stone, his eye shining steadily from his corpse-like face, his voice
hollow
and deep, but undisturbed by one pause, or sign of hesitation, it
seemed to the beautiful woman that she beheld Ranulph of Mount
Sepulchre
himself, that she heard his own sad accents, repeating the details of
his incredible history, while Paul Ardenheim passed entirely from her
sight.
But now he paused, he hesitated, overwhelmed by emotion he was
unable
to proceed, and Paul Ardenheim once more stood before her.
The full history of that hour I dare not repeat; it would strike me
dead, but to tell it to human ears, he resumed, in a faint and gasping
voice; He revealed to me, the page of the Future, and showed me the
gray hairs of my father, dabbled in blood. He, Ranulph of Mount
Sepulchre
,
depicted the utter folly of any attempt on my part to evade Fate, and
battle with Destiny, and yetand yet
`
And yet there is a Hope born of a Better World, and that Hope is
yours!
'
These words fell from his lips the moment before he disappeared.
Yes, in the very bitterness of his mockery, he pointed me to Heaven after
he had surrounded me with the atmosphere of Hell.Beautiful woman!
Do you now comprehend my destiny? Paul grasped her hand; his pale
cheek was tinged by a faint glow. Do you now understand the source
of the Voice, which spoke to you, and bade you urge me to my Despair?
It was the spirit of this Demon which filled your breast, and gave words
to your tongue. Ranulph of Mount Sepulchre found an instrument for
his purposes in youyour eyes, your tones, the very pressure of this
hand translated his infernal design into the semblance of virtue and
courage
,
and with a broken vow upon my soul, I crossed the fatal threshold,
and flung my soul into his Power. Had I not covered myself with
perjury he could have had no power to move me. But as it was, I had
already proved his words, and decided my destiny before I saw his
corpse-like
Face. It was the perjury that wrecked my soul. And, now what
canst thou give me in recompense for the guilt of that Broken vow?
Thou art very beautifulyes, thou art like Eola! `
Never did the eye of
the Sensualist rest upon a more voluptuous shapenever did the gaze of
the Devotee linger upon a face more hallowed by calm and spiritual
beauty
.' And yet, were the Universe thine to bestow, thou couldst repay
me for the guilt of that Broken vow!
And as the words fell from his lips, the music from without came in
merry peals through the curtained window, filling the chamber with its
bounding echoes.
The Wizard's daughter smiled, and quietly surrendered her hand to the
nervous grasp of Paul Ardenheim. The ivory line gleamed through her
parted lips; her eyes were full of latent mirth.
Did it never occur to you, Paul, that the woman who loves you, was
no real form of flesh and blood, but a misty creation of the Demon's skill?
A spirit sent by Ranulph to win you to despair? A beautiful Demon
placed in your path, by Ranulph's power, and armed with the fascination
that bewilders only to destroy?
She spoke laughingly, but Paul's forehead grew dark at her words.
He dropped her hands, and retreated from her gaze, while his eyes were
chained to her face.
Eola! he muttered, with a vacant eye.
Let me frame another supposition, she spoke again, but her face was
sad, her voice deep and thrilling: You are surrounded by the arts of a
Demon, who has lived three hundred years, and who cannot die until he
has plunged you into a vortex of unnatural crimes. Tell this to the
people
of the every-day world, and they will laugh at you for a madman. I
will believe it; yes, I will receive the Revelations of the Sealed Chamber
as common-place truth. But where will you find this demon? In the
form of the Woman who loves you, or in the shrunken figure of that Old
Man, who has stolen you away from the halls of your fathers,buried
you in the shades of Wissahikonsurrounded you with incredible
temptations
poisoned
your very blood with suspicion and madness?
Paul gazed upon her in blank amazement
Of whom do you speak? he cried.
Do you not guess my meaning? Of the aged man, whom you call,
Father! she whispered and clasped his hand. There was persuasion in
her tone, a calm, deep conviction in her eyes.
My father! Paul drew his hand from her grasp, and his face was
stamped with unmingled horror. Beware! he whisperedYou
blaspheme
the Dead.
Ah, he is dead, then? He has
disappeared
her lip curled, and
her eye flashed with the very laughter of scorn:
Disappeared!
First,
your Sister dies; sacrificed to his relentless vengeance, and then he
disappears!
And, Paul Ardenheim, who was driven forth from
Wissahikon
,
like a felon two years and more ago, comes back again to weep by
his Sister's grave, and mourn forsooth at the disappearance of the Demon
who had deprived him of rank and powerof race and Nameand
planted in his heart the fear of Parricide. Man! You are unworthy of
your Destiny, for you have yielded yourself a willing victim to the very
Demon whom you abhor, andit is enough to bring a smile to a cheek
of marbleyou have called this Demon by the name of`
Father
!
Woman! You blaspheme the dead! cried Paul in a voice hoarse
with agony, and yet her words penetrated his soul, and overwhelmed with
a Conviction which he could neither banish nor confute.
I will not, I dare not think it! he cried, wringing his hands in very
frenzy, as a flood of memories, swept over him, bewildering every faculty,
with their confused voices: My father and Ranulph of Mount
Sepulchre
the same? Nonoby the salvation of my immortal soulno!
It is false, it is blasphemous
His voice rising with all the emphasis of despair, mingled with the
melody
,
which burst gay and thrilling through the curtained window.
He buried his face in his hands for a moment, and then started toward
the mirror with outstretched arms and distorted features:
Away! he gaspedThou art the Demon. Thy voice whispered
ruin. Thine eyes looked Death into my soul. Thy very presence breathes
EvilRemorseDespair! My father is dead; my sister sleeps the
untroubled
slumber of the grave, and I am left alone upon the earth, but
left to work out a solemn duty, which permits no communion with the
passions or hatreds of mankind. AwayI hate thee!
His hands grasped the mirror, as he sought madly for the secret spring,
while his face was turned over his shoulder.
Hate thee! Dost read it in my eyes? 'Twas a Woman base and
beautiful as thee, who wrecked the life of Ranulph, and bartered his eternal
despair, for the brutal appetite of his Brother! Away! Thou art Eola!
And he sought for the secret spring with trembling hands.
The beautiful woman, glided calmly to his side. She did not reply to
his reproaches, nor return him scorn for scorn. Her eyes were downcast;
her face and bosom hidden in the folds of her luxuriant hair.
You will leave me, Paul, she whispered, extending her hands
Behold! The door is open. Your way is free. And yet there was
a tremor in her voiceI would not part in anger.
Her hand had touched his own, as it sought for the secret spring. She
was by his side; the hair which shadowed her face, waved against his
breast, swayed by the breeze which came through the opened door, and
gave him a glimpse of her faultless throat, and one white gleam of her
panting bosom. He could not see her face; it was lost in shadow. But
a tear glittered upon that gleam of the snowy breast, and he heard her
voice die away in an inarticulate murmur.
Paul began to tremble; he was ice and flame by turns; his foot was on
the threshold, yet he lingered one moment, ere he left her Presence and
went forth into the silence and shadow of Night.
CHAPTER FORTY-SECOND.
TO NIGHT I AM TO BE MARRIED, PAUL.
One
moment! It passes ere the pen can write the letters, and yet ages
of Thought may come and go, within its compass.
One moment!
It may be, only the last pebble which tops the pyramid, or the pivot on
which a world spins round.
Go forth, she faltered, But not in anger.
She touched his hand, and clasped his fingers with an almost
imperceptible
pressure.
Paul's face was no longer wild and distorted; it was subdued by a
vague melancholy, but his heart beat tumultuously, and he was forced to
lean for support against the frame of the secret door.
A breathless pause ensued, while she stood near him, her face in
shadow
,
while her hand gently touched his own.
The door was free. Beyond was the darkness and silence of night;
here Paradise, made beautiful by Eve.
Paul lingered
Where was the anger, which had swelled his heart, and quivered in
burning accents from his tongue?
She raised her face, and looked at him silently through the intervals of her
dark hair; her lips moved as if in the effort to speak, but without a sound;
and then she stretched forth her arms, and sank upon his breast.
To night, she murmured, as she buried her face upon his bosom.
To-night I am to be married Paul.
Her breast was throbbing against his heart; her arms were round his
neck, her hair waved over his arms and shoulders. It was as though
liquid fire had been poured into his veins. He gathered her form to his
breast with one arm, and closed the secret door with the other. The
mirror in its place once more, reflected her head pillowed on his breast;
his face, glowing with the fire and quivering with the tumult of a sudden
rapture.
Married! he echoed, andlooking over her shoulder, he saw the
white couch, among its snowy curtains, and knew at once that he beheld
the Bridal Bed.
He was lost in a tumult of conflicting emotions; he was mad with
boundless joy.
Thou wilt be my wife! he gasped, Thou so young and beautiful,
wilt take the nameless wanderer to thy arms!
The dim luxurious light of that silent chamber, the pictures glowing
from the walls, the statues gleaming from each shadowy recess, the music
bursting in merry peals, through the window, the Bridal Bed, enshrined
in twilight, all these conspired to inflame his senses, but the Woman who
clung to his neck, and suffered her bosom to beat against his breast,
completed
his delirium.
My wife! he cried, For me these marriage guests, for me these
peals of marriage music, for me this silent room, made sacred by the
Marriage
Bed! It is too muchmy brain is mad. For me the wanderer
without a name, the outcast without one rood of land, with no heritage
but Poverty and Despair.
And then the Thought came over his soul, that this beautiful woman
had discovered his real Name; had found the clue to the title and the
wealth of his race, and planned this scene as a merry surprise, for him
her Husband.
Speak! Tell me the secret of this mystery with thy lips ripe with
passion. Tell it to me with thine eyes. Nay be silent. Do not speak,
or I shall grow mad indeed. Thy heart beating against mine own, speaks
a language which needs no words to be understood.
She gently unwound her arms from his neck, and removed his hand
from her waist, and stood before him, radiant, glowingwith all her
loveliness
about her like a veil
I love you Paul, she whisperedin a measured voice, with a pause
between each wordand took his hand: Never can I love any one but
you. We will love each other until we are dead. In all the world, there
is no man, whose destiny is linked with mine, but you. We will climb
the heighths of fame and power together. I will be near you, when
darkness
clouds your soul. I will cheer you in the moment of Despair.
When there is no resting-place for you, in all the world, my bosom shall
pillow your head. But Paul, I am to be married to-night, but not to
you.
It seemed to him, that he was cursed with sudden blindness. The
room, the lights, the Marriage Bed, and the voluptuous form, all were lost
in thick darkness. His brain swam; he heard sounds like the ringing of
death bells in his ears; he was at once blind, mad and dumb.
I am to be married to-night, but not to you!
These words he heard; they sounded again, and again; they mingled
with the tolling of the death-bells.
There was a long pause, ere he saw clearly again, and found himself
still in the room, the Marriage Bed before him, and the beautiful woman
by his side.
Pity me! he falteredI am in a dream. Soon I will awake, and find
myself beside the Wissahikon, with the moonlight on my face. Yet it is
a fearful dream. If I do not soon awake I will die.
Rising to her full stature, she swept her dark hair aside, and revealed
her face,unutterably beautifulbut calm and pale as Death.
It is no dream, Paul. It is real, terribly real. To-night I am to be
married. Married to Wealth, joined in solemn vows, uttered in the
presence
of Heaven, to Gold. The history is intricate and long, but I will
speak it Paul, in few words. A Rich man has my father in his power;
all this wealth which you behold, is hollow and fantastic as the gold of
the Arabian legend; it shines brightly, but turns to withered leaves,
before
your eyes. This mansion, adorned with all the externals of wealth,
these lands by the Wissahikon, nay the very liberty of my father, are
shut up in the Rich Man's coffers,coffined and frozen in the charnel
house of `Law.' My body, Paul, is to be sold to-night, in the solemn
auction of Marriage; sold by the Priest, to pay the debt of my father,
and secure his gray hairs from the ignominy of the jail. The Rich Man,
the creditor of my father will purchase me,yes, buy my bodybut the
Soul, Paul, the Soul! That at least cannot be bought; it is free, as air
or Death!
Paul did not answer. As the first man in Eden, suddenly awoke from
his dream of innocence, and found himself naked and was ashamed, so
Paul Ardenheim, started up from his wild dreams, and found himself
Poor
.
Poor
! The Woman whom he worshippedfor whom he would
have bartered his Soulwas to be sold, into the arms of sanctified lust,
for the price of some thousands of round and bright and beautiful
doubloons
.
Could he save her! Could he redeem her body from this
unholy
traffic? He could not call one piece of gold his own. He was Poor.
The agonies of the damned, are sometimes written in those three
syllables
I am poor
.
Come, he muttered, as the room swam round him, and the
death-bells
sounded in his earsWe will leave this place. Some cabin by a
hill-side, will give us shelter. Our souls are rich, what need we care for
the Gold that pampers the body and damns the Soul?
His eye was vague and wandering; his accents broken and faint; he
spoke like a man half roused from some horrible dream.
Love in a cottage! she whispered, while her face was radiant with
that laughter of scorn, which gave a Satanic lustre to its beauty. No,
Paul. We are not mad enough for that. Wouldst like to gaze upon the
face of a Child, and feel that thou hadst given it being, with the curse of
Poverty upon its brow? The Leper of old, had no right to love or marry;
the Leprosy which poisoned his blood, he might bear in the silence of
despair; it was a sin darker than Parricide, to communicate that Plague
to the veins of a Child. Which is most fearful Paul, the Leprosy which
corrodes the blood, or the Poverty which transforms body and soul, into
one hideous ulcer?
Paul was still silent, but the blindness had passed away; his eyes shone
clear and deep again; his Soul was possessed by a fixed and irrevocable
Resolve
To night I am to be married, Paul. Hark! How the marriage
music
peals through the window! The Priest will say his Prayer, or rather,
repeat the words which make the sale complete. The guests will throng
around the Bride, and while the Rich Man, contemplates his Purchase,
they will prepare Her, for the consecrated orgies of the Marriage Couch.
This is all fair; is it not? Legal, too, aye and Religious? When a Man
buys a thing, and gives his gold for it, he has a right to use it as he pleases
has he not? But hold she grasped his hand, and looked into his
eyes: Suppose the thing that is sold, has a Soula Will. Suppose the
Woman bought with Gold, meets her Buyer on the threshold of the Bridal
Chamber, and taught by his own `Golden Rule,' whispers in his ear
`You have purchased the body, Husband by law, but Another has
married
the Soul. Soul and body, are not to be separated: I am fearful,
Husband
by law, that you cannot enjoy the one, without the possession of the
other. You have bought the body with your gold; Husband by law, that
gold is now your Curse. For with that gold, I will raise the Husband of
my soul, to rank and power; aye with your gold, I will unloose the
prison
bars of Poverty, and let Genius spread its wings, and seek the Sun.
Do not murmur, Husband by Law; before the world, I will be, your Wife.
I will submit to be surveyed, by the noble and the rich, as your Purchase.
But the threshold of this chamber, you may never pass; while there is a
throb in my veins, or a Soul in my bosom you shall never mount that
Bridal BedHusband by law!'
He will be base enough, to hear this, and obey? murmured Paul,
while his Resolve gave a terrible light to his eye, an unnatural glow to his
cheek.
The man who buys a woman with his gold, and is content, with love
that is only purchased, is base enough, cowardly enough, for anything.
And then Paul, do I look like a Woman, who will be foiled by a creature,
like this? When I look into your eyes, Paul, I feel that you are the
Master
of my Soul. And shall I, armed with this consciousness, falter and
turn pale, at the cunning or the gold of the Husband by Law?
Paul did not answer her in words, but his gaze, spoke the purpose of
his soul. She was before him, in all her transcendant loveliness, a bold
and fearless soul embodied in a voluptuous shape. His bronzed cheek
was growing with a crimson flush; his eyes deep and clear and yet flashing
as with liquid light, devoured at a glance the witchcraft of her face, the
warm palpable beauty of her virgin form. He extended his arms,he
drew her to his breast. And girdled in that arm, with all her life,
throbbing
in her bosom, and throbbing against his breast, she felt his touch, as
his hand gently parted her tresses, over her forehead, she felt his gaze,
burning, passionate, madas his lips clung to her own.
And their broken sighsthe low murmur of their love, half-drowned by
their mingling lips were lost in the Marriage Music, which still pealed
gaily through the curtained window.
And the mirror reflected their forms,her robes like the driven snow
floating about his dark attireand their faces, both impassioned by the
same glow, her eyes kindling with the fire of his gaze, her hair, streaming
over the arm, which held her to his breast.
Thou art mine, he gasped, And
now
. Behold our Bridal Bed.
And ere the words had died on his tongue, ere the kiss which answered
him, had sealed her full assent upon his lips, the mirror glided silently
aside, and two forms entered the apartment, with noiseless footsteps.
Reginald of Lyndulfe, gay and magnificent in his wedding attire, with
the pale face of Rolof Sener, smiling coldly over his shoulder.
Leola
! cried the voice of Reginald.
Save me! Reginald save me! cried the beautiful woman, springing
from the arms of PaulSave me from this villian!
And Paul turned and saw her clinging to the neck of Reginald, her face,
stamped with terroraye with hatredturned toward him, while the pale
visage of Rolof Sener, smiled coldly at his side.
CHAPTER FORTY-THIRD.
LEOLA, PAUL AND REGINALD.
Save
me from this villian! He entered my chamber, by that secret
door, he assailed with threats, aye with violence! He assailed my life
and more than lifemy honor!
And the Wizard's Daughter clung, frightened and pale to the neck of
Reginald.
Paul was dumb.
It is not Paul Ardenheim that I behold. It is some miserable
coward
,
who bearing some resemblance to the noble Paul, has stolen his dress
and name. It is notit cannot be Paul Ardenheim.
Reginald's cheek was flushed, his blue eyes flashing with concentrated
rage, but his tone was calm and measured, in its very mockery of doubt.
33
And as he spoke he took the hands which encircled his neck, and pressed
them gently, at the same time, gathering all the sweetness of her
voluptuous
mouth, in a long and passionate kiss.
Paul was dumb.
Rolof Sener, who stood near the mirror, with folded arms, surveyed
the three, with his cold and passionless smile. Here the beautiful
woman
,
clinging to the neck of Reginald, arrayed in his wedding dress;
there Paul Ardenheim, standing alone, his arms hanging by his side, his
face colorless and leaden as the visage of death.
Had I been a moment laterBy Heaven, it makes my blood boil
to think of it! and Reginald gazed fondlytenderlyin the face of the
Wizard's daughter. Only a moment later, and I should have entered
this room, to find you my Leola, dishonored and a corpse.
Again he clasped her hands, and pressed a kiss upon her lips.
Paul was dumb.
Rolof Sener's sunken eyes began to flash with peculiar light, and the
icy smile played around his pale thin lips, but he did not speak.
One moment, love, whispered Reginald, and he unwound the arms
of the beautiful woman, I will punish this villian, who has assumed the
name and dress of Paul Ardenheim, and then Leola he gazed fondly
into her eyesthe guests are waiting for us in the room below, and
every thing is prepared for our Marriage.
Paul's chest began to heave; the color rushed to his cheek, and a
deadly light, glimmered from his bloodshot eyes.
Leola
! he gasped, and with the utterance of that fatal name, all the
mystery of this scene, was revealed to his soul. When the word had
passed his lips he was pale and dumb again.
Reginald resigned the arm of Leola, and crossed the floor, until he
stood face to face with Paul. Rolof Sener smiled as he remarked the
contrast. The muscular yet graceful form of the Monk of Wissahikon,
clad in the garb of a Heidelberg Student; a garb worn with travel, and
bearing in every detail, the unmistakable indications of Poverty: the
muscular
and military figure of the Lord, attired in the costume of a wealthy
gentleman, on the eve of marriage; a costume of silk and velvet, adorned
with jewels, and eloquent of Gold. Reginald's chesnut hair, touched by
the hand of his
valet
, and carefully dressed after the fashion of the time,
relieved with its powdered locks, his clear
blonde
complexion; Paul's
dark hair, flowed wildly aside from his bronze visage, and only made his
cheek seem paler, his eyes more intensely bright.
This was the contrast which fixed the icy smile on Rolof Sener's lips.
As regards brute strength, they seem fairly matched, he muttered,
Only Paul seems palsied in every nerve, while Reginald is stronger than
ever, with settled rage.
Leola clasped her hands, and awaited the issue, without the power to
stir from the spot where she stood.
Reginald stood face to face with Paul, and surveyed him from head to
foot, with a glance of overwhelming scorn. Paul returned his gaze, with
a vacant and apathetic stare. For a moment neither spoke; the color
went and came on Paul's bronzed cheek; now he was panting and
gasping
as if for life, and now pale and immovable as the dead; while
Reginald's
cheek glowed into one scarlet flush, and his eyes shone with settled
hate. At last he broke the stillness
Paul Ardenheim! he whispered, hissing that name through his set
teeth, as though it was in itself the bitterest scorn, that his rage could
utter.
Paul did not answerdid not movehis eyes was fixed upon the floor.
Speak! Speak Paul! Make but the lamest excuse; frame but the
basest apology, and I will listen patiently. In a moment my servants will
hurl you from this room and scourge you from the house. Speak! I am
waitingwith patienceam I not? What means your presence in this
chamber?
Reginald bent forward as he spoke, until his breath inflamed by rage,
fanned the very cheek of the Monk of Wissahikon.
Paul stood motionless and dumb, with his eyes cast to the floor.
Rolof Sener smiled his icy smile, as he stood beside the mirror. As
for Leola, with her finger pressed upon her bloodless lip, and her entire
frame quivering like a tigress, about to dart upon its prey, she silently
awaited the end of his tragedy.
You are my friend, Paul, whispered Reginald, with scorn in his
look and in every accent. Do you remember our vow?
Paul shuddered.
We will be true to each other, and in no extremity or danger desert
each other, but cherish forever the solemn symbol of the Broken but not
divided Coinbroken not divided for its seperate pieces are moved by two
hearts, joined in one by the holy tie of Brotherhood
. Do you remember
it,
Brother
Paul? Quite romanticeh?
Paul raised his eyes, as if about to speak, and at the same moment
Leola started one step forward, and her gaze encountered the eyes of the
Monk of Wissahikon. That look was unperceived by Reginald. Paul
felt it to the inmost core of his heart, and his pale face, glowed into life
again. Rolof saw it and smiled. No words can describe it, for the whole
being of Leola, was embodied in that single glance. It was passion, it
was entreaty, it was madness. It said to Paul, `
Spare me! And at the
proper moment I will tell you all! Spare me! For I am thine!
Paul therefore, although his heart beat madly against his breast, was
silent as the dead.
You still wear the Broken Coin about your heart? cried Reginald
surprise and rage, struggling for the mastery on his face: And with that
Coin upon your heart, you stole coward-like into this chamber, and
attempted
the dishonor of my Wife.
Your wife! ejaculated Paul, and thenagain that look from the
flashing eyes of Leola.
My betrothed, answered Reginald, In a few momentsafter my
servants have scourged you from the mansion, mark yeshe will be my
wife.
Reginald placed his hand within the ruffled lace, which fluttered between
his silken waistcoat and his breast, and in an instant, drew forth his half
of the Broken Coin. He cast it at the feet of Paul, exclaiming, Take
it up, my Brother! It will serve to remind you of our vow.
Paul trembled from head to foot, he started forward as if his agony had
at last unsealed his lips, but looking over the shoulder of Reginald he
again encountered Leola's gaze. He was dumb once more. He knelt in
silence, took the Broken Coin, and placed it within his garment, close to
his heart.
The moment rapidly drew near, when Reginald's rage at first settled
into a tone of biting sarcasm, was to burst all bonds, and vent itself in
loud reproaches, perchance, in dishonorable blows.
Thou paltry knave! he cried, Did I not feed thee of my bread,
and give thee to drink of my cup? Thou to meditate an act like this?
Beggar! Did I not share my purse with thee, and clothe thy coward's
form, with the very garment, which it now wears?
The cup of Paul's agony at last was full. Scorned for his treachery,
insulted for his cowardice, and now, tainted with hisPoverty.
I am poor!
he muttered wildly, and fixed his blood-shot eyes on
Reginald's face, his arms quivering to the very fingers as with a spasm.
Was he about to grapple with the young Lord, and trample him beneath
his feet?
Rolof Sener smiled.
Leola crossed the floor with noiseless steps, and stole gently behind
Reginald, winding her arms around his neck as she whispered in his ear,
but at the same time, gazing steadily into the very eyes of Paul
Ardenheim
.
Do not be angry with the poor knave, Reginald, she whispered
Do not so far forget yourself as to strike him. This gentleman who
stands near us, and whom I have seen to-day before, will doubtless charge
himself with the care of the poor wretch. Will you not, good Rolof?
Thrust him forth by the secret stairway, and our guests will not be
disturbed
by the scandal of his presence. For my sake, Reginald!
And her look which flashed into Paul's very soul, spoke to him, as her
voice spoke to Reginald:
Spare me! I am thine! When the time comes, I will tell you all!
Away Leola! cried Reginald, thrusting her gently from his side:
This knave shall answer to me, and without delay. Speak, coward!
If within your craven form, there yet lingers one throb of manhood, speak
and answer me! Have you no word to excuse this outrage?
Paul raised his form to its full stature, and surveyed Reginald with
steady look, at the same time wiping the cold sweat from his forehead.
But he did not speak. There was a spell upon his tongue, upon his blood,
upon his Soul. It was the Soul of Leola flashing from her eyes.
Rolof Sener advanced; spoke a few brief words; extended his hands,
and then retreated to his former position near the mirror. It was but the
work of an instant, and yet his extended hands, placed a sword in the
hands of Reginald and Paul, and the words which he had spoken were
full of meaning.
Do not forget that you are gentlemen. There are two swords. The
peal of the Marriage Music will drown their clashing. Leave scolding to
women. The outrage was attempted in this chamber, and here it must
be atoned for.
Reginald surveyed his sword, with an exclamation of joy, as wild as
incoherent. Paul felt the hilt in his grasp, saw the sharp blade glitter in
the light, and with an involuntary glance, measured the form of his
antagonist.
Defend yourself! cried Reginald, glowing at once with the
consciousness
of muscular power, and with the fury of revenge: Come!
This matter can be settled in a moment!
Had Rolof Sener been a Demon, he could not have looked more coldly
calm, or more serenely delighted than at the present moment.
As for Leola, like some beautiful Statue of Terror, she stood rooted to
the floor, her hands hanging stiffly by her side, while her eyes flashed
vividly in her death-like countenance.
Paul grasped the sword, and his blood-shot eye brightened with a
ferocious
instinct. He gazed upon the breast of Reginald, gay with marriage
attire, and seemed to meditate the blow, which would crimson that
marriage
attire with the Bridegroom's blood. He had forgotten the solemn
mission which forever separated him from the loves and hatreds of
mankind
;
forgotten his dead Father, and the stern Prophecy uttered by the
Living-
corpse
in the silence of the Sealed Chamber; he was only
conscious
of the three-fold taunt of treachery, cowardice, and poverty. His
blood bounded once more in his veins, as he felt that sword hilt in his
grasp; the lust of bloodshed possessed him from head to foot. He
measured
his antagonist, and stood readyto kill.
Come
it is enough he cried, in a voice almost inaudible, while
his discolored eyeballs gave an unnatural look to his visageHere,
beside the Bridal Bed, thou shalt die.
And at the same instant, his sword fell from his nerveless hand, and
clattered at his feet. He caught the gaze of Leola,that look unloosed
his iron graspand trembling from head to foot, he stood gazing vacantly
upon his fallen sword.
Coward! Said I not so? He dare not confront his
Brother
Reginald
.ThusthusI
inflict upon you, the last shame which might even
stir a craven into manhood.
And he struck Paul across the shoulder with his sword; not with the
edge, as he would strike a man, but with the side of the blade as he would
strike a dog.
Then the smile which had lingered about Rolof's lips, mounted to his
eyes, and radiated over his massive forehead.
Paul calmly folded his armscalmly, although his chest was swelling
with fearful agonyand looked Reginald in the eyes.
Strike higher next time; he quietly said, Let the scar upon my
forehead
,
direct your aim.
The scene which then occurred defies all power of description. Even
as Paul, raising himself to his full stature, placed his finger upon the scar,
while a singular calmness overspread his face; even as he spoke of that
scar, which had been received in the defence of his friend's life, Reginald,
blinded by his rage, raised the sword, and struck the defenceless man
across the forehead. As before, he used not the edge, but the side of his
sword. Still, the blow was violent, and the scar received for Reginald,
bled afresh.
Paul, with the blood upon his forehead, staggered to and fro for a
moment
,
then, conquered as much by his agony as by the blow, fell like a
dead man to the floor.
His arms were outspread without life or motion, and his ashen face,
with the features fixed as if in death, was half-concealed by his dark hair,
which was damp and matted with his blood.
Reginald struck the blow, and before a moment passed, stood gazing
upon the prostrate form, the sword still clenched in his right hand. Near
him Leola, without the power to speak or move, her hands clasped, and
her head bowed on her breast, while Rolof Sener, in front of the mirror,
looked on the scene with his brilliant eyes and icy smile.
For a moment, something like regret struggled with the mad anger of
Reginald's face, as he surveyed that noble forehead, half-hidden by the
dark hair drenched in blood.
But Rolof Sener, gliding over the floor with a soundless step, was at
his side:
Reginald, let us remove the body, he whispered, in his softest tone.
Reginald felt an unknown fear creep through his veins; he cast his
eyes to the floor, and trembled in every nerve. For the words of Rolof
Sener told him, that he beheld not a living man,stunned by a sudden
blowbut a Corpse
He is dead, whispered Rolof, He died, not so much by your hand,
as from the breaking of his proud heart. 'Twas a noble fellow, after all.
And the scareh, Reginald? Received in your defence, when he saved
your life? But come, we will remove the body, and to-morrow this
matter
may be duly explained to the wedding guests. There is no time to be
lostquick, Reginald!
Reginald wondered to hear him speak thus in the presence of Leola.
He turned to look upon her and mark the expression of her face, but
Leola had fallen in a swoon. Without a sigh, like a flower broken on its
stem, she had sunk insensible, her hair waving over her face as she fell.
She will not awake until we return, whispered Rolof, And we can
tell her a merry story, how we scourged the `Monk' from her father's
grounds.
And without another word, they bore the body of Paul Ardenheim
through the secret door and down the narrow stairway. We will not
aver, that Reginald's hands did not tremble as he grasped the body of his
dead `Brother,' nor dare we assert that his heart did not grow cold as he
felt the head of Paul upon his breast. But the moment before they went
from the light into the dark stairway, Reginald, gazing upon the face of
Rolofillumined in every feature by that light, and thrown distinctly into
view by the darkness of the stairwayfelt something like a dim memory
flit over his brain. It was a remarkable visage, you will remember, its
thin lips stamped with that eternal smile, with its great forehead relieved
by short gray hair,a single lock falling down the centreits eyes sunken
deep, yet gleaming with dazzling lustre, and lighting up a visage whose
colorless complexion reminded you of the waxen face of the dead.
I have seen that face among the family portraits of our Race, the
thought flashed over the mind of the young LordAnd it looks like the
face of Ranulph-John, who was found dead beside the dead body of my
Grandsire.
And thus they took the body of Paul Ardenheim from the voluptuous
light of Leola's chamber, into the silence and darkness of the summer
night. The marriage music which smote their ears, fell cold and dead
upon his pulseless brain. And the light, which came in fitful rays through
the shrubbery which encircled the opening of the secret stairway, shone
upon his marble visage and dark hair drenched with blood.
Meanwhile
Leola
, stretched insensible upon the floor of her Bridal
Chamber, with her dark hair waving over her face, was all unconscious
that the Rich Man, who had bought her with his Gold, had borne away
the lifeless body of Paul, the Husband of her Soul.
It was not many moments ere Reginald again stood in the secret door,
gazing upon the voluptuous images of Leola's chamber, ere his footstep
crossed its threshold. His eye lingered for awhile upon the statues
gleaming from each recess, upon the pictured walls, wrapt in luxurious
light, but rested last of all, upon the Bridal Bed, half-hidden in twilight
gloom. Then all the pallor was gone from his face, and the smile of his
red lip, the gleam of his deep blue eyes, the heaving of his broad chest,
all told, that his thoughts had passed from the dead Paul to the living
Leola.
And ere an hour passes, she will be mine. The wedding guests are
waiting, even now; and the good Clergyman, the Reverend Jacopo!
stands impatient, book in hand, and eye cast toward the floor.
And the handsome Reginald smiled as he crossed the threshold, and
looked around, impatient for Leola's bewitching glance.
Leola, however, had gone from the Bridal Chamber.
Reginald's face manifested something like disappointment, but sinking
in a chair, with his back to the secret door, he surrendered himself to his
thoughts.
She has gone to array herself for the marriage ceremony, he thought,
and a smile crossed his lipsThe most beautiful woman I ever beheld!
A good friend, that Rolof, for when my father storms and talks of an
ill-assorted
marriage, Rolof will quietly point to Jacopo, the
amateur
clergy-man
.
And
he
lies dead, out yonder, in the darkness, with his bloody
forehead
against the damp grass. Twice he saved my life. Once on the
Wissahikon, when the huntsman's knife was at my throat, and again in
the streets of London. Dead, now! I have always had a lurking fear,
although I never confessed it to myself, that the man would be dangerous
to me some day or other. But now he is dead.
You must not imagine that thoughts like these found utterance in words,
for even as they crowded upon him, in all their vivid hues, his lips spoke
a far different language.
Leola, the beautiful! he said, aloud, She will be mine, ere an hour
passes, and we will be happy together, here on the Wissahikon.
He
is
not deadno by Heaven! Only a fainting fit; it was a hard blow, but it
could not kill. But I must leave this placeha, ha! It would not do
for me to be summoned to the marriage, from the Bridal Chamber, and
therefore, I will make my retreat by this passage. I can enter the hall
door, and tell my good friends, that I have been taking a solitary stroll by
moonlight. That will do. Pshaw!
He
is not dead!
He rose, and turned toward the secret doorway. He made but a step
forward, when a new wonder paralyzed his entire frame, and drove the
hues of passion from his handsome cheek.
The frame of the doorway was occupied by a beautiful picture. Had
the hand of Rolof Sener stretched the canvass there, and placed before
him, this Picture which smote his heart, no less with its calm beauty than
with its terrible memory? Or was it an Apparition from the shadows of
the Other World.
It was the picture of a young woman, whose brown hair was gathered
in a dark and glossy mass, on either side of a serenely beautiful face.
Eyes of deep and tranquil hazel lighted that face, and gave an expression
pure and virgin, to the warm cheeks and ripe and dewy lips. The form
was young, graceful, and yet swelling in every outline with the ripe
loveliness
of womanhoodbut womanhood that has only a moment passed
from maidenhood into perfect bloom.
It was a picture of Madeline.
Madeline! faltered Reginald, as the blood left his cheek, and gathered
in tumultuous throbs about his heart.
And then the Picture moved from its frame, and came forward into the
chamber, and spread forth its arms, from beneath the dark mantle which
floated over its white robes, and fell upon Reginald's neck with tears in
its hazel eyes.
It is Madeline! No ghost, but Madeline living, and more beautiful
than ever!
And he pressed his kiss upon her lips, even as she clung to his neck,
and wept upon his bosom. It was not a Brother's kiss. It was warm
and passionate and clinging; the kiss of a Sensualist. Then he raised
her face from his breast, and gazed long and ardently upon its beauty,
bathed as it was, in tears, and held her form at arm's length, and with a
gaze as long and ardent, surveyed its ripe and womanly outlines. She
was not so queenly as Leola. There was not the witchcraft in her eyes,
that gave such overwhelming power to Leola's glance. There was no wild
ambition on her young brow, no daring Thought written upon the warm
lineaments of her young face. She was but a Woman, with only a
woman's
purity and a woman's holiest instincts written upon her
countenance
,
while Leola was a bold and fearless Spirit, embodied in a
voluptuous
form. And yet there was something in the very Innocence, something
in the very Womanliness of Madeline, that roused the senses of the young
Sensualist, and made his blood beat with a wilder throb, than ever stirred
his breast when encompassed by Leola's surpassing loveliness.
And she was not his Sister; she was only Madeline, the daughter of
Catherine Conwell, the Poor Woman.
A thousand vague plans for the Future, already shone in Reginald's
sensual gaze, plans which rushed upon him in a floodvague, misty and
shapelessyet all fraught with danger to the innocence of
Madeline
.
My beautiful bird, he cried gaily, and have I found you again?
Have you risen from the grave, have you dropped from the sky? Tell
Madeline, my beautiful, where have you buried yourself so long?
Brother! she answered, while something like fear pervaded her
bosom as she felt his ardent gaze upon her face; and yet it was fear,
overshadowed by the very Innocence of her virgin soulI received
your letter only an hour ago. I am here to claim your promise. You
said the Past should be forgotten, Brother and that you would join my
hands in marriage with my plighted Husband, Gilbert Morgan.
Reginald did not suffer the unmingled surprise which pervaded his
being to appear in one lineament of his handsome face. He bowed his
head,thought deeply, intensely for a momentand then drew her gently
to him, and pressed his kiss once more upon her lip.
So I did Sister, he murmured without raising his face, and so I will,
my pretty one. You shall be married to Gilbert. I vow it on my soul.
CHAPTER FORTY-FOURTH.
MADELINE, GILBERT AND ROLOF SENER.
And
at the same moment, the door of the chamber was opened, and a
footstep echoed from the secret stairway. Reginald heard neither the
echo of the step, nor the sound of the opening door.
But when he raised his head, he saw Leola standing by his side, her
lips curling in scorn, her eyes flashing with wild lightLeola surpassingly
beautiful in her Bridal Dress, with her dark hair crowned with pale lilies,
and a diamond glittering on her proud forehead.
Leola was at his side, and before him stood Gilbert Morgan, his almost
giant form attired in green and gold, trembling in every nerve, his
sun-burnt
face darkening with deadly anger, his hands clenched, and his brown
hair falling in disordered masses over his corrugated brow.
Gilbert had entered by the secret door, as Leola came through the other
door of her chamber.
Go on, she cried laughingly, in a tone of withering scorn, This
drama amuses me. Go on, husband of mine. I would not disturb your
love scene for the world.
And the future Duchess of Lyndulfe cast upon him a glance, which
might have killed him, had glances the power to kill.
And soh, my gay friend, we've met at last, said Gilbert, drawing a
hunting knife from his belt: I've waited a long time for this meetin'. But
we have met, an' face to face too. There's no mistake this time. We
can settle our long account at once, and without delay. Come!
And in the face of his plighted wife, and with her scornful gaze upon him,
and in the face of Gilbert, and with his uplifted knife flashing in the light,
Reginald drew Madeline to his breast, and kissed her rosy lips once
more.
Gilbert uttered a blasphemous oath; Leola bit her red lip until it was
stained with blood.
For this, Madeline, he cried, for this I have defied the power of
the Fiend, and resolved to shake off his infernal sorcery, and be a man
agin! Ah, girl, your words and heart are alikefalsefalse as the
Fiend himself!
Leola did not speak, but her thoughts was full of agonyFor this, I
have sacrificed Paul Ardenheim!
Reginald's handsome face was convulsed with laughter.
Leola! Behold my long lost sister! he cried, and taking Madeline
by the hand, urged her gently into the arms of his Betrothed.
Ah! That face is stamped upon my soul. Yes, yes, I have seen you
before! and the proud damsel extended her arms to clasp the Orphan
Girl to her heart.
But Madeline did not respond to her caresses, nor look into her eyes.
For Madeline's warm cheek was warm and glowing no longer, and
Madeline's
bright eyes were obscured with a misty film. Trembling in every
limb, she had suffered Reginald to press her lip, and lead her toward his
Betrothed, but from the moment, when the voice of Gilbert broke on her
ears, she had lost all consciousness of anything but his presence. And
yet she had not seen him; she had not the power of will to turn and gaze
upon him.
Even as the queenly woman pressed her hands, Madeline murmured
faintlyYou saved my life on that fatal night! but her thoughts were
of Gilbertevery instant she expected to clasp his hand and be gathered
to his heart.
You are not well; this excitement has been too much for you, my
sweet sister, exclaimed Leola.
And like a maiden walking in her sleep, Madeline turned and beheld
Gilbert. Stood face to face with himsurveying not his glittering
suit
so different from the rude huntsman's costume of other days, nor yet his
sunburnt face, with brown curls about the brow, and a thick beard around
the muscular throatbut looking into his eyes, as though she would grasp
his very Soul.
Gilbert saw her look so wildly on himtrembledand reached forth
his arms. Come, Madeline, he said, in a husky voiceYou're the
only thing left to me on this earth, and you only can save me from the
Fiend.
She did not glide to him, she did not dart into his arms, but she was
thereupon his breasther maidenly form, which looked slight and
diminutive
beside his giant frame, quivering in his convulsive grasp. And the
tears of that strong man fell like rain upon her face, and in the very agony
of his joy, he muttered incoherent ejaculations, which no one unfamiliar
with his adventures, might comprehend.
True! True! True by ! True as light to-day, or an angel to
its God. There aint no blemish in you, girl. Spotless as the driven
snow. And you'll pray for me, and God will hear your prayer. Wont
you Madeline? He did not suffer her to answer him with words, but
took his answer from her lips. How that kiss, the first that had pressed his
mouth from Madeline's lips, since the fatal night thrilled poor Gilbert's
soul! It was like a token of Peaceof Forgiveness.
And I murdered you, Madeline; yes, stabbed you as if you'd been a
savage beast, or a devil in human shape, like myself. Did n't I? Can
you ever forgive?
Gilbert, she answered softly, pressing her hands upon his sunburnt
face, as he held her to his breast, as you would hold a child: The darkness
has gone from us forever. It is morning with us now!
Leola proud and beautiful, as she was in her bridal attire, could not
restrain
her tears. She suffered them to flow freely, and did not attempt to
hide them, as they flashed over her glowing cheek.
Reginald with a moody brow, and lips pressed between his teeth,
surveyed
the scene in sullen silence, only muttering a deep curse or two,
with some gallant ejaculation, such as this: He carries it bravely! The
peasant grub turned butterfly, as I live! Zounds! He'll strangle her
with his clownish kisses!
And as you intend to marry the Lady Madeline, sister of my Lord
Reginald, may I, as an humble friend of the family, presume so far as to
request the favor of your name?
It was a very mild voice, low and gentle, and yet it thrilled Leola and
Reginald with the same shudder; forced a shriek, half joy, half fear from
Madeline's lips, and as for Gilbert, it seemed to transform into a statue;
a sort of quaint effigy of the giant Sampson, with a face of marble, and
costume of velvet glittering with gold.
It was the voice of Rolof Sener.
He had glided unperceived from the secret door, and now he stood
between
Gilbert and Reginald, his pale face slightly drooped upon his breast,
as he gazedwith upturned eyesinto Gilbert's visage. There was
something at once grotesque and sublime in the horror manifested by
Gilbert
,
at the sight of Rolof Sener.
The Fiend himself! he gasped, save me from him, Madelinesave
me, or I'm lost. He put his Soul upon me an hour ago, when I was in
your room, at the Haunted House, away yonder at Germantown, and I
was forced to obey himand walk where he wishedand do as he
willed mebut I've resolved to break his power. To break his power, I
say, and cast off his spells, and be my own man agin. You can help me,
Madelineyou only! Back! Back! I say! You dare not touch me
while this pure girl is on my breast!
Why this is my father, good Rolof Sener, cried Madeline, amazed
at Gilbert's horror.
You see, my children, I have not moved an inch, and yet he bids me
back! and shrinks away from me, as if I meant to strike him. I indeed!
when a blow from his arm would crush me to powder.
Rolof with his arms folded, and his head drooped on his breast, gazed
around with upturned eyes, while a sad sweet smile hung on his thin lips.
Leola shuddered; why, she could not tell: His face does not seem to
me, like the Rolof Sener, who talked with me to-day! the thought darted
over her mind.
Ranulph John! muttered Reginald, as a singular memory agitated
his brain.
You wish to marry this lady, continued Rolof, who now kept his
gaze fixed immovably upon Gilbert's horror-stricken faceYou are
gaily dressed. This is well. Unless indeed, your beautiful plumage
covers a vulture's heart. But we wish to know your name?
Back! Back! Your eyes from my face I say, your curse from my
soul! shrieked Gilbert, and in his despair he clutched poor Madeline
with an embrace like Death itself; You're spinnin' your infernal web
around meI know it, I know it. An' I must come into your clutches
at last, but while this girl is near my heart, I defy you.
The words had scarcely passed his lips, when his arms were
out-stretched
,
with a stiff, mechanical movement; his features became rigid
and motionless; his eyes, fixed in their sockets, shone with a dull leaden
lustre.
It is not Gilbert! shrieked MadelineIt is a Corpse! and
half-swooning
she sank into the extended arms of Reginald.
Now my Lord, and you fair lady, with your permission I will
question
the cunning knave, who thinks to hide his criminal life, and cowardly
designs, under the cloak of madness. Have the goodness to remain
perfectly
still while I question him. And you, my own Madeline, let not
your heart throb against your bosom, like a bird against the bars of its
cage. The
real
Gilbert, may come back some day.
The real Gilbert? cried Madeline, This is Gilbert Morgan,at
least she gazed into the corpse-like face and hesitatedAt least I
thought it was a moment ago.
It is not to be denied that Leola and Reginald awaited the issue of this
scene with a breathless interest. And as they stood, perfectly silent and
motionless, their eyes alternating between the remarkable visage of Rolof
and the face of Gilbert, who looked in truth, like a frozen man, placed
on his feet, by some strange fancy, the merry sound of the Marriage
Music, still burst in one bounding peal, through the window of the
Bridal
Chamber.
Answer me, said Rolof Sener, never for an instant removing his
gaze from Gilbert's face, Where was you, this night one year?
A horrible smile distorted Gilbert's lips, while the other part of his
face remained fixed as Death.
On board the brave Ship Avenger, with as tight a crew as ever trod a
pirate's deck. Ha, ha it was not a burst of laughter, which came from his
lips, but rather a series of spasmodic groansHow we boarded the
East Indiaman, at set of sun, and raked her decks, and drove her crew
into the hold, and thenwhy then, the moon came up, and saw
five hundred of them walk the plank, and struggle their last, among the
waves as red as blood.
You hear? whispered Rolof, turning to Madelinethis is your
lover.
Madeline was silent, but Leola mutteredIf he was brave, and only
made war upon the strong, I could love him in spite of all.
Rolof again turned to Gilbert, whose face still retained its corpse-like
immovability. You were the Captain of the Ship? answer me truly;
I know your life, and can punish falsehood with a halter.
The Captainha, ha! again that burst of unearthly laughter
You should have asked my men, as they gathered about me after the
fight, who was Captain of our Avenger! We had wine from the stores
of the East Indiaman, and women, too,aye, we saved the best of the
lot, and made a night o' t together. We did. I and my jolly crew.
You are listening my child? and again Rolof with his sweet smile
turned to Madeline.
It is only a frightful dream! she faltered and gathered her hands,
across her breast with a clash like iron. And yet in spite of all, it is
Gilbert, and he is my plighted husband.
Leola reached forth her hand, and pressed the cold hand of the Orphan
Girl, while a tear glittered in her proud eye.
Meanwhile Reginald's face, manifested the extremes of surprise and
horror. The wretch! he muttered and retreated a step from Gilbert:
He would have stolen my sister, and made her the toy of his brutal
orgies! Fraternal Reginald!
Listen once again, Madeline, my child. Tell me, Sir Pirate, did you
ever encounter a rude landsman in your travels, named Gilbert Morgan?
You lately assumed his name; but his rugged honesty would put your
shallow knavery to the blush.
I did. In the West Indies, I saw him two years ago; he often spoke
of the Wissahikon. Byit was the last word on his lips!,'
The last word? cried Madeline, starting from the arms of Reginald.
He is dead, then, but nono! It is a mockery. You are here, Gilbert.
My heart tells me, it is you. Wherefore these idle words? Speak to me
Gilbert! What means this scene?
But the Man whom she addressed did not answer her with a word
not even with a look. His leaden gaze was still centered on the visage
of Rolof Sener. To Rolof, Madeline turned and laid her head upon his
folded arms, looking into his face, with all her soul, in the intensity of her
gaze: This is not kind of you, my Father! It is unworthy of your
generous nature!
Yet Rolof without pausing to answer her, continued his questions:
You saw the last of Gilbert Morgan?
He died in my arms, scarcely two years ago, of the yellow fever too,
raving to the last about Wissahikon and Madeline, was the answer.
The Orphan Girl sank back as if a bullet had penetrated her bosom;
she buried her pale face upon the breast of Leola, who whispered
`Courage, my Sister! It is not so dark as it appears.
You bear a great personal resemblance to Gilbert Morgan?
Madeline
awaited the answer to this question with quivering suspense.
I do. Not a doubt of it, by Jove! My comrades often laughed about
it, while he lived, and when he was dead, I resolved that I'd turn it to
advantage, if I ever came to Philadelphia.
Madeline buried her face again; the last hope had gone out.
How? asked Rolof Sener.
And the Man with the motionless form and corpse-like visage, uttered
a burst of hollow laughter as he replied: Gilbert had spoken of the
pretty lass named Madeline. Had told me, in fact, those dear little
secrets
of his love affairs, which are generally only known to two persons,
to wit, the lover and the sweetheart. Says I,that is after he diedif
I even come to Philadelphia, I will seek out this Wissahikon, and make
love to this Madelineif she happens to be livingin the name of the
dead Gilbert. So I planned it, and so I've tried to accomplish it, but
you
Villian! I have foiled your cunning and brought your knavery to the
light, interrupted Rolof, his eyes for the first time, flashing with rage.
Now depart! Once this day, have I warned you; I now repeat my
warning! This time you depart unscathed. But remember! Should
you ever appear upon the Wissahikon again or
dare again, to assume the
name of poor
Gilbert Morgan
remember! I will deliver you into
the clutches of that Justice, whose very name, makes your face wear the
look of death, and the heart within turn to ice. This time depart in
Peace!
And the man, clad in the green doublet embroidered with gold, turned
his fixed eyeballs from the light, and with a measured, but mechanical
stride, crossed the threshold of the secret stairway.
Gilbert! Gilbert! shrieked Madeline, darting forward with panting
bosom and outspread arms, Do not leave me! Do not leave me,
Gilbert
But he did not turn back, and cast one farewell look upon her
face. Without a look, without one accent of farewell, he crossed the
threshold, and was gone.
Let me arrest his flight, cried Reginald, starting from his stupor,
which had bound his senses while these events transpired before his very
eyes: A wretch like this, is not fit to live!
Rolof waved him back. Would the Lord of Lyndulfe convert
himself
into a bailiff on his wedding night. I have unmasked the wretch.
That is sufficient. Let him depart in peace.
Unmasked, indeed, murmured Madeline, sadly, gazing upon the spot
where the Pirate had lately stood: But at the same time, good father,
you have unmasked my grave. It was concealed by flowers, only a few
moments since. I see it clearly now, andmy foot is on the brink.
Was it a tear that subdued the stern light of Rolof's gaze? Very sad
it was, to see her standing there, the centre of the silent group, her pure
and virgin loveliness frozen at its fountain, by the corpse-hand of despair.
Come, Madeline, you need repose, said Rolof, kindly, as he took her
by the hand: This house must be your home, until you depart for
England
,
with your Brother Reginald, and your sister, his Bride.
Even the thought of leaving Wissahikon, brought no glimpse of color
to her cheek; she took his hand in silence, and with faint and uneven
foot-steps
,
moved with him toward the door.
Reginald, he said, as he passed the young Lord, I will join you
again, before the marriage ceremony.
Jacopo waits below
, he added, in
a whisper,
and when Leola cloys your appetite, the daughter of
Catherine
Conwell will lead on the drama of your loves
. There was a strange
significance in his look and smile, as he spoke these latter words.
Then passing onward, to where Leola stood, he addressed her in a
paternal tone: Arrayed for the bridal, my child? I thought you
beautiful
before, but now, it seems to me, you look like the Duchess of
Lyndulfe
,
and yet he hissed the words in an emphatic whisper:
Paul
Ardenheim will yet be yours!
With Madeline clinging to his arm, he left the Bridal Chamber, while
the Bride stood gazing on vacancy, her cheek flushed and her bosom
heaving; and the Bridegroom, with his gaze fixed upon Madeline's
retreating
form, felt all the sensualism of his nature, mount to his eyes. The
last words of Rolof Sener had thrilled like molten fire through their veins.
Paul Ardenheim will yet be yours! murmured Leola, as she laid her
hand upon her voluptuous breast.
And Reginald, as he smoothed the snow-white cambric which fluttered
over his breast, exclaimed to himselfThe daughter of Catherine
Conwell
and Leola! A delicious contrast, upon my soul!
With thoughts like these stirring in their hearts, they took each other
by the hand, and looked into each other's eyes. Never stood nobler pair
before the marriage altar. Reginald magnificent in his young manhood,
his entire form presenting a perfect type of physical beauty; his limbs at
once graceful and muscular; his
blonde
complexion lighted by eyes of
dark blue, his forehead relieved by hair of chesnut brown. Leola,
well-developed
in every rounded limb, her bosom swelling with life, her clear
brown complexion blooming into vermillion on the lips and cheeks, the
intense blackness of her hair, encircled with pale lilies, only exceeded by
the darkness of her eyes. The Soul of a sensualist embodied in a manly
formthe Soul of a proud and ambitious Spirit embodied in the shape of
a voluptuous Woman. There they were, hand in hand, eye gleaming in
eye, looking into one another's faces, with all the frankness of an
all-trusting
Faith, and meanwhile, in their hearts was written,
Lust
and
Pride
.
A beautiful animal! he thought, as he pressed her hand.
A convenient stepping stone for me and Paul! she thought, as she
looked into his eyes.
There is a lesson in this scene; a lesson worth all the sermons ever
preached in grand marble churches, to ears of lead and hearts of brass.
Survey it with your own eyes; paint it in your memory.
This luxurious chamber, so beautiful with the pictures that seem to
breathe from the canvass, and marble images that look like human beings
whose footsteps have only been arrested for a moment by a passing
thought; this luxurious chamber, whose very atmosphere seems hallowed
by the sacred Marriage Bed, while its curtains move to and fro, to the
impulse of a breeze that comes ladened with Marriage Melody. Is it not
a beautiful scene?
And here, in the centre of the place, stand the Bridegroom and the
Bride, looking into each other's eyes, with glances that seem to speak of
Love, as pure as that which trembled from the gaze of Adam into the
heart of spotless Eve, andand after all, this Bridegroom and Bride
are only a Rich Man and his Purchase.
The Marriage Bedah! What words spoken from a book, what
Priest ordained by a Bishop, what vows uttered in the sight of God and
man, can render holy that Marriage Couch?
This night has beheld many dark and troubled scenes, whispered
Leola, as her eyes wore a vague and dreamy light.
But, Leola, whispered Reginald, as his passionate breath fanned her
cheek, while his eye, gazing over her snowy shoulder, beheld the
Marriage
BedBut, Leola, after all it is our Marriage Night.
At this moment, what scenes are passing yonder, within the
Block-House
of Wissahikon? And Paul Ardenheimdoes he live?
34
CHAPTER THE LAST.
THE END OF ALL.
When
Paul awoke again, the luxurious chamber had passed away. He
found himself alone, in the silence and shadow of Night. His form was
prostrate; his brow was pressed against the damp grass. He raised
himself
and looked around, and endeavored to collect his shattered senses.
There was blood upon his forehead; a sharp pain smote his very brain.
He was in the shrubbery, near the secret door. This much he knew.
But how had he come hither? Why this mark of blood upon his brow?
The form of the Wizard's Daughter, clinging to the neck of Reginald
was that only the remembrance of a dream?
And through the shrubbery which shut him in, came fitful and broken
rays of festival light, and the murmur of musicmusic pealing within
solid wallscame faintly to his ear.
Where am I? he muttered, and placed his hand against his bleeding
brow. Ahit was all a dream. I knew that I would awake at last.
Yet it seems to me, that I heard Reginald call her by the name of
Leola
.
And that I saw her clinging to the neck of Reginald. A troubled dream
nothing more!
A burst of music, mingled with the hum of merry voices, rushed upon
his ear: and at the same moment, a form emerged from the shadows and
drew near his side, and by a ray of broken light, he saw the pale visage
of Rolof Sener. A memory smote the heart of Paul, that he had seen
that Face before. But where?
The Bride has gone to her chamber, said a voice, singular in its
sweetness, And now the young Husband goes to claim his Purchase.
Do you hear the shouts of the marriage guests? Leola is young and
beautifuland married. Or is Sold the word? And the Rich Man who
bought herdo you remember how an hour ago, he smote you on the
forehead,aye, smote the very scar you received in his cause? How he
thrust you from the chamber, and flung you, bleeding and insensible, upon
this sod? Reginald, your friend, did thisan hour agoand now he
goes to claim his Purchase. His footstep is on the thresholdLeola
in the Bridal couch awaits him.
And Paul Ardenheim felt something pressed into his grasp by the
speaker; he clutched it, and raised it until it met a fitful ray; it was a
dagger, with a hilt of iron, and a long blade sharp and glittering.
That door leads to her chamber, whispered Rolof Sener; and Paul
Ardenheim, without a word, went through the narrow door into the
darkness
of the secret chamber, the iron-hilted dagger in his grasp.
As he disappeared, the withered frame of Isaac Van Behmeor
Sir
Ralph Wyttonhurst
, as you willcrept from the bushes, and glided to
Rolof Sener's side, and then sank trembling and prostrate at Rolof Sener's
feet. His pallid face, seen by the wandering rays, was stamped with awe
his hands were clasped, as if in the act of worship  he gazed into
the face of Rolof Sener, and murmured.Satan!
Have no fear, said the sweet voice of Rolof Sener, Paul Ardenheim
is mine, and Paul Ardenheim is gone to bring the precious blood for
which thou dost seek.
Up the dark stairway, dagger in hand, went Paul Ardenheim, and
pressed the spring of the secret door, but in vain. It did not move at his
touch; the mirror was fastened in its place. Then Paul, in the darkness,
laid his hand upon his bleeding hrow, and thrust that hand within his
garment, and felt the fragment of the Broken Coin. Then, as if every
relenting pulse had turned to ice, he pressed his weight against the door;
it yielded without a soundand he crossed the threshold of Leola's
chamber.
A solitary lamp was burning there, and its rays left the statues and the
pictures in twilight shadow, while the Bridal Bed, its white curtains drawn
together, gleamed distinctly on his sightand from those snowy folds, the
sound of murmuring voices met his ear. Leola in the arms of Reginald
Leola in the embrace of the Rich Man, who had bought her with his gold!
Yes, her white robe appeared in the interval of the curtains; her form was
dimly discernible through their folds; she was standing beside the bed,
bending over it, and with an arm around her snowy neck.
Paul stood on the thresholdglanced around for an instantcrossed
the chamber with noiseless steps, and over Leola's shoulder, struck his
dagger into the breast of Reginald, even as he reclined upon the couch.
And then Leola turned to look upon him, and Paul, tearing the curtains
with his frenzied hands, rushed forward, eager to catch the last look of the
dying man. It was too dim; he could not see; he heard Leola's
half-uttered
shriek, but the face and the visage of the Dying was lost in the
shadow.
Then, suddenly a burst of warm radiance filled the placePaul turned,
and by the glad light which gushed through the doorway of the chamber,
saw
Leola
and
Reginald
encircled by the marriage guests. And at the
same time, from the secret door appeared the face of Isaac Van Behme,
quivering with an infernal desirewhile Rolof Sener calm and smiling,
stepped into the room with folded arms.
Paul turned to the Bed once more, and saw the prostrate form, and knew
the ashen face. It was His Father. But this Woman by the bed-side,
whose golden hair waves aside from a face, serenely beautiful, with its
eyes of clear, deep blue, lighted by an Angel's love? It is Catherine.
The sister by the bed gazing into his face, while the Father stricken by
his hand, writhed his last agony!
She took him by the handhis Sisterand pointed to the quivering
features of the old man. He dies, Paul she saidyeshe heard
her voice and livedBut not by your hand. Look! The knife is
buried in the pillow. As you struck, I raised my hand, scarce knowing
why, and turned aside the deadly aim. Away, Paul; this is no time for
explanations; no time for thought. Awaylet not your footsteps pause
until you stand within our Home once more. To the Block-House, Paul,
and when you have rescued the Deliverer, and looked upon your true
Destiny, then I, Catherine, your Sister, will tell you all.
Paul heard her voice, and looked into her eyes, and drank the God-born
Thought, which gave them light. For a moment he lingered to press his
Sister's hand to his lips,even as a Catholic might the marble hand of a
sculptured Mary, mother of the Lordand then with an agitated
countenance
,
but with eyes radiant with a holy Resolve, he turned away, and
passed through the door, passed between the forms of Leola and Reginald
without a glance, without a word.
The rest of the events of that nightare they not written in the
chronicles of Mount Sepulchre? Some day we will again take up the
Record, and from the mysterious cyphers translate the history of Paul;
Leola; Reginald: of Madeline and Gilbert, and of the dread Ranulph,
whose corpse-like visage, Paul beheld in the shadows of the Sealed
Chamber. But now, we linger only for a parting word
As Paul crossed the threshold, Rolof Sener rushed to the Bed,saw
that the dagger was harmlessand then with a livid face approached
Reginald, even as Leola, pale and beautiful, hung on his arm:
Behold the Son of Gaspard-Michael! he cried and pointed to the
retreating
form of Paul Ardenheim.
And Catherine kneeling by the bed, and pressing her Father's death
chilled hands within her own, lifted up her eyes and voice to Heaven,
and thanked the God of all life, that the Malice of Satan, his intricate
plans and infernal cunning, all had been brought to nothing, conquered
and crushed by the instinct of a Sister's Love.
END OF BOOK SECOND.
EPILOGUE.
A WORD TO THE READER.
Thus
far have we progressed in our translation of the Ancient
Manuscripts
,
which record in their peculiar Cypher, the history of Paul
Ardenheim
the Monk of Wissahikon. Much we have written, and yet at the
present moment we have scarcely passed the threshold of that history.
We have seen the fearful education of Paul Ardenheim's Soul; we have
seen it writhing into shape, in scenes of temptation and despair. We
have yet to look upon that Soul, in its matured vigor, embodied in deeds,
at once generous and sublime. What pen shall dare attempt the
portraiture
of the
entire life
of Paul Ardenheim, and trace him step by step from
the chamber of Leola to his grave? Step by step through the American
Revolution, among scenes which written History has blazoned to the
world, and among scenes which still slumber, dumb and unrecorded, in
the charnels of the Past? What hand shall dare to lift the curtain, and
reveal Paul Ardenheim gliding like a Ghostlike an embodied Fate
through the incredible horrors and gloomy triumphs of the French
Revolution
?
For glancing over the untranslated volumes, which in their
difficult
Cypher, enshroud these Legends of a past age, we read the name of
the Monk of Wissahikon, not only in connection with the history of
Washington and the New World; but also on the red page, which tells
of the Old World in travail for its freedom with Robespierre the Messiah
of Blood, presiding over its glorious agonies. At the present moment,
neither our time, nor the limits of this work permit us to translate the
entire
life of Paul Ardenheim; and array its various and mysterious
incidents
in the familiar garb of every-day speech. And yet, at this moment,
when we are about to part after journeying together so long, it is in my
heart, Reader, to speak a word to you. Let us talk together like two
friends, who after traversing many a hill and valleyside by side, in storm
and calmattain the last hill-top, and linger for a moment, with their eyes
fixed upon the wide landscape of their pilgrimage. Like friends, I say,
let us talk together, and say a frank word to each other. It is not for me,
now, to attempt to explain the mysteries of the present work; many things
in its pages, which appear dark and obscure, might easily be made plain
as sunlight, by a simple reference to that great science of the Soul, whiel,
in our day is called Magnetism. But for the present, I will not attempt
any explanation of these mysteries; in a future work I may lift the veil
from all that now appears incredible in the history of Paul Ardenheim.
But this work is Improbableits events are wildunnaturalthe very
machinery of the story is based upon supernatural agency!' To
objections
like these, I might answer, in a frank and confidential way, my
friend:
`Truth is stranger than Fiction. Wherefore? Because Fiction only
revels and glows in the Probable, while Truth in her noblest form, dares
and conquers the Impossible. Was ever Fiction so wild, so romantic, so
utterly defiant of all your rules of criticism, as the actual life of Napoleon
Bonaparte. Fiction in its present form as displayed in the poems and
novels of the present day, does not present extravagant views of life, or
paint pictures that transcend probability; its delineations, or the contrary,
are only extravagant in their tameness, and transcendant in their
mathematical
probability. The truest of true histories never look at first sight,
like Truth. Tell a man of Franklin's day, that a time would comewas
coming, and the boy of ten years old might live to see itwhen carriages
would go by themselves; when ships would cross the ocean without
sails; when a man in Boston would converse with his friend in New
Orleans, by means of a wire stretched along an infinitude of poles! Ten
chances to one, but Dr. Franklin himself would have put you out of his
office, for assertions wild as these: without a doubt, any one of Dr.
Franklin's
neighbors would have quelled your lunacy in a mad-house. The
veriest man of
common-sense
of Franklin's day,the merest gossip of
a neighborhood, or a newspaper could have told you, that your brain was
mad, your skull soft, your blood red-hot with fever.
How many years is it since a crowd of our most respectable citizens
men of common-sense, mark younone of your vague dreamers, but
substantial
men, familiar with business, and eloquent in bank notesstood
laughing and jeering on a Philadelphia wharf, while crazy John Fitch
attempted
to propel a boat without sails; merely by the aid of paddles and
steam? Poor John Fitch, how they pitied him, these men of
Matter-of-Fact
!
He starved to death, while his Folly that is the boat intended
to be propelled by the agency of paddles and steamrotted snugly in
some muddy hole, near Kensington. And now, the steamboat which was
John Fitch's folly, has become Robert Fulton's fame; and the steam car,
and Magnetic Telegraph, which in Franklin's day, would have scared a
whole church of `common sense' men into spasms, are admitted to exist,
even by the most respectable newspapers.
`The Thing, we deem Improbable, my friend, is many a time just the
thing, about which we know preciselynothing. Everything great in
science, history or religion, has at first view been
the most improbable
thing in the world
. Paul was mad when he spoke of Brotherhood among
men; Galileo mad wen he said the earth moved round the sun;
Washington
mad when he said that he could defeat the tyranny of an Anointed
King.
`The rule that is good in history, science and religion, is also true in
literature. Mad Paradise Lostmad Childe Haroldmad Zanone! All
three mad at the time of their publication, and their respective authors,
worthy of nothing so much as a dark cell, with shower baths and straight
jackets innumerable.
`If works like these have been called mad! and their authors
assailed
as either harmless idiots or malignant demoniacs, how shall a poor
author
like your humble friend, ever summon courage, to writeto print a
book like Paul Ardenheim?
`Now I do not claim for the present work, that the incidents, which it
embodies, occurred precisely, at the time and place, as they are set down;
but I
do
claim for these incidents, that they are true to the springs of human
actiontrue to the secret history of the heart of mantrue to the feelings,
which sway mankind, in all ages and in every clime.
`At the same time these incidents are utterly improbable. They are
altogether impossible. The author, grown reckless of the critical stilleto,
out-herodsherod, out-horrorshorror; he prides himself on having
written
the most improbable book in the world
.
`The critics who expect to `use up' (in our own choice language) this
book and its author, will find all their thunder stolen before hand. Their
withering sarcasms about Monk Lewis, Mrs. Radcliffe, works of
the French school, etc. etc. will not avail them in this case. They will
have to invent a new vocabulary of slang, and become familiar, with
something
more venemous even than their souls, in order to abuse a book,
which stares them in the face, with its mottoTHE MOST IMPROBABLE
BOOK IN THE WORLD.
`The very title of the work will appal the writings of the small papers,
and shock into spasms, the portentous thugs of the Magazines. The
Monk of the Wissahikon! This author is at his old tricks again; he
wrote the Monks of Monk-Hall, and now he writes the Monk of
Wissahikon
.
Will he never have done with monks? Who ever heard of Monks
on the Wissahikon, or if you come to that, what is the Wissahikon, but
an obscure mill-stream, hidden somewhere among big hills? Will he
never have done with horrors? He wrote the Legends of the Revolution
we all know that the Revolution is past and goneour people demand
something more
practical
than this worn-out matter of the Revolution, and
all that sort o' thing. He crowds his pages with horror; skeletons;
corpses; daggers; skulls; Monk Lewis is a fool to him in the horrible,
and he distances poor Mrs. Radcliffe in the way of the monstrous.
Besides
his works smack of the French School; a school made infamous by
the licentious George Sand, the profligate Sue, and the unnatural Dumas.
Why does he not attempt something in a quiet vein,
founded on fact
touched with unpretending pathos, and pointing to some impressive moral,
such as the immaculate purity of our banking institutions, or the spotless
integrity of the Corporation which built Girard College, or the
mysterious
query, what ever became of the Funds of the United States Bank?
`There, my friend, you have ita
critique
ready mad and at the
service
of any gentleman, connected with the critical department of our
literature
.
Or, should your taste, incline to those delectable productions, which
adorn the `
literary
' papers, under the head of `
burlesque of Mr.
'S
style
,' let me give you an idea, how this peculiar kind of literature is
elaborated. Take the purest thought that ever flowed from an author's
penbreak it into short paragraphsarray it in all the garniture of big
capitals and marks of admirationslime it well, with some choice
obscenity
,
and your work is done. The author is burlesqued. He is put
down. These writers of `burlesques' are terrible fellows. I remember
one of the select band, who made capital fun out of the Death Scene of
Nathan Hale; he grew quite merry over the dying struggles of the
Martyr
and Hero, and by a clever piece of wit, turned the last sigh, which
came from his livid lips, into a laughable joke? The peculiar wit of these
gentlemen is never so vivacious, as when it capers about, over the bones
of the deadit is quite boisterous, in its laughter, when it mounts the
Altar of Religion, and slavers its obscenity there. It can take up any
passage of the Bible, and with its free, lively vein, write Divinity into a
jest, and mock the last hour of the Dying Redeemer, with a freedom of
manner and an elevation of tone, worthy of the thief, who scoffed his God,
anddied blaspheming. Indeed things like this, have been done, in more
than one case by able criticswithering burlesque writers, precisely
of the same class, as the respectable gentlemen who figure in certain of our
newspapers and magazines.'
`But why mention these persons,' I hear you exclaim`Do you expect
to impress their natures, with any such ideas, as the purity of woman;
the good in the heart of universal man; the divine lesson of Brotherhood,
as displayed in the life of the Redeemer?'
`No, my friend. I expect nothing of the kind. And on reflection I am
sorry that I have blotted this page, with even the mention of these
common
stabbers.But now, let me turn to you, my friend, and thank you
for your generous sympathy with my labors. I have never seen your
face; have never taken you by the hand. And yet, as I sit in the
loneliness
of my room, writing these closing words, I cannot,even if I would
repress the throb that pulsates at my heart, when I reflect, that you are
my friend. A friend neither bought with money, nor won by baseness;
but gathered to my heart, by pages like these, which I now send forth to
you. Pages, written amid various circumstances; amid the clamor of
slander, or by `
the light of a candle held in the skeleton hand of Poverty
,'
but which still I hope, are true to the best instincts of humanity.And
so, our familiar talk is over, and I once more glance into the pages of the
Ancient Record, where I chronicled, an incident of some interest in the
life of the Monk of Wissahikon:
One night, in a miserable garret, hidden away in some obscure
faubourg
of the great city of Paris, there sat a lonely student, keeping the
vigil of his thought, and even as he gazed with his vacant eyes, upon the
flame of the expiring candle, tracing absently upon a sheet of paper, his
unknown name, `
Maximilien Robespierre
.' And even as he sat there,
so sad and lonely, with half-formed thought, glimmering in his vacant
glance, there appeared to him a stranger, whose face was impressed with
a Sorrow unutterable. And he took the lonely youth by the hand, and
told him of his Future, and pointed him to a path, which covered with
blood, and strewn with crowns and thornes, ended at the foot of the
Guillotine
.
`This path you will walkyonder King you will killand at
last your stern mission accomplished, you will die abhorred upon your
own Guillotine.' And the Boy-Student trembled at the prophecy of the
unknown, who passed from the place ere his last word, had ceased to
echo, but left the record of his name, beneath the name already written.
The names together read thus`
Maximilien Robespierre
* * * `
Paul
Ardemheim
.'
THE END.Sunset,
December 31, 1774.
My Son
In case the hope, in which I have lived for seventeen years, proves
false, and the Deliverer for whom we have waited in Prayer, for so many
years, does not comeeven then, Paul, it is my purpose to fulfil, with
regard to you, the command of the Lord. From your infancy you have
been devoted to God. You have been sacred from the world, set apart
from the faces of men. The relentless lust of traffic, the feverish desires
of ambition, the hollow sophistries and cold selfishness of the great world,
have not polluted your virgin intellect. You have bloomed into life in
the wildernessa life, pure and serene as the stars. Therefore, to-morrow,
at the hour of sunset, I will fulfil the purpose of my heart, and solemnly
dedicate you to God.
Behold the manner of this dedication.
The upper rooms of our mansion you have never seen. They are
sealed to all human eyes, and have been for years. But when you
traverse
the corridor which extends between those rooms, you will read on
those closed doors, the names of AnselmJosephImmanuel.
These were my brothers, not in the flesh, but in the spirit. With me
they left Germany,left house and home,and we came into the
wilderness
together. Together, in these woods, we reared the altar of our
Brotherhood. Our creed was simpleLove to Man is Love to God.
While you were but a child, and Catherine scarcely a babe of two
years, they died, these brothers of my heart, and left me alone in the old
mansion. In their death-hour, I vowed a solemn vow that you and
Catherine
should be devoted to the great work of our Religion. I vowed it,
clasping their chilled hands, with their glassy eyes fixed upon mevowed
it to each one as he sunk back in the wave of death. A month or more
intervened between their deathsin the space of half a year they all
were gathered to the grave.
To-morrow I will solemnly dedicate you to the work which those
brothers loved all their lives, and clung to with unfaltering faith in the
hour of death.
You will be called upon, first of all, to take this vowIn the presence
of God, and surrounded by the skeletons of the Brothers of the good
cause, I do vow to devote all my efforts, to bend my life, my intellect,
my wealth, to the progress of that cause.
And in order that my strength may not be weakened, my heart clogged,
or my brain clouded by any tie of earth, or taint of earthly passion, I do
further solemnly vow, in the presence of the dead, never to contract
marriage
,
nor to look upon a woman with the eye of sensual love. My only
bride shall be the good causemy only hope and aim in life, its final
success.
Are you ready for this vow, my son? Let your time be passed in
Prayer, so that the hour of sunset to-morrow does not find you
unprepared
.
Your Father
.Midnight, December 31, 1774.
To Paul, Baron of Ardenheim:
Thou seekest to know. Enter the door with the Cross upon its
panels. Search the Urn. The Past and future will be opened to thee.After midnight, January 1st, 1775.
My Son
Within an hour I will exact from you a Promise and an Oath. The
Promiseyou are not to enter this chamber, nor place your hand within
this Urn, until a year has passed.
The Oathyou will not enter the chamber whose panel bears the sign
of the Cross, until I am dead, under peril of a father's curse and the guilt
of the Unpardonable Sin.
Before you look upon the name of the Deliverer, you will be made
acquainted with the Secret of the Sealed Chamber, which involves your
Destiny and mine.
Within a year I will be dead. At the hour of my death, you will enter
the Sealed Chamber; one year from to-day you will enter the Chamber
of the Urn. Thus you can obey your promise, your oath, and at the same
time learn within a year, the Secret of the Sealed Chamber and the Name
of the Deliverer.
That brief year rolls awayit is the appointed hour. * * * It is the
first of January, 1776. * * *
You have broken the sealthe letter which contains the narrow strip
of paper, on which the Deliverer wrote his name, is in your hand.
At this moment, my son, I charge theeRemember the vow which thou
didst take upon thy soul, when thou wert initiated into the brotherhood
of the R. C., on the night of the first of January, 1775.
Remember the words written in the Chambers of the Brothers, Anselm,
Joseph, Immanuel.
Has the Lead indeed become Gold with thee, and hath the Sneer in truth
been changed into a Smile? Hast thou forced the Heart to reveal by
boldly
grasping the Hand?
Hast thou discovered at the feet of the Imprisoned, the D
Hast thou, in a word, learned the truth embodied in these enigmas, and
seen Union lead to Freedom, and Freedom end in Brotherhood?
Hast thou, in the Chapel of the R. C., beheld the Altar, the Bowl, and
the Book, and been nerved by their memories for the great task which
awaits thee?
Then thou art indeed prepared to read the name of the Deliverer; but
not until these mysteries are to thy soul as the sunlight is to thine eyes,
shalt thou break the seal which conceals that name.
Your Father
.To the King
At twelve to-night. The placethe Block House of the
Wissahikon
.
You pursue this lane, cross the stream, and then turn to the right.
It is but little more than half a mile from the place where you will find
these words
.To Madeline
!
Do not tremble, fair girl, when you behold the name, written beneath
these lines! It is, Iit is Reginald,who sought your love, under a
cowardly disguise, and sought to lure you to dishonor, on the fatal New
Year's morning of 1775. And Reginald, repenting of the crime, now
seeks to make atonement, and thus deserves your forgiveness.
Forgive me Madeline. The dream of passion, has passed away. I no
longer look upon you with the gaze of an unholy love. You are to me,
as something set apart from the crimes and woes of this mortal lifeyou
are, to me, as pure, as distant, as unapproachable, as the evening star,
which trembles serenely on the sunset horizonas a Saint enthroned in
Heaven, to whom we may present our prayers, but whose sanctity repels
the idea of earthly passion.
I seek to atone for the past. Will you listen, Madeline,can you
forgive
?
Come to Wissahikon, Madeline; my servant who bears this note,
will lead you to the appointed place, where your hand will be joined with
the hand of your plighted Husband, Gilbert Morgan. This is the
atonement
which I would make; Gilbert is my friend; and believe me your,
Lover no longerbut Brother,
Reginald Lyndulfe
.`Rolof:
`The plan is good; the project itself confers immortal honor on its
originator. The Army of His Majesty is now in Jersey, as you are aware,
advancing toward the Delaware; the object of the General being the
possession
of Philadelphia. But the project will pay us for a thousand
Philadelphias
;
will end the war, in fact, and bring the revolted colonies to the
foot of the throne. I will be in * * * * * * * * * * at the appointed time, and
at the place you designate. Let your messenger meet me there, with a
line from you, in your own hand, which I will take as a token to go
forward
.
You will have time to perfect your understanding with our friends
in Philadelphia; we can seize HIM away from HIS camp; conceal HIM for
a few days in Philadelphia, andthe war is at an end'Alice
Should these lines, traced with a hand, fevered by disease ever
meet your eyes, you will learn something of the fate of your poor friend,
Cath............
the day when our ship was boarded by pirates, who threatened to
dismantle
it, and consign every soul to the waves, unless `the person and property
of Lady Alice, wife of Right Hon. Clarence Albert Lyndulfe was
surrendered
to them'..........
........ scene which ensued..
.. my poor husband, John Conwell, had died the week before,.
. a poor lieutenant on half pay.. widow a beggar.
. had received kindness at your husband's hands, while in the
West Indies, and....... I was alone in
the world; your life was valuable.......
..... notwithstanding your entreaties, I assumed your
dress, ornaments, etc., and some personal resemblance aided my disguise.
..............
..............
..............
. from the decks of the pirate vessel I saw the Artemesia on her.
way.............
......... concealed for a month or
more in the City of Philadelphia, and now am a prisoner in a house,
in the midst of a forest; how far from the city I know not
.
To day my persecutors came; they had searched your chests, but
without
finding the gold or the papers for which they sought. They assailed
me with threats, and demanded of me, either the gold plate, or papers, or
they said my life..........
from their broken hints, I imagine that yaur husband was in some
measure
,
connected with an attempt to destroy this terrible organizotion.
..............
papers containing matter sufficient to put, in peril the lives of many noble
and wealthy persons, not only in England, but in the Colonies, were
contained
in the chest, entrusted by your husband to the Captain of the
Artemesia
..........
........ slave traffic and
pir........
..........
a hope of deliverance dawns upon me! A poor negro, whom I saw on
board of the pirate ship, and whom my husband, had rescued a year ago,
from a severe punishment, in Jamaica, has followed me, discovered the
place of my concealment, and it is to his hands that I entrust this let
.
..........
..........
...
and O! Alice! if the child that now throbs within me,
ever should see the light, to you and to yours I dedicate...
.............
..... be called, Madeline
.....
Catheline Con